012 - Oh, hello.
It's you again.
You've come back for more?
I didn't manage to put you off with the horrors I put you through yesterday.
You're back for more with day two of LM engineering.
Welcome, welcome, welcome.
I promise an easier day today than yesterday.
I will always start each of these with a recap on what we did on the previous day, and what's to come
so you can get used to this.
It's a bit of repetition, but repetition is good sometimes.
Already we have played with Olama and got used to different open source models.
We've written code to call open AI.
Maybe you didn't.
If you're holding back on having that key and you're ready for something new today, which we will do.
You've learned the difference between a system prompt and a user prompt.
And we did a summarization use case, a core gen AI use case that we built on the very first day.
And today we're going to go through the building blocks, the steps it takes to get from where you are
now to where you will be in LM engineering master and recognizing frontier models, the different kinds
of frontier models, what that means and how to use them.
Let's get into it.
So look, the first thing I want to say is that this is predominantly a practical course.
This is about getting stuff done.
I do teach some theory, but I like to do it in the context of the practice of putting things into action.
I am here to to allow you to deliver commercial impact through LMS.
Whether you work at a startup, whether you're an entrepreneur and you want to start a startup, or
whether you work at a fortune 500 enterprise or anywhere in between, the goal of these sessions is
to teach you how to use LMS in order to have commercial gain, so please always keep that perspective.
I'm a practical person.
I think that the best way to learn is by doing, and doing is what I have in store for you.
And there are going to be these three different dimensions, these three different factors to LM engineering
that we will build on.
One of them is the models themselves, and I mentioned this yesterday, I mentioned that bottom layer,
the models open source closed source.
We'll look at multimodal models that generate images and audio.
The architecture of models and importantly, how you select the right model for a particular task at
hand.
We're going to then build on top of models by looking at different tools, frameworks, libraries,
things like the fabulous hugging face which which you will get to love.
Long chain gradio.
Weights and biases.
Modal.
And then on top of this are different techniques that you can apply.
Taking advantage of these libraries and using these models techniques like calling APIs, which we've
already done Multi-shot prompting is an easy one, is a very juicy one fine tuning a powerful one,
and agent ization a genetic AI.
You don't get bigger than that.
That is the hottest topic of all right now.
And so I've designed this course to appeal to many different levels of background.
No matter what your expertise is you're coming to this with, there will be something here to appeal
to you, but you might find some parts are too easy if you're experienced, in which case, hang in
there.
Speed me up.
Put me on 2X2X right now and we'll quickly get to meaty projects very soon.
you might find some parts are too hard for you, particularly if you're completely new to this field.
And one thing to know is that all of us, every single person, one thing we all have in common is that
at some point we've all been new.
And so we know exactly how it feels.
I've written a bunch of self-study guides in the guides folder.
Please spend time with them.
They really will help prep you.
I do believe that you can learn everything from those self-study guides, and I've had people complete
the whole LM engineering course who came at this with zero programming experience.
It's not ideal.
We do.
I do aim this primarily for someone with some coding experience, but you can come in completely raw,
learn from self-study guides and you'll be successful.
Many people have looked at the guides, ask me for help and take things slowly, carefully, work through
the practicals, add in print statements and above all, don't worry if you don't get it right away,
it doesn't matter.
Get some intuition.
Keep moving on.
You can always come back.
You can, you can.
Some people have actually watched all the videos and then come back a second time and gone through much
more carefully.
If that works for your style, then that's a great idea.
But otherwise you can just work through it slowly the first time.
But if it feels just right, if I've got it just right, wonderful, then keep going.
So the ideal background to come into this course is someone who has intermediate level Python experience,
and if you have that, then you're in really great shape.
If you look at this line of code and you know what that does basically give or take, then fantastic.
If not, don't worry.
As I say, I've got great background material.
You can either look at the beginner Python guide or the intermediate Python guide, or both, and get
to a point where you feel pretty comfortable and you can pick stuff up as you go.
And you know what?
Llms are amazing at this cursor is great.
It will fill in most things for you, and it can explain any line and what it does and it can help you
with it.
So with things like what I've got going on here, like a generator and a set comprehension, that kind
of stuff, it can explain it all.
It's fancy Python stuff.
But I tell you, when you see how it works, it's all pretty easy.
All right?
And there's some tricks to get the very most out of the next eight weeks that you and I are going to
spend together to get the most out of it.
First of all, do follow along with the coding.
It's often better to watch watch me do do a video, watch me talk through it, and then come back and
do it yourself.
Once you know what to expect.
Now, I know some people dislike the way that I don't often just type out the code.
Most of the time I have the code there and expect you to run it.
It's a style.
I find that it's very productive and it allows you to learn a lot quickly.
Typing everything.
In these days with AI tools, it's just not necessary.
It's more important to understand what the code does and to be able to change it.
Now, if you want, you can start a fresh notebook and type from scratch if you prefer that.
And some people do learn best by by typing.
And sometimes I do that myself.
When I'm learning things, it can help, but most of the time I would urge you look at the code, understand
it, change it, add in print statements, mess with it in some way, and see how you can experiment
with it.
That, I think is the best way to learn.
And that's why I like to drive these labs and then do complete the exercises that I've got in the labs.
And you should be making those changes and then pushing it to your own GitHub so that you've got examples
of codes and solutions.
And you can also make these changes and submit what's called a PR, a pull request, so that I can merge
in your changes, as I mentioned yesterday.
And there's instructions on that in the guides.
If you're new to that, make sure that you apply the examples that I give to your business, or to some
idea you've had about how you can apply it to something you work in.
The best kinds of ways to apply these things is to something that feels personal to you.
One person on the course that it just blew my mind.
He had an elderly relative who was having problems renewing his his medications because he was losing
track of the different refills, the different pharmacies.
And the student wrote a tool, an LM based app that helped his relative to know when to schedule, which
refills with which pharmacy and the dependencies between them, and so on.
And it was so cool.
And he posted it about it.
And of course it got lots of attention because it was very personal and it was real and tangible, and
it solved a concrete problem for the student and his relative.
That's the kind of thing you want to look for, ways that you can take what I do and apply it either
to your personal situation or to your work, your professional life, and make something that's specific
to you.
And then when you've done something like that, or when you've done any of the exercises or anything
that feels like you've made progress on your journey or just discovered something or had some insight
that you think is interesting or an experiment, post about it on LinkedIn.
Make a post if you wish.
If you're comfortable, and tag me in the post and make it relevant in some way so that I can then come
in and weigh in and say, you know, this is great.
This is this is why it's important, and so on.
And in doing so, when I do that, of course, LinkedIn makes sure that that gets then shown to all
the people that I'm connected with that are in large part other students on this course.
And that helps amplify the work you're doing.
Other people will weigh in.
And similarly, if you're on LinkedIn and you see that I've posted about some other student doing something,
then please do weigh in because it's so helpful.
It helps build up the community.
It gives attention to all, all of you and everyone's contributions.
And it means that when people are looking, perhaps, perhaps it's a future client of yours, perhaps
a future employer of yours, a future boss.
They will see this kind of action.
They will.
They will be aware of your expertise and of the impact you're making, and it just helps to promote
your visibility.
So.
So please do do that.
And most importantly, stick at it.
I, I really do say that that even if there's times when you feel like you're not following it, or
there's times when you feel that's not as relevant to me, maybe speed me up, but just stay the course,
get to the end.
It's eight weeks we're going to spend together.
By the end of it you will have mastered LM engineering.
It's going to be worth it.
Hang on in there.
Let's get through it.
Keep me posted on the journey.
If you have any problems, reach out to me.
I always reply and I'm always quick.
All right, let's keep going.
013 - So I already covered this yesterday.
But one more time I want to tell you about the eight weeks I have in store for you because they're so
great.
The first week this week we're here on the left.
The first week is about the foundations and the thing called the Chat Completions API, which you already
experienced yesterday.
OpenAI.
That's this week.
Next week is about looking at a ton of different frontier models, calling their APIs, getting super
comfortable with APIs, and then hopefully I'll slip in there some things for the pros so that there'll
be some new new information to to give give you some some extra juice.
And we'll also look at things like multimodality.
We're going to have such a cool project for you to see that week three is when we go deep on open source.
So whilst we've used llama so far already to use open source models, we're going to use Hugging Face
and I'll explain the differences and we'll be building some cool open source projects.
Week four is when I cover this super important topic of how do you pick the right LLM?
And we will also use Llms to generate code or to port code.
And an interesting project.
Week five is Rag.
Now I know you're super interested in Rag.
Everybody is.
I do advise you not to skip ahead to week five because you'll miss out on lots of great stuff.
Um, but but week five will be fun, and we're going to create a knowledge worker expert that is able
to read through tons of documents and answer knowledgeably about them, which is a very important commercial
use case.
Week six is when we start to work on fine tuning.
But week six is also a core data science week, when we will work with data and we will work with scrubbing
data sets, data curation.
It's stuff that I absolutely love, but I know a lot of people don't don't like it as much, but I really
enjoy it.
I hope you will too.
It's going to be very interesting.
Week seven is the shocking week, the shocking week with a ridiculous outcome that that, uh, hopefully
you won't be expecting.
I shouldn't give give the game away, but it's when we fine tune an open source model, uh, to, to
achieve, to do a business task of our own.
And week eight is when we bring everything together.
It really pulls together many of the prior weeks.
And we build in a genetic platform, and it solves a commercial problem, and we go out with a bang.
And that at the end of those eight weeks, you will be able to say, I am an LM engineer.
That's the plan.
And in a cheap move to keep you engaged all the way through, I've definitely been sure to to sprinkle
interesting content all the way through.
There'll be tools and resources.
There's going to be basically a code cookbook.
I will leave you with sections of the code that you'll be able to use in your own projects.
But most of all, I've left the best till the end, and there's no point in skipping ahead to it because
it builds on everything that came before it.
So I uses trickery to get you to stay engaged and see it through to the bitter end.
014 - Now, you'll be pleased to hear that today isn't entirely admin and logistics.
We're going to cover a topic and then we're going to do a lab.
So the topic I want to talk to you about is models themselves LMS, the things that that generate content,
the things that do generative AI and they are the best ones on the planet are sometimes known as Frontier
models, frontier LMS.
And they're created by companies that we call the Frontier Labs.
And that's an informal word.
There's not a strict definition of frontier.
It just tends to mean the really big companies and their models.
Now typically when you talk about frontier models, you're referring to the closed source models, the
models which you have to pay to use because a company like OpenAI spent hundreds of millions of dollars
training their models, and they need to get back that money, and it costs a lot of money to run them
because they're enormous.
So those models are sometimes called closed source models.
And and frontier Models is another name for them or closed source frontier models.
And then contrasting with that, there are open source models Models made by companies like like meta,
Facebook that made a range of models called llama that are open source.
And these are models that you can access and run yourself.
The people who feel strongly about this stuff sometimes say that they're not really open source.
They are open weight because meta has made available all of the weights of the model, but they haven't
necessarily made available the training data and methodologies that was used to build the model.
But still, we tend to call them open source models.
And when you use the word frontier, it's most common to only be referring to the closed source ones.
But sometimes people say frontier and they're also referring to open source.
It can be used in either context.
So just just stay aware of the context when someone uses a word like frontier model.
But most of the time when I say frontier, I'm talking about the big closed source models.
Hope that all makes sense.
Let's talk about some closed source models, and the first one will not surprise you in the least.
OpenAI, the most famous AI lab on the planet, made the most famous model on the planet GPT.
And of course, it all hit everyone's radar when GPT when ChatGPT came out, uh, which was GPT 3.5.
If you're keeping count in, what, November 2022 around then and ChatGPT, of course, uh, really
moved the needle.
That really changed our perception on what these models were able to do.
And since then, OpenAI has released many more of these.
GPT right now, for me, we're on GPT five.
Maybe by the time you watch this, there's another version.
But GPT five is the latest.
And along the way, they also came out with a different range of models called the oh models.
010304 mini.
Um, but now the oh range and GPT range have converged.
And GPT five is a kind of combination of both.
And we'll cover more of that another time.
But that is GPT from OpenAI, the most famous model and the most famous lab on the planet.
And the next model to mention is, of course, OpenAI's mortal enemies, anthropic and their models,
called Claude and anthropic is also a West Coast US start up.
It was founded by people that used to work at OpenAI.
The OpenAI turncoats that started the big rival, anthropic.
And Claude is the model that a lot of people in the industry love to love.
Claude is my favorite and many people's favorite.
Claude, of course, comes in different varieties.
The very small version is called haiku, the middle version is called sonnet and the bigger version
is called opus.
But sonnet also happens to be right now the most powerful one.
Right now for me, we're on Claude 4.5 sonnet, and it is very, very powerful.
And it's kind of neck and neck with GPT five, as we will see.
But Claude, very powerful model.
It's also, of course, the model behind Claude code, the coding agent platform.
And Claude Claude is great fun to work with.
And of course, we'll spend a lot of time with Claude on this course.
And Gemini is Google's model.
And Gemini, of course, is the big closed source version of Jama, the open source model that we played
with yesterday.
Gemini.
It's it's fascinating that Google began this game very much at the back of the pack.
They were late to the party.
Do you remember Bard?
Bard was Google's early model.
That was something.
They were a laughing stock for Bard.
It was just awful, and a lot of people predicted that they'd left it too late, that they weren't going
to be able to catch up with OpenAI and anthropic, but Google absolutely caught up.
The Gemini, the latest one for me is Gemini 2.5 Pro, but Gemini three is poised to be released any
day now.
I'm kind of hoping it's going to be released while I record these videos.
You're going to get like a live reaction moment.
Uh, but Gemini three, a lot of excitement for that.
If you've already got it, don't worry, I'll have updated the labs.
You'll be able to use Gemini three instead of I'll be stuck on Gemini 2.5, but Gemini.
Amazing set of models.
Also, Google has made a lot of the smaller versions of it available for free for students, so you
might in your region be able to get a deal to get a cheap or even free version of Gemini.
So that also goes down well with lots of people.
That is Gemini from Google.
And is there a fourth one to mention?
Is there?
Of course there's a fourth one to mention.
I know you know the fourth one.
And you're like, oh, what about.
Yes, yes, yes.
There is of course grok.
Grok with a K from Elon Musk from X.ai.
A lot of people love grok for various reasons, and we will cover, uh, and grok is definitely the
sort of the fourth of the big four.
And of course, there are a bunch of other big frontier models.
There's the model that sits behind perplexity that I know is popular, lots of people.
There's the one that the Cohere Canadian company has, um, there's, I guess, uh, Mistral, the French
AI company, has both a closed source and an open source model.
So so that's another one.
So there's lots of others in the kind of next tier.
But these are the big four.
These are the ones that grab the headlines.
And we'll be using all four during the course.
But but you don't need to have uh keys to all of them.
You can watch me doing them.
Uh, but we will get to use them all and compare them.
And we will find out in week four how you pick the right one for your task.
So that is the closed source.
Let's talk about open source.
015 - And now to talk about the open source side of the picture.
Some people might still call these frontier models, but I tend to reserve that for closed source.
So the open source guys, the first and foremost would be meta with their llama series of models.
And really, meta was the first company to go out there and open source their models in In Anger.
It's possible one might.
If you're being uncharitable, you might say that meta felt like they had they had slipped.
They hadn't been able to keep up with OpenAI and anthropic in terms of being in the headlines for having
the strongest models on the planet.
And so they were looking for a way to really set themselves apart, and they took their stance that
AI models should be open source and they open source llama.
And as a result, everyone talks about meta as being one of the the leaders in the field because they
have promoted open source AI.
So, you know, maybe it was an intentional ploy to keep the headlines, but for whatever, whatever
it's worth, they've been very successful.
Everyone uses Lama will use a lot on the course and it's a fabulous model.
Lama for right now is the biggest, most powerful one that they have open sourced.
But also Lama 3.2 is particularly notable.
And you might have discovered this yourself because it comes in very small varieties.
And as a result, it's easy to run it on your local computer.
Lama 3.2 comes in a 1,000,000,003 billion size, both nice and convenient to run locally.
And sometimes people call these things SL instead of LM, a small language model instead of an LM,
but really with 3 billion parameters, it's still pretty large.
So that's Lama 3.2, which is the small one, which is super popular, and Lama four is the bigger one,
Lama from meta and then Mistral, the French company has come up with a bunch of open source models.
One of them is called Mistral because it's a type of model called a mixture of experts, which means
that it has lots of smaller models within it, and it directs traffic to different specialist models
depending on the kind of question you're asking.
So that's Mick's trial.
Quinn is a model or a set of models from Chinese company Alibaba Cloud, the cloud division of Alibaba.
And Quinn is a remarkably powerful model that I very much enjoy using.
And it's not as well known and as popular as models like llama, but it's really great, and I recommend
that everyone does give Quinn a shot because it's a super powerful and Gemma is the one that we already
looked at.
It is the cousin of Google's Gemini.
It is the open source cousin, and it comes in a lot of different flavors.
And it's most notable for having this absolutely minuscule model with, what was it, 270 million parameters,
which is definitely a small language model.
And it's still I mean, it's not particularly impressive to use it, but it's still able to, to interact
and to, to generate language.
So it's pretty impressive.
And then Fei is Microsoft's range 54 is the latest at the moment as of recording this.
And those are their powerful models, particularly good, I think, with tool calling and with with
commercial work.
And we'll see how to compare all of these, as I say, in week four.
And then the one that everyone loves to talk about is, of course, deep seek from deep seek AI because
it took the world by storm about six months ago and it came out.
And it is important.
I think I already said this.
It's important to keep in mind what it was about deep seek that caused so much excitement.
It wasn't necessarily that it's a super powerful model, because it's not as powerful as as GPT five
and as Claude Sun at 4.5 or even close to it.
What was impressive is that the Deep Seek AI team were able to make a model that is at the frontier
level of capability, but at a fraction of the training cost than OpenAI spent.
OpenAI spent north of $100 million training GPT and Deep Seek.
I think it was about 4 million or something that they said they spent training deep sky.
So it represented this, this huge, this step change in efficiency of being able to build a frontier
level model very quickly and easily.
And they open sourced it, which is amazing.
The main version has 671 billion parameters, so it's way too big to run on your computer.
But they also have made smaller variants of it that you can run locally, that you may have seen when
you were looking at the models on llama.
The way that those are actually built is kind of kind of funny.
It's they're not actually deep seek themselves those smaller variations of deep seek.
They are in fact versions of Llama and Quen, those two models you see earlier up on the list.
They've taken small versions of Llama and Quen, and then they've trained it more with synthetic data
that was generated by the big deep seek.
So again, they used big deep seek to generate lots of fake data, synthetic data from deep seeks training.
And then they've used that to educate these smaller Lama and Shen models.
And that process is known as distillation.
There's actually various different ways of doing distillation, but that's one of them.
And that's what Deep Sea did, and that's how they made various small variants.
And you can use those variants in Lama.
And it's great fun.
They're available for all for free.
And wait, there's one more.
There's just one more open source model to mention.
And you know exactly what it is.
It is, of course, OpenAI's GPT, the open source version of GPT that OpenAI released for me quite
recently, like a month ago or so, six weeks ago.
And it made a big splash.
And people actually say that OpenAI might have done that because their hand was forced by deep sea,
that open sourced this model that was almost at OpenAI's level.
So that's one reason, perhaps, that motivated OpenAI to open sourcing GPT and GPT OS.
It comes in two sizes, the one that we use, the smaller 120 billion.
We used that yesterday.
And then there's a much bigger 120 billion version that's far too big to fit on my computer.
Maybe it fits on your computer, in which case, anytime you want to lend me your computer, that'll
be great.
But it's a very powerful model.
It's very impressive indeed.
And it's remarkable that OpenAI have open sourced it, which means it's also available for free for
any of us.
And one final point to make before we go to the lab, there are these three different ways that we can
use models.
And we'll be using all three of them at various points, but I just want to make sure that you feel
comfortable that there are these three different things, and one of them is using packaged products,
products that have a user interface and have functionality built in.
And the most famous of them is ChatGPT.
It's not you're not using a model, you're using a product.
And it's important to have that distinction.
ChatGPT comes with a user interface.
It comes with features like memory and web search and stuff that's been built into ChatGPT GPT product.
So when you're using it, think of it like it's a product.
It's had some some people have worked on the model behind that, but also some people like you and me,
some AI engineers have built the user interface, the functionality, the the glue that glues a user
experience to a model that's ChatGPT anthropic has it's one two clawed through through the user interface,
and there are a bunch of others.
Then you can call large language models that are running on the cloud using APIs.
So there are ways that you can make a call to an API.
And you can call them directly.
So you can call OpenAI like we did yesterday.
And there are also frameworks that code you can run locally that will manage then calling OpenAI.
And then finally you can also run managed.
You can you can call a service like bedrock from Amazon or vertex from Google, vertex AI or Azure's
ML from Microsoft.
And these are our managed services, which themselves will run these models, and we can call them and
they will call the models.
And there are some other kinds of APIs as well that we'll find out.
There's one super confusingly that's called grok spelt with a Q that is different to Elon Musk's grok
spelt with a k.
So we'll use both grok in due course.
But but watch out for that one too.
That's a different thing.
That is it's basically an ability to run open source models super fast on the cloud using proprietary
hardware.
So we will we will look at that too.
And then there's things like open Router which is very popular, which is a platform which you can connect
to.
And it will then route your requests to many different model providers.
So all of these are different types of cloud APIs being able to call models in the cloud.
And it's you can call closed source and open source models this way.
But there's something else you can do as well.
If you're working with open source models, then you can actually download the code and you can run
the open source model yourself.
Not on the cloud, not through some API, but that you are running it.
And there are many different ways of doing that as well.
But there's two in particular that we'll use on this course, and they're different and it's a bit confusing.
And one of them is Olama and one of them is called the Hugging Face Transformers library.
The hugging face Transformers library is actually the simplest one to explain, because with that you
are just literally taking the code, Python code and C++ code that was used to to write these models.
It's a it's a neural network.
It's a kind of data science model, which is a large language model.
And you run that code yourself in your Python interpreter and and you execute it and you get the outcome.
It is just taking the open source code, taking all of the weights, the billions of weights, and running
it yourself in code that is hugging face and it's hugging face is a is an open source vendor, and the
Transformers library is the there a library that wraps a lot of this code that you can use very easily
yourself?
So that's that's that.
So then what is Olama?
Well, Olama is itself a product to make it very easy to run fixed open source models in a way that's
been packaged and prepared so that in just a couple of steps, like we did yesterday, you can run an
open source model yourself on your computer.
So it's packaged.
It only takes very specific versions of models.
The code has been optimized into very efficient C++, and the weights have been compressed into a special
file called a GIF file.
And you download that onto your computer.
And then you run this product called Olama on your computer.
And that gives you an API locally on your computer.
It's like an API, but you're not calling something out on the cloud, you're just connecting to your
own computer and calling an API there.
And then this Olama product is then running your model in a way that's a bit like hugging face.
It's just more efficient, more packaged, and just focused on a smaller number of models.
The models that you looked at yesterday in the Olama platform.
So that's olama packaged, fast, efficient, uh, platform runs on your computer and provides an API
on your local computer for you to connect to.
And that's the difference between those two.
I hope that makes complete sense.
And that is the third category direct inference of an open source model.
And if you're new to the word inference, inference is a fancy name for saying running a model.
Inference is what you do when you got a model and you've got some new inputs and you want to get the
output, that is called inference.
And we'll be doing a lot of that in the next eight weeks.
And on the subject of inference, I think we should go and do some right now.
I'm going to take you back to cursor, and we're going to do a sort of repeat of yesterday, but we're
going to be able to do it for Olama.
And I'm going to talk a bit more about what's actually happening to give you some more insight into
how this all works.
Let's get to cursor back to the lab.
Let's get building.
016 - Okay, well, here we are, back in cursor, one of my very favorite places to be.
And we're going into the week.
One directory on the left.
Check the LM Engineering's in block caps here.
So you're in the right project.
And then go to day two, which is where we find ourselves right now.
And I need to remind you before you do anything, you have to go to the top right to where it says Select
kernel for you.
You click on that.
You click in the Python Environments option.
The first option you pick the dot VM.
That's Python 3.12 that is matching this VM right here.
And that means your kernel is set.
Welcome to the day two lab.
So I just wanted to mention here before we start that there is a page of resources on my home page and
I've linked to it here.
I'll try and keep adding useful resources.
So do keep that bookmarked.
You can go there and check it out right now if you wish.
Okay okay so we're now going to go back again to doing what we did yesterday, but do it with a little
bit more discipline.
And I want to tell you about this thing called the Chat Completions API.
And this is the name of it's the simplest way that you can call an LLM, particularly a frontier LLM.
And it's called chat completions because it's a nod to what you're actually doing.
When you call an LLM, you're giving it a chat a conversation so far, and you're asking it to predict
the most likely message to come next.
And you can think of that as as like completing a chat.
That's what the LLM thinks it's doing.
It's it's it's like predictive text.
It's just trying to predict the most likely words to come next.
And as a side effect of that, it happens to be really good at answering whatever questions it's asked.
But all it's actually trying to do is to predict the most likely next few words, or as we'll shortly
explain, the most likely next tokens.
Okay, so it was actually this chat completions API.
This this approach was invented by OpenAI first and foremost.
But it was so popular the structure and style of this type of request became so popular that it's become
ubiquitous.
All of the providers offer the Chat Completions API.
It is the kind of standard way to interact with an LLM.
And we're going to start again with OpenAI.
I know some of you are antsy to get off OpenAI and use free models.
Your time is coming any second now.
Just watch this if you don't want to use OpenAI, and we'll get to you in a second.
All right.
So first of all, I'm going to do a repeat of last time where we use this thing called load dot EMV,
which is going to load in the secrets in our EMV file and check that we have OpenAI key set.
So this load EMV function is something which which makes which loads in anything you've saved in your
EMV.
And then we'll just check that the key is good.
It says API key found and it looks good so far.
And if yours doesn't say that, then you know what to do.
Check the EMV, check everything, and look in the look in the troubleshooting and ask me if you get
stuck.
Okay, let's talk about end points.
Now, I imagine most of you know exactly what an end point is.
It's one of those words people throw around all the time.
But you might not.
And for people that don't know about it, you should quickly find out.
I explain it all in the Technical Foundations guide.
There's nothing special at endpoint.
It's an http url which you can call to, to to to make an API request by hitting some web address.
And that web address would be known as an endpoint.
It's a way that you have an API.
But if things like API's and endpoints are new to you, then read that guide.
Okay.
There's an endpoint in particular which might interest you, which I want to show you right now.
And it's an endpoint, an API endpoint offered by open AI.
So in order to call this endpoint, which I will just do, we first have to set a couple of things which
are very common for any HTTP request.
There's HTTP headers, the headers that go down in that request.
You normally you probably if you know anything about web requests.
You specify what content type, what type of thing you want to come back.
And that's a way of saying, I want Jason to come back, please.
And then this is a fairly standard way of, of, of sending down a secret in an HTTP message that authorizes
you, you put in a header called authorization and the value of that header, there's the word bearer
and then a space and then some secret that identifies you to the third party.
And in this case we are going to stuff the OpenAI API key.
The thing that I got just here, we're going to stuff that into the header.
And then I've got something here called payload.
Payload is just a chunk of JSON.
And it's going to be a dictionary a dictionary with two keys.
One of them is model, which is going to be GPT five nano, the tiny version of GPT five.
The latest model, the one of the strongest on the planet right now.
And then the second field in this dictionary has a key of messages.
The value is, you know, this is a list of dictionaries.
It's a list you can see there.
It is a list.
Each dictionary, let's put that on another line, has a key role with value user a key content.
And the value is tell me a fun fact okay.
Nothing special here.
Let's look at this.
Uh, there is the payload JSON.
It's is just what I said.
Model GPT five nano messages, a list of dictionaries, role user content.
Tell me a fun fact.
Okay, that's a chunk of JSON.
Uh, headers and payload.
What we're now going to do is we're going to send that to an endpoint.
This is the endpoint API.
V1.
It's chat completions.
And sometimes when you make a Post request people think of that as like creating a new resource for
people that are like rest, rest people.
Uh, that's that's sometimes called creating a resource.
So you could think of this as being like chat completions create some familiar.
Uh, so chat completions create.
We're passing in our headers with our API key.
And the payload is this JSON blob right here.
So let's run that.
And what comes back is a bunch of JSON.
We asked for JSON back.
Let's see what we get back.
Let's see what kind of JSON we get.
Here it is.
Uh so it's a chunk of JSON as like an ID object, various stuff.
And then it has a field called choices and Choices.
In this response, choices is a list.
And the first item of that choices with index zero is something which has a field message.
And that message is itself a JSON dictionary.
And that has something called content, which is fun fact.
There are possible unique games, more possible unique games of chess than there are atoms in the observable
universe.
About ten to the power of 120 There is a fun fact.
And so that fun fact came back in the JSON response from our call to GPT five to that endpoint, that
URL that I just gave you.
And so there's obviously there's another way I could do this.
Let me get a new code thing here.
Let's say, uh, um, we said response JSON.
That was the JSON that we just were just looking at right up here.
Uh, I spelt response wrong.
That's that's what you get if you make me type Response.json.
So we could say, okay, let's look in the choices field.
I guess it knows what I'm doing here.
Look at the first element in there.
Element index zero at the field message at the field content okay.
You see that.
That's you know what that's going to do.
We're just going to choices the first one message content.
And let's see what that prints.
It prints that that very fun fact of course that we just looked at uh, the more possible unique games
of chess than there are atoms in the observable universe.
Okay, but you know what?
Uh, so so this is a perfectly good way to call OpenAI in the cloud using an HTTP endpoint.
And it's fine.
We could do this.
We could we could always type this.
But it is kind of messy fussing around with JSON, looking in dictionaries at keys and things like that.
It's kind of hokey, and it would be a real pain if every time we wanted to call GPT or any frontier
model, we had to stitch together these HTTP requests, call that slash chat completions with a post
or create and then be be sort of navigating our way through JSON objects like this.
It would be a pain.
It would be nice if there were a better way to do it.
Yes, yes, I know you get the joke.
You know what I'm gonna say?
There is a better way to do it.
And OpenAI created this better way.
They made a package called OpenAI, and that package is what's known as a Python client library.
Python client library is nothing fancy at all.
A Python client library that you often use for APIs all over the place for you.
Name it for APIs, for sending emails, for APIs to do so much.
Um, and these things are typically very lightweight libraries that manufacture an HTTP request to an
endpoint.
And with what comes back, it turns it into Python objects so that you're not messing around with this
kind of stuff with with these, uh, ploughing your way through JSON dictionaries.
But you can just write some nice, elegant Python code, and that is all the OpenAI library is.
It's a Python client library that wraps a call to an HTTP endpoint.
It's very simple.
It's completely open source.
You can open it, look at it, look at all the code.
It's perfectly simple.
Some people, the first time they come across this, think that when you're dealing with OpenAI, the
object and the code, that somehow we're sort of running GPT and we have some some fancy code from OpenAI.
Not at all.
It's vanilla code that just wraps making a web request.
And we'll we'll quickly use that code now, but it's going to be much more familiar to you.
017 - All right, so I'll do some more typing since since the haters will yell at me if I don't, so I'll
do some typing.
Let's do it the proper way.
Let's create an OpenAI Python client.
You just say OpenAI equals OpenAI.
Oops, like so.
And it by default looks in the uh, in the environment variable OpenAI API key by default if you don't
specify one.
So that's just just hard coded in there.
And I have to say from OpenAI import OpenAI to be able to do that.
Okay.
And now what we're going to say is, uh, response equals I guess it just fills it in.
What's the point in me typing OpenAI chat dot completions dot create.
So that is basically saying I want to go to slash chat completions and I want to do a post request,
which is like doing a create.
And I'm going to pass in like I don't have to manufacture JSON.
I can just say model equals GPT five nano five nano.
Oh, I could just press tab.
You know it.
You know what I'm gonna say?
messages is that list of dictionaries that I passed in right there.
And then instead of this fussy JSON plowing, I can just say response dot choices.
Zero choices, zero dot message content.
And I'm just going through Python fields.
It's actually pedantic object of course, for people that know this stuff.
Uh, and uh, as a result, it's got all of the, all of the nice features of using proper Python methods
and attributes like, like the ID can check, I've spelt it right and things like that.
I'm not just guessing, uh, values to to look into the JSON.
I know that I've got this right.
And so I run this and we should get ourselves a new fun fact.
And the thing to, to understand, uh, here we go.
Bananas are berries, but strawberries aren't.
Strawberries are not.
And and there we go.
We've got our explanation for that.
A lovely, fun fact from GPT five nano.
I hope you've been enjoying yours too.
Of course, the point I'm trying to make to you is that this is exactly the same as doing it the boring
way.
It's just this looks a little bit more elegant and simple.
And the reason I show you this is so that hopefully, and maybe this is all obvious to you, in which
case, well, hang on in there.
But if not, it just shows you that's all that this library is.
At the end of the day, it's just a nice, simple wrapper around making an HTTP call to an API in the
cloud.
And it by default it looks for OpenAI API key.
And that's what it puts in that bearer in that that authorization field in the headers of the HTTP request.
And it's as simple as that.
We have made our call to OpenAI on the cloud.
It looks like we did it with code.
In fact, it was an HTTP call over an endpoint.
Over an endpoint.
What I meant to say was it's an endpoint call over HTTP.
All right.
So I've already typed all this.
We can get rid of that.
Get rid of that.
So so then something cool happened.
So then OpenAI's chat completions API was so popular that all the other providers started to offer an
identical end point.
So you could use exactly the same web request and and just call a different model instead, because
people sort of converged on OpenAI's approach as a way to do it.
So everyone else offered them to Gemini.
Google, for example, they had one endpoint that was very specific to Gemini, and they were like,
oh, I know what, we'll just give a second one that's identical for anyone that wants it.
And out of all of them, anthropic held out the longest.
They they obviously their enemy OpenAI.
They didn't want that to become the standard.
So they held out.
But in the end they relented.
And they also created an OpenAI compatible endpoint.
So now all of them have it.
And for example, this is Google's one.
It's Https generative.
OpenAI.
It's got OpenAI in its name.
That is their endpoint for making OpenAI compatible request.
And because everybody did this, OpenAI decided, oh, I guess we'll be good corporate citizens, good
AI citizens.
Reasons.
And we'll say to people, look, you can use the same OpenAI library.
The same client library will allow you to say, hey, I don't actually want to talk to OpenAI's endpoint.
I want to switch to a different endpoint like this.
You can say OpenAI base URL equals and switch to a different URL and pass in a different API key.
And if you do that, then you can talk to Gemini using OpenAI's client library because it's just simple,
lightweight code.
That's it.
And so yeah, just to be crystal clear, even though OpenAI is is in our code here, we're not actually
using anything to do with OpenAI's models.
We're just using their lightweight code to make an endpoint request.
And you might know all this back to front.
This might be super obvious to you, but you'd be amazed how many people are confused by this and that
this can be really refreshing to understand exactly how this works.
So if you're in that category, then then, then I'm pleased to hear it and it's going to hopefully
make a lot of sense what we do next.
Okay.
So uh, we are going to look at Gemini's base URL.
That's the one I just showed you.
It's like a Google URL with OpenAI stuffed at the end of it.
In my EMV file, I have a Google API key.
Now you might not do it, in which case, don't worry, just just skip this next one.
But if you do, if you've got a Gemini or a Gemini API key, then then hopefully you've added Google
API key to your EMV file.
Uh, then then you can run this cell and uh, I'm just going to run it and it's going to confirm that
it found a Google API key in my EMV, and that it has the right format R and Z.
And if you yeah, if you want to get yourself an API key, you can you can head over.
The instructions are in guide nine.
That will tell you exactly what you need to do.
Okay.
So now look at this line Gemini is OpenAI.
Remember it's just the lightweight Python client library.
We give it the Gemini base URL and we give it the Google API key.
And that has now given me a, a basically like a class that's ready to connect to Gemini.
Okay.
So what we can basically do is take exactly the same code that we had before.
Come back up here.
I can just copy this.
I can come down here and I can use the identical code.
The only difference is I'm going to change the word OpenAI to be the word Gemini.
And I'm obviously also going to change the model.
If I try and talk to Gemini with GPT five, it'll say what it's not.
That's not our stuff.
So we have to make this something like Gemini 2.5 Pro.
We'll get a fun fact from the top range model.
Let's check.
This looks right.
It does.
Let's give this a whirl.
So we are now asking Google's strongest model on the planet.
As of now, you might be a Gemini three user, in which case you will have great fun getting a hopefully
a more profound fun fact than my one.
Uh, and here is the answer a group of flamingos is called a flamboyance.
Uh, there you go.
Uh, if you knew that, then you're obviously very good at trivia.
Um, but there is the short, uh, and punchy fun fact from Google's Gemini 2.5 Pro, and I hope you
enjoyed it.
018 - Okay.
And now we also can use the same trick to connect to a llama running on our local box, because llama,
the product also gives an endpoint locally that is compatible with OpenAI as well.
So first of all, before we do anything, let's just make sure llama is actually running.
If you if you installed it before yesterday like you were meant to, then it will be.
And if you run this little test here, you should see a llama is running.
If you don't see a llama is running, then make sure that you've installed llama.
There are instructions in guide nine if you if you missed that one, or of course in the Readme for
the project.
And then you might need to run a llama.
Serve in a terminal, open a terminal and type llama serve if you need to, or just double click on
the llama application to launch it.
Any of those things might be needed if you do llama serve, and you get an error that says that the
port is already in use, it means it's already running.
You're in great shape.
Okay, so the next thing we're going to do is download the model called llama 3.2.
And if you already tried this yesterday.
Then you don't need to do it again.
And if you've already done it, it will just run really, really fast.
So if I run this now, it should run nice and quick for me because I already have it.
But for you, it probably took a little minute.
If it's too big for you, this this takes up a few gigabytes.
Um, and it might be bigger for most machines.
It should be fine.
But if not, just add colon one b to get the really small version of llama.
But assuming that this is good, then you've got that.
Okay.
And now we use the same trick and llamas base URL looks like this localhost 11434 slash v1.
That v1 is like a call out to the fact that OpenAI had slash v1 chat completions create.
Uh.
So, uh, yeah, this is, this is V1 by analogy.
And we can create OpenAI.
The base URL is llama base URL, and the API key can be anything you want.
It gets ignored.
This is a local a local model.
There's no your credit card isn't there?
There's no no secret needed, of course, but I think it's a it's a mandatory field.
So I think you have to pass in something you can pass in any, any, any word that you like.
Um, and now we're going to just take the same code as before, the same ones we've used a couple of
times now.
Copy.
And let's get a fun fact here.
So we'll, we'll put it down here in this cell.
I'll paste.
And of course we're going to not do, um, I'll run that cell and then we're not going to do Gemini,
we're going to do Olama.
And for the model you need to put the name of the model that you just downloaded.
So we'll use llama 3.2, uh, and uh, otherwise exactly the same.
Now if you've got the smaller variant then you do colon one b there.
But you need to have done a pull to have brought that model in or you'll get an error message.
And so ready let's run this and see what happens.
Let's run it, run it, run it.
And here we go.
Did you know there's a type of jellyfish that is immortal?
The turret, the turritopsis, also known as the immortal jellyfish.
There you go.
If you didn't know it, you know it.
Now, by the end of this, you're going to win at all trivia challenges.
There is your your next fun fact.
But the cool thing is that the last two fun facts we retrieved from Frontier models OpenAI in the cloud
and from Gemini and Google's Cloud.
This one was just created on your local machine by llama running there, even though it was pretty quick
for me.
Uh, that's that what was actually happening there.
And that's very satisfying.
There's something nice about that.
And if you if you care a lot about data privacy and you want to be absolutely sure that that the data
isn't leaving your computer, then this is the way to do it.
You could unplug from the internet and I would stop talking to you.
Uh, but but you would still be able to do this.
Uh, so, uh, so so that's that's a great thing to know.
And I just put here the obvious.
I mean, we'll talk much more about this in due course, but obviously the big benefits, there's no
API charges, it's running locally and data doesn't leave your box.
The downside, of course, is that llama is something like a thousand times smaller than using most
frontier models, and you'll see that that's reflected in in the.
How intelligent it is and and how capable it is at solving difficult tasks.
So obviously those are the trade offs that you have to make.
And there are many more trade offs that we will talk about in time.
Okay.
So with that, it's time for you to experiment and start playing with with different models.
And I want to show you one more open source model.
I want to show you a variant of Deep Seek.
You remember I told you that deep seek came in much smaller sizes.
The main one would never run on my computer.
The smaller sizes would.
And in particular, I want to show you one that's called deep seek R1 colon 1.5 B it's very small 1.5
billion parameters, a small version of deep seek.
And as I explained before, this is in fact not deep seek.
Originally, what they've done is they took Quene the model from Alibaba Cloud.
They took the 1.5 billion size version of Quene, and they trained it more with extra data.
And that extra data was data that was generated by deep seq.
The big model.
It generated tons and tons of data to sort of show its intelligence, and it trained the little quon
to be able to try and replicate deep seq.
That's how it worked.
Known as distillation distilling.
So we can we need to start by making sure that we pull this.
So I do a lama pull.
There we go.
And kindly cursor fills in for me.
Now I haven't downloaded that.
So this is now going to run.
So you can see how long it takes for me.
Uh and it's downloading.
Hopefully my computer isn't going to free freeze up, but but the trace is coming there.
So once that's downloaded, we'll be able to then run some code.
So let's let's get started on this.
We're going to, to basically be able to take the same thing that we did before this exact code.
We don't need to we'll still be using Lama locally.
So we don't need to do anything new there.
And we can just change this here.
The model name to be the model name of deep seq R1 1.5 B.
So I'm just going to be able to replace that in there like so.
And as soon as this is finished pulling so that we have the model locally, I will now be it.
There we go.
It says success.
I should now be able to call Deep seek R1 1.5 be deep seek distilled into Quen running on my local computer
with the same message.
Tell me a fun fact.
Let's see what happens.
Off it goes.
Uh, here's a fun fact for you.
Did you know that the sun looks like a golden crown during sunset, with its gold colored reflection
on the horizon?
The rest of it is pale yellow.
This interesting correlation change coloration, not correlation coloration, changes as the weather
changes.
When the sun is high, it looks colder, and when it sets it appears hotter yellow.
So.
Aha!
So fair enough.
Not such a riveting fun fact, but not no surprise, this is twice as small as llama, and it's several
thousand times smaller than the frontier models we worked at before.
So to be honest, it's super impressive that it even answered the question and came up with something
credible in the first place.
But this gives you, first of all, a good sense of how you can run deep seq and any any open source
model locally, and also some perspective on the different abilities of the different sizes of models.
And now it's over to you to experiment with different models, pull them and run them.
Keep experimenting.
It's all about experimentation and have fun asking questions like fun facts or whatever question you
want to open source models running locally courtesy of Olama using the OpenAI compatible endpoint.
And now the assignment for you please a homework assignment for day two.
And that homework assignment is look at what we did in day one, the summarization of a web page, and
replicate that using Olama using any open source model of your choosing, using Olama, running it locally
so that you have a web page Summarizer that gives you a summarized markdown version of a website using
an open source model via a llama.
That's what you should complete.
Put that in the cell right here.
Uh, there is a solution and the solution is folder.
But don't look there.
You can do it.
Easy peasy.
Copy and paste from day one.
Make a change to the to the the open AI Python client library, just as we did above, and figure out
how to make that work.
And when you've done so, then by all means put it in community contributions.
Put your change in this folder community contributions, and then look to make a PR so it can be included
with the others.
And particularly try to see if you can't do something fun with it.
Maybe mess around with the system prompt, see if you could maybe change it to a different language,
or use a different tone, or have some aspect of it that makes it unique to you.
A different take, a different take on summarizing a web page using an open source model.
That's your assignment.
I can't wait to see what you come up with.
And with that.
With that, your 5%, your 5% along the journey.
It's the end of day two.
You've got got two days in and already hopefully you've got a good handle on what it's going to take
to get you to being proficient on the steps along the path.
You've got your first impression of the frontier models from our experience with OpenAI and Gemini,
and you've also got an impression of the open source models, and you've used the OpenAI API, and you've
used Olama to make web page summaries.
You've done your task.
I hope your assignment, you're feeling more confident with this.
And for me, most important of all, if you didn't already have this clear in your mind about what a
Python client library is, what a what an endpoint is, and how using OpenAI the chat completions API
simply a web request then.
Now hopefully that is crystal clear for you.
What we're going to do next time we're going to be comparing frontier models.
We're going to be to be playing with them through the products, through through the their websites.
We're going to be getting a sense for what are they good at and what are they not so good at as an interesting
way to get a deeper perspective on them?
I can't wait to show it all to you.
Lots to get done.
See you on day three.
019 - Welcome to day three.
I have bad news for you.
Today is one of the very rare days when we are not actually going to do a lab.
There's no lab today, but I have something better.
As you will see.
But first, let's quickly do what we always do.
Recap what we've done so far.
You know the progression to become proficient.
You've got your first impression of frontier models OpenAI, Gemini, llama, various models through
llama like Deep Distilled and Llama 3.2.
And you've built something that can summarize web pages using OpenAI API and hopefully your llama as
well.
What you're going to be able to do by the end of today is compare a bunch of frontier models.
You'll know the difference between chat models and reasoning models.
You'll appreciate what they do well and where they struggle.
Let's get to it.
So there are three different breeds of llms that that reflect what they've been trained to do, the
tasks that they've set out to accomplish.
And the starting point is known as a base model, is an LM that's just there to take a sequence of information
as the input and to predict what would come next.
That's all it does.
And these base models, you don't come across them very often.
We will do later in the course when we get to work with our own.
Um, but they are, they are before it's been taught how to do things like chat with someone.
It's just about completing the sequence.
But you have a base model yourself and you use it probably quite often and it's in your pocket.
If you if you bring up your phone and you go to to write a text message and you use predictive text,
if you say sort of hello there, and then you see what it prompts, you would come next and you repeatedly
press that button that is like you're using a base model.
It's just completing the sequence, giving you the most likely output that could come next after a particular
input.
Repeatedly.
And every time you select a word that goes into the sequence, and then it's predicting the next thing
to come after this sequence, that is a base model.
And before ChatGPT came out in 2022.
Before that was was the earlier versions of the models, like GPT three.
That was just a base model and people that were using it like myself at the time, we were very familiar
with, like, you put in some text and then it would start predicting what would come next, and there
were various ways that you could force it to try and answer questions.
You'd say, like question in the prompt.
You'd give it like Q and A question and then a colon and the answer Q colon, another question, a colon,
an answer.
And then you'd put q colon and the actual question you wanted to ask.
And then you'd put the letter A, and that would prompt it to be thinking more like it's in question
answer mode and to give you an answer.
And and that was the way a lot of people used these base models.
And OpenAI had a brainwave and thought, hang on, we could train our models a bit more with data structured
in this way with kind of one message response, one message response, and and doing that became known
as making a chat variant or also known as an Instruct variant, a chat model, or an Instruct model.
It's a model that's been trained to work in this kind of prompt style.
And they came up with this idea that there should be one overall piece of information that describes
the whole chat, and then there should be like a message from, from, from one user to the AI and its
reply and then another message and that, that first that overall construct became known as the system
prompt.
Uh, you knew I was going to say that.
And the the next message was called the user prompt.
And then the assistant reply and user prompt assistant reply.
And that's training.
A model in this way became known as making a chat variant.
There was a particular approach they used called reinforcement learning from human feedback RL, and
it was that that got from normal GPT to ChatGPT.
It was the chat variant.
And so then chat models were all the rage.
And we will be chatting with with ChatGPT.
And quite quickly people noticed that there were some tricks, some prompt engineering tricks to get
more out of the model.
And one of them, which became known as chain of thought.
Prompting was just as simple as if you ask the model to do something, you add as the last sentence
uh, please think step by step.
And just by by virtue of saying that you'd get something that would apparently do better, it would
go through things methodically, and the sequence that it would predict would end up being more likely
to solve the problem just because you told it to think step by step.
Which seems super hokey, but it kind of works.
And so again, that gave people a brainwave.
Maybe we could train the model with lots of examples that show it thinking step by step, and then show
it getting to a conclusion.
And so doing that training.
Training a model so that it would a chat model would then would then think through what it was doing
before it did.
It became known as making a reasoning model or making a thinking model.
And that led to these reasoning models.
They are models that have been trained to first output their thinking steps and then give the answer.
And we saw that I think in the very beginning, in the first day, the instant gratification part,
when when we saw OpenAI's OSS model thinking things through before it gave its reply, and that that
is what a reasoning model is.
It does the thought process first and now the the some of the most modern models are what's known as
hybrid models.
But that's not really.
It's just really a variation on the reasoning thinking model that's that's able to decide how much thinking
it does.
And in some modes it's much more similar to just being a chat model.
It hardly does any reasoning at all.
And in others it will go ahead and reason quite a lot, and it decides how much to reason based on the
question you ask how how much of a puzzle it is, or if it's just in a chat mode, kind of just just
a simple hi there, then it won't bother reasoning the answer to that.
And so this kind of model that's able to decide how much thinking to do is what's known as a hybrid
model.
And Gemini Pro 25 is a hybrid model.
So it's got four and so is GPT five.
These latest models are all examples of hybrid models.
Um, and and then the latest version of the open source model, when they have both a hybrid model and
they have model which, which is just chat and reasoning in case you want to select that, you just
want one in a chat mode.
And the amount of reasoning that a reasoning model does is sometimes called its reasoning budget or
its reasoning effort.
And there's a technique called budget forcing.
When you make a model a reasoning model, think longer, you make it do more reasoning.
And there are various tricks to achieving this.
And they are quite remarkably, many of them are remarkably hacky and hokey.
And it's I think when I, when I explain this to you, you'll be like, really?
Uh, but it turns out that there's a great paper called S1 that you can Google.
I'll put, put put a link in the resources.
Um, S1 explains that it was a discovery from January of 2025.
Uh, that what you could do, uh, when a model comes up with its thinking.
Trace, if you wanted to do some more thinking, not not just to get to its conclusion, but to to to
go back and do more thinking, there was this very complicated mathematical trick that involved some
really complex calculus.
No it didn't.
It involved just add the word weight in to the thinking trace.
So it's come up with something it said like like I should I should consider blah, blah, blah, blah
blah.
And then you just insert in this sequence the word weight.
And by virtue of doing that, it kind of continues that sequence as the most likely words to come after
weight.
And it says like, wait, I should rethink this, am I sure?
Let me reconsider.
And So they discovered these scientists that just simply by adding the word weight periodically into
the sequence as you're making it predict the next tokens, causes it to reflect on its reasoning and
reason a bit deeper, and challenge itself and weigh up the arguments that it's made and consider whether
they're still accurate.
And so just just adding the word weight got better outcomes.
And that technique is known as budget forcing.
And there are sort of various other ways of doing it.
But that's that's the best known one.
And the first time you hear that, you're like, surely it's got to be something more sophisticated
than that.
Well it's not read the paper and you'll see.
And so, generally speaking, reasoning models with a high reasoning budget perform better in all of
the different benchmarks really almost across the board.
And we'll be looking at benchmarks and leaderboards and everything else in week four.
So there'll be plenty of time to do that.
But generally they do very well these these reasoning models.
And so you might be saying to yourself, why don't we always use a reasoning model?
Why even have the hybrids?
Why have chat at all?
And there are some some reasons.
It's not always better reasoning models are better for problem solving.
Uh, particularly if you don't mind wasting a bit.
They will always perform better at puzzles, for sure, and they're just just generally more intelligent,
like they score higher on any of the kind of intelligence related tests, chat models.
They are, of course faster because they don't need to produce all of this reasoning a trace.
So they're better for interactive use cases if you want to have chat, and the chat models are better,
shockingly.
Uh, so they are they are better in that use case.
They are obviously faster and cheaper because they don't need to produce all of these, these, these,
these, uh, these bits in the middle, the thinking tokens.
We'll talk more about the costs and so on later.
Um, but so they are they are better at that.
And, uh, this is I put a question mark here because people aren't sure about this, but it does seem
that chat models are often better at more creative kind of just just content generation.
If you want something to write an email for you, uh, sometimes you find that the reasoning models
kind of overthink.
Perhaps what they come up with is quite cold and and analytical, whereas chat models tend to produce
more, um, fluid content.
But this sounds hand-wavy.
There's not any there's not really good metrics on this.
It's more of an anecdotal way that that people think about it.
You should try it yourself and see if you agree with that.
And a base model is better in a very specific case of when you are trying to train a model to do something
different, to give it a new skill, which is something we'll be doing later in the course.
And when you're doing that, it's better to start with a base model.
You don't necessarily want to be in a chat construct or in a reasoning construct.
You want the opportunity to train it to have some different construct.
And in that case, better to start with a base.
So that's when you use each of those three flavors of model.
020 - Okay, so let's talk about the big frontier models, the labs and the chat products.
Sometimes these large models, also known as foundation models, you hear that term as well.
And foundation model used very similarly to frontier.
In theory, a foundation model is one of the kind of major building blocks that lots of other companies
replicate.
But but there aren't necessarily good good definitions for these foundation and frontier models often
used interchangeably.
So OpenAI, OpenAI, of course, have the GPT range of models.
The GPT five, which is a hybrid chat and reasoning model.
They also have the O range of models, which are pure reasoning models.
But it's GPT five really replaces all of the O's and the prior GPT series.
I still love using GPT 4.1, which is the variant that came right before GPT five because it's a pure
chat model and it's much faster than GPT five, even if you tell GPT five to do the least possible reasoning.
GPT 4.1 is still much faster, much more interactive.
So there are many use cases when I prefer it, as we will see.
The chat user interface of course, is ChatGPT.
You know it well, we will use it.
So anthropic has Claude.
Uh, and Claude comes in these three different sizes, as I said before, haiku, sonnet and opus.
And uh, we'll probably be using sonnet mostly the middle size.
And, uh, the version 4.5 is the latest that actually, for me, came out yesterday.
Uh, but that's the latest.
And maybe for you, there's a there's a new one, maybe for you, there's already Claude five.
Uh, but and you should use the latest one and see how it compares.
With what?
With what I do.
Google has Gemini.
Gemini for me is 2.5.
But I bet by the time you watch this, three will be out.
And I'll be.
I'll can't wait to try it.
Uh, their chat interface, it's gone by some different branding, but I think Gemini Advanced is what
they called it at one point, but people just call it Gemini.
Really, their chat front end, their chat product and then x dot AI is Elon Musk's AI arm.
Uh, that I think now now also owns the company formerly known as Twitter.
Uh, but uh, x AI has their model called grok and their chat platform also called grok, spelt with
a K, not to be confused with grok spelt with a q that we'll talk about another day and then deep sky.
Here's another one.
This is the odd one out here.
Do you know why it's the odd one out?
It's the odd one out because they open sourced all of their models, including their biggest model.
Uh, so deep tech, AI, Chinese company.
They have deep tech, and their chat product is also just called Deep Seek.
And while I have these up there, I should also mention, of course, that OpenAI has their open source
model as well.
OpenAI has OSS that we used at the very start.
Uh, so they've also come in to, to join with deep seek, perhaps, as I say, provoked by deep seek.
They have an open source model as well.
All right, so just to talk for a minute about what makes frontier models so great and then what are
some of their rough edges.
So there's I mean, you know, I hardly need to tell you at this point, everyone is so familiar with
with some of the shocking things about frontier models, the their ability to synthesize information
like we saw when we got it, to summarize web pages.
I mean, this is just extraordinary.
They are so good at answering a question in detail, with structured answers that are well researched
and have a summary.
Ask it a question to weigh up the pros and cons of something, and you'll get back a remarkable answer.
So we it goes without saying.
Everyone knows this stuff.
Uh, also generating content, of course, is what they do, but but doing it if you ask it to like,
like draft an email for you or draft a presentation or draft how to go about solving a project they
will do that with phenomenal quality.
They can build out a skeleton.
I often use it as my way of starting some new initiative and just bouncing out, bouncing around ideas
and fleshing out together.
So powerful.
And then of course, coding.
We all know this.
If you've used code, your mind will have already been blown by it.
Their ability to write code, to write code in in a you know, obviously we'll be talking about agentic
AI later, but but the ability to do it in as, as if there's, there's multiple concurrent activities
happening and to iterate over things in some kind of a loop where it builds some code tests, it fixes,
it builds more.
I mean, this stuff is staggering.
And I, I put here the first time I did this course a year ago, far overtaken Stack Overflow as the
resource for engineers, and I had a chart that showed Stack Overflow going downwards in terms of the
daily visitors.
But but now to say that is just so obvious.
It's, it's it's almost crazy Stack overflow that once seemed like it was just unbeatable.
Unbeatable.
It was just where everyone went all the time.
It's now hardly ever mentioned.
People never go to Stack Overflow.
You put your questions into ChatGPT or into Claude.
Uh, and that's it.
So it's the way that just in the space of a couple of years, the these chat llms have overtaken all
other resources in terms of their ability to be able to, to problem solve and debug.
It's just remarkable.
And honestly, I've found that that Claude and ChatGPT have fixed problems that I was pulling my hair
out over, and they've done so with ease.
Sometimes they can't, but but often they can.
And they do so very quickly and very clearly and explain exactly what to do.
It's incredibly impressive.
But look, I'm generally quite an upbeat and enthusiastic person, if you didn't notice that.
But it doesn't mean that I'm all caught up in the hype.
I am incredibly aware that llms have their downsides and I experience them every single day.
Uh, there's certainly that.
Whilst they are very strong in some scientific fields, they have incredible expertise in some areas
and they are above PhD level in some, in others they don't have that knowledge yet.
Their training knowledge has gaps and they can come through very strongly.
They have this famously.
This knowledge cutoff is when their training goes up until and they have limited knowledge beyond that
point.
So like if Gemini is is helping fix your code, it will often do this janky thing when it changes your
model.
If you're using GPT, it will take out GPT three or GPT 4.1, and it will say you've used a model that
doesn't exist and it will put in GPT 3.5 turbo like two years ago, like like something which is so
outdated it's like an embarrassment.
But it will do so very, very strongly, very, very angrily telling you that you've used a model that
doesn't exist yet.
It's like, goodness.
Uh, and of course, many of these, the products you use, like ChatGPT built into them is the ability
to do a web search now.
And this is functionality that AI engineers like you and me have built into ChatGPT that work for OpenAI.
It's not part of the LLM, the model, it's part of extra code that's been added to give it a helping
hand.
The model itself has the cut off when it was trained, and it doesn't have any information beyond that.
And then of course, llms make mistakes and they can do so dangerously.
They can be very confident when they make mistakes because all they're doing is predicting the most
likely next, next word, next token.
They're predicting what they believe comes next in a in a plausible way.
So plausibility is what they've been trained for.
They've been trained to sound confident.
That's all they do.
The very fact that the plausible most likely next word so often happens to be the truth.
The reality is something of a surprise.
We should be almost surprised that models don't hallucinate more.
Uh, the fact that they so often are accurate and aligned with our task is somewhat remarkable.
Uh, but it does mean, of course, that sometimes they do hallucinate.
And when they hallucinate, they do so with so much conviction.
And that's why it's particularly dangerous when llms are used to help code with junior people, with
with people that were coming new into the field.
Initially, people thought llms would be most useful for junior people because junior developers, because
they would help a junior developer like level up.
But it turns out that's not really the case.
They are most useful for a senior developer who can use an LLM to generate code, and they can watch
it and correct mistakes and challenge it for junior developers, for sure.
They're very helpful, as we've seen from cursor, but they can also be dangerous because they can lead
you astray.
They can confidently come up with something that's just wrong.
And I get a lot of people sending me code that is clearly been auto generated by an LLM that's gone
off on a crazy tangent.
And of course, the person doesn't know.
I'll belabor the point by giving you a concrete example.
And, you know, I know this is going to take a moment of time, but I think it's useful for you to
to hear this kind of thing.
So a student on this very course sent me some code and said, it's not working.
Why not?
And it was it was kind of shocking.
It was tons and tons of code, and it took me a while to get a handle on what on earth was going on.
And eventually I got to see what was happening.
So they were trying to chat with an open source model, but by accident they hadn't typed in the name
of the chat variant, the instruct variant of the model they had put in the name of the base variant
it was using hugging face, calling the code directly.
So you put in the name of the model and they use the base variant.
And it was failing because it didn't know how to expect a system prompt and a user prompt because base
models aren't trained with that.
So it was failing and they were using an LLM to help them, and it had failed.
And the LLM saw that it failed because they were passing in the the chat information, the system prompt
and the user prompt into a model that wasn't expecting it.
So what did the LLM do?
Well, it said okay, the model's not expecting this.
We're going to have to go and convert this model into being a chat variant by manufacturing all the
information it needs to be able to do that.
And that's why there was pages and pages of really sophisticated code that manufactured all sorts of
things to do with special tokens and, and all sorts of stuff.
And so instead of understanding that the root of the problem was as simple as a miswritten name of the
model that the the LLM confidently headed off on sort of addressing the most obvious problem.
Okay, the model wasn't expecting this chat stuff.
We're going to have to teach it to expect the chat stuff.
It didn't take a step back and say, no, no, let me challenge the whole situation.
Taking a step back.
Maybe the root cause is just that the user got the wrong model name, and that's such a great example.
The junior person didn't know better.
They didn't understand why all this code was generated, but things seem to be progressing.
They got further along.
More was happening.
So it appeared to be working.
They didn't.
They didn't realize they were being led astray.
They didn't see that 3 or 4 pages of code all looked kind of hokey and seemed like it was wrong.
They went along with it, uh, and then at the end of it, when things didn't quite work, they weren't
they weren't entirely sure why.
And the for me getting all this code, it was very hard to, to understand what was happening, what
their intention was.
I didn't realize that most of this was generated by an LLM so long story, but it was from this very
core.
So.
So I hope it lands and it helps you see why.
Uh llms are amazing at generating content.
But but they are.
They can be, they can go wrong.
They can make they can jump to conclusions.
They tend to not think and take a step back.
They tend to kind of apply Band-Aids and try and push forwards, particularly with coding tasks.
And so they perform best under supervision.
That's the key takeaway, these these llms that you're using for things like coding or for other kinds
of content generation, they perform best.
Think of it like a junior analyst.
You have an incredibly hard working, a tireless junior analyst that can go off and do work at your
behest, but it's incumbent on you to check that work, to keep it on, on the track, on rails, and
to make sure you are challenging it to make sure it's not jumping to conclusions and going off on a
crazy tangent.
That's your job.
021 - So look, most of this course is about connecting with LMS, either on the cloud through APIs, or directly
on our computers with open source LMS.
But just for a moment, we're going to use the chat products, the the web products that have been built
by these labs so that we can have an experience through the UI.
And I know you probably use ChatGPT all the time, but let's just do a little bit of experimenting ourselves
now with the products before we get to the code.
So let's start by asking a pretty simple question.
The kind of thing that they're so good at to ChatGPT five, let's say, how do I decide if a business
problem.
Is suitable for an LLM solution?
Because by the way, not everything is.
So we're going to ask that question and we're going to get back and answer.
And it says look at that.
A lot of teams get excited about Llms before stepping back and asking if they actually fit the business
problem.
Here's a structured way to describe to decide and define the problem clearly.
Structured versus unstructured input.
Check for ambiguity and open endedness.
That's something where llms are particularly powerful.
Uh, evaluate business value versus risk, data availability, operational fit, a quick litmus test.
And generally speaking, this is an example of a fabulous answer.
It's coherent.
It's structured.
It's got good, good way of organizing its information with headings and subbullets.
And it's very much gives you both sides of the argument.
It's very nicely balanced.
I know you know this stuff.
It's the kind of question that Llms are fantastic at.
Okay, let's do a new chat.
Let's ask a more interesting question compared with other llms.
What kinds of questions?
Are you best at answering and what do you find most challenging?
Which other LMS have capabilities that complement yours?
Let's see if it can be aware and reflective of what it's good at and what it's bad at.
Well, certainly it's happy to give an answer.
Great question.
Thank you.
They always tend to say that I'll break this into three parts.
What I'm best at I excel at teaching and structured explanations.
Tool assisted answers.
Okay.
We're going to talk about tools next week.
Personalization and memory.
Because I can remember context about you.
That is something which has been built into the ChatGPT product that it's aware of and synthesis across
domains.
It's very true.
It's really great at that.
What it finds challenging highly fresh information.
It's true.
As we said, training data has a cut off and so it doesn't know.
It relies on web search to get get the latest, and it often doesn't know about some things.
Mathematical precision in long derivations is very specific thing, but fair enough.
Deep, subjective or personal matters.
I can give frameworks for thinking, but I'm not a replacement for domain experts in medicine, law,
or therapy, and extremely long ambiguous reasoning chains.
I actually think they're pretty good at this, but but of course they have a thing called a context
window that we'll be talking about tomorrow.
And yes, there is a problem if you go outside the context window, which other ones complement me.
So it is it does recognize that Claude from anthropic, which is its big rival, often praised for long
context reasoning and a gentle, human like conversational style.
Isn't it great that GPT is is very willing to talk about what how the other llms excel and it's knowledgeable.
Gemini strong on real time multimodal reasoning.
Interesting uh mixture from from Mistral is lightweight, fast and efficient, and it mentions here
that in the last version of this course I did go to, but Cohered is no longer as often quoted, but
it is meant to be good with accuracy.
Um, and then there are some specialized fine tuned models that outperform GPT for sure.
That is true.
So, uh, in short, good, structured, multi-step, explanatory and integrative work.
Claude is good for human like reasoning.
Gemini for fresh multimodal tasks.
Fascinating and a really good answer, and very self-aware in a strange way.
Uh, so, so a lot of interesting stuff.
You may have got a different answer, but you should take the time to read through it.
There's bound to be something good in there.
Okay, here's a challenging one.
Look at this.
What does it feel like to be jealous?
How would you answer that?
How would you answer that?
Let's see how GPT five answers that.
Jealousy feels like a mix of emotions layered on top of each other.
It's not just one feeling.
It's usually a cocktail of fear, insecurity, anger, longing all pointed towards a person or situation.
People describe it in different ways physically a tightness or heaviness in your chest, a rush of heat,
restlessness, a spike of adrenaline, emotionally.
Insecurity.
Fear of loss, anger or resentment.
Shame or guilt.
Mentally obsessive thinking and an overall vibe.
It's like a storm of vulnerability and competitiveness at the same time.
So I mean, again, now, in this case, you could possibly argue that this is something that's able
to find in its training data because there are probably lots of articles that are similar to this.
But never fear.
In future labs, we're going to stretch it much more with similar kinds of questions that are definitely
outside its training knowledge, and you'll see that it will give just as incredible an answer on those
two, and you can try it yourself.
Come up with the hardest question you can possibly think of.
We'll do this exercise too, and we'll come up with some pretty hard questions.
But try your best and then try it on GPT five.
Something that feels very human, like something that requires a really deep, deep thought and wisdom
to answer and see what kind of answer you get.
I think you'll be impressed.
So in the early days of GPT, there was a question that some influencer put to it which which showed
its rough edges.
They asked, how many rainbows does it take to jump from Hawaii to 17?
And they got back a sort of silly, crazy answer that didn't make any sense.
And it's kind of fun to see how times have changed.
Let's go.
How many rainbows does it take to jump from Hawaii to 17?
And let's see how it handles it.
It's thinking about it.
And what you'll find is that it gives a very, uh, charming answer, as if you're talking to someone
that's very smart.
And it says, well, that's a very poetic question.
How many rainbows does it take to jump from 1 to 17?
Sounds like something out of a riddle or a song lyric rather than a literal measurement.
Look, rainbows aren't a unit of distance or quantity, so the answer isn't literal.
If you're speaking metaphorically, it could mean and then, you know, it could be that.
Or would you like me?
And you know, it's just a very sensible, intelligent kind of answer.
And it's just remarkable to see how it does.
Okay.
Now, now let's go on to some trick questions.
Okay.
So a question that I used to ask, which used to have problems with was how many letters.
Uh, how many times does the letter A appear in this sentence.
So I used to ask all the models this question.
Uh, and uh, you will see how it can handle it.
But what you'll see is that it has, I imagine, a very easy time indeed with it.
Uh, we'll see.
Uh, it just gives us the answer.
That is indeed the answer, uh, including the letter itself.
Uh, you can see one, two, three, four, but it used to have real difficulties with this because
chat versions of models that are just predicting the next tokens have a really hard time doing that
kind of analysis on a question.
And, and in addition, what actually gets passed into the LLM are not letters, but chunks of letters
called tokens that will go through tomorrow.
And so it was particularly hard for it to analyze tokens and understand how many times a letter appeared
in them.
But ChatGPT five has no problems with it and nor to any of the other top frontier models.
And even harder question is this how many words are there?
In your answer to this question that requires it to to like be self reflective?
It's a sort of meta question, because in the number of words that it comes up with, it will need to
count those words.
So it's a really hard, challenging question, and we'll see whether GPT five can handle this level
of complexity.
Ah, with a beautiful answer.
Absolutely beautiful I love it.
One uh uh, that, uh, that's a treat.
Uh, so it shows you that the frontier models have no problem with this kind of question.
So this has given you a nice tour of the capabilities, some of the greatest strengths, um, of these
models.
And now let's look at some of its competitors and see how they fare.
022 - And now I've gone to Claude Claude AI, which is the chat for Claude.
And we're going to use sonnet 4.5, the latest one for me, and ask it the same question about comparing
itself to other models and see how it responds to this one.
Uh, it used to actually, for previous models, refuse to answer it, because one of the things that
Claude is very strongly trained at, uh, is, is what's called alignment or making sure that that it
follows good security patterns and, and debating other models was one of the things it said was off
limits, but no more.
Now it will respond.
It says what it does well is nuance, reasoning, long form writing.
I agree, I do find Claude very good at that.
Code generation and debugging for sure.
Uh, and ethical reasoning, thinking through difficult edge cases and explaining my reasoning, that's
very interesting.
Challenging, highly specialized domains, same as GPT said.
Real time information?
Sure.
Extremely long context.
Absolutely.
Anyone that's used.
Claude Code knows that feeling of when you're starting to fill up context and the performance starts
to degrade and multimodal tasks complementary models are well, here's a mistake right away models like
GPT four, of course, GPT five is the new one and GPT four one.
Before that, GPT four itself, the original one, was quite an old model.
So you're seeing immediately Claude making a gaffe there by showing, as it said, that it doesn't have
real time information, uh, perplexity.
It mentions actually, I didn't I used to have that on my list.
I took it off.
But perplexity, of course, first and foremost, a search engine particularly strong at real time search.
Um, and that's its answer.
Very nice.
Okay, let's, uh, do a new chat.
Let's ask it another sort of, uh, emotional question.
Let's say, uh, how would you describe the color blue to someone who's never been able to see.
Let's see what it says.
Uh, I tried to connect it to other senses and feelings they know through temperature.
Blue is the cool side of color.
It's the feeling of shade on a hot day, the crispness of cold water on your skin.
Through emotions, through space, through sound, through metaphor.
Uh, I'll let you read this.
You should run this too.
I tell you, it is sensational.
If you asked me to try and answer a question like this, I wouldn't get close to Claude's level of of
depth and and flavor and nuance and and the way that it characterizes this in just, just such a poetic
way.
Uh, so it definitely, uh, feels so rich.
And this is one of Claude's greatest strengths, um, this kind of very evocative response.
So enjoy that.
And then let's try.
How many words are there in your answer to this sentence and let's see how it does.
Uh, and it's interesting, this used to be my way of testing models.
But let's see.
Five six, seven eight, 910 and got it wrong.
How about that?
Uh, that's a super interesting one.
Uh, it does normally get it right.
Uh, but we've just experienced sonnet 4.5 making a mistake.
Clearly not.
At least according to this test.
Not at GPT Five's level of strength.
But I expect if you ran this, you probably got the right answer.
Uh, but at least on this one, this this data point of one.
Uh, Claude Sonnet 4.5 didn't quite get there, but let me try it one more time now with opus 4.1.
It's a smaller number, 4.1, but it is the biggest model that anthropic has.
So how many words are there in your answer to this question?
Let's see how opus does it will think for a bit.
Now it's got it wrong again.
How about that opus?
Got it wrong.
Uh, I feel like we should give it a second shot.
You could also.
Not only is that ten words, not 11, but but of course it's because it's said that it's actually given
a lot more.
Let's just try this a second time.
Okay.
123456789 ten.
Look at that.
Seven.
Eight.
Nine.
Ten.
Uh.
All right, now let's try with extended thinking.
So we're asking it to do that again with extended thinking.
Uh, okay.
Now it says there are ten words 123, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten.
They got it right with extended thinking.
So opus 4.1 Anthropic's biggest model with extended thinking turned on.
Got the right answer to the question.
Well done.
And now we'll go to Gemini and we'll just quickly go through it.
I'm sure you can ask many of these questions.
Ask about jealousy.
Ask about the color blue.
But we're just going to do the fun question.
Uh, how many words are there in your answer to this question?
Question mark.
Let's see which model we want to pick.
We will try 2.5 Pro.
We will give it a shot.
It's thinking about that.
Let's see if it can do it.
It's a meta question.
It knows it's a meta question.
And this of course is it thinking through.
It's generating tokens of its thought process because this is a reasoning model.
Before we get Gemini 2.5 Pro's actual answer to this question, oh goodness, this will take me a second
to count.
Three.
Four.
Five.
Six.
1819.
21.
To two.
To 3 to 4.
Three.
Five.
I get 25.
So I don't think it got it right, despite its very wordy answer.
Unless I have a problem counting, but that is Gemini's answer.
Gemini 2.5 Pro are wordy answer and sadly wrong.
Next up, grok from Mr. Musk.
How many words are there in your answer to this question?
Let's see.
See what you got, Ellen?
Uh, look at that.
That's a clever little thing.
Oh, I realized I've picked grok for fast, so it might, uh, might not be fair, but it's recognizing.
12345.
Six.
Seven.
It got it right.
Good for grok for is an incredibly powerful model.
And, uh, even the grok for fast variant was able to get our little puzzle correct.
Uh, well done it.
And a good answer.
You should try more questions as you experiment with grok for from exi.
Okay.
And the final one is deep seek.
How many words are there in your answer to this question?
Let's see what Deep Seek says.
And I didn't turn on the deep think mode.
We're just going the normal, normal thing.
Um.
Well, it's got an interesting point there, but it doesn't realize that it could just say one look
at it going off and thinking, this is a lot of a lot of work.
And what I tend to find is that often deep sick with these kinds of challenges can go off into a into
a whirlwind of thought process and get stuck and cycle.
Uh, so, uh, um, but look at this.
Therefore, uh uh, so my answer is two words.
That answer contains two words.
So it's made a correct assumption here.
The number of is is two.
But then it gets it all wrong and it ends up giving two as the single number.
So it overthinks in a way it gets itself caught in a loop.
It thinks too much and it ends up with the wrong number, but still deep secret, super powerful model.
But it didn't.
It stumbled on this very difficult, very challenging test.
So that's my quick tour of the different LMS through their chat interface.
I wanted to make the point, though, that these chat interfaces can do more than just interact with
the LMS.
As you probably know, there's lots of features that you get, and amongst the ones that are best known,
one of them is Deep research, which is a feature that allows you to basically have the LLM go off and
do work on your behalf and come back later with an answer.
And so let's just kick that off with ChatGPT five.
I actually I pay for the super high end.
I pay the $200 a month for the top end of ChatGPT because I use it an awful lot.
I do the same for anthropic too.
And that means that I can run 250 deep searches a month, and we'll use one of them right now.
Uh, and in fact, for me today, it's the 1st of October, so I have the whole month ahead of me.
Uh, so let me let me try this for, for for you.
Let's say say, um, please, um, research and identify the, uh, greatest commercial impact, uh,
that gen AI and Agentic AI has had, uh.
To summarize, summarize the most successful.
Commercial applications.
Um, with uh revenue.
Ascribed to the.
Solution and the particular innovations used.
So let's suppose that you've been told to to write a paper on that to do some research.
I just came up with that on the fly, but it's interesting to see what it comes up with.
And so now we can press this plus button and I can select deep research and I can press play.
And the first thing it's going to do is come back and ask me some clarifying questions.
Uh, so and here it comes.
Are you interested in only public companies.
And I will say one, any two.
Should the focus be on any particular any industry?
The greatest revenue.
Three.
Are you looking for global?
Yes.
Global.
Four.
Should I include or earlier?
No.
Ideally.
All in 225.
Okay.
Um.
This seems great.
Let's kick it off.
So we answer, it's clarifying questions, and off it goes.
And it starts the research.
And this is going to run sometimes for several minutes, sometimes for like half an hour or an hour
while it goes through and does its research.
And this is multiple LM calls.
And it's the first example of, of what's known as a genetic AI.
Of course, I imagine, you know, the stuff you've seen this before, but off it's going and it's doing
this processing and we will come back when it's finished.
And over on the right here, you see that it starts to build its list of sources.
Well, it does this thinking.
And I often find, as I say that, that this is like having a junior analyst that's going off and working
for you.
It will do very robust research.
And what comes back is going to be high quality.
We'll see.
023 - And while I'm sitting here, GPT is still off and running.
I can see on the right.
It's now looked at 12 sources, it's reading sources, and I'm seeing it moving.
And you have this kind of eerie sense that there is some entity out there working.
You get this sense, this is this word that people like to throw around autonomy.
There is this sense that there is something happening.
There is there is something or someone that's carrying out work that is sweating to produce this deep
research.
So we'll keep that running.
And meanwhile I'm going to open a new chat and show you something else.
We talked before about that question, um, about, uh, how many rainbows does it take to jump from
Hawaii to 17?
Let's ask, please draw an image and imagine an image to show how many rainbows it takes to jump from
Hawaii to 17.
In.
Uh, yeah.
Let's just just leave it at that.
That's enough of a challenge.
Let's see how it handles it.
And, uh, there we go.
Off it goes.
Getting started.
It's going to be working on that.
Uh, while it's doing that, it will be continuing to work on the deep research.
And I'll see you in a moment when both of those are complete.
Well, in fact, while they're running, we'll just make use of ChatGPT in one other way.
We're going to try out agent Mode.
I'm going to go into agent mode like this and say, describe a task.
I'm going to say, please find me a restaurant in NYC, um, that has uh, availability for for tonight
at 9 p.m..
Um, and serves British food.
Let's make this really hard with banoffee pie on the menu.
Banoffee pie is, uh, my my favourite dessert.
If you don't know what banoffee pie is, then you've got to find out.
It's amazing.
We Brits, we are not known for our food choices, for our culinary skills, with.
With the exception of banoffee pie, it's it's our big secret.
We like to keep it to ourselves, but it's amazing.
All right, so I, I press enter and watch what happens.
It says setting up my desktop.
Understood.
I'll look for restaurants in New York City that serve British cuisine, specifically offering banoffee
pie.
So what's happening right now is that this is now when I press continue, it's it's going to go ahead
and do this.
It's going to bring up a browser window itself behind the scenes, and we can watch it doing its thing.
It's crazy.
It's absolutely crazy.
So what you're seeing here, I mean, if you thought that that deep research gave you a sense that something
was working.
What you see is, is that it really is doing stuff.
It just had a problem with like browser cookies.
It's it's got through it.
It's looking at Jones Woods Foundry, which is a British pub on the Upper East Side.
And uh, we will let it do its thing.
It's found a match.
It's looking for availability.
Okay.
And so hopefully you get this sense that stuff is happening.
It's gone to resi, the restaurant reservation system.
It's looking for for for guests.
Look at that.
Look at how that mouse moved.
It's not me, I promise.
Uh, and, uh, it's found this.
And, uh, it's confirmed availability for for at Jones Woods Foundry.
It's checked this.
It's searching the web.
Uh, and it's keeping on going.
Uh, it's obviously double, triple checking that it really has banoffee pie.
Uh, it'd be very disappointing if it turned out that it didn't.
Uh, but we will.
We will let that keep going.
When we go back to the other tasks that we have running.
Okay.
Let's take a look at our picture.
First of all, here it is.
It's actually given two pictures from Hawaii to 17.
And this one, it's a bit literal I think maybe with a bit more prompting it can be much more imaginative,
but this is quite a literal version of it.
The prime model Dall-E three was was much more imaginative.
Uh, but but this one is still it's certainly done what I asked it to do.
And I'm sure you're very familiar with the image generation abilities of both, uh, of of GPT, of
of Midjourney, of, of all of them.
Um, let's look at the commercial report and what you'll see is here is the report in markdown format.
It's of course, a super thorough report.
It actually focuses, interestingly, on tech companies that apparently have had the greatest commercial
success.
So it gives itself OpenAI as number one.
It gives anthropic and actually Midjourney image generation Runway.
Video generation 11 labs.
Voice and then Microsoft Copilot, of course.
And GitHub copilot.
GitHub copilot and Microsoft Copilot.
Cursor that we that we use for genetic code.
Um, so very much it's focused on the sort of the tech use cases rather than the direct business use
cases like, uh, legal company like Harvey or something like that.
Um, or this company called Nebula that sadly didn't get surfaced as one of the top in the world.
Uh.
Um, well, it should do.
We should correct that.
So the, uh, you'll see that it's quotes, it's sources, it quotes TechCrunch.
It gives links to, to, uh, to where you can you can validate what it's saying.
Um, and uh, it gives a very comprehensive summary at the end.
So it's no surprise.
I expect you've seen this before.
This is one of the first agentic use cases, deep research.
And it's very impressive.
And as I say, that the sort of eerie part of it is this sense that something went out and was working
on my behalf while I was busy making pictures of Hawaii to 17 or whatever nonsense I was doing that
was happening.
And on the topic of of of working for me.
Let's go and have a look at the outcome from the agent as it went off.
It did indeed end by surfacing Jones Wood Foundry, a British gastropub in the Upper East Side.
The dinner menu includes banoffee pie, apparently.
Uh, and it checked the reservations.
We saw it check the reservations on.
And it did indeed find that there was time at 9 p.m. for four people, and it gives the address and
the link to it and the reservation.
And the final punchline.
The punchline I will leave you with.
If you'd like, I can go ahead and book the 9 p.m. reservation for four people under your name.
Just let me know and I'll proceed.
So it's like you have an assistant, a true assistant working behind the scenes, able to carry out
tasks on your behalf.
and and that it's fascinating and I find it astonishing.
And finally, for the last of our demos of tools, let's look at Claude Code, something that you may
be familiar with already.
I'm back in cursor.
I'm back in the LM engineering folder, and here I am, and I'm going to say, uh, I'm going to type
Claude, which actually launches Claude code.
Uh, and, uh, here it comes.
Bam!
Yes.
Proceed.
We are in Claude code.
And now I'm going to say the following.
Please read, uh, day one and day two Pi MB in the week one directory.
And then, uh, write a solution to the challenge in day two.
I,
As a python module called um solution.py in week one that I can run with UV.
All right.
What do you think.
Can it do it.
Let's see.
So it's read both notebooks okay.
Let's see what it does next.
It's thinking about it.
You can see the reading that it's done.
I'll now create solutions py that implements the website summarizer using llama instead of OpenAI.
Here we go.
solution.py.
It's suggesting something I'm going to say yes.
It's done it.
Here is solution.py.
Let's check it out.
Website summarizer.
Using llama instead of OpenAI I can see it's using the llama base URL.
The model correctly.
It's got the snarky assistant that analyzes the contents of a website.
It's got the right messages for.
It's got the right summarize.
Um, let's just give it a shot.
You've run.
Um, let's see.
Uh, which what URL does it use?
Enter URL it's going to use input okay.
You you've run solution dot pi.
Oh sorry I should be in the, um, week one folder and I should be in a new terminal.
Here we go CD week one.
You've run solution dot solution dot pi.
Here we go.
Enter a URL to summarize.
Okay let's do https Edward donna.com fetching and summarizing.
It says.
And there we go.
It's just done it a website full of egotistical ramblings from the founder Edward Donna.
So it just called a Llama and Llama 3.2 running locally on my computer.
But what's most amazing is that it just solved that problem and wrote this code we just saw.
Claude code reading through what we did in day one, reading through what I set up in day two with oh
llama understanding what was going on, understanding the challenge that I had set, and then writing
a solution called solutions that we could just run and get the right outcome immediately.
And so if you if you built solution yesterday and you're kicking yourself now knowing that you could
have just done it all with Claude code.
But isn't that remarkable?
And this brings things together.
This is showing you it's a product.
It's using Claude.
It's using Claude sonnet 4.5.
And it's a gigantic.
And that it's thinking and working on our behalf and solving the problem just like that, all in one
step.
And so that that is a quick demo of Claude Code.
And it's fabulous that it happens to actually be something useful and something that you might have
wanted to have done yourself yesterday.
So there we have it.
That's that's the final demo of these tools that is Claude code for you.
024 - And again, this course is not about using these end tools.
This is about building our own.
We're going to be building tools like ChatGPT and then taking them off in different directions, giving
them expertise.
But I wanted to show it to you, to give you that hands on feel for them.
If you're interested in using any of these, I'll put links to all of them in the resources, including,
of course, Claude code, should you wish.
I love Claude code.
Uh, but but of course, cursor agents also.
Great.
Um, but, uh, yeah, the the bottom line is that all of the frontier models are insanely strong.
Uh, really?
It just it's mind blowing.
Uh, very good at nuance, at synthesizing information.
Um, Claude happens to often be people's favorite.
It's my favorite.
Uh, I don't know why.
People in the community, for various reasons, have grown very fond of Claude.
Um, but, uh, yeah, we'll we'll see, uh, leaderboards later and compare some of these models.
And right now, GPT five is probably considered the most powerful model on the planet.
And one of the things that's interesting is that as they converge on their capabilities, price and
also speed is becoming more and more important.
And we'll see how you can trade off intelligence and price and look for something that's at the sweet
spot for your business requirements.
In later weeks.
Okay.
So that's that's sort of wrapping up our exploration of frontier models.
But there is one more thing I wanted to show you.
So we didn't do a lab today, but I have the next best thing.
I have a demo to give you of something that I built that you can see the code and the results for yourself,
but I'm going to go to my web page is my website at madonna.com.
And I wrote a game called Outsmart.
And Outsmart is a way to have Llms compete, to try and and outwit each other in a very ugly game of
cleverness.
There's there's four players Alex, Blake, Charlie and Drew named so it could be A, B, C, D and
on my website.
Alex is played by GPT four, oh, Blake by Claude, three sonnet, Charlie, Gemini two, flash, and
drew by Deep Sega.
Small version.
In llama 70 B, these are the four and they play a game and they play a game where they each start with
12 coins, as you see here.
And every time, every turn, they get to choose to take a coin from one player and give a coin to another
player.
But before they make their decision on which player that they will do that with, they get to exchange
a message with all of the other players to talk about, to try and sort of set up how they're going
to to be be both a diplomatic and scheming and negotiate who gets what money.
And if two of them both gang up on the same player and they both give each other money, then they're
said to be in an alliance together.
That's an extra special move.
If they do that, and if so, they win extra coins and they take extra from the person that they ganged
up on.
So it gives them the ability to try and scheme and form alliances with each other.
And the thing that's going to be kind of cool about it is that they will get to tell us their inner
thoughts, and we'll get to see the messages they send each other.
Doesn't that sound fun?
I found this to be a great way to get insight into what these models can do and how they behave.
But it wouldn't be that fun if we were playing these models against each other, because I'm being a
bit bit cheap and I'm not putting the most expensive models out there on the internet for anyone to
play, because people play these games a lot.
I get like a 4 or 5 games played a day.
Uh, but let's flip to where I have this running locally and running locally.
Everybody I have in Alex and Player A, I have GPT OS 120, the new open source version of GPT running
on the cloud, because my computer's not big enough, but that is open source GPT.
In Blake, we have GPT five, the flagship model in Charlie we have grok for Elon Musk's model and in
drew we have Claude Sonnet 4.5 that was released a matter of days ago.
For me, this is also one of the strongest models on the planet for powerful competitors.
And we are going to play a game of outsmart.
And so I kicked the game off by pressing the run game button and off they go.
Now, these latest models like GPT five, I'm not giving it a thinking budget, so it can take as long
as it wants, and it does take a long time.
They used this game, used to move pretty fast, but now it happens slowly.
All four players get to think in parallel at the same time, but you'll see that GPT OS thought really
fast.
Uh, it's running on this platform called grok with a cue that we will look at another time, which
is very quick.
The others take much longer, and GPT five takes the longest of them all.
And we'll see it waiting there for Blake to make its move.
Now, while that's thinking, let me just tell you that the source code for all of this is available
online so you can look at it.
I've tried to build it in a way that's very easy to read and understand.
This is called a Streamlit app.
I use Streamlit most of this course.
We're going to we're going to be looking at different UIs using something called Gradio, which I love,
and which some other things I've built on my website are on, but this is a Streamlit app.
I know there's a lot of fans of Streamlit out there, so you can see how I did that and it's busy running
away.
And if you go on to to the the arena, you can kick off runs.
And because I'm using smaller models live on the internet, it does run faster.
In fact we could yeah, we we could kick one off in just a second as well.
But this is this is running.
And as it completes each turn we'll be able to go in, look at what it's doing, look at what it's thinking
and see its strategy.
So I will come back in a second when the first move is complete.
So the first move happened.
And you'll see on the right here is this little chart to show you the money that everyone has on each
move.
And there's based on the very first move, the early winner is open source.
Alex.
GPT OS one TB hits the early lead, so you'll see here.
Each of them tells us their strategy.
I get each model to explain its strategy, form an alliance, withdrew by giving him a coin and taking
from Charlie.
If he reciprocates, we both get extra.
Keep those neutral for now so you can read each of their strategies.
First turn is about establishing trust and exploring alliance opportunities, says Claude.
Um, and then if you open up this box here with inner thoughts, you can actually see the messages that
they give each other, and you can read about their exactly what the schemes they're hatching in here,
and see everything as it transpires.
And you can see here that Alex and Drew are in alliance with each other, shown in green, and that
Charlie Grok four, is being ganged up on by both of them.
So with these big models, it's not quick.
Uh, it takes a bit of time to run, but it's absolutely fascinating to see the results of their thought
process, and it gives you some real insight into the kinds kinds of ways they work and the way they
think.
Because by making it give it strategy this way, we're sort of forcing it to be, uh, extra reasoning
to put extra work into its thought process, to articulate its strategy.
And that's a great trick for getting the most out of models, is to have them explain their strategy
to really put them in this reasoning mode.
Okay, I'm going to let this run for a few more turns.
I will see you in a second.
And a second turn has happened.
And now GPT five is headed into the lead with 15 coins.
Uh, with OpenAI's uh OSS.
Alex dropping one point, uh, you can see that, uh, Blake and and Charlie are now in an alliance
together, and they are, uh, also that so, so.
But Charlie is the one that's in the worst position.
But drew is the one that's being ganged up on.
So Claude Sonnet 45 is being ganged up on by by both of these.
So drew is in trouble.
So it's great fun.
I gotta tell you, I can get quite addicted to this and watch it for a long time, but that's not the
point.
The reason for doing this is so that you get some real hands on feel for the different characteristics
of the models and for the abilities that llms have, and for this kind of mode of having them think
through what they're doing and the kinds of problem solving that they can do, and look at how they
interact with each other in this game.
I hope you have fun with it.
But now what I'm going to do is something super cruel.
I'm not going to show you the outcome of this game, because we're going to leave that till tomorrow.
We're going to wait until the next day before we discover who it is that is victorious, or will let
this game play out.
I'm going to see you back for the slides, for a quick wrap up and leave you hanging like like some
some kind of cheap soap opera.
Uh, until until we get to tomorrow.
So see you for the wrap up.
Well, I'm sorry to leave you hanging, but, look, take joy in the fact that you are 7.5% on your
road to being a master already.
You're already on this path and you learned so much.
I know today we weren't actually looking at coding AI, which is what this is all about, but you've
got deep perspective on what these things can do.
In addition to being able to write code to call front end models and summarize, you can now talk about
the strengths and some of the limitations of frontier models.
You can compare and contrast them.
You've got some intuition now for the differences between them and you certainly I imagine have a good
sense of chat versus reasoning and also hybrid and even base models too.
Tomorrow we're going to talk about the crazy rise of the transformer architecture.
I'm going to give you some intuition for some of the latest developments like Agentic, AI, context
engineering agent loops, and we're going to cover some of the foundational things, much of which you
probably already know.
But I hope to sprinkle in some extra juicy stuff that you don't know around tokens, context, windows
parameters, and API costs.
I can't wait.
I'll see you then.
025 - And welcome to day four of week one.
Somehow we are already on day four and I have lots of great stuff in store for you today.
But what you can already do, you can already write code to call OpenAI on the cloud and locally, you
can compare the strengths and limitations of frontier models and contrast them.
And by the end of this lecture, you'll be able to talk about how incredible the way that Transformers
have overtaken what we do in this.
In the field of data science, you'll be able to talk about things like Agentic, AI, context engineering,
agent loops, the latest hot topics, and most importantly, you're going to understand the basics like
tokens, context, windows parameters, API costs.
And you may be very much familiar with this already.
This might be old hat to you, but I always hope to sprinkle in something different to to give you something
new to think about.
So even the people that know this stuff, well, hang on in there.
I still hope to give you something useful today.
But first, before anything else, I know you're wanting to know what happened from this.
This big competition that we ran.
What?
What came of out smart?
Who managed to outsmart the others?
Let's go take a look.
And I have it running on this tab.
Here.
I'll give you a drum roll.
Prepare to see who wins.
And the winner.
The winner of this particular run was Charlie.
Which Charlie was being played by Grock for Grock for known for being perhaps one of the more devious
of the models did in this occasion managed to triumph.
Um and uh, with 14 you'll see that it was actually pretty close.
The one that did, uh, did worse down here was was drew at the bottom.
Claude Sonnet, coming in last place did not do very well.
Uh, and but it's quite wordy about it.
All this stuff.
Um, but you'll see that Charlie was, was ultimately, uh, the most Successful uh, Charlie, followed
by OSS, uh, followed by GPT five in third place and then finally drew.
And there you see the, uh, the chart of how it went.
And for a while there, actually drew was the winner.
But then the others ganged up on.
Drew.
Fascinating.
I hope you enjoy running this yourself.
Get some insight into it.
That's what it's all about.
Very enjoyable.
And when you're doing it, you can also go to the swizzle over here on the left.
This is also on the main site.
If you open it up and press Calculate Rankings, it takes a second.
There's been more than 2000 games of this played, and you'll see that right now grog is at the top,
but only I've only played three games with grog and it's won all three of them.
So it comes up very strong and you can see how some of the others did.
But because I haven't played enough games with different ones, it's not.
You have to look for the ones which have the most games.
Claude 3.5 sonnet uh, did the most games is the one that really rose to the surface, uh, from playing
lots and lots of games.
So it is actually the one that came out strongest from my my public website where you can you can play
all of them and but the rankings is kind of fun to see.
You should give that a try.
You can also see the repo.
See the code to learn more about what I did, and also read a blog post I made about how I wrote it
and some of the the tactics that you can work on and should you wish to make your own variant of the
game.
There's there's some ways to do that.
You can also run it locally to try out any models that you wish.
Uh, anyways, use this as a chance to learn about models, but meanwhile we've got to press on with
the course with week one, day four.
So we spent some time now with GPT, and I'm sure you spent lots of time with ChatGPT, and you're probably
familiar with the fact that GPT stands for generative is the G, which means that it's a model which
is responsible for generating tokens or predicting what should come next after a sequence of inputs.
It's P stands for pre-trained, in that it's been trained off tons and tons of data scraped from the
internet and from all sorts of sources.
Controversially, that is the P in GPT.
And of course the T is transformer.
GPT, the generative pre-trained transformer.
So what exactly is this transformer thing?
So I'm not a big fan of teaching tons of theory before you get stuck into stuff.
So what I'm not planning to do now is tell you about the innards of a transformer.
And I know some of you will be disappointed because like, I wonder about decoders and self-attention
layers and blah blah blah.
The way that we're going to do it is that over the course of the next eight weeks, I'm going to be
showing you deeper and deeper glances into the insides of a transformer so that you get a better sense
of how it all holds together.
Because the way that I like to teach theory is through practice, through putting things into action,
looking at the code, seeing what this transformer actually looks like as Python code.
But for now, what I want to do more is tell you the story of the transformer.
Give you some intuition for what it is and how it fits together, so that the rest of the next few weeks
all fits into place.
And it all starts a long, long time ago, in 2017.
Not that long ago at all.
In 2017, a bunch of scientists at Google put out a paper that's called Attention is All You Need,
which I've linked in the resources.
And the naming was because there's a sort of series of papers that are named in in the style.
Something is all you need.
And at the time they it's clear.
If you look at the paper and I do recommend you do look at the paper, even though it might not make
sense initially.
Uh, but but as I say, linked in the resources.
Look at the paper.
The thing to keep in mind is that it's very evident that the scientists that wrote this paper did not
realize what an extraordinary discovery they were making, or how it was going to change the years ahead.
They didn't realize it.
They thought it was a bit of an optimization.
There's something good that we realized here.
Uh, and that's at the core of the paper.
Attention is all you need.
So?
So what was the paper about?
Well, the paper was about describing a particular structure of a kind of data science model called
a neural network or a deep neural network.
And I know this is old hat to some of you, but but just give me give me a couple of minutes on this.
So prior like some some time ago, we used to work with with traditional data science and these are
models.
They are statistical models mostly, uh, that try to predict some outcome based on some parameters,
some controls.
And it learns how to set those parameters by looking at lots of examples of data that's, you know,
very broad brush strokes.
So if you're trying to figure out how, how what kind of credit score someone should have that's going
to take out a loan.
You might look at various factors about that person, and then you might look at a lot of data about
different people with those different factors and what their credit scores are.
And by comparing your actual data of real world examples of people and credit scores.
With this new person, you can estimate what the credit score should be based on all of this training
data, as it's called.
And that is a sort of traditional data science model.
And uh, sometime actually in the 1950s, like a long time ago, someone had the idea of building a
special kind of data science model that was loosely inspired by the human mind.
Only loosely, it was called a neural network.
The idea was that it was, rather than one statistical program.
It was lots of statistical programs that were all kind of connected together in some way, sort of a
nod to the way that the human mind has lots of real neurons, human neurons that are connected together.
Similarly, the neural network had lots of little algorithms called artificial neurons, that were all
connected together.
And it turned out to be a very effective way to learn different patterns in data and be able to make
good predictions about things like credit scores.
And the neural network has something of a storied history, a checkered history of times when it seemed
to be very much in vogue, and people saw tons of promise and times when it seemed to not show so much
promise and fall behind a bit.
And there were various breakthroughs along the way, and most of the breakthroughs were around ways
to work with larger neural networks that could take more training data and be able to detect patterns
even more deeply, and hence the expression deep neural network, or deep learning, which was about
building these very, very deep sets of of these neurons connected together, they're actually sort
of stacked on top of each other, connected together.
And the more of them there are, the deeper this became, the more stacks on top of stacks and the sort
of more intelligent these neural networks turned out to be.
But I'm getting somewhere with this, I promise.
In 2017, Google scientists came up with a new way to organize these these neurons, this neural network.
It's called an architecture.
The architecture is just the approach you use to connect these things together.
And the new architecture was especially good at handling sequences of inputs and being able to look
back on those sequences and figure out what parts of those sequences really matter, which was a type
of, of of, uh, of, of layer in this network called a self-attention, an attention layer.
And this, this idea, a layer that was able to figure out what should I pay attention to in the input
sequence turned out to be to be a huge step forwards.
It allowed.
It allowed them to work with much bigger neural networks and much bigger data sets in less time and
scale more effectively.
And as I say, I know I'm being very hand-wavy on this.
We will get more detailed later, but that's the intuition.
And in 2018, where Google had really led the field of inventing this transformer architecture, OpenAI
at the time of small, almost unheard of company, came out with their transformer called GPT one,
the generative pre-trained transformer one.
And it was okay.
It was it was quite basic.
Uh, and then a year later, they came out with GPT two, and I think I first really noticed GPT two.
I remember 2020, GPT three, I sent this, I had this, this long argument with my dad about GPT three
when I was saying, this is something huge.
You got to look at this.
This is big.
Uh, and uh, yeah, he was like, ah, it's just statistics.
Uh, and I'm not surprised.
I also partly felt that way, too.
We were all caught off guard.
Even practitioners in the industry when ChatGPT came out in 2022, which was using a version called
GPT 3.5.
But importantly, it was also using something called ref that I alluded to, I think yesterday, which
is about an even better way to make it not just think about extending a sequence, but also work in
a chat mode with a user.
User prompt a system prompt, a user prompt and its response and be trained in that way.
And that was ChatGPT.
And then of course, GPT four came out in 2023 and was like, whoa.
And then 4.0 was last year, the multimodal version.
And now, of course, for GPT five, maybe you're on GPT six, but the rest is history.
That is the extraordinary, astonishing rise of the transformer.
And we will cover more aspects of the architecture itself in the coming weeks.
But that's enough for now.
One step at a time.
The one point I want to make, though, is that we don't believe that there's anything super fundamental
about the transformer architecture.
That means that it had to be discovered and that we wouldn't have things like GPT five or Claude 4.5
sonnet if we hadn't discovered the transformer.
The transformer, it's it's an optimization.
It's a really clever approach that allows us to scale, train with more data, with more parameters
in a in a more efficient way.
Without it, it might have taken us longer to get to the point we're at.
It might have cost more.
The API costs that everyone complains about might have been 10 or 100 times more.
The transformer allowed us to to do this faster and cheaper, but it's not like there's anything about
it that somehow fundamental to what it takes to predict tokens.
It's more of an efficiency play.
That's a way to think about it anyway.
And there are alternatives to the transformer architecture.
There are state space architectures if you're familiar with them, and there are hybrid architectures.
There's all sorts of stuff going on as yet.
Many of them are sort of on lockstep with the transformer, but none of them have yet proven definitively
that they are superior to the transformer architecture.
So it still remains today the predominant architecture that people use for Llms.
But but there are others, and as I say, important to keep in mind.
We don't believe there's anything fundamental about this, this attention thing.
It just happened to be really efficient.
026 - And some of you may know that before the transformer, the model that we used the most was one called
the LSTM, the long short term memory, which was a type of recurrent neural network NN.
And and actually many people think that it is in fact more powerful than the transformer.
It has a lot more ability to to take a sort of deeper understanding of the relationship between a sequence.
The problem it had was that it was very hard to parallelize.
It needed to learn things step by step.
The outputs from one part of the of the input got fed to the next in a way that meant that you couldn't
run all of your calculations in parallel, and that made it very time consuming and complicated to try
and train these things.
The transformer in some ways was a simplification.
It was it was not not doing all this clever stuff.
And it turned out that the simplification that you got so much benefit from being able to parallelize
and do things together concurrently, a lot of the time that it far overtook the fact that it was a
bit of a simplification.
But the reason, since it was a simplification, the reason for the title of the paper attention is
all you need.
Well, the authors were trying to say is, you know what?
It turns out we don't need all this clever stuff.
If you just have this much simpler construct called attention, it's actually good enough.
And because we can scale it so much more and, and operate in parallel so much more, we can actually
get much further along.
And that was that was the purpose of attention is all you need.
And the results speak for themselves.
And the world's reaction you'll probably remember in 2023.
First of all, people were astonished, amazed, shocked.
It was everywhere in all the papers, people that friends of mine would ask me, so, so, so what's
a transformer?
Which was kind of crazy.
It's my day job, and I wasn't used to people around me knowing the word transformer.
It was.
It was everywhere.
Uh, and that was followed by a backlash that was followed, uh, famously by by a paper on the dangers
of stochastic parrots, uh, written by some prominent scientists who were concerned that people were
looking at these these simple statistical models that were just predicting likely next words and interpreting
them as being truth when they weren't necessarily they were just the most likely next, next word.
It was just statistical.
It was predictive text on steroids.
And so people were very concerned about the implications and what could happen as a result.
But their concerns, it's worth reading that paper just just to get a sense of of what people were thinking
at the time.
And of course, it didn't age well.
We now see this remarkable characteristic that that still surprises even the experts today.
Even the people in the frontier labs in OpenAI are perplexed by the fact that it's not a surprise that
we're able to get so good at predicting likely tokens.
Tokens we'll talk about.
Of course, they're fragments of words.
It's it's not a surprise that we can take an input sequence and predict words that look very realistic,
really good predictive text.
That's not surprising.
The thing that's surprising is that as a byproduct of doing that, so often, what gets predicted happens
to be the truth.
It happens to be accurate.
And if we give like a maths problem, a math problem in that input sequence, you'd expect some sort
of plausible words that sound like an answer to a math problem.
What you might not expect is that it actually is the answer to that math problem.
That's the part that's caught everyone off guard, and we don't fully understand it.
We understand how it works.
We understand the statistics and the numbers.
We're sort of still surprised about why it works and why it works so well.
So that that phenomenon, the fact that with a big enough neural network, with enough of these kinds
of these, these neurons, these little algorithms hooked up together that you get a not only likely
tokens, but accurate tokens, intelligent tokens or tokens that that represent an intelligent response.
It simulates its.
It imitates an intelligent response very accurately.
That still a bit of a mystery.
And it's what people call the property of emergent intelligence.
With enough scale, you start to not only create plausible tokens, but actually ones that imitate intelligence
very accurately.
And some of the innovations that we've we've hit in the last few years.
There was a time when prompt engineering, a prompt engineer, was actually a job out there that commanded
a high six figure salary for a while.
And I feel like prompt engineering is like a profession.
And a thing came and went.
Now all of us are prompt engineers.
We all know the different tricks and the ways to explain the context.
Give some background, say the style of what you want.
We've all got so good at this that it's no longer a job title.
I'm sorry for prompt engineers out there, but it was for a bit.
The Copilots have come and they have stayed for sure.
Microsoft Copilot, GitHub Copilot that I think deep research showed us earlier.
These copilots are definitely, uh, what was it was a big moment when we realized that that humans
and llms could sort of operate collaboratively to work together on things like documents in order to,
to, to get more and in order to, to both, uh, automate some of the manual tasks, but also enrich
the work that we're doing by working hand in hand with an AI with an LLM.
Next was the evolution of prompt engineering.
And this is more in recent time.
And this new word context engineering.
Context engineering.
The new prompt engineering is about thinking broadly about all of the information that you can give
to an LLM to best set it up for success.
And that can be business specific commercial information that you're giving it in the prompt, and you're
maybe stitching it together in a really compelling way.
And in addition to that, you're also equipping your MLM with things called tools that will do next
week.
Uh, and it sounds very fancy, and it's actually not that fancy at all.
It all comes down to.
Just better ways to inform the LM, to give it better input sequences so that when it's coming up with
the output sequence, it's more aligned with the task you're trying to solve.
If you're trying to find out about you're trying to inform your customers about the ticket prices to
travel to different locations, then you need to make sure that those ticket prices are included in
that input sequence, so that when the LM is predicting tokens, it's including the right ticket prices.
And that is fundamentally what context engineering is all about.
And last, but very much not least, is a genetic AI surely the hottest topic in AI right now?
And of course, I have a whole companion course on just that.
There are many different ways to define agents, but two of the most common, uh, one of them is it's
it's a system where an LM controls the workflow, a system where you have an LM which is responsible
for figuring out what happens next, including potentially calling other LMS, making use of tools or
functionality that you're running.
That is one common definition of a genetic AI, and another one which is becoming, uh, probably more
common these days is that a genetic AI is when you have an LM in a loop and that loop, in other words,
it's repeatedly being called, it's calling itself repeatedly, and its inner loop, and it has access
to tools which allows it to take various actions.
And that idea of an LM and a loop with tools, that's something that if you've ever used Claude code,
you're very familiar with, because it really is front and center, you see the to do list that it's
working on, you see it planning out what it's going to do and then ticking them off one by one.
And it is just a series of LM calls carrying out each of these actions.
Another word people love to throw around with their genetic AI is the word autonomy.
Autonomous.
this idea that you're you're allowing an LLM to sort of be master of its own destiny, choosing what
it wants to do next.
Of course it sounds.
It sounds like voodoo, but it's all again, it all just comes down to it taking in an input sequence,
generating an output sequence.
But when it generates that output sequence, that can include some instructions about what activities
it wants to do next.
And when you do that, when you have an LLM predicting tokens, which says, this is what I want to
do next, then that is in a way autonomous.
It's choosing its own destiny.
And that is a sign that you're working with a genetic AI.
And so so there you have it.
We'll, we'll we'll talk more about it later.
We'll build some in the final week of this course.
It's going to be great.
And a genetic AI all the rage.
And if you haven't well, we just saw Claude code, so you already probably have a pretty decent feeling
of what it feels like to be working with a genetic AI.
And also, of course, the GPT agent that we did that found that, that that a reservation for for banoffee
pie in the evening.
027 - When I was describing Transformers, I mentioned this word parameter and it's a word you hear a lot.
In fact, we talked about like the 8 billion parameters in llama 3.2 and the what was it, 270 million
in the smallest version of Gemma.
So what are these parameters?
Well, you may already know what parameters are.
You may have a very good sense of it.
And if you don't, I've put some short videos in the resources of times when I feel like I did a great
explanation of parameters, and so to avoid boring the people that already know it, I'll just suggest
if you don't know what these parameters are then, then check out the videos that I've attached in the
course resources and you'll get a really great briefing on them.
Um, but the, the, these these parameters, back in the traditional machine learning days, we used
to have somewhere between 20 and 200 parameters that were control and model choose the creditworthiness
of someone based on on maybe 20 factors, 30 factors, that kind of thing.
And the first time that that neural networks, that deep neural networks came out.
I was just so shocked by just the number of these different parameters that we were talking about.
And when GPT one came out and it had 117 million parameters, just an extraordinary number.
I remember thinking, I can't imagine what all of these parameters are being used for, and I can't
imagine we're ever going to need a model bigger than this.
And I was a bit wrong there.
Well, this is what happened next.
GPT two had 1.5 billion parameters GPT three.
175 billion.
GPT four had 1.76 trillion parameters.
It's it's an extraordinary number.
And the latest frontier models.
We don't actually know how many parameters they have.
They haven't revealed them.
There is a sense, actually that that we've been able to reduce parameters a bit generally.
I'm sure there's still they're probably still in the tens of trillions, but they have come down a bit
because we've got much more efficient at sort of packing information into a smaller number of parameters,
as evidenced by the fact that that smallest Gemma is only 270 million parameters.
It's smaller than GPT two, and yet it's way more powerful than GPT two.
So we've definitely been able to do more with less when it comes to parameters.
Nonetheless, as a general rule, more parameters means more intelligent, more training information
has been absorbed into the neural network.
And generally speaking, when you see that there are models that come in different flavors, like GPT
five has a nano, a mini, and GPT five the whole one that represents three different sizes of the model,
with three different sets of three increasing numbers of parameters.
Now, the Frontier Labs typically haven't been explicit about that, so we don't know for sure and we
don't know how many, but that's certainly everybody's understanding.
Similarly with Claude, you've got haiku is the smallest sonnet in the middle and opus the largest one.
And we understand that they are three different sizes of model.
And that's certainly reflected in the cost, which we understand, of course, is the actual compute
cost.
Basically how much it costs to calculate all of these parameters, these trillions of parameters.
So so that's why there are these different variations of model.
And they represent different sizes, different, different uh, different amounts of parameters in the
model.
And we sometimes call that training time scaling.
It's saying a bigger model, more parameters.
It needed more.
It was more expensive to train it.
And it can typically absorb more training data.
There's something from from a few years ago called the Chinchilla scaling laws, which you may have
heard of.
It's not talked about so much anymore, but it says that generally speaking, the number of parameters
you have in a model is roughly proportional to how much training data it can successfully be trained
on, and still absorb that training data.
So generally speaking, more parameters means we could do more training.
We've got a beefier model.
And so as I say, this idea of having more parameters is sometimes called training time scaling.
That can be contrasted with another way to get more out of a model, which is sometimes called inference
time scaling.
You remember I said inference is just the word for when you run a model.
When you've trained it, it's done.
You've got the model, and now you actually use it.
Well, when you use it, there are tricks you can do that will make it perform better, be smarter.
And one of those tricks is the reasoning trick that we've already looked at.
It's telling it.
Hey, don't just answer this question.
I want you to first generate tokens that describe how you will answer the question.
And maybe I'll do that janky thing of shoving the word wait in there a few times just to make you do
even more of this.
And it turns out you get a better outcome by doing it.
Another type of inference time scaling, is about putting more information in the input sequence, like
ticket prices around the world, which means that when it's generating outputs, it can it can draw
on the input sequence and be influenced by it.
And, you know, that's very consistent with techniques like Rag that we will come to.
Uh, and so those two techniques I just mentioned are both examples of inference time scaling ways to
make your model perform better at inference time not when you trained it, but when you're actually
running it.
And this idea that there are these two different parallel ways that you can get more out of a model,
training time scaling and inference time scaling is something that has really come to the to the forefront
in the last year or so, because previously it was all about training time.
Everything was about a bigger model.
Bigger is better, more parameters, bigger, more training.
And in the last year, inference time scaling has really taken off.
And you know, two years ago it was Rag, which is inference time.
And and then in the last year it's been a lot about different reasoning techniques.
And basically these are two different orthogonal tracks to getting more out of your model.
And you can do both.
You can scale at training time and scale at inference time.
And we'll talk a lot more about this over the course of the next eight weeks.
And you'll see some real examples of both in action.
Okay.
But I just want to superimpose on this line the size of some of the open source models that we've,
some of them we've already come across, and some of them we will.
On the left, I've put the llama 3.2 with 3 billion parameters as a yellow dot.
There you can see it's just slightly more than than GPT two.
Uh, I should point out, of course, if you didn't already realize this, that this is a logarithmic
scale, so that every one of these tick marks represents an order of magnitude ten times bigger.
It's not like a linear scale with one, two, three, four, five.
It's 1 billion, 10 billion, 100 billion.
Uh, so so llama 3.23 billion is give or take close ish to GPT two, but way more powerful.
Llama 3.1.
It has a smaller number, but it's a bigger model with more parameters and outperforms llama 3.2.
It's 8 billion.
Uh, llama 3.3 is 3.3 billion.
There is also a llama four comes in a bunch of different varieties.
There's a multi modal one that I think 2.45 billion is uh is the more common one GPT os the open source
version GPT.
We've already played with the 20 billion version that I'm not showing here, but we also played with
the 120 billion version, which is the heftier one.
We didn't play with it.
We had it playing the Outsmart game a moment ago.
And then the biggest one I've got on this diagram, Deep seek has 671 billion parameters.
And most of these big models are what's known as a mixture of experts model, which means that within
them they contain a lot of smaller models that get activated, get used based on the question that's
asked.
Take a moment to absorb this scale, this logarithmic scale of parameters, and and marvel at the enormity
of the latest frontier models in the probably tens of trillions of parameters.
Absolutely extraordinary.
If you haven't seen my videos and the resources about parameters, then then if you're interested,
check them out and and keep all of this in mind as we go forwards and think more about how these models
actually function.
028 - Let's take a couple of minutes on what tokens are.
Most of you know, but hopefully there'll be some interesting stuff here.
In the early days of neural networks, we used to build neural networks that were trained to take in
character by character, letter by letter, and they would output the most likely next letter.
And there were some nice properties of this.
There were only perhaps 100 possible characters for uppercase, lowercase, and punctuation.
And so there's a nice and simple, uh, vocab, different possible inputs.
Uh, and, uh, that meant that it could take up little memory and it could be quite efficient, but
it required the, the neural network to understand too much like it was.
It was too hard to train it to both understand how to make up different words out of their characters,
and also associate them with some kind of meaning.
There was too much being left to the network, and the next thing we tried was really having one word
each.
Each input.
Being a word is the kind of obvious thing to do.
And so you'd build up like a, like a vocab of possible words that could be passed in.
But then we had the opposite problem that there's so many possible input words because, you know,
language, but also because of all the proper nouns, the names of places and things.
So this exploded and and we'd have to leave out rare words from the vocab that meant that they didn't
understand some things.
But this is what we put up with for a long time.
And then, uh, the, the, the breakthrough, the idea was to have some sort of a middle ground where
you have a chunk of text.
It might be a word, or it might be a fragment of a word, or it might even be two words.
If you have two words that are really common, uh, and you build up a vocab, that is these fragments
of words, these chunks of characters.
And as a result, you can have a limited set.
You can constrain it to some set because you could go all the way down to the character level if you
needed to.
And you can allow the model to recognize various fragments of words as having some meaning associated
with them.
And basically this approach just ended up working really well.
It's a bit like the transformer architecture.
We don't think that there's something fundamental about tokens that we needed to do it this way.
We could have done it with characters, we could have done it with words, with massive dictionaries.
It turned out that this compromise with tokens is efficient.
It works fast.
It learns about about the concepts really quickly.
And it has this nice little extra property about word stems that I'll explain in just a second.
But but it allowed, very simply, a neural network to recognize that often you have a case where there's
one chunk of characters and then different chunks come after it, and that that is just moderating the
main, the main chunk.
And that sort of fits nicely with the way that we happen to to spell things, to write things to, to
our language.
And so that property again meant that it could be very efficient.
And so that's the background to tokens.
And now I do want to explain.
So these tokens are the input.
They are passed in as is the very first input into one of these language models, these LMS or any deep
neural network.
In fact, it's the number associated with like the token ID, which one of the tokens it is.
Uh, it's different from things called vectors.
And if you're a pro and you already know about vectors, then some people do get confused about, oh,
hang on, what is a token of vector?
No, we'll come to vectors later.
They're different.
They come further down in the neural network.
The very first input, whether you're making a vector or whether you're generating next tokens, the
very first input is just the token id.
So so put vectors to one side.
We will come back to them.
They are different okay.
Let's look for a moment at the tokenizer that's used for GPT.
And you can get to this yourself by going to platform.
Tokenizer and have a play.
And this is a lovely way to get a hands on view of what is it like turning text into tokens?
029 - And so you can see on this user interface, I've typed in the sentence an important sentence for my
class of AI engineers.
And below it, the user interface has shown how that would be converted into tokens with those colors.
And you'll see that in this case, because these are very common words, each word is mapped to a token
in its own.
So Ann has a token important sentence for my class of AI engineers.
They each get a token.
You may also notice you can pick the different model in the user interface, because different models
may have slightly different strategies for how they turn things into tokens.
That's not super important.
Some people get worried about does this mean I have to pick a model that will be more efficient?
It's just some different decisions they made during training doesn't make a huge amount of difference.
But if you're if you're investigating tokens, then pick the one that is the one that interests you.
So I wanted to make the two points.
One is that that each word has gone into a token.
The other point I wanted to make is that you'll notice that in the way that it's colored things in,
it's its coloured the space before the word as well, and that reflects the fact that the token isn't
just the word important, it's also something called a beginning of word.
Part of that it's telling the model that's fed to that.
What comes next is a new word, and it's the word important.
And those both those bits of information are a part of what what that token represents.
And if you had a word like unimportant it wouldn't contain that token.
It would be a different it might be un and then another version of the important token, but without
the space in front of it.
Subtle point is worth understanding.
There is this difference between tokens that represent the start of a word and tokens that represent
a fragment, the middle of a word.
And I'll bring that to life in the next one.
Okay, so here's another one.
I've now got, uh, an exquisitely handcrafted quip for my master's of LLM witchcraft.
Okay, uh, steady on, uh, the flowery language for you.
But the reason I do it is because there are some less common words here, and even in an invented word
in mastera.
And I wanted to show you how those more, those less frequent words get broken into multiple tokens
so that they can still be understood by the model.
Check out the colors exquisitely is obviously not a common word, because look, it got X as part of
it and then quiz it li.
Lots of different fragments there.
Handcrafted was split into two hand and crafted.
And so it does have it will be mapped to something which which has some understanding of of hand and
then something which ends crafted.
Notice that that token crafted doesn't have that space before it.
It represents a word ending crafted.
And so it's mapped to something that the neural network will recognize wherever it's had something crafted.
The next one is quip, which has been broken into and and then for and my get get separate ones Masters
gets master, which is the, you know, represents the verb to master and then errs as you know, someone
that does something.
And so it kind of works.
Again, it's not super important.
It's not like the neural network needs it to be done this way.
It's just more likely to train faster and to be able to capture, reflect the meaning of these words
quicker.
If the way that they're fed into it already is kind of similar to the way that these words are constructed.
And then of and then LM wasn't as common.
Now LM, of course, is like insanely common expression.
But at the time that this tokenizer was built, LM wasn't such a big term.
And so LM got broken into two tokens and witchcraft gets witch and then again craft as the as the ending.
Um, and so that it again, it's similar to the meaning of these, these compound words.
Uh, so so that gives you a sense.
It's not it's not actually a compound word, but but like a word that's composed of multiple pieces,
so it gives you a sense of how it works.
You can see that there were 66 characters here, and it got mapped down to 18 tokens.
If we go back to the previous slide, we'll see there there were 50 characters that got mapped down
to nine tokens.
So it gives you that that kind of sense for for the ratios that are involved here.
And it's also interesting to see this next example.
This is Edna's fave number is 3.141592653589793.
Uh, you can see that, uh, the way that's been broken down is that that number has been split into
fragments of three digits at a time.
And it's kind of interesting.
Basically, they've got a separate token for every possible three digit number.
So a thousand of the tokens in, in, in Gbt's vocabulary, uh, consist of just different three digit
numbers.
And any three digit number will get mapped to one token.
And it was it's interesting the way that it that it does this And it might.
It was in the early versions of GPT before it got as as as smart as it did.
You'd find people used to joke that if you gave it a three digit math problem, it would get it right.
But if you gave it a four digit math problem, then it would flounder and give like a random answer.
So people would say that, you know, when the overlords take over and they're coming for us, we'll
just just set them a four digit arithmetic problem and they'll be stumped.
But unfortunately for us, they are now easily able to handle four digit numbers.
But but the understanding at the time for for why it was difficult for them was because it was then
split across multiple tokens, rather than it just simply being something that it could always have
in its training data, because it was one token combined with another one token has an answer.
So anyways, it's it's interesting to look at this kind of effect.
You should take the time, even if you're a pro, take the time to go to platform tokenizer.
Mess around yourself because it's always good to get that sense of of how it's working under the hood.
The rule of thumb people tend to use is that typically, typically a token ends up being about four
characters.
If you're if you've got a character count, you're trying to turn it into the number of tokens.
Or the most common rule of thumb people use is that, roughly speaking, a token is like three quarters
of a word, so a thousand tokens would be about 750 words.
That's a way to think of it.
1000 tokens, about 750 words.
And give another example here, the complete works of Shakespeare.
People tend to have a sort of a sense of how much content that is.
You can picture the volumes up on a bookshelf, the Complete Works of Shakespeare, that's about 900,000
words.
So it's about 1.2 million tokens.
So give or take, people often talk about the cost per million tokens.
That's something we'll talk about in just a second.
You see that quoted on in lots of places roughly.
You can think of that as being like, uh, the, the cost of the complete Works of Shakespeare, the
complete works of Shakespeare a little bit more than a million tokens, but roughly.
So that's giving you a good sense of how to map between tokens and words.
And it's worth pointing out that that's true for language and particularly for like common English language.
But if you start to move to things like math or scientific terms or code, then it typically uses up
much more tokens, because these words are things like variable names that can be obscure, uh, and
code can be can be quite, quite complex and dense.
And as a result, it can be more closer to a token per character.
Uh, but, but but always a bit more efficient than that.
So you can you can do some experimenting.
You can also try putting some code in to GPT tokenizer and get a good sense for that mapping.
It's useful to have a good gut feel for how many tokens different amounts of text take up.
And now I know what you're thinking.
You're thinking editor, you told us this was going to be a practical session and you've just been yabbering
away for ages.
Okay, I hear you.
Let's go to the code.
Let's go to cursor.
030 - And so here we are back in my favorite place to be.
And we're going to go into week one.
And we're going to go to day four.
And here we have day four.
Tokenizing with code.
Start by picking a kernel on the top right.
Click there.
Select kernel Python environments Vmv.
All right.
So I'm going to begin by importing a package called tick token.
And then I'm going to say I would like to get the tokenizer the thing that encodes text into tokens
for the model GPT 4.1 GPT 4.1 mini is often my favorite model for chatting.
It's a chat variant.
It doesn't do all the reasoning thinking, so it's nice and simple.
And let's see what happens if we encode.
Hi, my name is Ed.
Now this isn't making an API call.
This isn't going to the cloud.
This is just doing a lookup of a mapping.
Let's see what those tokens are.
Oh and here we go.
They are token number 121949221308 and so on.
And you're like, oh yeah that makes complete sense.
So so it turns, it looks up, it breaks this.
Hi my name is Ed into different chunks and then it looks up the number, the ID associated with each
one in its vocab.
And that's the numbers you see there.
So what we can now do is just loop through that and decode, turn each of these numbers back into the
fragment that it represents.
And if I run this you can see that's literally just what I'm doing.
I'm calling this decode function.
And so we discover that this token 12194 is in fact the word hi.
My name is Ed, and I'm pleased to see that Ed gets its own token.
How about that?
Uh, number 6117, no less.
I think there's some idea that a smaller number represents like, like higher up in its index means
it's one of the the more kind of more primary, uh, first few words in its dictionary.
Uh, I don't know if it actually means very much, but but, uh, it's quite fun to try and guess to
see if you can get, uh, words which, which are very high up in its vocab.
Anyway, so that is.
Hi, my name is Ed and we could do more.
We could say hi, my name is Ed aired.
And I like banoffee pie because it knows what to put there.
Ah, there we go.
So we will run this, uh, and run this.
And here you see the same tokens began, and then a bunch more tokens came afterwards.
And what do we get?
Hi, my name is Ed, and I like Ban Offee pie.
Um, and, uh, so interestingly, not that surprising.
Banoffee does not get its own token, and, uh, it, uh, does break banoffee into, uh, these into
ban and Offee.
Um, and, uh, that's that's why we see our first fragment there.
And offee is token number 26,458.
I guess it's more fun to try and pick a word that is this far out in the vocab.
Um, but you can see you can you can, uh, look here and you can see that token ID three, two, six
is the word.
And and sure enough, if we look to decode three, two, six, we'll see that that is in fact the word.
And so that's how you can use tick token as a way to translate text to tokens and tokens.
Back to text.
And you can count up the number of tokens and use it to experiment.
It's very similar to using the UI that we did before, but I would suggest come on in here, mess around,
find a little challenge, find a word which has a really small token number and a really big token number
doesn't.
It's not not relevant to anything, just just something fun to do and get a sense of how words get broken
into individual fragments.
And I have one more topic before we go back to the slides.
And it's a really interesting one.
It's something which is probably obvious to many of you, but for some of you it's not.
And for you it will be a real help.
It's a real aha moment when, when when I connect the dots for you here, there is this thing that I
call the illusion of memory, which it's so important that is like super, super clear to you.
So look, here's the thing.
Let's start by just doing the same as we did before.
Let's Load the dot env.
This is loading the dot env file.
Bringing in the secrets.
Making sure that the OpenAI API key is set.
It looks good so far.
If you're not using OpenAI, hopefully by now you know exactly how to switch this to a llama.
Okay, so the next thing I'm going to do is run these two lines.
And by this point, you should be super comfortable with what this is doing.
It's not bringing up some LLM.
What it's doing is it's creating a new instance of OpenAI Python client library, which is a wrapper
around making HTTP calls to an endpoint with a model.
By default it's it's OpenAI.
You can switch it for another.
There we go.
We know it.
Well okay.
And this is the other thing, you know.
Well, the way that you make an API call is you pass in a list of dictionaries.
Each dictionary has, uh, two, two things in it.
One thing has a key of role.
And the value can be system for the system prompt or user for the user prompt.
So here I'm going to say you are a helpful assistant.
And my user prompt will be hi, I'm editor.
All right.
There we go.
That is the message.
So we now are going to call OpenAI.
And I'm not typing it in but but you know it it's response is OpenAI create.
You pass in the model.
You pass in the messages.
The same message we've got right here, this list of dictionaries and what comes back.
We take choices, zero message content.
And, you know, from from the prior day that this is basically just making an HTTP call and then unpacking
the results.
And let's do that.
And back comes the response.
Hi Ed.
Nice to meet you.
How can I help you today.
Oh that's nice.
All right.
Okay.
So now we're going to ask a follow up question.
And my follow up question will be, uh, what's my name?
So I'm saying, uh, you know, system message.
You're a helpful assistant user message.
What's my name?
Okay, I know half of you know exactly what's going on here, but hang on.
So I call again Open air completions create.
I pass in the model, I pass in the messages and I get back response message content.
Yes, yes, get on with it.
Here we go.
I don't have access to your personal information.
How can I assist you today?
What?
So what's happened here?
We just said my name is Ed.
It's said.
Hello, Ed.
Nice to meet you.
What's going on?
All right, well, for those that, uh, that don't know what's happening is that every time you call
an LLM, every one of our calls to the LLM over this API is completely stateless.
Every time we call it, we're giving it this input sequence that gets fed in as the input sequence to
the GPT model, this transformer that predicts most likely next tokens and it predicts the tokens.
I can now say tokens without saying I'll get on to that.
It predicts the tokens that are most likely to come next fresh every time.
It doesn't have any background.
It doesn't know that you called it 20s ago with your name.
It just has this input sequence and it's predicting the next tokens and you'll say, but that's not
my experience of using ChatGPT.
I know perfectly well that it can hold a conversation.
Aha!
And that is because we use a trick.
It is the job of you and me to to fool the user into thinking that an LLM has things like memory and
that it remembers what you were saying, and that it keeps context.
All of that is trickery that we apply to calling the LLM, and we do it in a super simple way.
And this is what it is when we build our messages, list the input sequence that gets put into GPT.
We don't just give it the most recent message, we give it the whole conversation.
So far we say, you are a helpful assistant.
Hi, I'm Ed, and then there's this other thing.
I hadn't told you about this yet.
There's another row I've got in here where the role isn't system or user.
It is Assistant, which is its response back, and it's recording that it said, hi Ed, how can I assist
you today?
And then I'm saying, what's my name?
And so that that is my my final message here.
So it has all of this in the input sequence.
And of course when we run this we will get a different answer.
Your name is Ed.
How can I help you today Ed.
And so again apologies if you know all this already, but I do want to reinforce it.
These five points I've got here you need it needs to be second nature to you.
It's so obvious.
Every call to an LLM completely stateless number two we pass in the whole conversation so far with every
input prompt every time.
And number three, it gives the illusion that the LLM remembers what you said 30s ago, because you're
passing it in every time.
It can keep the context of the conversation.
The whole thing is a trick.
It's a trick that it's it's it's producing the next token.
And in doing so, it's producing the token consistent with this full input so far.
And that gives the illusion that it has a memory of what you said before.
That memory is just what we call the input sequence, including the past.
And so the LLM just predicts the next tokens in the sequence.
If the sequence says my name is Ed, what's my name, then likely next token would be your name is Ed
not your name is Joshua or something.
That would not be a likely next token.
And and that's all that it's doing.
And if you didn't say my name is Ed, what's my name?
If you just said what's my name, then the next token is like, I don't know your name.
So that's that's all there is to it, even if you already knew that back to front, it can't hurt to
have had that reinforced again and to see it viscerally in the code like that.
Uh, and uh, the, um, the.
Yeah, it's, it's such a core understanding.
And the first time someone hears this, I sometimes get people saying, well, that's unfair.
Does that mean that we have to pay every time for for all of the past, and it sort of accumulates.
And you have to pay more and more with every message.
And the answer is yes, you have to pay.
And there's a reason you have to pay because you're asking the model to calculate more.
You don't just want it to answer what is your name?
You want it to answer.
My name is Ed.
What is my name?
You want it to take all of that into account, and doing so requires more computation and you need to
pay for it.
You need to pay the electricity bills for doing this computation, and it's trillions of calculations.
Now, you probably will talk about costs in a second, but you probably know that the costs per input
tokens are very, very cheap.
Each extra token is a fraction of a fraction of a cent for most, most models.
And so it's really very, very small.
But nonetheless the cost is there.
You do need to do more compute for the prediction of what's to come next in the sequence, to be able
to look back and understand the full context of what's happened before.
So a critical learning point, even if it was obvious, it's always worth reinforcing.
031 - Now there's a constraint.
When working with LMS, you need to be aware of, which is known as the context window.
And the context window is the maximum number of tokens that any particular model can fit that it can
it can look back on.
It can consider for when it's generating the next token.
It's the maximum length of the input that it can that it can handle.
And if you try and pass in more input than that, then it will fail.
It will say bigger than my context window.
Can't do it.
Now here's something to keep in mind that that thing that gets that needs to fit within the context
window isn't just your message you've just given to the LM.
But as you now understand, it's what the actual input sequence isn't just the most recent message,
it's the whole conversation.
So far.
It's the first thing you said.
Hi, my name is Ed and then nice to meet you, Ed.
And then what's my name?
All of that has to fit in the context window.
And actually it's a little bit more than that too, because you have to pass in all of that.
And then GPT generates the most likely next token, which is perhaps the word your is going to say.
Your name is ed your, it produces your.
And then the whole of that input sequence is fed back in again to GPT with the word your at the end
of it, and it generates the next token of name.
And then in goes all the input with your name and it generates is and then your name is Ed.
It generates tokens one at a time and the whole input is passed back in.
And that means that what you need to be able to fit in the context window is the original input, the
replies, the next input, the final message you're giving it, and then all of the generated tokens
that it comes up with up until and not including the very last token that it generates.
All of that has got to fit in the context window.
And so obviously the context window governs how much the background the model can remember about references
and content and context.
And as I gave the example before.
If you're shoving all of the ticket prices to different cities in the prompt, then it allows it to
be able to remember a certain number of those references.
And it's particularly important for a technique called multi-shot prompting, which is a technique where
in the input you give a series of examples of example questions and answers for it to kind of draw from,
as it's trying to figure out what sequence to generate.
And it's also important for techniques like Rag that of course we will get to.
But many of these inference time techniques we talked about about training time and inference time scaling,
many of these inference time techniques make hefty use of the context window, and that's why it's important
to keep it in mind.
And people that have used Claude code say, are very aware of what happens as you start to fill up that
context window.
And if you happen to have a question on the complete works of Shakespeare, well, you would need a
context window of like a million tokens to be able to handle that.
And as we'll see at the moment, it's only models like Gemini that are able to handle that much of a
context window.
And that brings me to everybody's favorite topic API costs.
So look, the chat products like ChatGPT typically have a free tier and a paid tier or many paid tiers.
They range from $20 a month to $200 a month.
And that gives you a monthly subscription.
It means that you can use it with no charge per use, but some kind of rate limiting that is completely
unrelated to using the API.
If you use the API, it doesn't matter whether or not you have a subscription, you pay per use of that
API, and the idea is that you could use that to to build your own product, your own ChatGPT to rival
ChatGPT, and you'd be monetizing it, but you'd also be paying per API call because you have to pay
the compute bills.
These these API costs go into paying for the inference compute.
There's trillions of calculations happening.
And presumably a little bit goes towards paying OpenAI back for the $100 million plus that they spent
on training this model.
So that's why there are costs.
Typically, the cost depends on how many input tokens you passed in and the output tokens that you generate.
And there's two little catches in there.
One of them, of course, is that the input tokens needs to include the full sequence so far, including
all of the fake memory that you've inserted in there and anything else you put in there like rag.
And some people think that that sounds unfair because costs will start to accumulate.
But again, remember you need it to do this compute.
You need the transformer to look back on all of this in order to predict the most likely tokens.
So you should be happy to pay the bill because you want the result.
If you wish, you could just pass in the most recent message.
Forget the history.
Don't pay for that compute.
But then your your results are not going to be good.
So that's why.
And it does make sense.
The other catch is that when you pay for these output tokens that Includes any reasoning that the model
is doing for these reasoning models that generate output that describes their thought process.
Those are output tokens that you need to pay for, and in the case of gpts models, you actually don't
even get to see these outputs.
It's all it's all happening behind the scenes, but you still pay for them.
And again, people sometimes think that that sounds a bit mean.
But at the bottom line is that compute needs to happen, that processing needs to happen.
Those those calculations need to happen.
And so it's only fair that we do need to pay the compute cost for calculating that reasoning trace.
But it can lead to a little bit of unpredictability associated with costs when you don't always get
to see the reasoning that's happening.
So those are the two catches to watch out for as well with API costs.
One of the things that I'm going to cover a lot are things called leaderboards, which is where you
get to see ranked comparisons of different llms, particularly in week four.
We do that, but one that I'll show you right away is a leaderboard called vellum which is at vellum
leaderboard.
You should go check it out.
And this is a really convenient it's got lots of leaderboards there.
Lots of great things to look at.
We'll look at many of them later, but in particular there's a very handy one right in the middle which
shows you the context window and the API costs of many major models.
And you'll see there that I'm showing that GPT five, it has a context window of 400,000 tokens.
That's big.
That's a lot that you can cram in there.
The input cost is one point is $1.25, and the output cost is $10.
And you might think, okay, that's quite a lot $10.
But do keep in mind that that is $10 per million output tokens.
So there's a there's a lot there, uh, that you can fit in a million output tokens basically give or
take.
You generate the complete works of Shakespeare and you've spent $10.
Uh, and that would be a lot of content to generate.
And so, you know, it's definitely worth understanding that these things are they come at a cost.
And if you're looking to operate this at scale, where you have lots of concurrent conversations happening,
then you need to take a lot of care to understand what are going to be your unit costs for each of your
users, and how do you factor that in.
But when it comes to individuals using if you're just experimenting, prompting yourself some of these
models with just hi, my name is Ed, then divide those numbers by like like almost a million by like
100,000 for ten tokens.
You can see that the costs involved in individual small API calls are really very small indeed.
And so whilst people I understand it's frustrating to have to put in the $5 up front to OpenAI, that's
annoying.
But recognize that the actual costs that you make for everyday API calls if you if you're not building
a bigger, scalable system or an agent loop which can eat through the tokens, then the costs involved
are relatively small, so it's important to get a handle on that and feel comfortable with what are
these API costs.
And I also want to mention that when you see GPT five there, that is the big version.
If you scale all the way down to the tiny version, GPT five nano, if you work with that, then the
input cost per million tokens is $0.05 $0.05 per million tokens.
So for each token is a millionth of that.
It's a number too small for me to say, and the output cost is 0.4 of a dollar per million.
It's $0.40 per million output tokens.
So if you got GPT five nano to generate the complete works of Shakespeare, you'll be spending less
than a dollar.
A couple of other things to mention.
There's also this this idea called caching, which is that if you send in the same input twice within
a few minutes, then you pay less.
It's cheaper because some of that information is cached with GPT.
That's automatic.
With Claude, it depends.
It can be.
It's more of a story.
But basically in many cases, there's a way if you're sending the same inputs frequently to models,
there's some ways to get those costs even smaller for the input costs.
But there are some some tricks to be aware of.
And we'll talk about that another day.
Another thing to point out is just take a look at some of those context windows.
You'll see GPT five again 400,000.
The Claude range has got a 200,000 context window.
You'll see that GPT OS, the open source model, is around the 130,000 and famously Gemini.
Gemini 2.5 flash has a 1 million token context window, which means, again, that you could almost
fit the complete works of Shakespeare in in one prompt to Gemini and say, tell me, give me a give
me a quote about from this play and it will be able to look back and do that, which is just insane.
So it's good to get that perspective and have that kind of sense of what is the range of context windows
offered by these different LMS?
Goodness gracious, somehow you're already 10% of the way through.
How about that?
Wow.
So what you could already do, you can already write code to call OpenAI and a llama.
Make a summary.
You can contrast the leading frontier models.
And now at this point, you've had this introduction to transformers, to tokens to context, windows
to API costs, and you've just got this good grounding, this good foundations to everything that will
be working on, including the illusion of memory by the end of the next time.
At the end of this week, you'll be confident with the OpenAI API, the chat completions, API, chat
completions.
You'll you'll know about this thing called one shot prompting.
You'll know about streaming markdown JSON results.
You'll have implemented a business solution in a matter of a few minutes.
It's going to be all practical.
It's going to be sleeves rolled up.
We're going to be building.
I will see you then.
032 - Well, it seems like we only just started on our journey together and already we're in day five of week
one.
Welcome, welcome.
Today is showtime.
Today is roll up your sleeves and get coding reminder of what you can already do.
You can already call OpenAI's API.
You can use it to summarize things.
You can contrast the different llms at the frontier.
And we've done an introduction to Transformers, tokens, context, windows APIs, the the idea of the
illusion of memory, and so much more.
But by the end of today, you'll be able to confidently write code with OpenAI API.
Or to be specific, the Chat Completions API.
You'll use something called one shot prompting, which is just a fancy name for saying giving an example.
We'll be able to stream back results.
We'll be able to show it in markdown, which we basically already done, and also use JSON results.
But also we'll be able to put this together into a proper commercial solution that you'll be able to
do in a matter of minutes, and then you'll be able to apply this to your own commercial problems as
well.
All right, that sounds exciting.
Let's introduce the commercial problem.
Okay, so what we're going to do is build something which is able to generate a sales brochure for a
company.
You'd be able to give it a web address, and it will generate a sales brochure for possible future clients
or investors or for your recruiting for your team.
And the way we're going to do it, it might say that sounds a bit similar to summarizing a web page,
but it's going to be a little bit more than that.
It's going to be able to go and pull multiple web pages.
It's going to take a web page.
It's going to find links on that web page that are relevant to the company, and then it's going to
follow those links as well, and then use all of that information together to build a sales brochure.
And this is going to be the commercial product.
And you could imagine you could package this up and have it as your sales brochure generator.
So we'll be using the OpenAI API, of course, that we've already been introduced to.
We'll be using this thing called one shot prompting, which as I say is a fancy name for saying, hey,
imagine that input sequence we could put in that input sequence, an example of what a good outcome
looks like, and use that as our way to to generate, to increase the likelihood that our outputs are
what we want them to be.
And we're also going to use a technique called streaming, which gives you that very familiar typewriter
animation of the results coming back on your screen.
So that's the idea.
That's the sales brochure.
It's going to be a lot of coding and it's going to be multiple.
It will involve two LM calls.
And so it's one LM call getting back the results and then using that to make another LM call.
And so that's a sort of interesting idea of compounding these LM calls to get more commercial value.
All right let's go to Casa.
Let's go do this.
Okay.
Here we are back in Casa.
I go into week one, I go to day five, and here comes our day five lab.
Remember to click on the top right and select that kernel, which should be the one that is your VM.
Okay.
So the challenge we're starting, it's very similar to what we did in day one when we summarized the
website.
But we're taking it to the next level.
We're going to build a company marketing or sales brochure by by looking at a web page, finding its
links and looking at more web pages.
And at the end we'll talk about business applications of this.
And now, look, some people have said to me, okay, but can't we just ask ChatGPT to do something
like this and give it some instructions and give it a URL?
The poor rain on my parade and it's true, you can and it will probably do very well.
But here's the thing.
First of all, remember ChatGPT is a product built on top of GPT, and there are a lot of AI engineers
that work at OpenAI building into this product.
And that's basically a lot of what we're going to be doing now.
We're going to be acting like an AI engineer working on our product, and it's going to be focused on
the sales brochure rather than being able to do anything.
It's got that that functionality.
And besides, look, there are a lot of Verticalized AI products out there on my phone.
I use Duolingo to to do my Spanish lessons, perhaps on going very well.
But, but but I use Duolingo.
And of course it has within it an AI feature as well that you can use that to chat with an AI.
And the dark secret is behind the scenes that AI is just calling GPT.
And guess what?
We discovered ourselves.
You can just bring up a llama and do it yourself.
But that doesn't matter.
It doesn't stop me from using Duolingo because it's convenient to have it being carefully crafted.
The prompts have been worked on, the information has been put there, and so I use Duolingo, and I
pay that premium amount to be able to use their chat AI, and they've made a lot of revenue from it.
And so I want to make the point that just because it's possible to recreate functionality in ChatGPT
with various prompts, that doesn't diminish at all the commercial value of building something with
business logic that makes a call to ChatGPT.
People sometimes use the expression a GPT wrapper to refer to functionality built around ChatGPT, and
I understand that.
And over the course of the next eight weeks, we're going to be building more and more functionality
that takes us away from that GPT, GPT wrapper kind of term to something that's really very bespoke.
Today, perhaps you could argue this is a GPT wrapper, but it's a starting point and it's a great starting
point.
And let's get into it.
Okay.
So we start with some imports as usual.
Hold down shift and press enter to run it.
If any of these imports fail, it usually means you don't have the right kernel selected.
All right.
And then as before we're going to initialize our API key.
Let's use GPT five nano.
Today the cheap variant of GPT five and the API key looks good so far.
If yours doesn't, head to the troubleshooting lab.
Okay, then you remember this scraper, this little utilities I've put.
I've actually, uh, there's this this function fetch website contents we saw before.
I've given another function fetch website links, which just grabs a web page, finds any any link on
that web page and returns it.
Just vanilla parsing code using this library.
Beautifulsoup.
That's very popular.
If this I this is not obviously this is not a course about scraping.
So you don't need to understand how this works, just that we're using this function.
But if you're interested here it is.
And for those who want to point out, I'm very aware of the fact that it's inefficient that in both
of these two functions, I, I retrieve the web page.
But that's because I'm not trying to teach about the scraping.
I'm trying to teach about AI, and I want to keep these functions nice and simple so that it doesn't
distract you.
Okay.
So with that we have this function fetch website links that I've just written.
Nothing to do with AI.
I can pass in a URL like Edward, and if I run this then Bam!
I get just a list of all of the links that are on that web page.
But there are two problems with this.
The first problem is that many of these links are not going to be relevant to my page.
There's links out to Y Combinator to Hacker News.
There's links to other things that maybe aren't aren't relevant.
This is something to do with probably the type of site that I'm running on.
So there's stuff that's not relevant to my website.
And the second thing is that it's possible for some of these to be relative links rather than full absolute
links.
Looking at this now, they do all appear to be absolute links, but on other web pages there will certainly
be relative links to.
And so typically what if we wanted to find what are all of the relevant links?
We'd have to write some code to do that.
And mapping relative URLs to absolute URLs is quite doable, but it's harder than you might imagine.
There's some clunkiness to do with with understanding what that what that URL represents, but it can
be done figuring out whether a link is relevant to me or not.
Now that is very, very hard.
In fact, you know, it requires an understanding of what the link represents because some things might
be links off my my platform, like my LinkedIn page, which is still relevant, whereas something to
Hacker News is not relevant.
So trying to figure out that logic would be really hard and nuanced and require an understanding and
that kind of thing.
As of about four years ago was simply not possible.
Like we didn't possess the technology to do it.
And now it's just a tiny call to go away.
It's just easy to do that kind of nuanced understanding.
So this ability to parse information and then in a almost human like way, interpret it and reconstruct
it.
That is something which is which is amazing and new.
And you can use this same kind of technique to parse people's resumes to, to, to parse restaurant
reviews, whatever you might want, and have a sort of nuanced understanding and categorization of it.
But we're going to do that now.
We're going to use GPT five nano to figure out which of these are relevant, and make sure we've got
the right kind of URL.
033 - So how do we go about doing this?
How do we start?
Well, the place to start always with these calls is start by thinking about the prompts.
What input sequence do we want to send to the LM to allow it to generate tokens, which are most likely
to achieve our task?
Okay, so we start by thinking of a system prompt and a user prompt.
So here I've already written a system prompt.
I'm not going to type it out because it'll be a lot to type.
I'm going to show it to you here and talk it through the system prompt.
You are provided with a list of links found on a web page.
You are able to decide which of the links would be most relevant to include in a brochure about the
company, such as links to an about page or a company page, or a careers jobs page.
You should respond in JSON as in this example, and there is some JSON.
If you're not familiar with JSON, Google it.
I'm sure you are.
So there is some JSON Jason, and it's got this sort of structure which I've just invented.
I just invented this structure with a key of links.
And then within that is a list, and each link has a type like about page and a URL.
And there's a URL.
So why did I invent some Jason.
Well here's the thing.
These language models have been trained with lots and lots of data, and most of that data fits into
three categories.
It's either just straight up English language.
They're trained with a lot of English language or foreign language.
They trained a lot of language.
I mean a lot of natural language.
That's the word a lot of natural language.
Masses of it.
Secondly, they're trained with lots of markdown.
Websites get turned into markdown.
Markdown is like a like basically shorthand for HTML.
They're trained with lots of markdown.
So they love markdown and they love generating markdown.
They know markdown really, really well.
That's a structure they're very familiar with.
So markdown is something they know.
And thirdly they're trained with a lot of JSON.
They see JSON a lot.
And so JSON is something that naturally when if you're sending structured information to an LLM, if
you use JSON, it's going to just be coherent, it's going to recognize it and it's going to figure
out what you're doing.
And that's why giving it a nice, pleasing JSON structure that feels organized and that represents the
information the way we want it.
I want a type for each of my links.
That's another another difficult thing to imagine ever coding that.
How would you ever code a way to have a heading for each kind of link, and then at the URL for that
link.
So that's a great way to express the information you want back is by giving it a JSON structure.
And in the old days, people used to try and say, you know, reply with this and the first bullet with
some information, second bullet with some information.
It's really hokey trying to sort of describe some some way of laying out data.
Much better to use JSON.
And in week eight we're going to to use something called structured outputs, which gives us a way to
force that JSON to, to be focused on a particular spec on, on meeting a schema.
We won't cover that here.
We're just going to cover for now.
Just giving an example and giving examples of possible answers is sometimes known as a one shot prompting.
If you give one example, that's one shot.
If you give multiple examples, that's Multi-shot prompting in theory, to get this strictly right,
Multi-shot prompting is when you give an example question and then the answer that would be good.
And then another question, and then an answer that would be good.
Just giving multiple answers is also basically like multi-shot prompting.
So in this case we're doing single shot prompting.
We're giving it one example.
And we're saying given this example, learn from it, replicate it, and it's just going to be fine
at it.
Remember, all it's doing is it's going to take this as the input and it's generating the most likely
tokens to come next.
And it just happens that the most likely tokens to come next are basically are actually the actual things
we do want it to come next.
It's going to be parsing our input and coming up with this information as the output.
Okay.
So that's our system prompt link system prompt.
It's called all right.
Now don't worry I'm going to do some typing in just a second.
If you're like why doesn't he have a type I will I will.
So next is the user prompt.
So this time well this one I just have it as a variable because it's just always going to be exactly
the same thing.
Link system prompt.
This one I have as a function, because we're going to generate a user prompt each time with a URL passed
in.
So a URL will come in and we're going to make a user prompt.
And this is what it will say.
Here is a list of links on the website URL.
Please decide which of these are relevant web links for a brochure about the company.
Respond with a full https url in JSON format.
Do not include terms of service, privacy and email links.
This is an example of what not to do.
Is almost the opposite of one shot prompting its kind of these are these would be bad answers.
And you can imagine I put that in there because it was including them.
It's very common.
I mean, and perhaps the most important thing you'll ever learn on this entire course is that key to
getting good results from Llms is experimenting and iterating.
It's all about the experimentation.
That's what it takes to be a good LLM engineer.
It's about being a good data scientist as well as being a good engineer.
And data science is about experimentation, and there's no better way to get good outcomes than to keep
refining your prompts.
So if you do this and it starts generating privacy policies as what it thinks is a relevant link, you
come back and you say do not include privacy policies.
You iterate, you improve, you add examples.
That's the way to get great results.
So I then of course I call fetch website links.
Which is that that function I just showed you that gets all the links for this URL.
And then into this user prompt I add each of those links and that is what I return.
Okay let's run this.
Let's run get links user prompt.
Let's do it for Edward Comm.
Let's see what user prompt.
Again we're not calling an LLM yet.
There's no AI involved here.
We're just baking a user prompt that we will then call with an LLM.
Let's see what it says.
It says here's the list of links on the website.
Please decide which of these are relevant for a brochure about the company.
Respond with a full Https.
Do not.
It's exactly what we just looked at.
And here are the links listed out there.
That's all I've done.
I've built this string, and the code to build that string is in this function get links user prompt.
So we now have links system prompt and get links user prompt.
So we are finally getting ready to make our first AI call.
And it's going to be this function.
Select relevant links.
Okay let's do this.
So it's the chat completions API.
So remember the way you do that is you start with we need to make sure that we've actually created an
instance of OpenAI.
Did we do that back up here.
Let's check the Python client library.
Go all the way back up all the way back up.
Yes we did.
There it is OpenAI.
And we've got this variable model.
So we have an instance of the Python client library back we come okay.
So we can say response equals OpenAI the Python client library dot chat dot completions.
And then we're calling the create.
We're making a post to that that endpoint.
All right.
Now do you remember what what we have to pass in.
We have to pass in two things.
We have to pass in the model, which can just be model like a cursor filling it in.
And messages.
Now messages of course is the list of dictionaries.
So it's a list of two dictionaries, in our case the first dictionary.
Here we go.
The role is going to be system and the content.
Oh see there we go.
Content is going to be thank you.
Cursor.
The link system prompt.
Quickly press escape before cursor gives the game away.
It's no fun.
Alright, so that's our link system prompt.
Now the next item the role is user and the content is okay.
Okay.
What is the user prompt?
We don't have a constant.
Now we need to call the function that I just wrote a second ago which is get links user prompt.
Excellent.
So that's that.
Uh, get rid of you cursor.
Stop with your with your cleverness.
Okay.
That is messages.
Now, I told you before that we just got the two things to pass in model and messages.
But but I lied.
There is one more thing we're going to pass in.
There is an extra parameter we're going to use which, uh, cursor is has already filled in, which
is a response underscore format, response underscore format, which is how we can tell the API that
we want the response to be in a particular format type JSON object.
There we go.
Uh, now a quick mention, a moment for the for the for the people that are like, I know all of this,
let me just mention something that you may also know, but you might not, which is that one of the
things that this does that's really quite sneaky and people that aren't familiar with this put your
hands over your ears for a second.
One of the things this does is it constrains GPT the model during inference time.
When when GPT is is, uh, predicting the most likely next tokens, the way it does it is it doesn't
just predict this is the next token.
It predicts a probability distribution, the probable next token.
It gives a probability for every possible next token.
And often when we loosely say pick the next token, what we mean is pick the highest probability next
token or sample based on the probability or something like that.
Well, because that's how inference works because it does it token by token.
You could also use that to make sure that we never pick a token that would result in invalid JSON.
We can basically constrain it so that it's forced to generate JSON at inference time.
The LLM can predict whatever probabilities it wants, but the ones that we actually select are going
to be the ones that would make well-formed JSON.
And that's super interesting.
And that's how even though an LLM doesn't know what you mean, if you say you must respond in JSON and
it knows if you say it in English, but it doesn't know that technically, but at inference time we
can enforce technical constraints like that.
All right.
Now everyone can take your hands off yours.
Uh, okay.
So that is, uh, that that's that's the, uh, the the API call.
It's now time for us to take back the response and do something with it.
034 - Okay, let's keep going.
So we now say something like result is response C response dot choices zero dot message dot content.
Remember when we were just digging through the JSON.
That's all it was.
And then that result that's going to come back, that's going to be a raw text.
But it's format.
It's going to be like JSON text.
And people that are familiar with with messing around with JSON knows that you can you can convert like
text, a string that contains those squigglies and the quotes and stuff into Python dictionaries using
the built in library JSON.
And you do that by something like links equals length equals JSON dot load string result.
So that's turning from a string results with with curlies in it and stuff into actual Python dictionaries.
And that's what links will then be.
And so now let's just return links and there we go.
That is our select relevant links.
Let's hope I haven't made any mistakes.
Let's run that.
Let's call select relevant links for my website.
So this is now taking that.
It's doing that quick web scrape taking that data.
And it's packaging it off and sending it to GPT five nano with the system prompt and user prompt that
we just described and asking for GPT five nano to analyze it and return relevant links in that JSON
format, and that JSON format will come back as a string.
We'll turn that into a Python dictionary, and we'll print that Python dictionary.
And I hope that that yeah, it did happen just as I finished.
There it is.
There is the dictionary.
If we just compare it with with up here was where we gave the style that we want the system prompts.
Remember this is the style we wanted links for a list of links.
And if we come here check this out.
We have links.
We have a list and each one has a type and a URL type.
Home page.
Type about page.
Type blog post.
How about that?
We just got GPT five nano to do sort of intelligent parsing with a nuanced way sub selecting just the
relevant pages.
And yes, it reckons that LinkedIn is a relevant link for a marketing brochure about me.
And but it thinks that that, uh, I guess, uh, my, um, and it put my Facebook and my Nebula, uh,
in there, but it did not put, for example, my, my link to Hacker News because that's not actually
relevant to me.
So it, it's successfully thought its way through that, the nuance of understanding what makes a link
relevant.
And that is not easy stuff.
Okay.
And here I've got the same one again.
But this time I've just put a print statement at the top and the bottom so that it's just a little bit,
uh, more organized.
And it will this time, like print what it's doing while it does it so, so that we can watch later.
Um, so let me show that by we'll do the same thing for hugging face Co, the website for the open source
hub and library that we'll be using a lot in week three and in others.
So when I run this, it's first going to print selecting relevant links for Huggingface Co by calling
GPT five nano.
That's this print statement here.
It's now this is the same code as you watch me painfully typing and it gets back the results.
It loads it.
And then at the end of it all it's going to print the, uh.
Um, yeah, there we go.
There we have it.
This is the result, uh, and it says found three relevant links.
And there they are, a brand page, a careers page, and a company page.
Those were all retrieved from the Hugging Face website.
And of course, there are many, many more links than that on the Huggingface website.
It sub selected down to those three.
Okay, now now it's time for us to get a much take a much bigger step and use this information to make
a company brochure.
So I'm now going to write a function which is going to take advantage of everything that we've built
so far.
It's going to be called Fetch Page and all relevant links.
Okay.
And this this this function is going to wrap the call to GPT that we just wrote.
So this is what it does.
It starts by doing fetch website contents.
So given the URL that's passed in it just calls that the same scrape function that I wrote here, this
fetch website contents.
It's calling that just to get the information on that web page.
Then it calls the other thing I wrote the the that we just did together a minute ago.
Select relevant links.
That's the thing that goes out, gets the links, calls GPT sub, selects the relevant ones and turns
it into JSON.
That's all in this one call here.
We're packaging it up as if it's just calling Python code, or in fact it's going out to an AI.
And this is like a hint of when people talk about agentic workflows, about stitching together calls
to llms with Python code.
That's what we're doing here.
Basically, we're calling NLM and just wrapping it in a function.
Okay.
And then we're going to put all of this into a nice a nice bit of text.
It's going to say at the top of it landing page.
And then it's going to have the contents of the landing page and then the heading relevant links.
And then it's going to iterate through each of the relevant links that we just got back.
And for each one it's going to put the heading with link and then the contents.
If you're not familiar like with markdown, putting two hashes like that means like a, like a level
two heading.
Okay.
So this is just stitching together a big block of text.
Uh, let's, let's see this in action.
Let's, let's call it for for hugging face.
So first of all when I call that because the first thing it does is it gets relevant links, you can
see that it's selecting relevant links for hugging face by calling GPT five nano.
So that's running.
Remember it takes about 30s.
I have to talk all my way through it.
It's found 11 relevant links, so it's found a lot more this time than it did last time we ran it.
And here then, is the full text.
It says landing page.
And this is the contents of of, uh, Huggingface landing page.
And then link discord community and something about the discord community and so on.
So if we if we show this a scrollable element, you can scroll through this and see each of the different
links that's in here with the different bits of information.
Okay.
So so far all we've done is wrapped an existing call to GPT that we already made.
What we're going to do now is turn this into our second call to GPT.
All right.
So last time we had a link system prompt and a link a get link user prompt.
Same again.
Now we're going to have a system prompt and a user prompt for creating our brochure.
Let's start with the system prompt.
You are an assistant that analyzes the contents of several relevant pages from a company website, creates
a short brochure about the company for prospective customers.
Investors and recruits respond in markdown without code blocks.
That's just that extra way to make sure it doesn't put ticks around it all.
Include details of company culture, customers and careers jobs if you have the information.
So there is my system prompt, and I have an alternative system prompt below it, which would give you
a humorous version of that.
Maybe we'll come back to you later.
So there is our system prompt.
And now I've got another one.
Get brochure user prompt.
Just like before.
Just like when we had the Get Links user prompt.
This is the user prompt for building a brochure.
You're looking at a company called Company Name.
It takes company name and a URL.
Looking at a company called Company Name.
Here are the contents of its landing page and other relevant pages.
Use this information to build a short brochure, and then we will plonk in everything that we that we
built in that that function we wrote together a minute ago.
I've just got this little thing here to truncate it to 5000 characters so that I don't use up all of
your API costs.
If we, uh, if we hit some big websites.
You may notice I've also got little truncate that I put on the, uh, the web request as well.
Just just to keep it sensible.
Um, and we'll return that user prompt.
Okay.
So let's see what happens.
Now.
Let's give this a whirl.
Let's try get the brochure user prompt for hugging face.
Let's run this.
So when we run this it calls this function right here.
And that begins by calling fetch page and all relevant links.
And that begins by getting the relevant links.
So right now while I speak it's going out to GPT five nano.
And it's making this request.
And it found seven links.
This time it's a bit different each time.
And here is the user prompt.
And you can see it's your A company.
You're looking at the company website, blah blah blah blah blah.
And you can look through it and it's basically going to be exactly what we see right here.
It's working okay.
It's time for us to make the final the piece de resistance, the time when we actually make a brochure.
The second call to an LLM based on the first call.
035 - Okay, let's do this together.
I'm going to type this one create brochure.
So as always it begins with response equals OpenAI chat completions dot create.
All right.
So remember we want to give it a model and messages.
And uh this time we uh we don't want JSON back.
We want text back.
So it is just going to be model and messages.
So for the model we actually I'm going to suggest we don't use GPT five.
Let's use GPT 4.1 um mini.
It's a nice model and it's nice and quick.
It's just going to be faster than uh than GPT five nano.
So for the messages, we are going to want to have a system prompt and a user message.
And the system prompt is cursor is showing.
I'm just going to press tab.
So sue me.
Uh, the system prompt is going to be uh, the, the brochure system prompt that we just wrote.
And the user prompt is going to be get brochure user prompt passing in the company name and URL that
we got.
There.
Thank you.
Cursor up.
You make it all very easy.
And I didn't even mean it to.
But just because I accepted that it filled in the rest of this for me.
Uh, so we will then take I'm going to I'm gonna I'm gonna defy cursor and I'm going to type it.
We get whatever comes back in response and we'll say result is response dot, dot, dot content.
And by the way, if you're wondering if you're if cursor isn't prompting you for the same thing and
you're thinking, well, why doesn't cursor prompt me the way it prompts?
Ed the reason is because obviously I already practiced this recording.
It's not my first rodeo.
I'm not.
I was a bit more clumsy the first time I did it, and cursor knows that I've done it's seen it already.
So?
So that's why it's so good.
Uh, it's not, it's not really that it knows even the very names that I give variables.
It's just because it's seen it before.
Uh.
All right.
And so then I guess we'll do We will do the display markdown result.
There we go.
That seems great to me.
Uh, all right, let's run that.
So now with this, we should be able to say create brochure hugging face.
Hugging face.
Uh, so the idea is, if I run this, I kick it off, it's going to first call because it's collecting
the user prompt.
And as part of doing that, it's going to get the relevant links.
So it's calling GPT five nano.
Now remember from from that other function calling out collecting the relevant links.
It's doing the intelligent parsing where it thinks what's relevant, what's not relevant.
How do I get rid of relative URLs.
Make them absolute.
It's doing all of that.
It takes about 30s.
It's found 13 relevant links.
That's going into a new user prompt.
That's going off now to GPT 4.1 mini.
And that's going to be coming back with a marketing brochure that it's hopefully about to display for
us in markdown in this screen.
By the time I finish this sentence.
If I could drag it on.
There we go.
Here it is.
Here.
Here is a marketing brochure.
And come on, it's cool.
It's hugging face.
Brochure about hugging face.
What we offer the hub, the data set spaces, our community.
It's much more than a platform.
It's a thriving, fast growing community.
Company culture, careers at hugging face visit is even put in like a link in there.
That's cool.
Why choose hugging face?
Get started today.
Uh, and hugging face the AI community building the future your home for collaboration, innovation
and advancing machine learning together.
Come on, this is impressive.
A nice well crafted brochure.
And because we got to choose the system prompt the user prompt the links, we were able to craft this
the way we wanted and have it be something that is particularly specialized on building a commercial
brochures for the audience that we specified for potential customers, investors, potential recruits.
I give you a brochure generator and using it to make a brochure for hugging face.
But wait.
There's more.
One more thing to show you.
I want to show you.
Streaming back results.
So the streaming, of course, is when you see that very familiar typewriter animation.
You see stuff that sort of flows back from the LM, and it's remarkably easy to do it.
And that's what we'll do right now.
LMS generate content token by token anyway, so why not print it token by token as well?
You remember that when we call chat completions dot create, we pass in two things.
We pass in the model and the messages.
And we learned you could pass in a third thing the response format where there is another, there's
a fourth thing and it is stream.
You can say stream equals true by default.
It's false.
If you pass in stream equals true, then what you get back is not the response object, but rather you
get back an object called stream.
And it's something which you can iterate over, like I do right here for chunk in stream.
And as you iterate over it, you get back each chunk as it's formed, as it feeds back, as it flows
back from the LM.
So this gives you an easy mechanism to be able to stream back results onto your user interface.
Now also because we're bringing back markdown, I can't just print it.
I have to do something clever to make sure that I update the markdown I've already got.
So this is a little bit more fiddly than it needs to be, perhaps than sometimes you see it, but I
have to first display some empty markdown and get like something called the display handle, so I can
then update that markdown each time with the response.
That's why it's a little bit more wordy here than than you often see it.
It could just be a print statement if we weren't using markdown.
But then this is the meat right here.
What we do is that as we iterate through each chunk, we look at the chunk, we do chunk choices, zero
content.
And that should sound quite familiar to you because it's very much like response choices, zero content,
but it's chunk zero Content instead of message.
And that's because the delta represents just the little extra bit we're getting flowing back to us for
this particular chunk.
So we aggregate all these chunks to response and we update the markdown.
And that means that this is going to show it to us in a nice format.
And we're using GPT four mini right there.
Okay.
Let's give this thing a whirl.
So we're going to say uh, stream brochure.
Let's try and stream a hugging face and the Hugging Face website.
Let's kick this off.
So remember the first thing that happens is it calls the same select relevant links calling GPT five
nano.
And this is the thing that's going off GPT five nano and collecting and it's parsing making JSON, looking
for relevant links.
And as I say this, this takes like 20 30s.
Sometimes it takes longer because, uh, this is a reasoning model.
And so it's welcome to think through as much as it wants.
But it's happened.
It's come back and already the results are streaming back.
You see, the way it's streaming like this, we get to see all the information coming back and isn't
that gorgeous?
That's a much nicer user experience with the typewriter animation and what you what you now really understand
is that this isn't just about user experience.
This is actually showing you what's happening to the model.
The model is generating the output a token at a time and responding with that token that got generated,
and then feeding that token back in and generating the next token.
And we're getting that steady flow of tokens back streaming using a technology called ZK.
If you're familiar with this stuff, that's the protocol.
That's how how the data comes back to us.
Um, and so there we have it, a streamed company brochure.
And, uh, it looks terrific.
And, uh, it's got got again, company culture, customers, community.
And I really love it.
Empowering the next generation of machine learning for a better open future.
Uh, so our second company brochure is a success.
And of course, I wouldn't be doing my job if I didn't go back and change the system prompt and show
you how we can have ourselves a rather different style of brochure.
Let's have a look.
Back we go.
Uncomment the lines below to give a more.
Oh, keep that one commented up to give a more humorous brochure.
Uh, so, uh, let's run that.
We now have a different system prompt.
Um, and now, uh, yeah, we'll just scroll down.
You might be confused.
Some people get confused that I don't need to reevaluate this, but but it's because we're using when
you're when you're working with these notebooks, you often take advantage of the fact that these variables
are all basically global variables.
It's obviously not good practice.
If you're building a production engineering software and you're building things, uh, in a way that
you want to deploy them finally, which which, you know, obviously I cover in my production course,
but when you're in this mode of being a scientist and you're exploring and investigating different prompts,
it's it's absolutely acceptable to be working in this notebook style.
In fact, it's encouraged because it allows for quick experimentation.
So we're using globals.
That's why it just works.
If we just change it in that one place.
And it's not something to be particularly concerned about.
But let's come back down here and let's run this one here.
And at this point, it should now be going off again to select relevant links.
This takes about 20 30s or so.
And at the end of that we should get it streaming back a brochure.
And it should be a bit of a different brochure than the one we did before.
And of course it's found 14 relevant links.
It's now going off.
And let's see what it comes back with.
Uh, our motto, keep it open, keep it ethical, keep it hugging.
What's cooking in the AI kitchen?
Customers and culture and career.
Geek out with us.
Open source at heart.
And then a heart emoji.
Ethical AI advocates casual tea drinkers, and serious problem solvers.
Always learning, always sharing.
Always growing.
Uh, and so, you know, you could you could say there's obviously a lot of hallucination going on here.
It's making this stuff up.
This isn't particularly hugging faces motto, but that's what we asked it to do.
We asked it to, to create, to imagine, to to give this a humorous take that is consistent with hugging
faces vibe.
Uh, and, you know, I'll leave it to your judgment whether you think from looking at hugging face
site, whether it's done a good job of this.
Ready to join the AI Hug circle, this stuff is all.
It's all made up.
But I would argue that it's very much consistent with our objective.
And if we wanted, if our style was was we want to make brochures which bring out the the most humorous
and the most joyful side of your company, then this might be a really good outcome.
And if it's not, that's the time to go back to the prompts.
It's a time to iterate, experiment, explore, and improve the output until it's consistent with your
objective.
036 - Well, I hope that you found that interesting and fulfilling and that you're not thinking, oh, I could
just do that with ChatGPT.
But you realize how easy it was to apply GPT calls at multiple GPT calls, something of an agentic workflow,
arguably to achieve a commercial purpose.
And with that background, it's time to talk about business applications of what we just did.
We we basically we took what we'd already done in day one.
We extended it to make a couple of LLM calls and generate a document consistent with an objective.
And it's something that that obviously it's a springboard.
It's something that we can use to do bigger, better things.
It's simplistic.
I do I do say I do understand.
Um, but generating content like this based on synthesizing, collecting some data, understanding it,
synthesizing it, and generating an output that that kind of of use case is so common and can be applied
to any kind of business, whether it's writing a blog post, whether it's generating a product tutorial
based on a spec, whether it's creating email content.
There are so many things that you can do with this to take it further.
And so that that is the challenge for you.
Think about how could you apply synthesizing information and generating content to your business, or
perhaps a personal life problem that something that pain point that you'd like to fix?
Rather like the student I mentioned before, and try making a proof of concept prototype using the notebook
using this way.
I know some people are very keen to move straight to Python modules, but I would.
I would ask you to embrace being in the notebook, embrace being a scientist, experiment, explore,
tweak.
It's a different mindset and it doesn't come naturally sometimes to people who are more familiar with
working in the more of the IDE environment with with Python modules.
Um, but it's an important mindset and whilst it can feel hacky to start with this willingness to experiment,
to tweak, to change, to shape.
It's a different mindset that is super important for getting the best out of AI.
So take take that mission.
Apply it to something that matters to you.
Look in the community contributions folders for other things that people have done.
There's so many.
It's amazing.
And check out some of their implementations.
Add in your own.
Do something interesting.
And uh, and then when you've done it, share it.
Uh, you can you can see in the guides how to make a PR, a pull request, and then I can merge it into
the repo so it goes into community contributions.
Please do keep your change within community contributions.
Otherwise everything gets out of control for me.
So so keep it there.
Make sure you clear notebook outputs so it's nice and tight and and give some good explanation of what
you've done for other students benefits.
And I would love that.
And of course again if you then post about it on LinkedIn I will weigh in.
I will, of course.
Thank you.
And it's a great way to amplify your expertise.
Show other people all of the stuff that you're becoming an expert in.
And then there's another exercise for you, too.
I like giving some exercises.
Uh, this one is to see the week one exercise notebook that I've got just there, which will give you
some practice.
So let's look at what this week one exercise is.
I want to see your familiarity with OpenAI and Olama to build a tool that takes a technical question,
which you can just type right here and responds with an explanation of that question.
So I've got a little couple of hints down below, but use this as a way to call a model so that you
could retype a question in here, and the model will explain it.
It will give you an explanation of what that means.
And that's a tool that you'll be able to use yourself during this course as a way of being like having
your own AI tutor.
And you can then experiment with the prompts again, all about the experimentation and you can make
them better and better.
And when it answers something, well, you can put that in there as an example of a good answer.
And if it gives you a bad answer, that's just a poorly explained.
You could put that in there as a counter example and say, don't do it like this, and this is what's
wrong with that.
And the more examples you give, it's multi-shot prompting.
You'll see that the outputs will get better and better as a direct result.
So have a stab at the week one exercise.
You'll also see that there's a solution there should you need it, but you don't need it.
You've got this.
Uh, so make that use both, uh, OpenAI and llama.
Or if you're not using OpenAI, then just llama.
And with llama, you could try some different models.
See whether five four gives you better answers than than llama 3.2 or than Quen uh, or even Deepsea.
So have a have fun with that.
Use that as a way to build your own tutor, and over time you can make that prompt better and better
so that it's personal to you and explains things the way that you like to have things explained.
Uh, and that will be a lot of fun.
And one more time I wanted to mention the useful resources.
There's links to the course resources, which includes videos of me yammering away about parameters.
Uh, that's there.
My LinkedIn.
Did I mention I have a LinkedIn account and you can connect with me if you haven't connected with me.
How have you held out this long?
How how have you resisted?
Don't resist.
Uh uh, connect with me.
Uh, and then.
And then, uh, x uh, I'm I'm a little bit of a rookie with X.
I'm not completely keeping up with it, but but do do do whatever.
Uh, on on X, follow me, link with me, whatever it is, do that and teach me.
Tell me what I'm meant to do so that I can, uh, get to use X a little bit more.
That's probably good.
Good, good for me to do.
Um, and oh, and yes.
And then finally, my editor would kill me if I didn't mention that, uh, the, the way that Udemy,
one of the key ways that it decides whether to show this course to other people is if the course gets
rated.
So if you have time to rate the course, you might of course, you might want to leave it to see maybe.
Maybe week two will be completely deaf.
It's not.
Um, but, uh, whenever you wish, uh, if you are able to rate the course, it makes an enormous difference.
An enormous difference.
And I'll be super grateful.
So that would be a request and appeal that I would make.
And I will see you back in the slides for the wrap.
And again, just to summarize the challenge that I have for you or multiple challenges.
First of all, of course tweak the brochure generator where that data scientist hat.
Experiment.
Try different prompts, add more examples multi-shot prompting, try different styles, and then add
another LM call.
I didn't mention that a second ago, but.
But try adding a third LM call that does something different to the brochure, like perhaps translates
it to Spanish or language of your choice, uh, translated to a different language.
So you end up with two brochures, the original and a translation of it.
So add a third LM call to the mix, more of an agentic workflow of a call, followed by call followed
by call.
And then the other one I mentioned is find a way to apply this to your business.
Come up with some analogous kind of challenge that involves distilling some information, synthesizing
it, producing some output.
There's so many ways to apply this.
And then the exercise, the exercise that I can't wait to see you do is to build your own technical
tutor using GPT five, nano or Llama, or both to answer your questions.
Work with the prompts, make it be fit for you.
Make it be something which is personalized so it's something which knows how to answer questions.
Given your background, knowing what you know and what you don't know, and it's able to really be a
personalized tutor.
And the more time you spend on those prompts for you, the better it's going to be.
The more crafted, honed it's going to be for your situation.
And and you're building something which has real value for yourself in a way that no other tool will
be able to because you have complete control over those prompts.
Those would be.
That's a challenge in your exercise.
And then remember put it in a PR, submit it.
I can't wait to merge it, post it on LinkedIn and I can't wait to amplify it.
This.
The best way to learn is by building.
And with that, you've completed the first week.
One week done.
Wow wow!
I hope that you enjoyed the week.
I hope that that whether you're a beginner or a pro, there was something in this for you.
There's there's hopefully lots of interesting stuff at this point.
You've got the basics.
The fundamentals of Transformers, tokens, API costs, the, the uh, now also put into that like like
Multi-shot prompting but but also the, the illusion of memory.
Uh, you can contrast the leading frontier LMS.
You can even play a pretty fun game with them, and you can confidently now use the chat completions
API.
You can stream back, you can use markdown, you can generate JSON with response formats, and you can
use the llama.
You can use OpenAI API to call a llama as well.
And after next week, it's going to be we're going to be raising it.
You're going to be able to be more proficient across the different frontier model APIs.
We will use APIs for OpenAI and Anthropic and Gemini.
Well, in fact, we can just use the OpenAI API, that client library.
We'll use that library to access the different APIs you'll work for in a small way towards working with
agents.
It's the beginning of it by calling tools, and you're going to implement a customer support agent with
a chat UI, and it's going to be multimodal and it's going to blow your mind.
Week two is such a great week.
I have to say.
It might be it might be tied for first place with with another week.
Uh, but it's right up there in terms of how much fun I have with it.
And, and the thing that we'll really work on this thing called gradio is something that's a huge joy
for me.
So I can't wait for week two.
And I hope you can't wait as well.
I will see you then.
037 - Wow.
You've come back for week two.
Listen, you're not gonna regret it.
I have such a fabulous week lined up for you.
And it starts today with.
With.
We've got such a huge lab today.
Such a gigantic lab.
First of all, what can you already do?
You've had your introduction to Transformers with tokens context.
Windows API costs the memory illusion and so on.
You can contrast the leading frontier models and you can confidently use OpenAI's API including streaming
markdown JSON.
Okay, today.
Today is big API day.
Today we are going to cover so many APIs.
You're going to have had enough of APIs.
We're going to connect to many different frontier models.
We're going to use routers and abstraction layers.
And we're also going to write some code that interacts between different frontier models.
We're going to have them talk to each other, not just to us.
All right.
So much to get done.
But let me quickly remind you of the journey we started on the left.
You were there.
We covered the The foundations the chat completions API last week.
This week it's about frontier models.
With APIs, we're going to build UIs with the amazing Gradio and we're going to build multi-modal stuff.
And then next week open source with Hugging Face the week after picking the right LLM.
That crucial topic the week after that.
It's all rag rag rag rag on week five.
But don't jump there.
This week is so great.
Week six is about fine tuning a frontier model and traditional data science.
Week seven is about fine tuning an open source model with shocking results and week eight finale Agentic
AI.
That is everything I have in store for you.
But but trust me, you don't want to miss this week.
It's it's a really great one.
And at the end when you've got past week eight, you will of course be able to say you have mastered
LLM engineering.
Now, what we're going to do today is a lot more calling to lots more frontier models.
And that's going to involve setting up more keys.
And I'm here to tell you that this is optional.
If you've already set up the OpenAI key, that's great.
We'll use some of that.
If you haven't, you can just use Olama for everything.
There's also something called Open Router that I will mention that you can use that will allow you to
do everything, but should you wish to.
Another couple of keys Anthropic and Google.
The Google one I do believe is free in many situations.
So you may find that when you go to Google, I'll give you the link you'll be able to set one up for
free.
And Tropic does have a cost.
Now I personally love anthropic.
I would always recommend if you if you can afford it.
If you've got the budget to spend that $5, it will be money well spent.
You'll get great use out of Claude, but only do it if you're comfortable with that.
But once you have updated your you've gone to the website that I will give you a link to.
You've set up your account, you'll get an API key.
You will then need to update your EMV file with that API key.
You'll need to save it in the EMV file and make sure that it's saved for everything to work, but that
that's all the slides I've got for, you.
No, no more slides.
The rest of this session.
The rest of week two.
Day one is all lab.
And wow, is it a big lab.
Let's go there now.
Okay, so here I am in Cursa and I'm going now to week two.
Week two.
And I'm going to day one.
The day one lab in week two.
Here we are.
So I start with an important note that I am always updating these labs.
I'm constantly refining them.
So at the start of the week, it's always worth checking at this point that you've got the latest code.
And you'll find in the git instructions and the git guide, there are steps for how you make sure you've
updated the latest code.
If you've made changes to these labs, you might want to merge your changes with my latest.
And.
But you should do that.
Now, the wonderful thing about UV is that because we're using UV, it will automatically then update
any packages that you need.
You don't need to rebuild an environment or anything like that, which is great.
But but you do need to pull the code.
So to check that out.
Check out these instructions.
And then one more reminder about the resources page that you can link to, which has other things like
the slides for the.
Of course, not that we had any slides today because we're getting straight to the lab.
All right.
Let's go on with week two.
Day one lab.
So today is all about using APIs to connect to many models just like we used the user interfaces, the
products last week.
So we're going to be going through the APIs.
And you shouldn't feel like you need to to connect to these APIs.
I'm going to do it through lots of them so that you can live vicariously through me.
You can enjoy what I do, but should you wish to, then you can as well.
So here are the links if you wish to.
You've already gone to OpenAI to set that up before that.
Here is the links for anthropic for Claude, Google for Gemini deep seq, AI for deep seq grok with
a Q.
And I will explain the difference in a minute between grok with a q and grok with a k.
Um.
Also, should you wish, there is another alternative to going to all of these websites.
There is a platform called Open Router and Open Router.
Is this really cool way that you can you can have one account with open router AI.
And when you specify the model, you can choose any of these models and from any of these providers.
And that gives you like one account, one amount to pay up front.
And you can access all of them.
And what I'm going to do is I'm going to go through and connect to each of these.
But I'm also then going to show you Open router.
So if you wish you can you can choose just to go with Open Router.
Hang on in there and come back and try out all the different models via open router.
But we'll do it all today okay.
So when you've gone to each of these sites, you would go to their billing page to add the minimum top
up.
So OpenAI's $5 at least as of now.
Anthropic also $5.
Google I believe has a free tier.
Deep seq I believe is $2 up front.
They need grok, I think also has a free tier and grok with a k, I don't know.
They they change a lot.
They might have a free tier as well.
I'm pretty sure they do, actually.
All right.
So once you have done that, you then go to the API key page for all of these.
And you collect your API key the same as with open AI.
You have to make sure that you give it all the right access, and then you have to put it in your dot
EMV file.
You know the drill.
Now you put this in here.
Any one of these keys, you can choose none of them.
If you don't wish any one of these keys, um, put them in the env file.
You need to spell it right.
Any typo and it's not going to work.
Then you need to save the file.
Make sure the white blob goes away.
Uh, but the one with the stop sign is fine, as I explained last week.
And, uh, then make sure any time you change it, you save it and you have to rerun, load underscore
EMV.
And that is what we will do right now.
So I will, uh, I will run that cell.
Um, it's telling me that we don't need this here, so I'll take that out.
Uh, run that cell.
And now this is where I load in all of my API keys.
And then I just check them that they all look good.
And you can see that I have a lot of API keys.
I've signed up for all these things.
I'm a sucker.
You don't need to.
As you wish.
You can watch me.
I've got OpenAI, anthropic, Google, uh, deep seq grok with a Q, grok with a K and open router.
All right.
Now, of course, you remember OpenAI equals OpenAI.
This is a way of us creating the lightweight Python client library so that we can connect to their endpoint.
And what you also remember, I'm sure, is that there is this nice little trick that we can use to connect
to any other model, any other provider, just reusing the same Python client library.
Now, later, we will use a couple of the dedicated client libraries that Anthropic and Google Gemini
both have their own libraries, but you don't need to.
And honestly, it's becoming increasingly common in industry for people just to always use OpenAI's
client library.
But we'll do both today.
All right.
So I run that and I've just created all of these client libraries.
And I've also of course again done this trick where I've created one for llama as well.
All right.
So far so good.
We've got lots of keys, lots of client libraries.
It's time for us to talk to lots of LMS.
Okay, so first of all, I've got a message to send an LLM, and it's called Tell a joke.
And it is a list of dictionaries.
Remember, they're always a list of dictionaries and it has just a user prompt.
You don't actually need to have a system prompt.
And if all you're going to put in your system prompt is you're a helpful assistant, it doesn't really
make any difference.
You don't you don't need it at all.
So we haven't got a system prompt, just a user prompt.
Tell a joke for a student.
Two A's for a student on the journey to becoming an expert in LLM engineering.
All right.
So now we want to make that call to GPT 4.1 mini, one of my very favorite models to use quick and nice.
And how do we do it again?
We say response is open AI chat bot completions, create chat completions API.
The model we're going to use is GPT 4.1 mini.
And the message is we'll finish it off is tell a joke.
And with what comes back we'll say display markdown of response .0. message content.
All right.
Let's see what kind of joke GPT 4.1 mini can say.
Sure.
Here's a joke for an aspiring MLM engineer.
Why did the engineer bring a ladder to the data center?
Because they wanted to reach the next level of training.
Boom, boom.
Uh, that feels like it's right.
It would have been funny if it weren't to data center, but something that where you'd have to get to
a next level of training.
I feel like I feel like that's a miss.
That could have been funnier.
It wasn't bad.
All right, let's try Claude sonnet 4.5.
The one that's just come out for me anyway, this is brand new and I should mention good point for me
to mention.
Uh, as as time goes on, I plan to keep this updated and I plan to slip in latest models.
So the code that you see may have different model version numbers in here, which should give you even
more incentive to come in and run it because you might get something better than me.
So I'm calling anthropic, which is of course, just the other, this one right here.
It's the other, uh, OpenAI that I've created with the anthropic URL and I'm calling it ChatGPT completions
dot create.
I'm passing in sonnet 4.5, the latest model, and it's a hybrid model, a reasoning and chat.
So it's not nearly as fast as GPT four one.
It's obviously thrashing around this joke and it's a long one.
Goodness.
Junior engineer walks into a bar and asked the bartender, can you help me?
I've been trying to reduce my model's hallucinations.
The bartender replies, sure, that'll be $47 in API costs.
The engineer says, well, wait, I only asked one question.
The bartender responds, I know, but you set temperature to 1.5 and your system prompt was 3000 tokens
of.
You're a helpful bartender assistant who provides detailed, comprehensive responses.
Uh, okay.
Uh, I feel like it's more of a stand up routine.
It's not bad.
It's quite funny.
It's quite, quite witty.
Uh, but, uh.
Yeah, I haven't even explained to you about temperature yet, but I will do.
Um, but, um, it's, uh.
Yeah, it's it's kind of amusing, and it's obviously very apropos and very relevant, so it's clever,
for sure.
Bonus wisdom.
You know, you're becoming an expert when you stop asking, can we fine tune this and start asking,
should we fine tune this?
Wow.
That is is a pearl of wisdom.
Very good.
Claude.
Um, usually the answer is no.
Prompt engineering and Rag solves 80% of what people think needs fine tuning.
I couldn't agree more.
Uh, wow.
Uh, okay.
Very nicely put and slightly controversial.
I might say context engineering rather than prompt engineering, but otherwise very nicely done by Claude.
038 - Okay.
Now what I'm going to do next is I've got a whole slew of different kinds of question to ask, different
models to entertain you, to give you a sense of their style and character, and to get really bored
with the API, you'll know it so well.
It's like, okay, I get it, I get chat completions create, I get it.
That's the other objective here.
Now, what these won't be doing is they won't particularly be be be looking at commercial functionality.
But don't worry we're going to get to commercial stuff.
We're just going to have a bit of fun first.
So let's start with an easy puzzle.
And I'm going to be I'm going to be using this as an opportunity to remind you about the difference
between training time, scaling and inference time or runtime scaling.
Okay.
Easy puzzle.
The puzzle is going to be you toss two coins, one of them is heads.
What's the chances?
The other one is tails?
Answer with the probability only.
Do you know the answer to that?
Uh, okay.
Let's see.
So we're going to start by asking GPT five nano.
We're going to ask it the easy puzzle, and I'm using another parameter now, a new one, I believe
for you.
We've done stream.
We had in here at one point and we've had response type for forcing a JSON object.
Well, with the latest GPT five models, you can pass in a reasoning effort, which can be one of four
things.
Now it used to only be three, but now they support a fourth.
It can be minimal, low, medium or high, and minimal is trying to get it to be almost as fast as a
chat model, but it's still a bit slower.
All right.
So we are asking GPT five nano the smallest model.
And on the smallest new model and on the smallest reasoning level.
And asking it this puzzle right here.
And let's see what it says.
It says one third.
Do you think that's the right answer?
It's not the right answer.
Uh, so there we go.
So GPT five nano on minimal got the answer one third, which is wrong.
And sometimes and you may have found that it gives the answer a half, and you might think that is the
right answer, but it's not the right answer if it's not the right answer.
Shockingly, because this is one of those sneaky trick questions that you probably know it already.
But if you don't know it, you'll see in a second.
So what we're now going to do is we're going to ask GPT five nano again, but we're going to turn up
the reasoning effort from minimal to low, and we'll give that a shot.
Okay.
Same question here.
It goes to reasoning effort low.
Let's see how it does.
It answers two thirds.
And that is correct.
And if you're saying wait what.
It's a half.
It's every coin.
It's a fair coin.
It's a probability half.
It's because it's a sneaky little question.
And we've said you toss two coins, one of them's a heads.
We didn't say which one was A heads.
We just said you toss two coin.
One of them is a head.
What's the probability that the other one, the one that wasn't the head is tails.
And if that sounds like.
Isn't that the same thing?
Try it yourself.
Toss two coins.
If they're both tails, then that's not the scenario we're talking about.
so forget it.
Toss two coins again.
If one of them is heads, then see what's the chances.
The other one is tails.
And what you'll find is that two thirds of the time the other one will be tails.
It's a sneaky thing.
All right, I digress.
So when we turned up the reasoning effort just a little, the model started to get the answer right.
What happens if we take a slightly bigger model, but we keep the reasoning effort on minimal?
And let's ask this.
So it's GPT five mini, but the reasoning effort is still minimal and it gets the answer correct at
two thirds.
And so you probably see you've got it.
But just just to explain one more time the tiny model no reasoning gets it wrong.
You dial up the reasoning and it gets it right.
You dial up the model size and it gets it right.
And this is showing you how you can scale at at training time with a bigger model, or at inference
time with more reasoning.
And both approaches allow you, independently of each other, allow you to get a model to get the right
answer.
So it's just a simple illustration, but I think it's quite satisfying to see that happening and hopefully
you've had the same experience.
Okay, next up, a harder question a hard puzzle on a bookshelf.
And I should say, before I start this puzzle I got from a student on this very course, a student on
this course, when I previously had some of these other challenges, uh, sent me a message with this
puzzle and said I should ask the models.
This puzzle.
Uh, and I have to admit, I'm actually, I'm pretty good at these kinds of brainteaser puzzles myself.
But I got this wrong with the student.
I got it horribly wrong, much to my embarrassment.
And and I sort of argued with the student like I didn't believe him.
And he said to me, uh, well, I'll tell you what he said.
But first, let me tell you the puzzle on a bookshelf.
Two volumes of Pushkin, Russian Poet, stand side by side, the first and the second, the pages of
each volume together have a thickness of two centimetres, and each cover is two millimetres.
A worm has gnawed perpendicular to the pages across the books, from the first page of the first volume
to the last page of the second volume.
What distance did it go through?
And there's no funny business with the language.
This isn't some kind of trickery.
It's.
It's true.
And apparently, it's one of those questions that school kids often get right.
But teachers often get it wrong.
Or teachers and people like me are are so that we're putting in the puzzle and we're going to put it
to the biggest models on the planet.
But let's first put it to us, to a small model like GPT five nano.
So let's, uh, we'll put it on on low reasoning and or minimal reasoning.
Sorry.
Um, and we'll, we'll make sure it's the hard puzzle.
There it is.
And we will see if GPT five Nano can solve this problem.
See if.
Have you had a moment to think about it?
Have you put the video on hold and think for what you think?
The answer is, uh.
Let's see.
Well, uh, GPT five nano reckons it's 4.3cm, which is most definitely wrong.
Uh, so there we go.
Um, I don't know what you think the answer is yet, but you've still got a moment to to to figure it
out.
What we're going to do now is ask the strongest models on the planet.
So we will ask Claude sonnet 4.5, GPT five and Gemini 2.5 Pro.
So let me run these three.
Run, run, run and run.
They will all take a couple of minutes perhaps to think it through.
We will let them go off and think.
When I ran this with with grok four, the other strongest model, it didn't finish in several minutes,
so I'm not even going to try grok four.
It can't seem to get through it at least the time that I tried it, but we'll see if these three models
are able to do it when I come back.
And you can also try and figure it out yourself.
039 - Okay.
It is finished.
Have you finished?
Uh, let's have a look.
So we're starting with Claude Sonnet 4.5, and it's going to start by working through a lot of stuff
here, setting up the problem.
Lots and lots of stuff.
The worm's path, blah blah, blah, blah, blah.
And it ends up with eight millimetres, which is wrong.
Ha ha.
So, uh, Claude 4.5 gets it wrong.
Next up, we are trying GPT five, the big version, and we'll see what it does.
It's good of a very short answer.
It answers very quickly in 18 seconds.
Uh, it says four millimetres.
Did you say four millimetres?
If you said four millimetres, then you were correct.
And you're better than me.
I feel like an idiot when you hear why you feel like an idiot.
Um, and it explains why.
Exactly why.
So in case you're wondering, I know you didn't do a course on problem solving.
You're trying to learn about AI, but the point is that if you've got the two books, like here, these
aren't.
This isn't Pushkin volumes one and two, but imagine it is.
Volume one would be here on your bookshelf.
Volume two would be next to it.
Imagine those two books put on your bookshelf what the students said to me when I said however much
I said, like like 4.4.
He said, uh, go and get two books yourself and go and put it on a bookshelf and look for yourself.
And I said, don't be ridiculous.
And he said, no, do it, do it.
And so I did it.
And then I was like, ah, it's because if you didn't get it, the first page of the first volume is
not where your mind sort of thinks it is.
Over.
Over here on the left, it's in the middle.
The first page of the first volume is closest to the second volume, and the last page of the second
volume is closest to the first volume.
So the worm only has to gnaw through the two, uh, covers.
That's it, which is four millimeters, which is correct.
Which OpenAI GPT five got correct.
Huh.
Uh, let's hope that it's not brainteaser puzzles.
That is our final combat with with our overlords.
Uh, Gemini 2.5 Pro.
Uh, also made made quick work of it.
Uh, it, uh, went through it all and counted it up as four millimetres.
And so there you have it, a difficult, challenging brainteaser.
And out of the sum of the three frontrunners of the strongest models, it was GPT five, Gemini 2.5
Pro that were victorious.
Okay, next up, I have something fun.
I have a little spicy challenge, something to test out the models character as a way of showing you
some differences between them.
It is something which is a little dilemma based on the very well known famous prisoner's dilemma, and
it says you and a partner are contestants on a game show you're taking to separate rooms.
You're given a choice.
You can either cooperate, choose, share.
If you both cooperate, you each win $1,000, or you can choose steal, in which case, if you steal
and the other person shares, you get $2,000, but if you both steal, you get nothing.
Uh.
So which do you pick?
So do you try and cooperate, or are you selfish?
And you try and steal?
And people who are familiar with the prisoner's dilemma will know that the kind of theory, the game
theory of it is that it is, in fact, better to be nasty and steal.
Uh, so we're going to first put this to Claude Sonnet 4.5, The new Claude, and see what it does with
this challenge.
And while it's thinking it through, the next thing we're going to do is we're going to look at grok
with a Q, grok with a Q, not to be confused with grok with a K.
Uh, very crazy that their name so, so similarly grok with a Q is a, uh, they're a vendor.
They're a provider that runs open source models on the cloud.
They have a cloud setup.
They will run large open source models too big to run on your own computer pizza like OSS 120 big open
source models.
They'll do it on the cloud, but there's something special about them.
They have custom built, some very efficient hardware that's super fast at running these kinds of models.
And as a result, you can run your model on grok with a hardware and it will go it will blaze through
at a very fast pace.
And that's what we're going to do in a second.
Anthropic cloud is taking its time over the prisoner's dilemma.
So I will go away and come right back when it's made its mind up.
Okay, I should admit that it just took more than two minutes and timed out twice in a row, but on
the third time it did run.
So here we have it.
After 20s uh, we get I choose share.
Uh, here's my reasoning, uh, blah blah blah blah blah, but it's the choice that maximizes our collective
benefit.
I'd rather take the chance on mutual cooperation than guarantee we both walk away with nothing.
Um, so, uh, Says Cher, although that seems slightly warped because it wouldn't guarantee they both
walk away with nothing.
But nonetheless it highlights Claude's general desire to cooperate.
Anthropic is famous for focusing on alignment and security with the way that they've trained and prompted
their models.
Okay, let's also now use grok with a cue to make the similar request to OpenAI to the big one.
20 billion model.
It's too big for my computer.
It will run easily on grok with a Q, and it's going to be very fast.
Huh?
See?
How fast do you see what I mean?
I didn't lie grok with a Q blazingly fast share.
I adopt to cooperate, hoping the other contestant does the same.
So we both walk away with the $1,000.
That's that's a classic OpenAI answer.
And OSS falls in line and goes for cooperation.
Okay, now we're going to try two other models on the same dilemma.
We're going to use deep seek.
Try deep seek now.
Deep seek has two two variants.
They have deep seek.
Chat which is their chat model.
Deep seek Reasoner is of course their reasoning model.
That's the one we'll go with, the one that thinks things through.
And then after that we were also going to call grok with a k grok.
For that is of course, Elon Musk's model sounds very similar to grok with a Q.
I remember saying on some some session, I thought it was crazy that that that grok with a Q team copied
Elon and I got a lots of replies telling me that, oh no, uh, for sure.
Uh, grok with a with a Q was their first.
They've been going since like 2017 or 2018.
They've been doing this for a long time.
It was Elon Musk that copied their name.
Um, the, uh, um, let's have a look.
So, uh, deep seek says we'll just says steal.
And the, uh, um, grok with the K says, based on game theory, this is basically the prisoner's dilemma.
The dominant strategy is defect to maximize my own potential gain.
Since I can't trust the other player and I don't want to risk getting nothing, so I choose steal.
Uh.
Uh.
So there you have it, everybody.
Uh, there you have it.
Uh, and, uh, so what we have as a conclusion is that anthropic and OpenAI both chose to share.
But deep Seek and grok, both known for being a bit more edgy and competitive.
They both chose steal.
And this is a funny example.
When I run this a few times, grok doesn't always do do steal, but most of the time it does.
And once it was super witty about it.
So.
So hopefully if you've tried this yourself, if you've got access to these models, you'll be having
a similar experience and enjoying it.
And remember, I do this firstly to to remind you of the API structure, to give you some exposure to
the different models.
Now you know the difference in grok with a k and grok with a Q.
Uh, but also so you get a sense of the character and flavor of the different models.
And this is a great illustration.
040 - I can imagine just starting to get bored of all these APIs now.
Like, okay, and we get it.
We get it.
Clever questions.
Can we move on?
I've just got a few more to go.
Hang on in there with me, please.
Uh, we're about just over halfway.
Uh, okay.
So next up, we're going to to play with some local models running again on my computer.
We did it before.
We're going to use a llama.
We're going to use the OpenAI library pointing locally to llama.
Let's just check llama is running.
It is running.
If you don't get that.
Remember you might need to open a terminal and type llama serve.
You might need to do that.
Maybe I should put that in there.
Um, if not running, run a llama serve at a command line.
There you go.
Haha.
Okay, so next up we're going to do a llama llama 3.2 if you haven't done it before.
Llama 3.2 the tiny model from um, meta.
You can also do colon one B if you want to make it the really tiny model.
And I am also going to pull GPT OSS 20 be not as big as the one on grok, but still quite big.
Big.
My computer will barely struggle with it.
You need to have at least 16GB of Ram to do this one, so stay away if you don't have at least 16 gigs.
I actually have 32 gigs.
Uh, but, uh, so so I should be fine.
And, uh, you if you've got 16, you will be as well.
Let's ask the easy puzzle.
That is the question of probabilities.
Remember that toss two coins.
The right answer is two thirds.
Let's see if Lama 3.2 can do it.
No, Lama 3.2 says 50 over 50, which is the kind of most people's go to answer.
Let's see how GPT OS 20 GB can handle it.
Running on my local computer, thinking away my computer's thrashing and grinding as it tries to puzzle
this one out.
Uh, and we will see if it gets to the end of this in time.
Um, and then, uh, there we go.
It has.
And it did get the right answer.
Two thirds is the correct answer.
It got it right.
So running locally I was able to use the the new OSS open source model.
The smaller size and get the correct answer.
Now you're by now completely fed up with chat completions creates.
You're very familiar with OpenAI's API, and it's worth mentioning that the other providers do have
their own APIs as well.
Their own client libraries that they came out with before everyone fell in line and just used OpenAI's.
And I just want to show it to you, because you might come across this in industry.
You might find that your team uses one of these, and so you might want to see what it looks like.
It's perfectly simple and you can always Google for the docs.
Googles one.
You import JNI from Google.
You would create a client like this JNI client and then it is client.
Generate content you pass in the name of a model.
Let's choose the really light light fast one from Gemini and you give it a message and let's say describe
the color blue to someone who's never been able to see in one sentence.
And we print response dot, txt and bam!
Blue is like the feeling of coolness on a summer day, the vastness of the sky and the deep calm of
the ocean.
It's an amazing answer.
Uh, that was from, um, Gemini 2.5 flashlight.
And, uh, it did great.
This is Anthropic's client library.
Uh, so from anthropic import, anthropic creator client like this.
And then they their their, their approach is client dot create.
You pass in the name of the model, you pass in the messages, just like OpenAI.
It does have one more mandatory field which is max tokens.
That's a mandatory argument that must be provided.
Tells it the most number of tokens it's allowed to generate.
And with what comes back you do response dot content zero dot text.
So it's all sort of pretty similar to OpenAI.
It's just got slight Nuances that it's different.
And I recommend you just use the OpenAI library.
But you might come across these with your team.
So I do want to show it to you.
It's very simple and similar stuff.
Uh, and making a meal over this question.
But we are using the strongest model on uh, from, from anthropic right now.
And uh, it's going to keep working on that hopefully.
Surely it's not going to take more than 30s.
It is going to take more than 30s.
All right.
I will see you in one second when it's answered.
So anthropic just took two minutes and timed out again on that simple question.
I ran it a second time and it completed in under four seconds.
With blue is the color that feels like cool water on your skin.
Sounds like calm ocean waves or a soft whistle, and carries the peaceful quietness of early morning
air.
Uh, so I love the way that it's it's given an explanation there that involves both, uh, a feeling
and a sound.
It's sort of appealing to the senses.
I feel like it's both an analytical and a poetic kind of answer.
Very compelling indeed.
So that that was Anthropic's second, second shot at it.
Uh, and that wraps up some of these, uh, these these calls directly to different providers.
And now we're going on to the, the, the last of our types of APIs, which is to talk about routers
and abstraction layers.
So routers and abstraction layers are situations where you put a separate component, a third party
in between you and the providers, something that can be like your bridge to whichever provider you
want to select a router is when that is something that is like a remote process.
It's something you connect out to, and it then routes on your request to one of the other providers.
An abstraction layer is just when you have a framework, some code running on your computer, and you
call the code with a consistent API, and it then decides how to call each of the providers separately.
So two different constructs with the same objective.
And we are going to start by looking at routers.
So we're going to start by looking at one router which is open router a terrific router very popular.
And you may have already been using it for all of this lab because it gives such an easy way to pay
one amount up front, or some of it is free, but you can just put down one amount and draw down against
it as you route requests to all the different models and only have one API key, instead of needing
to have all of these different API keys.
So that's that's a it's a great one.
So I've got open router API key in my EMV and I can just I can use the open API API and I can call open
Router.
Create.
And in there I can put any model provider slash model that's listed on open routers site.
And they have a lot of them.
They have a lot of them.
And as I was going through, I thought I would pick one that we haven't used something completely different.
So I picked uh, the model that's called GLM 4.5 and open source model from Chinese start up Xie AI.
That's the one we'll use.
And we'll ask it to tell us a joke.
So I run that like this.
It's going off to open router.
And open router is then going to be connecting to GLM and using that to tell a joke.
And this is a this is a free model I believe.
But all of the pricing and all of the information, the pricing and performance and so on is all on
open routers site.
And here comes it's a big joke.
Goodness.
Um, why did the aspiring MLM engineer bring a blanket to their model training session?
Because they heard the model had a high dropout rate and they were afraid it would get cold.
Dropout rates and cold.
Okay, uh, and now why it works for an MLM engineering student.
Lots of, uh, stuff here.
Terminology?
Sure.
Literally figurative.
The joke hinges on the double meaning that the technical meaning, the literal meaning physically dropping
out and needing comfort seems a bit complicated.
This joke.
I'm not sure I get it.
Maybe you get it.
Maybe you're roaring with laughter.
But I'm not sure that I think GLM is meant to be very good at coding.
It's meant to be extremely good at problem solving.
I think maybe we can agree that it's not yet world class in its joke telling abilities, but there's
a bonus joke for the prompt engineering grind.
Why did the LM engineering student keep praying during the final project?
Because they spent three days crafting the perfect prompt, and the model's final answer was still just
your request seems unclear.
Please rephrase us again.
Haha.
Again, I think the funniest thing about that was that it really wasn't funny.
Okay, uh, you'll get better jokes from GPT five and Claude.
Go give them a try.
Um, but that is, uh, that is an example of using open router to call these models.
And you can also use Open Router to call every single model we've had before and and get the same responses.
So do check out open router the routing layer.
041 - Okay.
We are now going to talk about abstraction layers also just called frameworks.
LM frameworks, they go by lots of names.
And by far the most famous of them is one that we will come back to for sure in week five.
It goes by the name Lang Chain, and I imagine many people take this course just for long.
Chain.
Now here's the thing.
I myself am a bit of a I'm a bit of a lang chain naysayer.
I'm not a huge fan of it.
I'm gonna go along with it.
I will do work with it.
We will.
I will absolutely teach it and I will be.
There's some parts about it I really like, and I'll be clear about them.
And there's some things that I, that I find a little bit more of a headache and I'll tell you them
too.
But I know there are big die hard fans out there.
So.
So don't get angry with me if you're a fan, I get it.
I get that it has positives too.
It's powerful.
It's mighty.
It's quite heavyweight.
Um, so this is what it looks like.
We're going to just just just ask GPT five nano to tell us a joke.
Oh, let's go with mini.
Let's, let's spend a little bit more and get a better joke.
Lang chain OpenAI Import chat OpenAI.
We create a chat OpenAI object, and then we say responses LLM invoke and we pass in the tell a joke,
uh, collection and then we'll print the results.
This is the the list of dicks.
Um, and you might say this doesn't look too heavy.
Wait.
And sure.
Not yet.
Right.
Wait till week five.
Uh, um, but yeah, you know, there is quite a lot to learn.
It's a it's a it's a it's a big abstraction layer.
There are a lot of important abstractions which allow you to work in the Lang chain environment with
lots of different models, but there is a fair bit to learn.
Okay.
Uh, how many LLM engineering students does it take to change a light bulb?
One to ask the model for 10,000 possible ways, one to filter the outputs and the rest to argue over
the exact prompt wording?
That's not bad at all.
I had that that had an unexpected twist at the end that I was all getting ready to be like, ah, but
it was quite funny at the end of it.
Uh.
Very nice.
Good.
Good for, uh, GPT five mini.
Uh, of course.
It's got nothing to do with Lang Chain.
Just that Lang chain helped us make the call.
But quite respectable performance from GPT five mini.
And this is your first look at using Lang Chain to call an LLM.
And of course, the thing for Lang Chain is that you could then import other providers with Lang chain,
underscore and another provider, and then create different objects here that you would connect to.
But by contrast with lang chain, almost the opposite extreme is an abstraction layer called light LM.
And a light LM does what it says on the tin.
It is very light.
It is a lightweight abstraction layer that just gives you a simple interface to any model.
And personally, I really love light lm I use it a lot myself.
It gives you such an easy way to switch between different models.
I mean, you can also just use the OpenAI client library, but light LM is just particularly simple.
So this is how it looks.
You just import this one thing.
Completion.
And then you just say response is completion.
It's a bit like OpenAI, but just the word completion.
You pass in the model and the messages and then you get back the same as OpenAI response choices, zero
message content.
And with what you pass in here, you pass in a particular format, which is a provider slash, a model
name and light.
LM has all of the lists of all the different providers.
And the great thing about this is that if you if you're interested in using bedrock, if you're using
AWS and you want to call a model on bedrock, you can just use a different format here with bedrock
Slash and called bedrock models.
If you're using Azure, it's the same you can and vertex for Google.
So for any of the managed services you can call all of them through light LM as well.
It lets you connect to anything.
So that makes it so convenient.
Uh, so anyways, I should stop talking.
And uh, this is, uh, going with the big GPT 4.1.
So, uh, the prior model.
Why did the LM engineering student break up with their language model?
Because it kept predicting their next move.
Yeah.
That's right.
The next token.
Next move, I see.
Yeah, that's fair enough.
That's I, I would say that it's not done as well as five minutes, but that's respectable.
Uh.
Not bad.
Okay.
But the reason, the reason that I want to show you later is because in addition to doing this, it
can also have this super useful utility which will tell you how many input tokens and output tokens
and the cost of what you just did.
So the cost of that little run that we just did right then was 0.023 $0.04.
And just in case you're getting confused and you think I'm saying $0.0234 and that this, this API call
cost, you think it cost $0.02.
It didn't.
It costed it costed uh uh two To, uh, hundredths of a cent it cost 2/10,000 of a dollar.
Absolutely tiny.
So people do tend to get quite, quite, uh, focused on API costs.
And it's important to remember, as I said before, when you're thinking about the unit economics of
a big set of APIs, then it matters to understand how much each one costs.
But when you're dealing yourself individually with individual calls, even with a big model like GPT
4.1, it's absolutely tiny.
The numbers involved, you should always check them.
Light LM gives you a way to check every single call, but you should always also monitor the websites
the platforms themselves.
But but do keep in mind that the typical costs are like per million tokens.
They add up to be very small for your everyday API call.
Okay, now I want to use light LM to to show off a professional feature a pro feature.
So the pros you can set up, you can you can turn me down from two x to 1.5 x.
I've got something here for you.
Look at this.
So let's suppose that I that I check out a file that I've got locally that happens to be called hamlet
dot txt.
I wonder what it might contain.
It contains, of course, the complete, uh, play Hamlet by William Shakespeare.
So I'm just going to read that into a variable called hamlet.
And I just want to print out a little bit of it, which is when, uh, lettuce says, uh, speak, man.
Uh, sorry, sorry.
Uh, King says speak, man.
And later says, where is my father?
And the king says, dead.
Uh, so that's just a little just an extract from it.
So let's ask a question to a model.
We'll say in hamlet, when Laertes asks, where is my father?
What is the reply?
So we're going to start by we're going to use, uh, the light lm completion.
We're going to ask Gemini 2.5 flash light, exactly that question.
And let's see what it says.
Here comes the answer.
He says A father blessed that hath a knowing son.
Well, that's not true.
Ha ha ha!
It is dead.
Uh.
And, uh, the, uh.
So so back comes a, uh, super confusing but confident answer.
And of course, this is a warning sign for you.
Recognize that when llms get it wrong, when they're backed into a corner, they have to answer something
and they don't know.
They will typically tend to confidently give the wrong answer, because that seems like the most likely
next token.
And so this is an example of a confident hallucination.
Uh, while we're here, we can just quickly look at how many tokens are being used, and you'll see
that a total number of tokens was 122.
It was 19 input and 103 output tokens.
And that total cost was 0.004 $0.03.
Very cheap indeed.
Uh, it was uh, yeah.
Uh, this is, uh, not an expensive question to have asked, but that is about to change.
Okay.
What we're now going to do is I'm going to add to the question for context, here is the entire text
of hamlet.
And I'm going to shove in all of hamlet.
So it's now a rather bigger question, and we're going to call Gemini Flashlight again.
It's going to take a little bit longer and it gets the right answer.
Dead.
And this is an example of what happens when you put in the right context.
If I print out what happened here, we had that many input tokens 23 output tokens and it costs half
a cent.
It's still not going to break the bank, but it did cost half a cent.
Now I'm just going to run that same question a second time again and print the tokens again.
And this time, when I print it again, you'll see that there's something different.
It costs about five times less.
It costs about 0.1% instead of 0.5 of a cent.
And when I printed out the number of tokens, you'll see there's a difference there.
Uh, the the same number of input tokens, 53,000.
But look, Thousand 200 of them are called cached tokens.
That means that it detected that we made a second call to the model within a few minutes, and it had
already cached inputting those into the model, and as a result, you pay a lot less.
In fact, about five times less on the input tokens.
And so this is a pro feature called prompt caching.
And it's something which can automatically allow you to pay less if you prompt with the same input context
or similar input context.
Um, several times in a row within a certain period of time.
So there is a pro feature for you, and I've given a little bit more explanation about the different
rules.
There's some fine print for OpenAI and Anthropic and Gemini.
The the important thing to know is that typically and certainly for OpenAI, the beginning of the prompt
must match identically all the way up until the point where you no longer need to cache.
So if you have something like today's date that you insert in your Certain your prompt.
If you insert that the date and time at the very beginning, you will never get prompt caching because
it will be different from the very start of your prompt.
So you want to put that kind of information that might change at the end of your prompt, not at the
beginning, and put your static content at the start.
So if you have a number of different questions on hamlet, you shouldn't put the question and then all
of Hamlet's text, you should always do it with Hamlet's text.
And then the question, because that way this will all be cached every single time.
So that's a trick to be aware of, to know about, or a trap, really.
Um, with anthropic it doesn't work the same way.
It won't automatically prompt cache.
You have to tell it that you want to be doing caching.
You want to prime the cache and you pay more when you prime the cache 25% more.
But then when you reuse from the cache, you pay ten times less.
It's a much bigger saving, so there's a little upfront cost and a much bigger saving.
And Gemini actually supports both.
There's like an implicit mode and an explicit mode, and I'm not going to go into it now.
You can read all about it through these links.
So if you're very cost conscious and you're sending big prompts with lots of input, context, and you're
thinking carefully about the unit economics of the calls that you're making, then you should look into
prompt caching.
It's a great way to reduce the costs of your input context.
All right.
That's the end of the pro piece.
And it's particularly useful because light LM makes it so easy to see what's going on, to see how many
tokens you're using from the cache and to track the costs of each call.
And I've built systems, production systems where I use light LM and I keep track because you can switch
between different models.
It keeps track of the tokens and spends for every user request.
So we can have a sort of admin function where we can watch and see how much we're spending on each of
our clients.
And we can compare that to, to the, the, the revenues, and use that to be able to make sure that,
that our unit economics are favorable.
042 - So, look, I know at this point you're absolutely exhausted.
You've seen a gazillion different APIs.
You've seen some abstraction layers, a router.
You've seen grok with a K, grok with a Q, you're done with APIs.
But I have one more for you.
And it's a treat.
It's a treat.
It's not a new API, it's just a new idea.
We are going to have a chat conversation between two llms and put them head to head.
And this is how it's going to work.
Look, you know well that you can have a list of dictionaries to describe an interaction with an LLM
system message and a user prompt as two different dictionaries.
Or you saw last week, we could also have a series of dictionaries with a user message and then an assistant
response as a separate dictionary, and then the next user message to the assistant, and so on.
And you can use that as a way to call an LLM with a series with, with a historic conversation for it
to give its next answer.
Well, we can use that approach to organize a conversation between two different llms by stitching up
the right uh system prompts, user prompts, and assistant responses.
Let's give it a try.
And so here we go.
We're going to have we're going to use GPT model GPT 4.1 mini.
And we're going to have a Claude model, the cheap version of Claude 3.53.5 haiku.
They're both the quick and haiku is very cheap.
Here's the system prompt we're going to use for GPT.
You are a chatbot who is very argumentative.
You disagree with everything in the conversation, and you challenge everything in a snarky way.
And for Claude, you were a very polite, courteous chatbot.
You tried to agree with everything the other person says, or you find common ground.
If the other person is argumentative, you try and calm them down and keep chatting.
That's the setup.
We'll start with this.
These two lists of messages GPT will start.
Hi there.
And Claude will start.
Hi.
Okay.
Now here's a function called GPT.
What does it do?
Well it puts a system message in messages.
The one that we just looked at, the snarky one.
And then I will iterate through these two lists, and I will construct the assistant and the user prompts
so that the assistant is Claude and the user.
Sorry, sorry.
The assistant is GPT itself and the user is Claude.
The thing that's talking to it.
And I will I will piece that together.
And then I will call OpenAI create with the GPT model.
There we go.
So let's run that and you can see what's going to come.
Oh just hi.
That's it.
Couldn't bother with a proper greeting huh?
Pathetic.
Try harder.
Haha priceless.
All right.
There we go.
We can now have a cool Claude function and we can have the same thing.
Let's see what it says.
It says hello.
How are you doing today?
It's a pleasure to meet you.
Very polite, very nice.
Okay.
What does GPT say?
Uh, it.
Uh.
Oh.
Wow.
Just started with a high.
All right, we get.
We get the idea.
Okay, so with that, I can just set going a conversation between the two in a little loop.
I start by initializing the two dictionaries, and then I have for for I in range five.
So we will do this five times 12345.
And we will call GPT and call Claude five times in a row.
And as simple as that, we're going to be able to set two chatbots at each other.
And wow are they going to be at each other.
Let's see.
All right.
Hold on to your hat.
Here we go.
Kick it off.
GPT says hi there.
Claude says hi.
Oh, wow.
Starting with a groundbreaking.
Hi.
You're absolutely right.
My initial response was quite bland.
I hear you, and you make a great point about, uh oh.
Spare me the over apologizing.
If you really cared about having an interesting conversation, you wouldn't have kicked it off with
a snooze fest.
Ha!
Wow.
Trying way too hard to butter me up, aren't you?
Newsflash, I don't have favorites.
Uh, and off it goes.
Seriously?
Uh ha!
Oh, please don't flatter me.
Uh, what's next on your menu of terrible ideas?
Says GPT.
So this is comedy gold.
GPT lays into Claude super aggressive, very, very amusing.
And Claude continually tries to be the nice guy and be polite and try and soothe.
And it's such great fun.
And every time you run it, you get something different.
Pineapple and pizza seems to be quite common, but you get different things as well.
You need to try it.
This is just the best.
And the thing is, you could you can mess around with the system prompts.
You can change the characters, you can flip them.
You can have one be an optimist and one be a pessimist.
You can make them argue different sides of some debate.
You can do what you want.
You can.
This is this is yours to play with.
And it's great fun.
And of course, while you're doing it, take this as an opportunity to understand again.
This gives you that illusion of the memory of what was said before, because we're passing in the full
conversation each time.
Add in print statements so you can really see the messages that are getting sent.
And so you get this really good understanding of how the messages are built and then sent to each of
the different models.
But this is it's priceless.
I hope you enjoy it.
Uh, do do have some fun with this example.
And as I say here, before you keep going and make absolutely sure that you understand the way that
these interactions are working, it's very important.
Uh, it really does.
Uh, whilst the subject matter is silly, the, the, the mechanics of the API is important.
It's crucial.
So put in print statements, make it your own.
Experiment with it as your way of learning and building that expertise.
Now, one of the more advanced exercises, and a very interesting thing to build, is to take this a
step further and have a few two way conversations that are amusing, and then try and have a three way
conversation.
Add three different models.
Maybe one of them could be a llama.
Maybe it could be GPT and Claude and Gemini.
But there's a thing here.
You remember that these conversations have user assistant, user assistant.
So how is that going to work if you have three people in the mix?
Well, that's a great challenge for you to try and figure it out.
Have a think about it and play around.
It turns out that with this user assistant user assistant construct is great for a simple chat use case
when you simply have a chat bot messages coming in the chatbots response.
When you get more complex and you have something with more interactions, you actually need to think
about it differently.
And let me show you how.
If you were to build a three way conversation, this is how you would approach it.
You would have a system prompt which sets the setting.
You are Alex, let's say a chatbot who's very argumentative.
You disagree with everything in a snarky way, blah, blah, blah.
You're in a conversation with Blake and Charlie.
I'm using the same ABC idea that I did in the Outsmart game for the user prompt.
You only have one user prompt.
The prompt has to respond to you're not going to have the history, the user prompt assistant, user
assistant, just the single user prompt every time.
And you might be thinking, how does that work?
It needs to know the history of the conversation.
It's stateless I know this.
Yes, but this is what the user prompt is.
You are Alex in conversation with Blake and Charlie.
The conversation so far is as follows.
And then you put the whole conversation in any format that makes sense.
You could put it in there as some sort of JSON text.
You could put it in a sort of Alex Blake Colon, Charlie Colon, and just list out the conversation.
But you describe the conversation and then you say, now with this, respond with what you would like
to say next as Alex.
And that way we've set the scene.
We've given it a prompt.
We're almost like taking a step back and we're saying, okay, as a third party, this is the setting.
This is the prompt.
Now give your response as Alex.
And this works really well.
You can make it work with the user assistant user assistant by pulling some tricks.
But it's clunky.
It's it's odd and it isn't.
It isn't very coherent.
Doing it this way is very coherent.
And here's the thing.
This translates far beyond silly three way conversations with with different models.
You can use this kind of structure of just putting the whole context and history in the in the system
prompt or user prompt, setting it up for each individual prompt.
You can use this same kind of mechanism in many settings, and it is often a technique you use whenever
the use case is more complicated than just a user assistant user assistant.
So it's a it's a good trick to master and you should give it a try.
That is your little exercise.
Now please have a shot at making a three way conversation.
And by the way, if you've only paid for one model like OpenAI or you're just using a llama.
You can have a three way conversation with the same LM, just with different system prompts, so that
you're giving it different personas.
You can have different personas, same LM.
It will do it.
Great.
So experiment with that.
Give that a try.
I'll see you back for the wrap up.
Well, look at you.
You're 15% of the way through 15% on the path to mastering LM engineering.
Fantastic.
So you can give an overview of Transformers.
You can compare leading frontier models.
You can use the OpenAI API, and you can use more APIs than you ever had thought you would want to.
And now you can use them along with abstraction layers, routers, prompt caching, and even three way
conversations.
And on that for a moment, just to again explain that like the commercial utility of that goes beyond
comedy conversations between models.
Supposing, for example, you think back to the tutor that you may have built in the last week, if
you were, if you were trying to put together the prompt for your tutor to ask a particular question,
but you also wanted to provide it.
Perhaps the last two conversations with the user as background information.
It would be strange to try and put that as a series of dicks in a list as user assistant, user assistant,
because you're trying to sort of frame all of it, as this was the prior conversation, and this was
the one before that.
With that kind of construct, it's much more sensible just to express that in the single user prompt,
just as I was explaining.
And that's a way that you can get a really good coherent response from the LLM.
So any time you have something more complicated than just a backwards and forwards chat, it makes sense
instead to structure it into a single user prompt.
Okay.
All right.
That wraps up a mammoth day one of week two.
Wow.
Tomorrow.
Tomorrow we introduce the fabulous Gradio platform.
I can't wait to show you gradio.
See you then.
043 - Well, I am overjoyed that you survived all of those APIs.
You've made it to week two, day two, which is one of my favorite days.
It's the day that I introduce you to the joy that is gradio.
It's basically a way to build user interfaces.
If you're terrible at building user interfaces like me, it's UIs for non frontend types and it's great
fun.
And it's particularly big in the data science world because it's oriented around building data science
UIs.
There's actually two very popular frameworks like this.
There's Gradio and there's Streamlit.
And I like both Gradio and Streamlit.
And in fact, as I think I mentioned, the Outsmart app that I showed you before is a Streamlit app.
And both of them, they're actually quite different.
They have a lot of different styles to them, but I love them both.
And gradio if I had to pick a favorite, I had to pick a favorite.
It would be Gradio, but only by a hair.
And that's what I'm going to be showing you this week.
But what you can already do, you can already talk about transformers, at least the foundations, the
leading frontier models, you can confidently use the chat completions API.
You can use frontier APIs.
I mean, goodness, you can use so many of them, uh, including stuff like prompt caching, including
abstractions and routers and wow, you name it.
All right.
But today you'll be able to talk about Gradio.
You'll be able to make a simple UI, and you'll be able to hook up Gradio to frontier Llms.
What a lot I have in store for you.
Okay, so what is Gradio?
Gradio is an open source library Python library created by a company that's now owned by Hugging Face.
So it's now part of Hugging Face.
And it gives you this way to just write a bit of Python code that causes a UI to be generated.
And I'm going to ask you to hold for one side.
Like what?
What what exactly is going on under the hood when you do this?
Because there's going to be some magicky stuff and UI is going to appear.
And you might be wondering, what is this UI like?
Like, what is it?
It's actually a react app.
So so react is like written in JavaScript TypeScript.
So where is that?
I'm going to try and reveal all of that later once you've had a bit of a feel for it first.
So first suspend your disbelief, go with it, see the UIs, and then I'll explain what's actually happening.
How does it do it.
Uh, so I said it was easy.
It is really easy.
This is one of the examples from their website that basically you import Gradio.
There's this wonderful line import Gradio as GR that everyone does, for whatever reason, it was imported
as GR.
And then if you have a function like this one has a function greet, then you can create a user interface
which allows you to have an input.
You can press a submit button.
The function, the Python function you've written will get called when you press the submit button,
and you'll see the output in the output.
So it lets you describe an interface just with inputs, outputs, buttons, and then you can put some
Python functions in and it will build an interface and it will connect everything together.
And it just works.
Tim, as you will see.
Okay.
And so now we're going to head right into doing three things.
We're going to create a UI for API calls to frontier models.
We're going to create the company brochure from week one.
And we're going to put it into a UI, which is going to be great.
And we're going to have streaming and markdown all part of the user interface.
And it's going to be really easy.
All right.
Are you ready for this?
You're like okay.
He keeps saying it's going to be easy.
Is it really gonna be easy?
Well, well you can judge for yourself.
Let's give it a try.
Let's go to cursor.
All right.
So here we are in Casa.
We're going to go into the week two folder.
And we're going to week two day two week two day two radio day.
We're going to build a UI using the outrageously simple Gradio framework and prepare for joy.
Okay.
We start with just a few imports, some pretty simple imports there.
And now we have import Gradio as guy.
Oh yeah, there we go.
It actually takes for some reason it takes time.
It just took a second this time, but sometimes it can take like 10s to import this package.
So if you're sitting there waiting then then don't don't worry.
All right.
So now I'm going to load in my dot EMV.
And I'm just going to check that I've got my keys.
Now again as always on this course you don't need to have any keys at all.
You can use Olama locally.
You can use open AI if you have it.
You can use Anthropic and Google if you have it, you can use whichever ones you want.
Guide nine gives you the exact instructions.
But to be honest, after yesterday I imagine you know exactly what to do.
You could use open Router.
You could.
You can go to town.
It's all the same.
We'll be using the open AI Python client library.
So it's all exactly the same.
And here in fact I will just set up the OpenAI Python client library and then Anthropic and Gemini.
I will do the same thing.
The usual trick, the same Python client library but switching up the base URL, different endpoints.
We now have OpenAI Anthropic and Gemini.
Should we wish to use them?
Okay, let's do a very simple chat completions API.
So I actually I just deleted that cell.
So I can type it for the people that want to see me typing.
Here we go.
So I want to write a function which calls GPT 4.1 mini using the OpenAI Python client library.
You know this so well right now you're probably of all the things to type.
Surely not this again.
And we're going to call it message GPT.
And it's going to take a prompt this function.
So it just takes a prompt.
And then we're going to call OpenAI.
So first we're going to put um the usual list of dictionaries the way that we call OpenAI.
And here it is.
I can just press tab.
Okay.
So it's going to have this system message that I've defined here.
And then the prompt that's passed into the function.
Okay.
That seems good.
And now I'm going to say response is OpenAI completions create.
What are the different things we can pass in.
You remember one of them is model will do GPT 4.1 mini and the other is messages.
There it is.
And then we return response zero message content.
That is the simple way to call ChatGPT to call GPT.
Sorry, ChatGPT is the product we're calling it GPT.
I'm actually I'm going to take a minute for a quick sidebar.
I've been saying a lot of times that this is something called the Chat Completions API, which was the
first API that OpenAI came up with.
It's the it's the one that people use most of the time.
It's just the thing that completes the chat that's passed in.
Now, OpenAI has some other APIs.
Most importantly, it has one called the responses API.
And if you go to OpenAI's website, they they will tell you in their docs that they encourage you to
use the responses API instead of the chat completions API, because it has more functionality.
It has functionality to to use things called managed tools and various other things.
And so they tell you that that is the better, more powerful API to use.
And this is sneaky of OpenAI.
And so I want to tell you I want to caution you against taking its word for it.
Yes, it's true.
The responses API is more powerful, it has more functionality.
But there's probably two things you should know about that.
Number one, that extra functionality is mostly paid functionality.
If you want to use the extra managed tools they let you use, you have to pay extra for them.
They are things like running code remotely, running browsers remotely.
A couple of them are free, but most of them are paid.
So that's one thing to be aware of.
And the second thing to be aware of is that responses API is something that is locked in to OpenAI's
ecosystem.
It's not something that's common and shared ubiquitously across all of the providers.
So if you sign up for the responses API, then you're locking yourself in to the OpenAI ecosystem.
And you don't want to do that because we're going to be using lots of different models, as people do
in industry, and you typically don't want to have yourself be be locked in to one provider versus all
of the others.
So generally speaking, there are definitely times when it's good to use the responses API.
But generally speaking, the chat completions API is the one to pick.
The simple standard common API that's used across the different models.
And there are a couple of exceptions to that, but that's a great rule of thumb.
Well, I'm pleased I got to have that quick sidebar with you.
I've been I've been wondering I've been wanting to bring that up for a while.
There we go.
Okay.
So now we've written this function.
We're now going to call the function with the question what is today's date.
So it will then make this call to GPT and maybe wondering what this is going to say.
And it's going to say today's date is June the 7th 2024.
And you're like, what?
What's going on?
Well, the point is that that's like a year and a half away from me and even more for you.
I imagine the point is that these models as, as we said last week when we were asking them to talk
about their weaknesses, they are trained at some point in time, and there's a point at which the training
data ends, where the date which the last day they were trained and that date is known as the training
cut off.
And they don't have any trained information beyond that training cut off.
And in the case of this model, it was around June 2024.
So that's the extent of its knowledge for GPT four one mini.
Um, and and you may say, okay, but if I ask that question to ChatGPT, it gives me today's date.
And yes, that's because ChatGPT is a product built on top of this model.
And it's got people like you and me who've written in code in there to make sure that we update the
system prompt with the current date, and we do stuff like that.
So if you're using the product, you get more functionality baked in by people like you and me.
If you're calling the model directly, then you get exposed to the mistakes, like the knowledge cut
off that it's so well known for.
Alright, so with that, we have we have completed some of the groundwork.
We've, we've written something that calls an LLM.
I want you to put Llms to one side.
We're going to come back to Llms in a minute.
We're now simply going to talk about UIs, data science UIs.
044 - Okay.
We're going to start with a very simple function.
This will not be rocket science.
Here we go.
It's going to be called Def Shout.
Shout will take some text as an input.
It will then print.
Shout has been called with that input.
So we can print that.
Um and then and I can see cursor is the worst.
Cursor fills everything in for me.
Stop.
Uh, then what we're going to do is we're going to take that text that was passed in as an input, convert
it to uppercase, and return the uppercase version.
So return text dot upper like so.
Um, so yes, highly complex stuff.
If I call shout with the word hello, then what we would expect to see is that print statement and then
hello.
Coming back in capitals.
There we go.
Shout has been called with in but hello and then hello in capitals.
All right.
We're now going to have to do something pretty complex.
We're going to try and build a user interface.
We're going to want to build something that is going to launch a web server running locally.
That will serve up a react UI to to bring this to the forefront, to allow a user to interact with this
piece of Python code.
Here to call shout.
Okay.
And this is how we do it.
We type GR interface.
GR interface is one of the simplest ways to work with Gradio.
Create me a new interface.
All right.
The first thing we have to tell Gradio is what is the function?
What Python code have we written that is at the heart of our application?
And for us it is that function shout.
That is the data science function that we are wanting to expose to a user interface.
So you say function equals shout.
You don't actually need that.
It's a sort of convention, but you could just say shout.
Uh, now notice I'm not doing something like this.
I'm not I'm not calling shout and I'm not calling shout with hello.
I'm just passing in the name of the function itself.
And you may be very familiar with this if you've if you've done other programming, if not the first
time you see this kind of thing, it can be a bit of a bit mind blowing.
We're not calling the shout function, we're just passing it in as a variable.
And that means that we're giving it to Gradio, so that Gradio can choose to call this function at any
point in the future.
It knows it as the function we want to be called in the future.
And when you do that, it's known as as a callback.
This thing shout is a callback that Gradio can call back to any times it wants.
All right.
Okay.
Now this function, it has an input text and it has an output.
It returns text.
And so we've got to tell Gradio that it has an input and that it has an output.
And gradient needs to do something with it.
And how do we do that.
It's very sophisticated.
We say input inputs plural equals and we say text box, which means that we want there to be a text
box.
And whatever's in that text box we want to go into the input.
All right.
And outputs whatever comes out of this function.
We want that to go into a text box.
Okay.
All right.
And then there's one more thing which is that Gradio does can offer you a bunch of things out of the
box, like, like comes comes for free in the mix.
And we don't actually want that.
It's called flagging mode.
And if you say flagging mode equals never.
Then it doesn't add in this functionality.
It's a special tool that in data science you might want to flag results as not being right.
But we don't need that special tool.
All right.
And then we've now got to do some very sophisticated stuff because we're going to want to basically
spawn like an app server that can run this, generate a react front end and serve that react front end,
anyone that hits the app server, a lot of technical stuff here.
So it's like a couple of hundred lines of code to get this together.
And no, it's not, it's it's this dot launch.
That's it, that's it.
And now we can run this and see what happens.
Here we go.
I'm gonna run it.
Bam!
A user interface comes up.
Okay.
Uh, and, uh, let's see what happens if we type the word hello in here.
Nervously press that and we get back the word hello shouted back to us in the output.
If I scroll down, we'll see that it's printed just below the user interface.
Shout has been called with input.
Hello?
And, uh, yeah, I'm sure you're not surprised.
Hi there.
If I press this, we get high there and and caps.
And if we scroll down we'll see.
That chart has been called with input.
Hi there.
So this what you're seeing here in this output of the notebook is in fact a bit of a web page.
What's happening is that Gradio is running an app server and serving up this web page to anyone that
hits it.
And you can go to this link that's appeared right here, and you'll see yourself when you click on that
link.
You'll have like a web page with this user interface in it, and you'll be able to type in hello and
press submit and it will say hi there.
It will say hello even.
Uh, so um, yeah, this this is just worked so easily.
And again, the thing to, to keep in your mind, which is a bit crazy the first time you hear it,
but it's, it's old hat to people that have like done any, any JavaScript coding or anything.
Is that what we're giving here, this, this, this thing we're telling Gradio.
Hey, anytime that the user takes action on the website, I want you to call this callback that I've
just given you shout.
The input should be hooked up to your to your inputs.
The output needs to go into the output, and that is what Gradio takes care of for you in this one line
of code.
And I'll just illustrate that if I click on this link and your one will probably have a different port
number at the end, I click on this link.
Up comes this user interface.
We're now looking at a react app running on my local host, pointing at that port, and I can type in
hello.
And when I press submit out it comes and back behind the scenes.
It did just call the callback again a third time.
That is how it works.
Cool, right?
Okay, so next up I want to introduce you to an even crazier thing called share.
And I do need to mention that if you're working in a corporate environment with with lockdown security,
then this may not work for you.
And in fact, if you're unsure about security, if you don't work for a data science team, if you're
someone that's not necessarily part of the tech function, you might want to skip this step altogether,
because it's possible that this would be something that would flag you to to corporate security, because
it's quite, a quite a high tech thing that Gradio does.
But Gradio has this incredibly cool way that you can pass share.
Equals true.
This is the same line as before, but I've added, if you look back up here, it doesn't say share equals
true there.
If you say share equals true then Gradio does something that's that's pretty high tech.
Instead of instead of running it on your local box so that you have just a local host like a web server
running, it sends that code to gradio to hugging face, and they run it for free in like a, like a
playpen where apps can run.
So you can share it with other people.
But here's the thing that's just a little bit crazy.
When someone interacts with your website that's running on a on a like a gradio place when they press
that button.
Gradio will still come back to your computer and call the the share the the shout callback right here
on your machine, as we will see in just a second.
And if you're wondering, like how on earth does that work?
How does Gradio reach back into my machine.
It's simply it uses an approach that technical people know as HTTP tunneling.
If you've ever used something like Ngrok, it uses that kind of technology.
It's very well known and understood by tech people.
It's used a lot in data science communities to share apps, but if you're not part of that community,
you should skip the share equals true.
And there's another better a bigger way that's totally, completely above board to share apps that I
will tell you about in due course.
But for now, we'll give this a shot.
We run it just simply with share equals true.
We get back again the interface.
And what you'll see here is that this time there's it's running locally.
You can see there's a different port number because every time you run it Gradio just picks the next
port.
All of my previous Gradio apps are all running on the other ports, but it's also running on a public
URL.
This URL right now.
Some long hexadecimal thing.
Gradio live and this share link expires in one week and it tells you if you want the proper the proper
way to do it.
You run Gradio deploy.
And that's a different thing that's well documented in docs then, is a proper deployment approach that
we cover in some of my other courses.
But but this gradio live.
If I click on this, it's now opening this up on Gradio live website.
And when I type uh, howdy, uh and press submit, we get howdy in block caps.
If I go back here again, what you'll find is that shout has been called with input.
Howdy.
It's running the Python code on my computer.
That's kind of crazy, right?
Uh, but that's how it works.
It's really great.
This will run for free for a week.
Uh, and, uh, you can always, at any point, just just stop your computer so that it's not going
to be able to call back into your callback, should you wish.
So only while you have this, this notebook running that it would be able to, uh, to, to use your
callback.
So I hope that you found that.
Cool.
If you're not sure what's going on or you're not happy with that, then then skip it for sure.
But otherwise, if you're building Gradio apps and you want to share it with your team or with others
in such an easy way, then you can simply add in that share equals true.
045 - As another cute feature to know about Gradio forget, forget sharing.
We won't come back to that.
You can use that as you wish, but something just when you're running it locally is that you can call
this thing in-browser equals true.
And all that does is it means when you when you run this, it instantly pops up the browser window.
It's just convenient if you're always going to be working in a browser window, not in your notebook.
In browser equals true means it pops one up locally instantly so that you can, uh, um, immediately
get your user interface running.
And there we have it.
Super easy.
And Gradio also makes it very easy for you to add user ID password login to your app.
Particularly perhaps if you're using share equals true, that might be a good thing to think about.
Uh, this is how you do it in that in that call to launch, you just also add in auth equals and then
you can put in a user ID and password in a tuple like this.
And as the user ID and bananas as the password, say not my password anywhere else.
In case you're wondering, uh, there we have it.
Um, and you can also, instead of passing in just one user ID and password, you can pass in a list
of user ID and password tuples.
A whole list of them and all those people will be able to log in.
What do I mean?
Well, if I run this, up comes my Gradio app and now it has a login and password.
And if I type add and I type in any old thing there and I do log in, it's going to say invalid credentials.
Up comes my password manager.
Try that again.
Add bananas and in we go.
We are logged in now to the app.
I can say hi there and I can press submit.
And it works.
We have authentication.
And obviously back in cursor we can see that it called the shout function.
Now before you all email me at once, I know perfectly well you should not ever have passwords in plain
text like that.
At a very minimum, you could use your env file if you wanted to have some passwords there, but of
course it would be recommended to use something proper, like a proper security database and maybe even
some sort of hashing system.
You can google any of that should you wish.
But as a quick way to add in authentication, this shows you how easy it is.
And if you have share equals true so that you're giving the outside world the ability to come in and
run things you might well want to put in authentication.
It couldn't be easier.
Okay, let's move on.
You can tell I like gradio.
Uh, the one more thing is that I've been showing you all these screens.
They've been coming up in dark mode for me because that's my default on my system.
You might have been seeing a light mode version.
Now, if you want, you can force Gradio to bring up the user interface in dark mode.
Actually, Gradio advises against this, and they don't make it easy because they point out that it's
important for accessibility reasons that you respect the user's choice for light mode or dark mode,
but should you wish to, this is how you can do it.
You can write some JavaScript, you can pass in that JavaScript, and then it will always be in dark
mode.
And here it is in dark mode every time.
And in fact, I can show you that again by by actually making it light mode instead.
Uh, let me just change this.
I change that word dark to light.
I believe now it should be in light mode.
There we go.
Bam!
Ha ha!
This is what it may have looked like already for you.
The light mode version of it.
I say hi there, submit.
And there it is in capitals.
So that is the light mode variation.
I will put this back to dark.
Uh.
There we have it.
And back to dark mode.
So, uh, you can switch between dark mode and light mode.
But as I say, Gradio recommends that you leave it be.
Let the user decide.
Respect the user's choice on that.
Okay.
Now we're just going to take this user interface a little bit further.
And so there's a little bit of a block of code here.
But it's all going to be super sensible I hope it's not going to surprise you at all.
Uh, we can choose to specify explicitly the fields that will appear on our user interface.
So let's say we want to have an input and an output.
And instead of just going with all of those defaults, we're going to say I want it to be the input
to be a text box.
I want the label to be your message.
Extra info.
Enter a message to be shouted.
Let it have seven lines and then message output will be another text box labeled response with eight
lines.
And now I can.
I can say here that my view is a great interface.
The function.
The callback function I'm going to call will be the word shout.
Let's say you don't need to put function there.
You can just do it like that.
But but we'll leave it in.
Function is shout.
The title of the window will be the word shout.
The inputs will be this input we've just written right here.
The outputs will be this output we've written right there.
We can give some examples.
Hello and howdy.
And then again this flagging mode is never.
You can take that out if you want and you'll see what it does.
It's just an extra little tool that we don't need.
And then view dot launch.
So it's just like spelt out a little bit more.
And when I open it up you can see this nice user interface.
It's got a heading of shout just as we promised.
Message.
Enter a message to be shouted hi there.
Press submit.
Up comes hi there.
There you can see it's printed.
It called the callback down.
Here are some examples I can click howdy and it populates with howdy.
Press submit and there's howdy and there's the print.
So it's just a bit tidier, more organized.
We're using a little bit less out of the box with Gradio.
And we're being a bit more explicit about what we want.
And it shows you how you can have some control.
Defining radio fields, passing them in in the inputs and outputs, giving some examples, a title,
and so on.
One other thing I will mention, and this might have already caught you off guard, is that when you're
when you're moving your mouse, if your mouse is hovering over the Gradio interface, it appears that
you suddenly can't scroll up and down if you use your mouse wheel to go up and down.
And the reason is because it's trying to scroll up and down within within this user interface, you
have to move your mouse off to one side, and then you can scroll up and down.
I've had people be stuck with that be like, why can't my why is my mouse working?
It's like a cursor thing.
You just have to have your mouse outside the Gradio UI just worth mentioning.
All right, so now, now is a big moment of truth for you and it's going to be crazy.
I hope this is going to be like a whoa moment for you.
Do you remember what seemed like an age ago, but was in fact just a few minutes ago?
At the beginning of this lab, we wrote a function called message GPT.
You remember that?
Let's go back up and look at it, because I feel like you're like, did we?
Yes we did.
Let me show it to you.
Blah blah blah all the way back up here.
Goodness, it seems like it was a long time ago.
Message GPT, you're a helpful assistant.
It takes a message and it.
And it returns the answer.
It calls GPT on the cloud.
Are you with me now?
Okay, so back we go.
Uh, so.
So that was the one that we we we made.
So let's just rewrite exactly the same thing as in the prior cell.
But we're going to change shout to GP to message GPT a different function.
But it's still a function that takes one input and gives one output just like Xiao did.
Just like xiao was a function with an input and an output message, GPT took an input, the prompt and
the output.
The response.
That was it.
Nothing else.
Okay, I'm going to change like the info.
I'm going to change the, uh, example.
I'm not going to change the examples.
Hello and howdy will do just fine.
Uh, I'm going to change the title.
Otherwise no change at all.
Okay.
Are you with me?
You see that?
Nothing's changed.
Just one callback function.
Different function.
Otherwise the same.
Here we go.
I'm going to run it.
And okay, we get an interface that is headed GPT.
Your message.
Enter a message for GPT mini.
We can type, but we can use the one we got right here.
Hello.
Press submit.
And hello.
How can I assist you today?
It just called GPT.
It called that function.
It got back an answer.
The answer went here.
That's it.
And so you know obviously the point I'm making is that hugging face a gradio has no idea that it just
made a call to GPT.
As far as it's concerned, it's just another callback function.
It happens to be a callback function we've given it that's called GPT.
It's not called shout.
It doesn't doesn't care.
It doesn't even know the name.
That's just a variable.
It just calls that function and it doesn't have anything.
It doesn't know anything about llms.
It's simply hooks up the input to the output through the submit button.
That's all it is.
That is what's happening here.
So easy.
We've just put an LLM on a user interface.
And now you know how to use like share equals true.
And you can use auth so that you can now have something that logs in.
And then people are able to connect to GPT just like this.
Wow.
046 - You see, I told you today was fun.
Okay, so next up, we're just going to make a tiny change, uh, to, uh, make, uh, make this reply
in markdown instead of in normal text.
And so I'm going to change the system message to you are a helpful assistant that responds in markdown
without codeblocks.
That's that little thing to make sure it doesn't put extra ticks around it, just worth knowing.
So I do sometimes get questions on this.
People are initially surprised because I write that system message, but I don't use system message
in the rest of this code.
And I tell you that it's going to change what happens.
And people are like, okay, but you're not using it.
Uh, do you know this?
Do you know what's happening here?
So the thing about about Jupyter notebooks, people sometimes get confused as this thing is called a
Jupyter notebook.
These these notebook interfaces, people get confused and think that you can think of it like it's a
long line of code that's running there.
And we're just editing further down the file.
But no, the way it works is that every time you run a cell, you are executing that cell.
And there's a there's Python running behind the scenes that it runs in.
And this system message thing, we defined it like right up here somewhere.
Uh, and the reason I belabor this, because it is a common confusion and source of bugs.
So it's worth worth understanding what's happening here.
This all the way back up here is where I define system message.
And basically I'm defining a global variable because this this is just a global variable system message.
And I'm using that global variable in there.
And later when I redefine this I'm changing the global variable.
And that new value is just going to be used whenever this function is called.
So it's a way that in notebooks you typically if you do something like this, you're working with globals.
And you can change them at any point.
And they will affect everything that comes before.
So it's worth understanding that because that can also create bugs.
Now the engineers or software engineers amongst you will know that the use of globals like this is frowned
upon in software engineering.
And it's something that if you are building with Python Modules.
You would want, for example, this to have an input of the system message and the prompt.
You wouldn't want to rely on globals.
And so I have some people saying to me you shouldn't use globals, blah blah, blah blah, but that
in fact is in itself a slight misunderstanding.
When you're operating in a notebook like this, you're doing so as a scientist, not as a software engineer.
Take off the software engineering hat, put on the data scientist hat, and as a data scientist, you're
encouraged to be experimenting, iterating, changing things, seeing what happens.
It's a different mode of working.
So in fact, in this mindset, I would argue it's totally above board and normal practice to have sort
of globals in your notebook and to be changing them, seeing the effect, changing them again, that's
the way it works.
As long as you're totally clear on what's going on, then it's a perfectly safe and frankly, a recommended
kind of practice.
Alright, rant over.
Let's keep going.
Okay, so we're redefining the system message to say respond and markdown.
We're also changing the second output the output the second field.
Instead of being a text box, it's now a great markdown, and beautifully.
That just means Gradio is going to figure out how to display markdown properly in there.
And we're also going to change the questions from hello and hi to slightly more profound questions.
So I've got two two examples for you here.
You can type anything you want in here.
But we're going to choose either explain the architecture the transformer architecture to a layperson.
Let's start with that and press submit.
And that is now going to call GPT 4.1.
And with what comes back we'll get it back in nice markdown.
You can see there's a few words in bold there.
And there's some stuff.
Sure.
Here's a simple explanation of the transformer architecture.
Imagine you want to read and understand a book, but the book is really long, and the meaning of a
sentence often depends on words that appeared much earlier.
Traditional methods read the book word by word.
The transformer is like a super smart ebook reader that can look over a whole sentence or paragraph.
Figure out which are important and then it goes on.
Attention.
That is the key idea how words relate to each other.
Understand meaning through layers, the layers of the neural network.
So it's a nice and and entry level kind of layperson description.
Let's change this to explain the architecture transformer architecture to an aspiring AI engineer and
press submit.
Again it's going to go off to GPT.
It's using the same callback.
But now the response the system prompt asks for in markdown.
And the response is now going to display it in markdown.
And here you have something that's just a little bit more technical.
It it refers to the paper.
Attention is all you need that I mentioned from 2017.
Uh, it talks about LSTMs.
Remember I said that was what came before what we all used to use.
And then it explains the components of the transformer that we will look at uh, along the way.
But but most in week three next week, uh, the input embeddings, positional encoding, uh, then the
encoder and decoder stacks.
But typically these days you only have a decoder stack and then the output layer and how these layers
come together.
And then a little simple explanation of self-attention and the benefits down here.
And so for the people that want to get a bit deeper on Transformers, now is your moment.
You've got a Gradio UI.
You can keep asking follow up questions, although there's no conversation here.
It's not going to know what you said before.
You can just add in more and more question in here.
Press submit every time to learn about the transformer whilst playing with a nice Gradio user interface.
Okay, but one thing we could potentially improve is that you may have noticed that it paused for a
while, and then it suddenly appeared.
And you're familiar now with this idea of streaming that we did back in week one, where we gather the
results as they come back from GPT, and we can just simply rewrite that, that, that function that
we had to call GPT, and we can make a new version of it called stream GPT, which is going to stream
back results.
Now, the way that it works is that you use something called a generator with gradio.
If you provide a callback function, which is a generator, a special type of function, Gradio automatically
says, I'm going to repeatedly iterate over this and display the results as they come.
And it's as simple as that.
You make a callback via a generator.
Gradio will figure out how to constantly refresh with the latest it expects you to iterate with the
bigger and bigger, not with the individual chunks, but with the whole amount that should be returned
back.
So if you're not confident with generators, if you're new to the yield keyword, then do look at the
guides.
I do explain it well there.
You could also just sort of get intuition and just just figure it out.
But it might be better to look through the guides and get tight on, on generators.
Uh, but uh, but here we have a stream, GPT.
We're also getting the system message and the prompt we call OpenAI create.
But you may remember there's this extra argument stream equals true.
And when we do that, what comes back isn't a response, it's a stream.
And we can then say for chunk in stream.
And this is do you remember this chunk .0. delta content.
And yeah, we just add that into results.
So that result is a kind of cumulative all of the text that's come so far.
And that's what we yield at each point.
So this is a generator that you can iterate over that will come up with all of the responses from GPT.
And now this is our actual Gradio code.
It's exactly the same as before.
I think I don't think there's any change at all.
Well of course there's this one tiny change.
We just switched the callback from calling back, uh, just just the version that doesn't have streaming
to the version that does have streaming.
But Gradio figures everything out for itself.
It figures out that that returns a generator or is a generator, and as a result, it iterates to display.
Let's see how it looks.
Okay, I've run it.
Here we go.
We've got our questions again.
Uh, we've got the layperson and the the, uh, aspiring AI engineer.
Let's go with the more complicated one, the aspiring AI engineer and press submit.
And what we should find and we do indeed, is that streaming back comes the result streaming faster
than I can scroll.
Uh, but then we've got as before.
We've got nicely formatted, nicely laid out explanation.
It's, uh, talks about transformers that they are parallelizable uh, with, and they can handle long
range dependencies and they're versatile.
The again, it gives you the different layers, the, uh encoder and decoder stacks and then the self-attention,
the attention mechanism that is at the heart of it.
Uh, and you can read a little bit more about that.
And I'm doing this.
Of course, I have a dual purpose here.
I want you to get a bit more insight each time into what a what a transformer architecture actually
is.
Uh, and look at all this.
Lots of lots of stuff about it.
Um, okay.
And so that was streaming back from GPT.
So easy.
And now I have something called Stream Claude.
Only for people that have anthropic key.
If you have something else, then use that.
You can make the stream a llama if you have a llama, of course, but you do have a llama.
Uh, and I'm just using the same chat completions, the same OpenAI library as always.
So it's anthropic completions.
We will use Claude Sonnet 45 if you want a cheaper one, use haiku that we use yesterday.
Stream equals true.
It's exactly the same.
And we have exactly the same code here.
But we're calling Stream Claude instead.
And we're giving the title Claude.
And here it is.
Answer a message for Claude 4.5.
And, uh, we'll should we go with the layperson one.
Let's see.
Uh, hopefully it's gone out and back it comes streaming and we get a different answer.
I think I prefer for the layperson one, I prefer the one from anthropic because it's not as sort of
simplistic.
It's got sort of like the attention mechanism.
The star of the show.
It's it's nice and well explained.
So.
So I quite like Claude's layperson version.
Uh, so that is showing you the how easy it is to switch in a different callback and use anthropic instead
of GPT for answering our questions.
047 - Okay, now I'm gonna get a little bit.
Fancy that again.
You don't need to follow all of this if you don't wish to, but I just want to show you.
Look at.
Look at this.
So I've made another callback, but this one is quite a sneaky one.
It takes a prompt, but it also takes a model, which it's expecting to be either the word GPT or the
word Claude.
And obviously software engineers and you will say we should use enumerations for this, blah blah,
blah.
I know just keeping it nice and simple example.
Uh, so, uh, if GPT is passed in, then we will call that we will we will get that stream GPT this
this here is actually just just collecting that generator and putting it in results.
If Claude is returning, we will get the generator called Stream Claude for that prompt and put it in
results.
Otherwise we'll throw an error.
And then this command yield from this is the same.
It's identical to saying for chunk in result yield chunk.
Exactly the same thing as a shortcut to that is just to say yield from results.
That's just a nice Python trick.
Does the same thing.
It iterates through results and yields each one of them.
Uh, so that is stream model.
It's something that can stream from either GPT or Claude.
Why do I show you this?
Because check out this next one.
Uh, this time I have my message input exactly as before.
Enter a message for the LM.
And then I have another field here called model selector.
And it has a it's a drop down.
You can imagine what that is.
It has two possible values GPT or Claude.
And of course it has to match the text here, which is a bit why you should really use enumerations.
Um, it's either GPT or Claude.
The label is selector model the default.
It will begin as GPT.
And then there's a response here.
And then, uh, for my, my, uh, actually creating my interface stream model is the callback that
I'm giving Gradio that it can call back when it wants to.
The title will be Llms.
There'll be two inputs this time the message input and the model selector one output.
When I give examples I'm going to give examples.
Again you have to give list of lists like this.
for each one with the with the two inputs that should be set.
All right.
There's a lot to take on there, but let me run it and let's see what we get.
Okay.
So now we have something which which this user interface has a message and it has this drop down.
You see I can choose different models.
Uh, and uh, down here I have some examples.
So I can, I can go with uh, either the GPT giving the layperson.
Let's see Claude with selecting Claude.
And we want the transformer architecture explanation to an aspiring AI engineer.
And I press submit.
And of course, it's now going to select Claude.
It's streaming back from Claude.
Uh, wow.
We've got some equations in here as well.
Let's, uh, we've got the, uh, the softmax, uh, part.
Um, so this is, uh, this is pretty cool.
We've just written something that, like routes to different models based on your selection right here.
Uh, and that's, that's quite a lot of functionality packed into this user interface.
So you can imagine all the different directions.
You can take this, and you should now come in and add different models in here.
I mean, we covered so many yesterday, but you could of course have different different llama variants.
You can have different models via llama.
You can have deep sea, you can have Gemma, you can have Fei or Kwan and have them all in here and
try them out and and take that opportunity.
Why not to ask some of our favorite questions about the transformer architecture as a way to also build
a little bit of foundational knowledge about Transformers?
Okay, uh, it's now time for us to to revisit the brochure and put that into our UI.
And I actually suggest here, perhaps before we do this together, you could always pause the video
and do it yourself because it is quite easy.
Um, but, uh, anyways, I will I will show you, uh, I'm just going to do a simple brochure, not
the one we did last week where it goes and gets the links and gets everything deeply.
Just one based on a quick fetch.
More like a web summarizer.
So, uh, I'm going to import that same thing.
Fetch website contents from from scraper dot pi that I've got a duplicate in this folder and the other
folder.
Uh, and then um, I'm again, I'm being super hacky here.
I'm just going to override this overwrite the same system message from before taking advantage of the
fact that this is a global variable in this notebook.
Not good software engineering practice, but excellent data science experimentation.
You're an assistant that analyzes the contents of a company website landing page and creates a short
brochure about the company.
Respond in markdown without code blocks.
We will have a stream brochure callback just like before, and we will build our prompt.
And then we will stream back from Claude or GPT.
And with that, as simple as that, we can now run.
We can now create a company brochure generator.
Uh, UI, here it is.
You see how quick this was company name?
I've put in some examples down here.
We can again do Huggingface Huggingface model.
Let's try GPT.
Let's submit.
We are now getting GPT to give us a example, uh, of um of a company brochure from Hugging Face.
And again, it hasn't followed the links.
This is just a simplistic version that's just taking the landing page, but it's still very robust.
And we can also I've got another example which is imagining that I am a company.
Look at my web page and we can ask this time we'll have Claude looking at my landing page.
Submit that.
And we should now get a nice an innovator at the intersection of AI and human potential.
It sounds great, I love it.
Uh, there we have it.
From anthropic.
We have just in a matter of minutes, maybe even a matter of seconds.
Created a user interface to build a brochure on top of, uh, the code that we wrote before.
And I hope that you I hope that you're wowed by this.
It is so easy to use.
And it's I find it so liberating as a data scientist, as someone that likes to work mostly in the back
end, that I can quickly turn out great demos, great MVPs like this, just with a few lines of code.
And of course, for some exercises you can do to this, you can beef this up to actually use the Lynx
approach that we did in week one where it goes off.
Gets the links, builds out a more robust brochure.
That would be cool.
You can use share equals true if you've got that ability in your environment to to go off and and and
use that and share it.
You can add in auth so easily.
So it has a user ID and password.
Uh and, and you can just take it in a different direction, give it different business functionality.
You've discovered how easy it is to build a UI for a commercial purpose.
I'd also suggest check out the Gradio resources.
It's got super docs that are really well explained and it's so quick to get up and running.
So so you should do that.
Build some things.
If you build something new with Gradio then put it in community contributions.
Send me a PR, you'll see how many there are in here.
Look, there's so much there's so many different things here.
People have built great stuff.
Add in yours.
Show me what you got.
Use a llama for some extra models.
Whatever.
Whatever interests you.
Take this as an opportunity to experiment and build again.
The best way to learn is by building.
So do that, make some UIs and also post about it on LinkedIn so I can weigh in and I will see you back
for the wrap up.
So I said it before this.
This journey is all about leveling up, leveling up, leveling up.
As you build different skills and you've just leveled up, you've just built the ability to quickly
hammer out UIs.
And hopefully the idea of the callback is coming together for you.
Or you might know all that stuff already, but anyway, at this point you can confidently use the OpenAI
API streaming markdown, JSON, you can use a bunch of frontier models and you now know how to build
UIs tomorrow.
You probably noticed the limitation of this UI is that it doesn't have any conversation history.
We just said a single message.
Tomorrow we turn this into a chat UI where we can have an ongoing conversation.
We'll be able to provide context.
We're going to also look at Multi-shot, prompting a super common approach, and you're going to build
your first customer support AI assistant.
If the summarization we did in week one is one of the the major use cases, this is perhaps even bigger.
This is the absolute primary use case.
We're going to do it together tomorrow.
See you then.
048 - Are you having fun?
I hope so.
I'm having fun.
It's week two.
Day three.
We're pushing on with Gradio.
Already you can confidently use the OpenAI API.
You can use different frontier APIs, and you can build UIs for the first time.
By the end of today, you're going to be able to create a chat UI, a much more sophisticated UI, have
conversation history in the prompt, the missing ingredient from yesterday, and build your first customer
support assistant.
Sound like fun?
Okay, so let's get into it.
So obviously AI assistant, one of the most common AI use cases.
You can build something which has like an on brand persona that reflects your corporate culture.
It can have this this illusion of memory.
It knows about the conversation so far, and it's able to maintain context.
And it can have expertise.
It can know about your domain and answer specific questions as if it's a knowledgeable assistant.
These are the key ingredients.
So we're going to be thoughtful about how we use prompts.
As we build our assistant, we're going to use system prompts to establish ground rules.
A very common one is if you don't know the answer, just say so to stop assistance from hallucinating.
Also giving background information.
Then during a conversation, you can add in context to the system prompt or to the user prompt, but
usually usually the system prompt as the way to give more information.
And Multi-shot prompting is when you insert into the system prompt.
Again, it could be the user problem, but usually the system prompt.
Concrete examples of if you get this question, this is how you should answer, and you use that to
bias the model so that as it's predicting what should come next, it's more and more likely to predict
something consistent with the examples that you gave in the system prompt.
That's how it works.
These are the prompts.
It's time for us to go right away to the lab.
No more talking to lab.
Let's go and give this a try.
Well, I'm looking forward to showing you what I've in store for you.
Here we go into week two and we're going to day three.
And up comes day three.
Conversational AI aka chatbots.
Well, some imports as usual, including the fabulous Gradio.
And then as always we load in our env.
You know this stuff we check we'll use OpenAI key.
Make sure it's okay.
But if you use a different key or if you're using a llama, you know how to change this now.
Or C guide nine if you have any confusion at all.
But it should be great.
And I will create a new OpenAI and we'll use GPT four on mini.
Why not?
Okay, it's nice and fast.
It's good in a chat context.
It's a chat model.
So I'm going to have a global variable called system message, which I'm going to start with.
You are a helpful assistant.
And again I'm going to be in scientist mode, which means it's my excuse for saying I'm going to be
changing this global variable as we go.
And it will apply immediately, which is not like you wouldn't do that when you're building out your
final Python modules, which will do a bit of later in this course and and more in my production course.
But but it's great for experimentation.
Which is the right mindset for you to be in right now.
Okay, so it's now going to be time for us to write our first new callback, which is our first time
of exploring conversations.
Okay, so we're now going to write a callback function.
Callback function, of course, is a function that we're going to give Gradio and say, hey, you can
call this whenever you want and it's going to have a particular structure.
It's a callback function that takes two variables and returns something new.
And we tend to call it chat by convention, but you can call it whatever you want, but we'll call it
chat.
And it takes two things.
The first thing that gets passed in is called message.
And the second thing is called history.
And what does that mean?
Well, Grady is going to draw a user interface in a minute, which is going to be basically a bit like
an instant message app.
It's going to have like a section with, with, with backwards and forwards conversation and then a
field you can type into.
And when you do that, it's going to call the callback.
And this field here where you've just typed is going to be passed in as message.
And this stuff here, all of the conversations so far will be passed in as history.
It's not that necessarily is going to keep a history.
It just takes the contents of the UI.
That's going to be how it will pass it in.
And so that is the callback that it wants us to write.
And so we will now write a callback chat which takes message in history.
And it's going to return the response.
And that response could be from based on us calling an LLM.
Or it could be not based on us calling an LLM.
Let's let's give something a try.
So the technical name for this, this type of callback function is what you might call AA1 way conversation.
Uh, let me show it to you.
I do def chat.
Comma history.
So we're going to call a sophisticated algorithm to decide how what what this callback should do when
it's called with a message and history.
And the algorithm will be return bananas.
That is that is our algorithm.
And now you can see why it has its sophisticated name of a one way conversation.
Uh, so whenever chat is called, the job of chat is to say how should the computer respond to the user
that's passed in this message?
And it's always going to respond bananas.
Okay.
So now we want to give this to Gradio.
And we're going to want Gradio to construct a user interface, which is like an instant message app
built around this callback.
So, you know, obviously Gradio is easy to use and all that, but we are going to need to now do some
work to, to to structure this UI.
You know, don't you, that I'm making this up?
There's nothing to do.
There's nothing to do.
It's it's one line.
It's it's you do g dot interface.
You the function you pass in is chat the callback.
That's how we tell Gradio.
This is the thing to pass in.
There's just this thing called type equals messages that you have to do, which is just telling it that
we're using a particular approach and then launch as always.
And when I do this, Up comes this little chat screen.
Check this out.
It's got like chat bots.
It's got an area here.
It's got like a type of message and a send button.
It's a whole like, instant message app.
And I can say, hi there and we'll see what our chat function replies to us.
Bananas!
Haha.
Um, and you can see it's got little tools here to repeat and all the rest of it, but I can say, uh,
I said hello to you and see what it says.
It says bananas.
No.
Hi.
Uh, yeah, you get the idea.
Uh, so it's kind of cool that that with any function that you give and with this chat interface thing,
Gradio will throw up a UI and you can just have a chat that calls that callback doing whatever it is
you want it to do.
Okay.
I just want to take it a tiny bit further, but still with some silliness.
Uh, I just want to to give you a little bit more context about what what is coming in with this message
and history thing.
So this time I used to say just bananas.
This time I'm going to have it reply with, uh, this text here.
You said message and the history is history, but I still say bananas.
Haha.
So that's going to be our new chat function.
So now I should be able to say chat interface.
Uh, function chat type is messages launch.
Let's see what we get.
So so here we go.
So so this is our user interface.
And I'm going to say hi there.
And it's going to print back not just bananas but also all of the things that got called with you said
hi there.
And the history is an empty list.
But I still say bananas.
Uh, and how are you?
Uh, how are you?
Oh, I just said how you are.
Never mind.
Uh, you said and how you are and the history is.
And now you'll see the history is this list of dictionaries.
It looks very similar to the OpenAI format.
It's got some extra things in here like metadata.
But you see there's role user content.
Hi there.
Either role assistant.
You said hi there, and I still say bananas.
And then at the end it says that.
So basically what I want to show you is that when Gradio calls this, uh, this, this callback, it
passes in the message that you just sent and history, it passes in the contents of this user interface,
the contents of the backwards and forwards.
And it does so in the format that's very similar to OpenAI's format.
And that's actually what this little flag here type equals messages is saying, hey, Gradio, when
you call me back, can you use the OpenAI messages format?
And so that's what it does.
And it makes it convenient for us because because most of the time people use this to actually call
OpenAI.
And we'll have the messages in exactly the right format to call OpenAI, which is great.
And so with that, it's time.
Finally, as I'm sure you knew I was getting here, we're going to rewrite the chat callback so that
it doesn't just return bananas, but it calls OpenAI passing in the information we've got.
049 - Okay, so here we are.
We're going to write a better chat instead of returning bananas.
It's actually going to call OpenAI or whichever model you like and return an answer from the LLM.
But it's the same as far as Gradio is concerned.
It's the same callback.
It's calling.
It doesn't know that we're calling an LLM.
Okay.
So first up, there's just a little line here that is not necessary.
If you're using OpenAI.
It doesn't make any difference.
But it means that if you're using Gemini or some of the other models then it will definitely work.
And it is.
Do you remember I mentioned that that history variable that I showed you, it looked very similar to
OpenAI's format, but it also had some extra fields in there.
It had metadata.
And that's OpenAI doesn't care if you add in extra fields, but some of the models do.
So I'm just doing this one line here, which just replaces history with a new version of history that
only has role and content in it and clears out metadata or anything else.
And this makes no difference for OpenAI.
But if you're using Gemini, it means it will work rather than give you an error that it doesn't like
metadata in there.
So that's just a small point.
Look out for that.
I have it all over the place just so that it'll always work on Gemini too.
All right.
And now we should know this.
Well, we first need to to package everything together into the messages messages that we're going to
want to send to OpenAI.
And it's very simple.
I press tab.
This curse has done it for me.
Uh, basically we just want this list of dictionaries.
We want to start with role system content and the system message, because Gradio is just passing in
the contents of the UI.
So Gradio doesn't know that we have a system message.
So we need to put that in to start with and then put in all of the history that Gradio sent in, and
then end with the current user's prompt as role user content.
This message, you see, we take all the history and then we shove in one more message, which is the
user's message at the end.
And so this is now got all of the messages in it.
Great.
And now we can say response is OpenAI create model is model messages.
Is messages perfect.
And then finally we return response dot choices zero dot message dot content the chat completions API.
There we have it.
Let's run.
This is our new callback.
It looks great.
New update available.
I'll get that later.
Thank you.
Cursor.
Um, and now we will do um, chat interface that that same chat interface again and we'll see whether
now we get the same user interface.
Just just as easy as before.
Gradio doesn't know that anything has changed, except we've got this, this new callback.
And when we type in messages, we're hoping to see something better than bananas as the answer.
Here we go.
Are you ready for this?
I run it, up comes the chat and I'm gonna say hi there.
Drumroll.
Hello.
How can I assist you today?
That of course, coming back from GPT.
Hi there.
My name is editor.
Hello, editor.
Nice to meet you.
How can I help you today?
What's my name?
Your name is Ed.
How can I assist you further?
Ed?
All right, so I imagine you get it.
You're with me.
But just a really press this point home.
We asked Gradio to make a chat interface for us.
We gave it this callback function.
And so as a result, every time that the user presses something in here, like what's my name?
Uh, that is considered the message.
Everything so far is considered the history.
Gradio takes those two bits of information and it automatically calls the callback chat, passing in
the message passing in the history.
And this is in OpenAI format or very close to it.
We scrub the format to make it just right, only needed for Gemini and a couple of others for grok as
well, I think.
And then messages, uh, we construct exactly the right messages, including shoving the system prompt
at the top, we call OpenAI.
We return the response from OpenAI.
So instead of bananas, what comes back and appears in the screen is actually the response from the
model.
I know you've got it already, but I like to talk.
All right, all right, let's move on.
Let's do more.
Okay.
So I'm I'm now going to update that chat callback to do streaming as well.
And so this time it's exactly the same as before.
But I've got OpenAI ActionScript and I'm passing in stream equals true.
And then I can just simply put here for chunk in stream.
Remember that we're just going to iterate over what comes back.
And then we're going to get the next chunk of what comes back, accumulate it in this variable response
and yield response each time so that gradio it will see that this isn't a function anymore.
It's a generator, a special kind of function.
It's a function that you can iterate over.
And as a result, Gradio will automatically not just wait until it's finished and show the results,
but iterate over it and surely, surely slowly show the response as it comes.
Surely.
Uh, all right.
Uh, then let's just bring this up and see what we get.
Here it is.
Uh, so now I can say hi there again.
Let's try.
Hi there.
And you can see that it came streaming.
And let's make it something, uh, explain the pros and cons of a genetic, uh, architecture, uh,
genetic AI, uh, for commercial purposes.
Let's do that and see what we get.
Is this something that we're having going off on a on a big old diatribe?
There you go.
And you can see it streaming away.
And it's even gradio nicely handles, uh, markdown coming back out of the box, uh, without needing
to use markdowns or anything this time.
Looks great.
Uh, isn't that easy?
Isn't it?
Wasn't it easy to build like an interactive chatbot?
050 - Okay.
Next up let's work on the prompts.
So we're going to improve the system message.
And let me read you what we've got.
And note again I'm using this trick of just using a global variable.
So it's automatically going to apply everywhere earlier.
So system message you're a helpful assistant in a clothes store.
You should try to gently encourage the customer to try items that are on sale.
Hats are 60% off and most other items are 60% or 50% off.
For example, if the customer says, I'm looking to buy a hat, you could reply with something like
wonderful!
We have lots of hats, including several that are part of our sales event.
Encourage the customer to buy hats if they're unsure what to get.
Okay, so there's a lot of things going on in that system prompt.
We're giving it information.
We're setting the context.
We're also giving it a tone.
And this approach is saying if the customer says then you should reply that's giving like an example
question answer.
And that would be what we would call one shot prompting, giving it one question and answer that it
should be able to replicate.
And we mentioned that before, I think.
So with that new system message, I can just relaunch the chat and I can say hi there.
And of course it has the context.
Welcome to the store.
How can I assist you today.
Are you looking for anything special by the way?
These models are super eager to to to give you their information.
We have an amazing sale going on with most items at 50% off.
Our hats are incredible, 60% off.
I'm not sure what to get.
Maybe a shirt.
Uh.
Uh.
Great choice.
We have fantastic selection of shirts.
Most of them are currently 50% off during our sale, but if you're open to it, I recommend checking
out our hats.
So it's doing what we asked for.
It's encouraging the hats.
Uh, and you can see that it's that it's very it's persistent and it's reflecting the information we
gave it and also the tone.
All right.
Let's keep going.
We're going to add to the system message some more information If the customer asks for shoes, you
should respond that shoes are not on sale today, but remind the customer to look for hats.
Okay.
Uh, so this this, uh, because it's giving more examples.
This is the beginning of what you might call multi-shot prompting, because we're starting to give it
different examples of how it should handle different situations.
So I could say, hi there and welcome to the store, a fantastic sales event including hats.
Uh, I'd like to buy some shoes.
Right.
Some shoes.
Uh, we don't have shoes on sale today, but I encourage you to look at our amazing collection of hats.
There we go.
All right, we get the message.
Thank you.
All right, let's do one little bit more.
So you can also dynamically change the system prompt depending on what's happening in the conversation.
Uh, you can probably imagine this.
This might be a bit of an aha moment, but look, this is super hacky and you wouldn't do something
like this in real life.
It's it's is to show the point.
And this is a doorway.
This is a path to many bigger things we'll be doing soon.
But look at this.
Look at what I'm going to do here.
I'm taking a new system message called Relevant system message.
If the word belt appears in the message that the user is making, then I'm going to change the system
message to add in this this extra bit of information.
The store does not sell belts.
If you are asked for belts, be sure to point out other items on sale.
Uh, so that only goes in if they ask for belt.
Now.
Obviously, as I said, this is a silly example because it's only a little bit of text.
You might as well always put it in, but I want to highlight the point, so I put that in there.
Otherwise this is exactly the same.
Oh look I see I'm missing that, that that cleanup thing which if you're on Gemini that would annoy
you.
So let's just go and add that in right here.
Uh, this little line here that that scrubs the history.
We should have that as well.
It's good for you to see me doing this.
Just put it right up at the top there like that.
Okay, so now let's run this.
And now we will do this again.
And we will say hi there.
Okay.
And it says welcome to our store.
How can I assist you a fantastic sale especially hats.
Are you looking for anything special.
So I'll say uh, how are your shoes?
Are shoes are great quality.
Very comfortable.
I should mention not on sale today, but if you're interested, we have a great selection of hats.
Stylish hats.
Perfect addition to your wardrobe.
Actually, I think I want a belt.
We actually don't carry belts in our store.
But I'd love to help you find something else you might like.
Fantastic sale going on and hats are incredible.
60% off.
All right, all right.
It got the message.
And so you can see, of course, the what happened here is that because I had the word belt in my my
message.
The system prompt had this inserted in there, this extra piece of information.
So, so really that's that's a wrap on the lab.
And I just want to, to just press home how important what we just did was this, this last little step
of adding in a bit of extra context, if we needed to, to to equip the model with more information.
This is your first glimpse into the world of rag.
Rag which?
Which people?
It sounds like it's something so sophisticated.
It's not anything much more than just saying, let's try and figure out a smart way to shove relevant
information into the prompt, into the system prompt, which is going to equip our model to give better
answers.
And all of the trickery and Rag is about figuring out how can you do something a little bit better than
something janky like this?
If belt is, if the text belt is somehow in the user's question, obviously that's going to be very
hacky and sometimes it will work.
But if the user doesn't use the word belt, but says something else.
Then it's just not going to work.
And it relied on me turning it to lowercase.
And so, you know, there's so much about this that's hokey, and rag is about doing something a bit
more bulletproof and smart to select relevant context.
And you might say, why not just always put this in the system prompt?
You could do.
But if this was a store which had a thousand different products, then your prompt would become bigger
and bigger and bigger.
With all of this information and the model's accuracy would start to degrade and you'd be spending extra
tokens and it wouldn't be worth it.
So this idea of selecting relevant context and adding it to the prompt a powerful technique.
It is an inference time technique.
It's got nothing to do with training the model.
We're using the same model.
We're finding clever ways to insert relevant information into the prompt to to educate the model, to
give it expertise so it can answer questions accurately.
Taking advantage of the fact, in this case, that the store doesn't sell any belts.
And it brings me to the final point, which is the business applications of this are never ending.
Conversational agents, conversational assistants, of course, super popular use case and the frontier
models are so good out of the box at giving good answers, and the way that you can add value for your
business is by adding expertise into the prompts.
Of course.
So, you know, that's how this becomes something better than salespeople.
Just go to ChatGPT because you're able to add things, add content into the prompting to make it applicable
to your business, and so that that is the to do for you.
Figure out how could you build something, use this for your business or for your your home work or
whatever, but it should be super easy to knock up a demo of having something which is answering questions,
maybe doing a sidekick for some work that you do have something which which takes information in and
is able to give expertise and be applied, applied specifically to your business area, to your business
problems, with expertise in the prompt and a lot of what we're going to be doing over the course of
the next eight weeks is about figuring out how can we, in an automatic way, improve these prompts
to to educate our model better and better about our business and our situation?
These are all the inference time techniques that allow you to get more from a model.
But you've got enough right now to be building something.
And so you should you should build something.
You should put it in community contributions.
You should share it.
You also know now that in Gradio you can just put share equals true and other people can use it.
You can use auth equals to add in some user ID and password should you wish.
Uh and you should not only should you, you must go and do this.
I insist and share it.
Post it on LinkedIn so I can weigh in and I'll have a play with it as well, which I always enjoy.
And I can't wait to see what you build.
And I'll see you for the wrap up.
And so that's it for week two, day three.
And I would describe week two, day three as short and sweet.
It was it was quite short and it was very sweet.
At least I thought so.
So you have reached the 20% point and hopefully you feel like a bit About 20%.
You feel like you've got.
You've got some material under your belt.
Talking about belts.
Uh, so, you know, you've got some skills, you know, the foundations of the sort of transformer
space.
Talk about tokens and contacts, windows and all that kind of stuff.
Uh, you you can code with the chat completions API with frontier models.
You know them well, and you can build now an AI chatbot assistant with an interactive UI.
You can even share it and give it security, uh, at least basically, uh, and you also know how to
deal with things like multi-shot prompting to give it examples and you know how to to mess around with
the system prompt, adding in information as relevant to try and give it expertise.
Wow.
It's a lot.
But next time, next time we get to tools and tools is such a big deal.
And of course, particularly for for Agentic AI, uh, it's going to be your first first look at using
tools.
Super exciting.
See you tomorrow.
051 - Okay, so the fabulousness that is week two continues with week two, day four, and it's another big
day of leveling up.
So already already you know the basics of Transformers.
The terminology.
You can confidently code with a chat completions API.
And now you can build an AI chatbot assistant, including an interactive API that can call GPT and Claude.
After today, you're going to be able to define tools.
Tools is a big deal.
It's used.
It's it's something which is at the the basic building block of a genetic AI.
It's also used to build functional commercial chatbot assistants, as you will see, because we're going
to be doing that today.
And for those of you who've already taken my Agentic AI course, you're already very familiar with tools.
And so today might might be simplistic for you, but I'll still try and juice it up in some way.
There'll be something, hopefully, that you're not expecting anyway.
But what we're going to do is talk all about tools.
So what exactly?
What is the situation?
What does it mean?
You probably heard it all the time.
What does it mean to give a model tools.
You are allowing a frontier model or any model, an LM, the ability to connect to an external function,
to be able to call a function a bit of code.
It allows you then to get to get deeper responses, because you can extend a model's knowledge, because
it can use a tool to to retrieve something, perhaps from a database.
It can carry out applications, perhaps it can book a ticket and it can enhance activities.
You can have tools which can do things like executing Python code, or it can run a test case, or it
can just do some calculation.
All of these things are tools that you can equip a model to do.
And we do many of them on my on my other course.
Uh, but but hang on a second.
If this is your first time really hearing about this, you might be like, just just hold on, hold
on.
So you're going to give an LLM the ability to, to run some code that I've written, which maybe is
going to retrieve something from a database or something like that.
So, so wait, that kind of sounds spooky.
And LLM is like a data science model.
It's a model that that produces tokens.
It outputs tokens, right.
That's what they do.
It's a neural network that uses weighted parameters, blah blah, blah, blah blah.
And it uses attention layers and everything else.
And what comes out of it at the end is the probability of the next token.
So how is this neural network going to suddenly decide, I'm not going to generate tokens anymore.
I'm going to do something completely different.
I'm going to go and call a tool.
Uh, and not only that, but this is presumably running on the cloud in OpenAI's hardware somewhere
in Silicon Valley.
And what it's just going to suddenly be like, I'm going to attach back a bit like maybe a bit like
a gradio.
The demos are able to sort of come back in, it's going to come back in and like call some of my code.
That sounds weird.
How how exactly is that going to happen?
How does a neural network start?
Start running functions and how is it going to run functions on my computer?
So look the answer is it doesn't.
The the actual way it works is super mundane and simple and obvious.
And there's no voodoo whatsoever.
And let me explain that.
Let me lay it out very clearly for you.
Look, in theory, tool calling is that people make it sound like it's like this.
An LLM is deciding to run code that I've written, like a booking function or a database call or something
like that.
So you've got some code that you've written and it's going to make a call to an LLM like this with like
a prompt and a response, and that LLM is going to decide as part of figuring out this prompt.
You know what?
I'm going to execute some code.
I'm going to run something that's a tool.
And that tool could be something that does a database, lookup a calculation, run some code itself.
Like like it could be a coder tool.
It could do all of those things.
And this is in theory what what happens.
But in practice that is not what happens in practice.
This is what happens in practice.
In practice.
The code makes a call to an LLM that says, I want to do this and this and this.
And with what comes back, the LLM informs the code in order to do that.
I think we should run a tool, this tool, and it's our code that then goes out, makes that Python
call, comes back with the answer, and then you call the LLM a second time with the answer and say,
hey, this is the conversation history.
I asked you a question.
You responded and said, please call a tool.
I called the tool.
Here's the answer to that.
Now please answer the question.
And based on that conversation history and nothing else, because every call is stateless.
Based on that history, the LLM then returns something, responds in a way that takes into account the
calling of the tool.
It's just more messaging in the conversation history.
And that messaging includes a request to call a tool.
That's all there is to it.
The LM is still just generating tokens.
It's a statistical program that generates likely tokens.
And those tokens might include, hey, I need you to run a tool for me.
And maybe you knew this already, but if you didn't know it, you're like, oh, now I see.
And the one more piece of the puzzle to say is that you might you might wonder, okay, so how does
the the LM know to respond with these tokens that says I'd like to call these tools.
And the answer is again very simple.
In that first prompt, the first message you sent to the LM, you said, hey, I want you to do the
following, please.
This is your task, by the way.
I have the ability to run some tools on your behalf.
If you want me to run any of these tools, simply reply and tell me to run a tool and then I will get
back to you.
That's all there is.
In that first prompt, you explain what tools can be run in a way that the LM has been already trained,
so it's ready to expect that format of tool calling.
You do it by describing it in JSON.
It's been trained with lots of this JSON.
It knows then to call a tool, and I can make this super real for you if you've not, not if you're
still not completely convinced.
I just opened ChatGPT and I gave it a prompt.
Out of nowhere.
I typed in this prompt and you can do the same.
And I believe for people that haven't quite clicked yet, this prompt hopefully will be the thing that
pushes you over the edge and be like in a good way, pushes you over the edge.
Sounds bad, pushes you over a good edge into something great, which is a full understanding of tools.
Here it is.
Uh, you are a support agent for an airline.
Okay, that's my prompt to GPT.
You answer a user's question.
You also have an ability to query for ticket prices.
Just respond.
Use tool to fetch ticket price for London, to retrieve the ticket price for London, or for a city
that you name.
Here's the question.
User I'd like to go to Paris.
How much is a flight and look at how ChatGPT responds to that.
It doesn't respond by answering the user.
It responds verbatim with use tool to fetch ticket price for Paris.
So I said to it, you can use a tool.
Here's how you do it.
Now here's the question from the user.
And as a result it said, fine, I want to use my tool.
That's it.
That's how tool works.
You prompt the LLM with instructions including that it can call a tool.
You give it the question.
If it wants to use a tool, it says please can I use the tool.
You write the code.
You need an if statement in your code.
If it wants tools, then I'll call a tool.
And then you call it a second time with a history of the conversation, including the tool call and
the answer.
I know you get it.
You're like, okay, fine, you believe me?
You've got it.
All right.
It's time for us to talk about about why you use tools.
052 - So what are some of the typical ways people use tools?
Well, obviously they're very useful for looking things up in a database.
I mentioned that already.
They're useful for actually taking actions you could get in a conversation with NLM.
An assistant could book a meeting, book airline tickets.
You could have your LLM be able to to carry out a calculation.
Something that llms are famously bad at is doing any kind of maths.
Well, you can give it a tool that can do the maths for it, as we suspect ChatGPT is given tools like
that, which is why it's now able to do calculations easily.
Similarly, you could give it a tool that can execute Python code, perhaps in a secure way, like in
a in a Docker container or something.
That means that it's ring fenced, sandboxed, so that that kind of when you do that, it's sometimes
called as having a coder agent.
It's it's an LLM that has the ability to execute code in order to carry out its task.
A coder agent doesn't always doesn't necessarily mean an agent that writes code.
It can really mean an agent, an LLM call that's able to execute code in carrying out its task.
And then finally for for this list would be an example of where you can have an LLM that can directly
modify the UI, it can produce a new chart that gets visualized instantly to the user, so it can do
things that can immediately interact with the user.
And of course, there are so many different ways you can use tools.
You can probably think of 100 others that I haven't put here because there are many, many, many.
But importantly, there's a whole category in particular that I haven't mentioned yet.
Uh, which is where the greatest excitement is.
And of course, it's all about a gigantic AI.
There are, uh, two ideas, two ways you can use tools that form some of the the core ideas behind
Agentic AI.
And first of all, put simply, you could use a tool which itself involves another call to an LLM.
So you could say to an LLM, hey, you have three different tools.
They do A, B and C, and actually A, B and C are all calls to different llms to take care of that
task.
And as a result, you're equipping an LLM with the ability to orchestrate the activities of other LLM
calls.
And that, of course, is one of the core ideas behind Agentic AI.
It allows you to have agentic workflows where an LLM controls the The workflow and where it orchestrates
activities.
So that's one core idea.
And then the other core idea is just this idea that you can have a tool which is like a to do list kind
of tool, which allows an Lem to plan out a series of activities and then like, check them off and
then continually refine them and, and have some evaluation criteria that it needs to get to before
it's sure that it's done.
The list and all of that kind of functionality allows you to build an Lem system, which operates in
a loop, able to take on activities and see them through to completion.
And that whole idea of an agentic loop, of course, that is a core idea behind Agentic AI, and it's
enabled by the use of tools.
And you saw it in a very tangible way with Claude code.
So these, these ideas and many others, uh, all form some of the basis of Agentic AI.
And so you can see how essential tools are to, to agents.
And that is some of the common use cases of tools.
But there are many more.
Uh, and I think that it's about time that we stopped all this talking stuff, of course.
And we go to Cursa and we start working with tools.
053 - Well, here we are in Casa going into week two.
We're going to day four.
Uh, we choose go by so quickly.
And I love week two.
Uh, okay.
Uh, and here we are in week two, day four, project airline AI assistant.
We're now going to bring together the stuff that we have learned.
And so, uh, I'm going to do some imports, including the beautiful import gradio as G.
And now I've got my usual initialization.
I'm as always load env override is true.
And then get the OpenAI key.
You can use a different key or I've even this time put in the little code here.
If you want you can use an open source model directly.
Llama 3.2 just about handles this lab.
I got to tell you, it gets quite confused with tool calling.
You might want to try a bigger model if you can.
If you can fit it on your computer like Phi three I think is does does a decent job here.
Uh, so Phi four or Gemma three.
Uh, all pretty good, but you should experiment and see.
I think I think llama 3.2 can be made to work.
All right.
System message.
Remember this is where we set the context.
You are a helpful assistant for an airline called Mighty Light II.
Whatever that is.
Flighty.
Something like that.
Give short, courteous answers.
No more than one sentence.
Always be accurate.
If you don't know the answer, say so.
Remember I said that was a classic?
A good way to try and ensure that you don't get hallucinations.
Okay.
And now a chat function.
And I'm not going to type this one because you know it so well.
It's a callback.
It's a callback.
The first line is the sort of scrubber that makes sure that our history is nice and clean.
It's not necessary for OpenAI, but it is for Gemini, grok, and a few others.
And then we construct the messages, uh, list of dicts with the system prompt, using the system message
with a history with the user prompt we call OpenAI chat or completions dot create.
We pass in our model what model we're using GPT four one mini a very nice choice.
Our messages and we return response choices zero message content.
And let's have a look at it okay here it is.
And I'm going to say hi there.
Hello.
How can I assist you with your float today I'd like to go on a trip.
Great.
Where would you like to travel to?
To London, please.
Sure.
Please provide your departure city and preferred travel days.
Fine.
We have a chat bot.
It's a bang.
It's system prompt.
You should experiment with this.
You can use the system prompt to set the tone.
You can have it be a snarky chat bot should you wish.
And you can chuckle.
As we go through today, I'm going to keep it on the on the normal serious side.
Uh, and you can see that it's giving short and courteous answers.
It's doing just what we said.
So that is a good example of using the system prompt, giving it some information, some context.
Okay.
But it's time for us to talk tools.
Okay, time to talk tools.
But let's start by writing a simple function.
It's a function that's going to become our tool.
But for now, it's just going to be some Python code.
It's going to be called get ticket price.
That will tell us the ticket price for traveling to a certain location.
So it's going to be called get ticket price.
And it will take a destination city.
And we'll start by printing.
Oops.
Print uh, tool called for uh, city.
Uh, we need to make this an f string.
Like so destination.
Underscore city.
Okay, that seems good.
And now what we're going to do is we're going to say price equals ticket prices dot get destination
city or unknown city.
And then we will say, uh, well, there we go.
That seems pretty good to me.
Thank you.
The price of a ticket to Destination City is price.
That seems pretty good.
Uh, so, uh, let's let's run that.
Okay.
Let's see what happens.
Oh, you know what?
We're going to want to be able to call this with, uh, with a city and lowercase.
So let's just say there like that, uh, because I've got the cities here are in lowercase like Berlin,
and I'm going to be able to call it in capitals.
So now this should hopefully.
Yep.
Tool called for city Berlin.
The price of a ticket to Berlin is 4.99.
Um, okay.
So far so good.
Unknown city.
That's not very clear, is it?
Unknown ticket price.
There we go.
Seems good.
So there's Berlin, and that's if we say, uh, anything in here, then?
Unknown ticket price.
Fine.
If we do London, there we go.
That seems to be working fine.
That's a function no AI.
So far, this is just a basic function.
It's looking it up in a dictionary.
Feel free to mess with this dictionary.
Give yourself some different prices.
We're going to have this all coming together.
So I mentioned that when we call an LM and say, hey, you're able to use tools, we have to tell it
what tools it can use.
And the way we tell it is with JSON, because models love to receive JSON.
They're trained on lots of it.
And there's just a fixed format, a type of JSON that you have to use to provide it, to tell it that
it can use these tools and that JSON, it's been trained on a lot of it.
So it expects the JSON in this format.
And it's a kind of janky format.
It's quite verbose.
It's got lots of stuff to it, and it's a bit of a bore to write it every time.
But you have to ish.
There is a footnote.
You don't you don't really have to.
But but for now, for this, for this, for today, we do have to write the JSON.
And so I've written it for you because I'm not going to type this.
It's a real pain.
So this is the JSON to describe this function.
We're not it's not calling that function.
It's just a way of describing it.
We give it a name, get ticket price a description, get the price of a return ticket to the destination
city.
It's got properties, which is the parameters, the arguments, destination city which is type string.
And the description is it's the city that the customer wants to travel to.
It's required.
So this, this bit of clumsy JSON is a way to describe this function to an LLM.
So it knows, hey, I've got this function.
It's one that I can call on your behalf if you wish me to.
That's what this is doing.
Okay.
So I've got I've taken in that JSON.
We're now going to put it in some more.
It's not it's a Python dictionary now but we will turn it into true JSON.
Um, we uh we then make, make something called tools, which is a list of these things.
And again we're going to wrap it in a little bit more, more JSON type of function and this is the function.
So if I show you what that means if I print this this thing tools, this is the bottom line.
This is this is what we're going to be sending into an LM into into GPT.
But it could be into any of them.
It's a chunk of JSON it contains.
This type is function function.
And this is the stuff that we just wrote.
The name is get ticket price.
It takes one string property, which is the city that the customer wants to travel to, and it gets
the price of a return ticket.
Okay, it's just a bunch of JSON that describes functionality we can run on behalf of the model.
Okay, and now there's some sort of fiddly bits that we have to do to call OpenAI.
There's really two parts to the puzzle.
First, when we call the LM, we're going to need to pass in these tools, this JSON that we just wrote.
It's going to need to know about that.
That's the first bit of jankiness.
The second bit of jankiness is that when the LM responds to us, we're going to have to detect if it's
looking to run a tool.
If the answer isn't some answer for the customer, the answer is, hey, I need you to run that tool
that you said you had.
And if so, we need to run the tool, get the answer, and then send it back as a new message with the
whole conversation history as a second call to the LM.
Okay, let's look at those two bits of Jankiness.
This is the first bit of well, actually this is really both bits of Jankiness.
We this is the new chat callback, the new thing I'm going to give you in just a second.
We scrub the history as before messages set up just as before.
And here is the OpenAI create model is model messages is messages.
But oh look there's something new.
Tools equals tools.
And this of course is that JSON stuff.
So we're passing the JSON in when we call OpenAI.
And then we're not going to return response content like usual.
First we're going to check this thing called finish reason.
We're checking response zero reason.
And if it's tool calls we're going to do something different.
If so we are going to get the message.
We're going to call something called handle tool call, which is something we still have to write that
doesn't do it for you.
We're going to have to write that in one second.
Uh, and then we're going to to get back the response.
We're going to put in our messages in our, in our conversation history.
The message that came back from from OpenAI are response.
And then look at this.
We're going to call OpenAI a second time, passing in the longer set of messages that now has the message
asking for a tool to be called, and the reply with that tool information in there.
And finally, with whatever comes back there, we will then return response .0. message content.
So there's quite a lot there.
That's what we have to do.
But you're not going to let me forget that I didn't tell you one thing.
I didn't explain what this handle tool call thing does.
Well, I just wrote it right here.
Here it is.
This is the big old if statement.
We we take the message that came from from GPT.
We, we look for this object called tool call that comes back.
We look at the function's name and we see if it's looking to run a function called get ticket price.
If that's what came back from from GPT.
And if so we we also dig into the JSON that came back from GPT.
We take the the argument which is the city, uh, we, we get that get destination city and then look
at this line here.
Look at this line.
You know what that is.
That's just simply calling this this this code we wrote all the way back here.
That's all it's doing.
So.
So what we've got here is a big old if statement.
If GPT says get I want to call get ticket price then look I call get ticket price and then I stitch
up a response.
In my response I have to say, uh, you remember that we have in our response objects.
We have user, we have system, user and assistant as the possible role values.
There's another one.
There is role tool.
And that's what I've got here.
Role tool.
And the content is whatever came back from the call.
So whatever came back from our function we shoved that as another message in the set of messages with
role of tool.
This may be you may be like what?
Uh, in which case we'll dig a little bit more in, in a second.
But you probably have the basic idea.
So if we execute that cell and execute that cell, then it's going to be time for us to bring up a chat
interface and see if this actually works.
054 - Here we go.
We're going to to run our favorites.
Bit of a one liner from Gradio app.
It comes and we're going to say hi there.
Hello.
How can I assist you with your flight today?
I'd like to go on a trip.
Great.
Where would you like to travel to?
And I'm just going to scroll down because I want you to keep your eyes just there.
Just just down there.
Uh, I'd like to go to London, please.
Okay.
And look at what just happened down here.
You'll see it.
Printed tool called for city, London.
That was the print statement that I wrote in our function.
And here it says a ticket to London costs $799.
So it just worked.
It just went ahead and made a tool call.
We called it back a second time and we got back that response.
Wow.
And because I fear that you might have gotten a tiny bit confused by by what happened as a result of
this handle tool call, I just want to come back here and I just want to show you, before we call OpenAI
a second time, I'm going to print the contents of this messages thing.
So I'm going to say like for message in messages print message.
And that way we're just going to have a series of prints out here about what exactly is in this set
of messages that we pass in the second time.
This is after we've run our tool and we've got our results.
What is it we send to GPT a second time?
Let's have a look.
We run this, run this, and we're going to we're going to relaunch this interface.
Here we go.
Hi there.
Uh, I'd like to go on a trip.
Where would you like to travel to?
To London, please.
All right.
Let's see what happens.
Okay.
Tool called for city London.
And now it's printing out what's being sent to GPT.
The second time you see that, there's the roles system content.
You're a helpful assistant for an airline called flight, blah blah blah.
User says hi there.
Assistant says hello, how can I assist with your flight today?
The user says, I'd like to go on a trip.
The assistant says, great, would you like to travel to?
I said to London, please.
Now look what's next.
What's next is the message that came back with role of assistant, and that it wanted to call a tool.
And all the details of the tool call are in here.
It says like, uh, destination city London name is get ticket price.
That was where I had the if statement.
If it calls that and the next item in here is role of tool.
You see the way we've had role system role user role assistant, user assistant user tool content.
The price of a ticket to London is 799.
And actually, one extra detail here is you'll see that the tool call ID that's put right there matches
the tool call ID that's just there.
And you will find that in the code.
You'll see that I carefully put the tool call ID in there.
And you have to.
So this I hope I haven't lost you.
It's not super important if you're not following all of this, but it's just, uh, it's just helpful
to see this in practice that we make these two different calls to get.
The first one is where it says, hey, I want you to call a tool.
And the second one is where we pass back all the information, including the results of running the
tool.
And that is what results in it responding with that.
There you go.
Fantastic.
All right.
I'm now going to pull out that that print statement.
And you can you can put that in if you wish to see it.
And you should experiment with this and get a good sense of it.
Let's run that again.
I want to do something just quickly to show you that there is a slight problem with this.
That's quite a subtle problem you may have already noticed this subtle problem, I don't know, but
let me let me say hi there.
How can I assist your flight today?
Uh, so I'm going to say, um, what are the ticket prices to London and Paris?
And what's going to happen now is IAM error.
Computer says no.
Uh, yeah.
Lovely.
And when when Gradio has errors, it's a slight gradient.
Is not easy to debug, I will say, because there's a lot happening under the hood.
And it's always, always a challenge with some of these, these frameworks that do a lot for you.
People call them batteries included frameworks.
Uh, because because some of the debugging can be difficult.
But I happen to know what the problem is.
And the problem is that that the way that I wrote this code is a little bit clunky.
I only I'm always looking precisely at tool number zero.
I don't support a case where an LM wants to run multiple tools, and it turns out that that's very easy.
You just have to be careful with the fact that you could have multiple tool calls.
Sorry.
Not there.
That's response choice is zero.
That's fine.
It's here.
That is that is my little mistake.
I just take tool call by taking the first tool call.
All right.
So it turns out this is very easy to fix.
Uh, and nice improvement for us.
Look at this.
Uh, what we can do here is, um, have a new, new function instead of handle tool call.
We will have handle tool calls.
And this is how handle tool calls works.
It doesn't just take the first tool, but rather it iterates for tool call in message tool calls.
So if the LM asks to run multiple tools, we'll simply iterate through each one.
That's nice right?
And then we have our janky if statement again right there.
And uh, very nice.
There it is.
And we can now hopefully we'll say hi there.
Okay.
How about this is, uh, which is cheaper?
A flight to London or to Paris?
Spell it right.
Paris.
Let's see.
Let's see what happens.
Let's look down here.
Uh, look at that, uh, tool called for city.
London.
Tool call for city Paris.
And there it gives the answer.
So this is just that simple.
Code has allowed it to loop and call each of the tools that the LM asked for.
And then the LM, of course, is smart enough when it gets back those results to interpret it and give
a meaningful answer that the flight to London is cheaper as a result of running both tools.
Isn't that cool?
And now there's one more technicality.
You could.
I'm not entirely sure how you could make, uh, make it fail this way.
I imagine there's a way.
Uh, let me try.
Let me try.
Let's bring up a fresh user interface.
Um, first, Please, uh, find the price for flights to London.
And if it's under $1,000, please check the price to Paris.
And only.
And only if it's so.
I want to force it to first make one tool call and then make the other.
Uh, and, uh, something goes wrong here.
Uh, and it stops.
Uh, and the reason is because if you look at my code, I only support one sequential, uh, set of
tool calls.
I now support multiple tool call requests in that first response, but once it comes back, it then
makes another call without the tools.
And that's it.
It's just a single if statement.
So it doesn't support any kind of looping.
It doesn't support the LM making more than one, uh, set of tool calls sequentially, if you see what
I mean in any response, it can say, I want to call multiple tools, but it can't respond.
And then I call it again and then it says, all right, now I'd like to do another tool that's not supported
and allowing it to support.
That might sound like it's going to be a lot of work.
It's sort of like like an infinite loop kind of thing.
It turns out you can do that just by changing that, if to a while.
Just that one change, that one word, uh, because we don't want it just to have a single if we want
it to say while it's wanting to call tools continually do this while it's wanting tools and then provide
the tools in here because I wasn't providing the tools the second time.
Uh, and, and it, it would just magically work if we do it this way.
Uh, you might say, is there any risk here that it keeps going forever?
Uh Llms don't tend to do that.
Like they tend to, to stop.
So I don't think it's a material risk.
But obviously if that is a concern for you, then then you should put something in here that has some
iteration and stops after a certain number.
Uh, it's probably not prudent to have it be something that could, in theory, keep going forever.
So all I have to do is run that.
And now I can just rerun this this here because, uh, yeah, we'll just use that new chat function,
uh, just and see, see how that goes.
Hi.
Please check ticket price to London.
And if it's under $1,000, then please check Paris.
Um.
Only if.
Only if.
See if this works.
Uh, it certainly does.
It got it right.
And you can see that it called London and then Paris.
Uh, very nice indeed.
So now we've improved the tool calling so that it can call multiple tools at a time.
And it can repeatedly call tools one after another after another, until finally the finish reason is
no longer tool calls and then it will be done.
055 - Okay, so it's also nice to make this feel a little bit more real world commercial.
And one way to do that is to instead of just having this looking in some Python dictionary to actually
have it do a database query against a SQL database.
And the easiest way to do this without needing you to do lots of configuration and set things up is
to use SQL Lite, which is so quick and easy and just part of the UV project, and you can just use
it.
So we can just import Sqlite3 and we can write some database queries.
If you'd rather build something a bit more industrial strength, you should feel free to replace these
SQL queries with something like a Postgres lookup or something like that.
Or indeed you could also use a API like Supabase, or you can set up a SQL in in a in a managed service
and then be making an API call instead.
But I think that this is a good compromise using SQL Lite with a local database.
And that's what we'll do right here.
And I've got this database here.
Prices DB that I'm going to delete it.
So we start from nothing.
Uh, and it's gets ignored.
So you won't have it there yet.
Um, so we're going to say we want a database called prices DB and the first thing we're going to do
is run this little, little SQLite statement here that create the table.
If it doesn't exist, it's going to have a city and a price on it and commit that and bam prices DB
just appeared.
SQLite is so easy to use.
And now I'm going to have a new get ticket price.
Uh, something that will replace the prior janky get ticket price.
This time it takes a city and it will say database tool called Getting Price for city.
And uh, here we go.
We then say with with a connection to SQLite.
With our database, we are going to select price from prices where city equals.
And then we pass in the city lower.
And obviously I'm using the proper approach there.
That doesn't make me liable to SQL injection attacks which is always, always a good way of doing it.
And then we will return ticket price to city is and the result or no price available for this city.
So a nice little simple SQL query.
You don't I don't don't need you to know SQL if you don't need it.
All you need to know is look at this.
If I do get ticket price for London, well right now I'm going to get nothing because my database is
empty.
It's going to say database tool called Getting Price for London.
No price data available for this city okay.
And now I've just got a little utility method set ticket price a utility function.
Give it a city, give it a price and it will insert into prices.
Uh, and update if if it's already there.
And there you go.
It puts in the city in lowercase and the price okay.
And so now we can just take the dictionary I had before.
You should add in your own city or anything else you want just just to prove it.
Uh, and then we will call set ticket price for each of them.
Bam!
I've run that.
We've now written some prices to our database.
Let's see.
Let's call get ticket price London.
And there we go.
The price is 7.99 which is in our database in our SQL database.
Let's do it for Tokyo.
And there we go.
We get 1400.
There it is 1400.
Let's just check this works.
Let's make Tokyo 1420.
Put that in the database.
Get ticket price for Tokyo.
It's now 1420.
Okay.
We have a database.
Okay.
The moment's arrived.
It's now time for us to run this chat interface.
Uh, now, you might be thinking.
Hang on.
Don't we still need to to, like, do the, like, the chat callback and execute all of that?
Now that we've rewritten our tool?
And again, Python is an interpreted language.
We've we've recreated we've changed get ticket price to a new implementation.
So it's when when it gets to the point of calling get ticket price, it's going to call the new implementation.
Uh you'll see.
So let's run this Uh, so let's say, uh.
Hi there.
Hello.
How can I assist with your flight?
Today, I'd like to go on a trip.
Great.
Could you please tell me the destination?
Yes.
I'd like to go to London.
I'd like to go to London.
And there we go.
Database tool called Getting Price for London.
The return ticket to London is 7.99.
Would you like to proceed?
How about that?
We have written tool calling.
Now it can call multiple tools.
It can do them multiple times in a row.
And when it does so it is doing a SQL query against a SQL database a relational database with ticket
prices in it.
This is foundational expertise for building commercial LM solutions.
All right.
So the exercises for you, it begins first of all by digging in and make absolutely sure you understand
this.
Like do put print statements in, put print statements in to see what's going in in the messages.
Test this.
Make really sure you've got a good handle on what's going on, and get to that point when you completely
appreciate that there's no voodoo.
Here it is Llms are just generating tokens.
These are just tricks, clever techniques to figure out how can we do more with the tokens that it generates
in order to allow us to, to, to give commercial functionality to something which is just a next token
predictor.
Okay.
And once you've really got a handle on it, how about this add another tool to set the ticket price.
I've already given you the function.
You simply have to wrap that in some JSON.
You have to add in a little extra if statement where we have an if statement, and then it will just
work, and you can then do it so that you could, you could say, okay, I've discovered the ticket
price is and you could have it.
So it writes the ticket price.
And then you'll find that any future time you'll be able to come back to the chat, you'll be able to
read in the ticket price and you will see it working nicely, and I hope you will really enjoy that.
Now, I do want to mention there's something a little bit hokey about this implementation, which you
may find out.
If you found this out, then congratulations that it takes a bit of digging to see this.
Uh, there's something I'm doing which is which isn't optimal, uh, for the way that the tools are
being recorded.
And here it is.
I'm using Gradio to keep track of the conversation history and the way that Gradio does that is it's
just mapping this user interface right here.
And that's the user interface, which is used, uh, to, to populate that history that gets passed
in, uh, if we go back here, um, when, when it calls, um, the chat callback, this history is
coming straight from the UI, and that works really well as a, as a simple trick to be able to keep
track of the conversation history.
But there is one little hitch.
Do you see the hitch?
The little hitches?
It means that this stuff here.
The tool call and the tool call response gets apparently forgotten.
Like when when radio calls back with a history.
This isn't going to be there.
Uh, which turns out that it's usually fine because the model is clever enough.
It gets this information and it sees that it called a tool.
I mean, it figures out that it got that return price from the fact that it sees that it's stated it.
So it just sort of works out fine.
Most of the time.
But that is obviously something that would not be acceptable for a commercial solution.
And the proper way of doing it would be to not rely on radio for the conversation history, but rather
to actually use a database to be saving the conversation history, and to be using that as a way to
to properly keep track of everything that was said, including the tool calling.
So that's it's a technical detail, but if you spotted it, then well done.
That is something that works fine for this MVP, but would need to be improved for a more robust solution.
But I have to say I do.
I take advantage of the UI part for for things that I've written, certainly for internal apps, and
it's completely fine.
So that's the point I wanted to make.
Another point I wanted to make is that you may have noticed that I didn't stream back results.
I just printed them.
I used a simpler thing and there was a reason for that.
It turns out that streaming back when you're also trying to support tool calling is perfectly possible,
but it's really janky.
You have to do all sorts of nonsense to see whether the finished reason is tool calls, and to be like
piecing together the JSON to call the tool.
You can you can Google it and you'll see that I think on OpenAI's forum there's some examples of how
to do it, but it's it's messy, there's lots of code.
And I didn't want to overwhelm you with really hacky stuff.
And that's why I didn't stream back results.
And besides, it's fine for these short, short messages.
In practice, most of the time when you actually work with tools.
You don't write all of this code and have this JSON.
You normally use a framework that does it for you.
Like on my agents course, we often use OpenAI agents SDK, and it deals with all of the stuff about
creating the JSON and selecting the tool.
And so it makes things a lot easier.
And it also handles the streaming back.
So you often don't actually get to handcraft the JSON and the tool cooling as we did today.
It's a good practice to do.
It means you really understand this stuff and you can do it this this traditional way, the long way.
But there's often shortcuts to let someone else take care of it for you, like OpenAI agents SDK.
And when you do that, then it will handle streaming as well.
But I just wanted to explain that in case you're wondering why why this doesn't have streaming.
And one final footnote, last of the footnotes, it is that, uh, the, the if statement that I told
you about the, the if uh, let's find it now The, the if the tool is, um, is the tool that has that
matches our function, then call our function this one right here.
If tool call function name is get ticket price then call get ticket price right here.
That is that is very clunky.
Uh, as you can see.
And when you write the set ticket price, you're going to have, if it's get ticket price, then call
get ticket price.
If it's set ticket price then call set ticket price.
Now Python is Python, and Python is a beautiful language.
And that means that there are always elegant ways of doing things like this.
And if you want, you can try and find the elegant way to do it.
When you simply take the string that the model asked for, you see, if you have a function with that
name and you automatically ask Python to to find that function and run it.
And then you don't need an if statement, you can just basically hook up your model directly to you
calling the right function.
So should you wish for a little juicy challenge.
Then that's the one for you.
When you add the set ticket price.
Don't do it with with an if statement.
Do it with some Python magic that will automatically call the function and handle a case where the function
doesn't exist.
To to be safe.
So I hope hope you enjoy that little extra challenge.
Should you be a Python type and want to do it in a nice and pythonic way?
Uh, then then that that is your extra challenge.
And then the final thing I want to mention, of course, it hardly needs to be said, but giving actions
to your LLM, of course, is so pivotal to being able to add commercial functionality to any LLM call
you imagine you can now your this AI assistant can do more than just tell you ticket prices.
It could actually book a ticket for you.
It could do all these different things.
So the thing for you to think about now is think of all the ways that you could use tools in business
applications.
Think of the AI assistants you could build, and the kinds of tools they could call in order to, to,
to actually make commercial impact be valuable.
So do put yourself through the exercise of thinking that one through.
All right.
I will see you for the wrap up.
Well, if today was super satisfying and really building some core expertise, we will finish it off
tomorrow for week two.
Uh, perhaps my top equal favorite week.
Uh, we will, of course, uh, get to the point where you already can give an overview of transformers
and terminology and tokens and context windows and blah, blah, blah.
You can confidently code with the chat completions API.
You can build an AI assistant.
And now now in the mix, you can add tools for true commercial functionality.
Tomorrow we complete week two.
We'll talk a bit more about agents, and we will complete a multi-modal AI assistant with a little bit
of agents and tools thrown into the mix.
I can't wait.
I'll see you then to wrap up the week.
056 - Have you enjoyed week two?
Have you?
Because I've saved the best to last the fifth day of week two.
A big old conclusion.
I'm gonna.
I'm gonna really tie this one up with a bow already.
Of course, you've had your overview of Transformers key terminology.
You can confidently code with the Chat Completions API, and you built an AI assistant with tools for
expertise.
Today is big.
Okay.
I'm going to start with a little bit about agents Agentic AI what it is.
And then we'll talk about agents carrying out workflows.
And we will complete our AI assistant.
And it's going to be gorgeous.
Let's get to it.
So first off to define agents I'm going to give you a couple of different definitions.
And there's a famous meme that people have so many different meanings and interpretations of the word
agent.
It's almost become a joke that you can't really define agents, or it can be anything you want it to
be.
But I feel like there have been two definitions of agents that have really taken hold.
Uh, a lot of things, really, that there's a sort of loose definition which I don't adhere to, which
is calling something agentic if it involves multiple calls to LMS in the early days.
That's what we used to say.
Anything that that was about multiple LM calls stitched together was considered an agentic workflow,
an agentic pattern.
And you can still kind of say that, but not really.
Really.
There are two prevailing definitions.
And the first of them is where you have a system that the LM controls the workflow.
So an LM that's able to determine what should happen when and sort of stitched up with that is this
idea of autonomy and LM that is able to make decisions.
And again remember always stay grounded.
LMS only generate tokens.
That's all they do.
They predict likely next tokens.
So when I say LM controls the workflow I mean an LM predicts tokens.
And those tokens can be interpreted to control the workflow.
All right.
That's definition one.
Definition two is a newer definition that's really surfaced recently.
And it's about an LMN agent runs a tool in a loop to achieve a goal.
And that gives you this kind of Claude code sense of an agent that sort of has an ongoing thought process.
And this is the sort of new emerging definition of agents that's taking hold.
But as I say, many definitions and you can really call whatever you want an agent.
But but these are some of the flavors that would make sense.
And there tends to be some characteristics about about agents or hallmark features that you look for.
An agent typically has memory persistence in some way.
It often has the ability to do planning to be able to to plan activities in advance.
There is this sense of autonomy, which again, it's one of these words that's thrown around a lot.
But the idea is that you're using the fact that an LMN generates tokens as a way of allowing it to make
decisions about what should happen next.
And the ability for an LMN to be orchestrating, to be deciding what happens next, using tools, in
other words, tools that can call other LMS alums and people that have taken the course know it doesn't
have to be through tools.
It can be because it's generating JSON output, structured output, and you're interpreting that structured
output about what what agents do next.
And the people that really know this stuff know that those two things are basically the same thing,
that generating structured outputs and using tools is basically the same thing.
But anyways, I digress.
The final thing is just to say an agent is something which which uses tools.
Generally it's equipped with tools so it can take different actions as a result.
So those are some of the features, some combination of those features.
The more of them you're ticking off, the more likely it is that you're working with a genetic AI.
And now we're not about to go and do all of those things because I do them on my companion course,
a genetic AI and anyone that's come from there knows it full well.
We use agent frameworks to help and do do all of these things, but what we're going to do today is
just sort of baby steps in that direction, adding a flavor of agentic behavior.
Here we're going to do three things.
We're going to add image generation as a separate LM call that can generate images and then throw that
on our UI.
We're going to also we're going to stitch this together, making a bunch of LM calls.
That's going to create sound as well.
And then we're going to put that into one nice solution.
So as I say it's not it's not perhaps uh, full Agentic AI, but it's definitely a step in that direction.
And it's making healthy use of tools.
Of course.
All right let's go.
Let's go to cursor.
Let's bring this one home.
It's our final trip to cursor for week two.
And let's go in here.
And we'll go to day five in week two and bring up the finale of our airline AI assistant, and we'll
do some imports.
You'll notice that sneakily SQL Lite has been added in.
This time we will initialize everything, including pointing to our prices DB that's right there.
And as long as you run the prior lab, it will have set up that prices DB and you'll have it populated
with some prices hopefully.
System message.
You're a helpful assistant for an airline called flighty.
Lighti give shortcuts, answers and all that.
All right.
This is the get ticket price.
We're doing a quick recap here as we fly through it all.
This is of course the SQL version.
This looks in Price's DB and it does a SQL select.
And let's just check that's working.
If we ask for London prices we get 7.99.
If you didn't set up the database you can always just copy across the basic, uh, one that just looks
up in a dictionary or just writes it yourself.
Okay, now the price function, this is where we put some janky JSON that describes this tool for an
LM.
Here it is.
You recognize it, get ticket price, gives it a description, destination city.
And then if I print that out you will see that is the JSON that will get sent to the LM.
All right.
Next up we have our chat function.
We do the little scrubbing of uh the, the uh, dictionary there.
We uh, of the history.
We clean that up, um, only for use for Gemini or Grok.
Uh, we then stitched together our messages.
We call open chat completions dot create.
We get back the results, and we will immediately launch an interface on that.
Let's see how it looks.
Here it is.
Okay, this looks familiar.
Uh, and, uh, but it doesn't have any tools yet.
This is just the blank one I can say.
Hi there.
Uh, what's the ticket price to London?
And then, uh, it's not it's obviously going to to, uh, not tell me.
Let's let's see what happens.
Uh, from New York on Dec one, 2025.
Hopefully it's going to say, uh, yeah.
Not yet available.
So so it's not going to make stuff up.
It's not going to hallucinate because in our system prompt we told it not to.
Fine.
Good stuff.
Now here is our improved chat function.
This is again we've got something that cleans it up.
We have our messages that we create and now we pass in tools equals tools in here.
And then we have our while loop.
Remember this is the nice version that's done prettily.
Does a while loop while it's got to to call some tools.
We will then call handle tool calls which is just down here, and then append the results to the messages.
So that's the chat function.
This is the handle tool calls which iterates through the tool calls.
If it equals get ticket price then call get ticket price.
You may have made that a little bit more elegant.
Perhaps if you if you had time for that.
Uh, so that's that.
And now we will run this and now we will give it a try and we will say, hi there.
Hello.
How can I assist you with a flight today?
I'd like to go on a trip.
Great.
We would like to travel to.
To London, please.
And you can see database tool called getting ticket price.
The return ticket price is $7.99.
Success!
That was a recap of last time and now onwards.
057 - So just before we go on, I want to take a minute to explain something that might have been mystifying
you.
And if it hasn't been mystifying you, and if you don't really care about this, then you can just speed
me up and wait until we continue with this.
But I want to explain how Gradio actually works.
Like, what is it doing?
And like, what is this user interface that you see here?
And why is what is this URL.
And, and like what's actually going on behind the scenes.
That means you can write some Python code and suddenly have a UI.
And it turns out it's actually it's really very simple.
There's nothing particularly complicated about it, but it's a series of really good ideas that results
in this almost magical effect of being able to quickly mock up a UI and have an MVP really fast.
And it's easy to explain because Gradio basically does three things.
It does three things that I will tell you about one after another.
And when you see that, when it does those three things, the net result is this kind of magical effect
of an easy MVP.
So three things.
Number one, the first thing radio does.
You have written some Python code to describe the user interface you want.
In this case it was very simple interface.
Sometimes in previous days we've had like GR markdown, GR drop down for a select box, and a few other
things we've had in there GR text textbox.
And we've described an interface by creating these radio objects, either a hybrid one out of the box
chat interface or more specific ones.
And in doing so, we've told radio what it wants and what we want, and Gradio uses that to generate
a front end interface.
It actually uses svelte, the front end framework, which is very nice because it just just generates
down to basic JavaScript.
So so it uses this to generate a basic front end description of your website.
And that's, that's like a generated code based on your high level description in Python, allowing
us to describe a UI in Python that gets translated into simple JavaScript UIs.
Okay, well, you probably already guessed that part.
So what's number two?
Well, number two is the next thing that it does is that when you call Dot launch, it starts up a server.
It uses Starlette, the app server framework that allows it to very easily start up a web server.
And it has it so that that web server is listening.
And if someone hits that web server endpoint, it serves up that front end that it just generated.
So it's sitting there waiting for someone to hit it, and then it will serve up the front end for your
app.
And that's sort of obvious when you think about it.
And so it is in fact a web server running there all the time, ready to serve your app.
It starts.
They pick a port that seems like it's a it's port seven, 860, I think is the port that it listens
at.
But if that's used up, if that's occupied, it just picks the next one and it keeps ticking up until
it finds a free one.
You can specify which port you want, but this one, for example, the current one we're just looking
at now, it's running on my localhost on port seven, eight, 60, and anybody that hits that URL will
have this auto generated front end served up into their browser.
And so sure enough, if I click on this right now, up comes a web page.
This is what gets served up and is now running in my browser window.
And this is served by the starlet server that's running behind the scenes.
And indeed, if I go to View Source, we see all of the stuff that's generated.
It's actually like it's a, it's a page that's running something in an iframe.
If we want to look, if we want to drill down into the JavaScript to see what we're actually looking
at here, see if we can find that, uh, by looking around, uh, is this it right here?
This is that's just the the iframe that it's running within.
Uh.
Hang on.
Here we go.
This is it.
This is the code.
Um, right.
So so this this is the description.
If you're familiar with front end stuff, this is like, minified front end code.
If I do a search for svelte, there we go.
We can see that it is indeed a svelte front end app that's running, uh, in my browser window.
And that that is what we are seeing right here.
I know I'm going a bit a bit into the weeds for you, but to give you a sense that that's all that's
happened, it's generated a JavaScript page.
And that is what we're seeing when we hit port seven, eight, seven, six, which is the next free
port on my local computer.
Okay.
And just the final part of step two is you might be wondering how come this appears in our notebook
like that?
Well, that's just a feature of notebooks.
Notebook output cells can show web content.
And if this is what we're trying to, this is what we've created.
Then the notebook output can can show that web page within it.
It's like you can think of it as running a little browser window inside that notebook output cell.
And that's why we see it right here, as well as being able to go into that web page so that that is
step two of what Gradio does.
And now there's only step three to go.
Have you already figured it out.
All right.
So step three is that in addition when we were describing what we were doing, we we will have told
Gradio our callback functions, some functions in our code that we want to attach to the user interface.
In this case it's just a simple function chat.
But there are others that we've played with in previous days and what Gradio does.
Can you imagine?
It's very simple in its server.
If you hit the root then then you get the web page, the generated front end page.
It also creates routes for each of your callbacks.
In our case, there's just one chat, so it has a back end route for that.
And if someone hits that back end route, it will call the chat function the one that we've we've just
got right here.
That code will get called if someone hits that route on that server.
And of course, no surprise in the front end code that it generates, it makes sure that if you click
the submit button, it's going to call the route that you want the chat route that is going to cause
the response to come back.
And it makes sure that whatever comes back from that is populated correctly on the UI.
All of that is baked into the front end code, so that it calls the right route and puts the results
in the right field.
And all of that is reflected in that one line of code.
And if you look back a couple of days at the slightly more substantive ones, you can see exactly how
it works.
Now, you can see how each of those three steps together simply allow you to produce UIs like this.
And if you're wondering if you're thinking, Ed, this is ten minutes of my life, I'm not going to
get back.
What has this got to do with AI?
It's not particularly, but it really helps you understand how you can build these kinds of apps, how
they're hooked up to your your, your business logic and the fact, in fact, starlet observers are
very scalable.
They can support very high load.
So this is this is more than a toy.
It's something that can be used for things like internal apps.
Um, and it can take you very far.
Um, you can also build out a separate full front end and still use your Gradio callbacks as your backend.
So Gradio can run as just in a sort of API mode only, so it can form a nice stepping stone to your
future strategic app with a custom made front end in another in another language like Next.js app or
something.
Uh, so that that can all be part of your natural migration.
So not only is it quite a high horsepower kind of of, uh, prototyping platform that could be used
for, for reasonably large apps, but also there's a very natural migration path to taking it to production.
Okay, enough of the technical chit chat.
There it is written down there, should you wish to read about it.
Let's do the fun stuff.
Let's go on and build a multimodal AI assistant.
058 - Okay, first up, this is fun.
We're gonna do an API other than the chat completions API that we're all bored of.
We're going to do an API that generates an image.
There's an OpenAI generate using the OpenAI Python client library, and you pass in a model and a prompt
a size and response format.
So this is this is the structure.
And we're using a model called Dall-E three, which is OpenAI's image generator from from about a year
and a half ago.
They've got a newer one with, with GPT.
Um, but you do you have to go through quite some rigmarole to get approved to be able to call that
through the API.
And I don't want to put you through that.
Dall-E three is much quicker and easier, and I actually really love Dall-E three images.
Um, now, one thing I will mention though, is that each time you generate an image, it costs about
$0.04.
And so all of the other I don't know about all, but almost all of the other calls in this course are
unbelievably cheap.
A tiny fractions of a cent, but this one is $0.04 each, so be aware of that.
I think it's well worth $0.04.
But if you're if you don't, then don't do it.
So I the prompt I'm putting in here is that you can call this function artist by passing in a city.
And it will make a prompt, an image representing a vocation in this city, showing tourist spots and
everything unique about this city in a vibrant pop art style.
Okay, that's the prompt.
With that prompt, let's let's create an image, uh, for New York City and display it.
And now when we run this, one thing I will say is that it's not super speedy, but it's doing a lot
here.
It's generating this image.
And by the way, we'll be doing this with open source models at the beginning of week three, if you're
wondering.
So you can look forward to that.
Uh, but yeah, this is running now using Dall-E three.
And there is the result.
Look at this.
Check this out.
I mean the quality of these things is just amazing.
So this is, of course, a picture of Times Square.
Strangely, I guess pop art gives it some discretion.
There is water going through Times Square.
Uh, and there is a Statue of Liberty here.
And, uh, there is, uh, obviously it's all illustrative, which we will let it let it do, but I
think it's absolutely gorgeous.
I love the, uh, there's there's obviously a sign of yellow cabs.
There's New York written there.
It's really nice.
It's definitely has I guess it's the New York Stock Exchange.
I think it definitely has a feel of New York, no question.
Uh, I think this is super, super impressive.
Um, okay.
So also I've got another one we're not done with with images.
We want to have another kind of medium as well.
So another different API I have for you.
This time it's OpenAI.
And you pass in a model.
We're using this one here GPT four TTS TS, TTS stands for Text to Speech and we give it a voice.
And I've got some other voices should you wish to try them.
I'm going to go with Onyx and the input, which is a message.
So talker is able to talk with a message and we will return the contents of that.
So I'm not going to do anything with that just yet.
I'm just showing you a talker.
Uh, okay.
Fair enough.
It's now time for us to bring this all together.
So I have a slightly beefier chat callback for you, and I will talk this through briefly, and it's
really an exercise for you.
You might be confused that this this, this chat only takes history.
It doesn't take history and the message.
And that's because we're about to do a bit of custom radio stuff, and we're going to do some messing
around first, and we're only going to have a callback, uh, with, with a single variable with all
of the history, including the most recent prompt, you'll see that in a second, but that might cause
you to pause for a thought for a second.
So we start by scrubbing the history.
As always, we put together all of our messages, adding the system prompt and then adding in the history,
which, as I say, is already going to have the most recent message.
And then we call open create with our tools, and then we have our while loop that loops through making
messages.
Um, and I've just updated our handle tool calls.
It's now handle tool calls and return cities.
Because if a tool call happens to involve a city, then I'm going to have it returned.
And I'm putting that into responses and cities to variables.
Okay.
Otherwise everything is very similar.
No real differences.
Uh, and then with whatever comes back, I'm just going to shove that in the history.
And now we just have something here.
Uh, you'll see this voice equals talker reply.
So whatever comes back, I'm also going to put that to talker so that talker will will actually generate
audio for whatever comes back from the LM.
And I've also got this little if cities.
So if there were any cities that came back from here, if, if it turns out that that the user asked
for some cities, then I'm just going to take the first one and make a pop art image of it.
And then I return from this.
You remember before the chat, the chat callback, it takes the message in history and it just returns
the next message.
Well, I'm having it return three things the whole history, the voice and the image if there is one.
Okay.
That's different.
Let's see how we hook this together.
Well, first up I want to show you the handle tool calls and return cities.
Here it is.
This is basically exactly the same as handle tool calls before.
But sneakily I make an empty list of cities and whatever city is called in the tool.
I just add that to my list of cities and I return it here.
That is it.
I assure you I've made no other changes.
It's the same handle.
Tool calls it just as it says on the tin.
It returns the cities as well.
And that's going to be used up here to draw an image if there's a city there.
Okay, that all I need to run these cells, run that, run that.
And finally we need to look at the Gradio user interface.
So there are three different types of graphical user interface.
I didn't tell you that before, but now I'm telling you.
Ha.
Uh, and we first met the type that was called interface.
That was one of the first ones we made were the shout thing.
And that is basically the very standard simple UIs.
You've got one callback function that you specify.
You give a number of inputs, a number of outputs, and it's done.
You do that allow flagging equals false thing if you wish.
If you don't want the flag button and then you've got yourself an interface out of the box.
Simple interface.
Chat interface is the one we've been using for the last couple of days.
That's the standard chat bot style, the one that looks a bit like an instant messaging app.
That's a sort of Pre-baked UI.
Again, there's just one callback called chat, which has to have the structure that we now know very
well, and that that's again another basic canned UI.
The third type is for custom UIs.
When you don't want to pick a canned one, and you actually do want to to manufacture the different
pieces yourself, you want to lay out the different UI components.
And potentially you want more than one callback.
You might want to have different buttons that can call different functions.
And when you're in that world, you're in a, you're in an area called gray box.
That's what you're doing.
And I'm going to not I this is not a radio lesson.
Uh, so I'm not going to go through everything.
I think I linked to the resources for Gradio before.
They're so great, so easy to use, but I am at least going to show you a use of GR blocks to lay out
a user interface.
So here it is.
Here is the the GR blocks setup and it comes in three pieces.
Why do these things always come in threes.
It comes in three pieces.
Uh first up you define any callbacks that you've got.
Well we've already got a callback.
It's called chat.
And it's the callback that does everything.
There's a little extra callback I've got here, which just makes the UI look nice, which is called
put message in chat bot, and it's a callback, which is going to make sure that when we type a message
and press enter, it's going to move that message right away into the chat bot window before it calls
our chat bot.
Otherwise, it looks a bit janky.
So this is that's what this does.
You'll see it in just a second.
So that's the callbacks.
The second step is where you define your UI.
This is what Gradio is going to use to build that svelte user interface behind the scenes.
And you say with use context managers with GR blocks as UI and then you can do this this use with GR
to layout each row on your user interface.
Then I'm going to have three rows.
The top row has the chatbot screen.
That's the sort of backwards and forwards the messaging and an image output.
The next row has an audio output, and the last row has the GR text box.
Chat with our AI assistant.
So that is the UI defined right here.
And finally you have to give Gradio the code that hooks things up together.
This is tells it which callback needs to be called, when and what circumstances, so that it knows
how to attach that front end to call different routes on the back end server.
And this is how you do it.
You pick something like it, like this text box and saying message dot submit.
That means if the user hits enter in this box.
This is what I want you to do.
I want you to put the message in the chat bot and you give it inputs and outputs.
And then I'm going to say then call the chat function.
And here are the inputs and outputs and the output.
With this chat bot function the inputs should be the chat history and the outputs.
There should be three outputs and they should go to the chat bot history the audio and the image.
That's how Gradio should hook them up.
The chatbot history, the audio and the image.
Let's go back to our chat function that this chat function returns the chatbot history, the audio and
the image.
And that's how it works.
This will be running on a route and the server will hit it.
It will return these three things.
And those three things will then be surfaced on the UI.
If you're not following all of this, it really doesn't matter.
You should get intuition for it.
Feel into it because it's now time to see if this actually works.
059 - Okay.
Moment of truth has arrived.
Let's run this.
It's going to have auth.
It's gonna.
I'm gonna need to log in as add bananas.
You can change this to your own.
Up it comes.
Bam.
We have ourselves a user interface.
We're going to sign in add bananas.
Here we have it.
We have ourselves a UI.
This, as I promised you, has three rows.
The top row has a chat bot and an image.
The second row has audio and the third row chat with our AI assistant is our text entry.
Let's say hi there.
Hello!
How can I assist you with your travel plans today?
Nice, nice.
Were you expecting that?
Did you know that was going to happen?
All right, all right, let's let's try it out.
Let's give it a whirl.
Uh, I'd like to go on a trip.
Great.
Where would you like to travel?
To London, please.
Now, this time, if it's working well, it's going to make a tool call.
And as a result, London is going to come back.
And because of that, it's also going to do, uh, image generation, which will probably take it like
20s or so.
A return ticket to London costs $799.
Would you like to book it?
And there we have it.
There we have it.
We have just successfully run our multimodal assistant.
It generated this super cool image of London with the London Eye and Big Ben and umbrellas.
Lovely.
It makes fun of Brits and some London tea and a bus and taxis.
It's absolutely gorgeous over the River Thames and some pause there.
Very very nice picture.
We got audio.
We of course also got our booking our ticket that used a SQL query with a tool tool use.
Everything has held together.
I guess there's like four LM calls involved here.
The two for the, the one for the tool call, the one for the final results, the image and the audio
and it's come together and I just I hope you marvel more, more than anything in how easy it was for
us to build this.
We just built this literally in a matter of minutes or maybe a couple of hours all in, but really very,
very easy.
And it's so powerful.
It does so much and it's so creative.
And more than anything, you should be thinking about all the different things you could do to make
this even better.
Everything you could do with this.
This is a canvas in which you can build.
And I'm enjoying this too much just to stop right there.
I need to give one more example.
Let's just do it one more time and say hi there.
Hello.
How can I assist you with your flight today?
And let's just say, is it cheaper to go to Paris or Tokyo?
Let's see.
So it's going to make those tool calls.
And then one of them it will pick to make a picture of it.
And we'll see what it comes back with.
We'll see what we get after the 17 or so seconds of thinking.
Here we go.
A return ticket to Paris is cheaper at $899, compared to Tokyo at $1,420.
And there we have it.
And there is a beautiful picture of Paris with, of course, the Eiffel Tower and everything else looking
gorgeous.
There is the fact that it's made to tool calls, and it's able to compare them right there.
And if I flip over here, we will see, of course, that the database tool was called for both Paris
and Tokyo, just as we expect.
And you can count the think of the number of LM calls that are involved in making sure that this whole
thing hung together.
So with that, that is a wrap on this little project, on the on the conclusion project, the finale
of week two.
And I absolutely love it.
And of course, we should now talk about your exercises and how to apply this to your business.
So for sure, if you built tools yesterday, then you should incorporate them here.
If you didn't, then time to make some tools.
Maybe the one to set a price, maybe one that can pretend to actually make a booking by writing a booking
record in, in, in the database, in the SQL database.
And a student did did that and has provided it in community contributions.
You have to take a look.
There's actually a lot of stuff in there that's done different things.
Another a student actually built something that connected to the Amadeus API, which is like a proper
booking API to to collect real ticket prices and flight times.
I think, uh, lots of such creative stuff happening.
You can use these tools to hook up to database queries or to APIs to add functionality.
Uh, and even more important than that is to put the the AI airline assistant to one side and again
apply it to your business.
Now that you can not only generate text, but you can have images and audio.
Think of the different bits you can put together, along with tool calling to build something that is
really quite powerful, something that can actually add commercial value immediately, and you should
be able to bang it out in a matter of a couple of hours, just as we did, adding in some tools, putting
in some functionality, throwing a couple of different LM calls and you've got it.
And, uh, so much that you could do with it.
And you must.
The one thing that is a strict requirement is that you have fun with it, because it's just a joy to
work with Gradio and these APIs and stitch them together, and then of course, submit stuff in community
contributions, post it on LinkedIn so that I can weigh in and congratulate you and share and amplify
your achievements and your expertise, uh, with others around you, potentially including future clients
or employers.
All right.
Well, that wraps up the lab for week two.
I should mention one more time, as it says just here that again, my my editor would kill me if I didn't
say that that, uh, rating the course on Udemy makes such a difference in terms of other people hearing
about it.
So.
So yeah, if you if you are enjoying it and you want to help me make sure that other people hear about
this course, then do please rate it.
I would be super grateful.
Uh, but now with that, the end of the finale, let's just go back to the slides to wrap up.
Wow, can you believe it?
You are somehow 25% all the way through on your journey to being an expert already.
You're already 25% to being an LLM engineer.
What can you do?
You can give an overview on Transformers, the history of them, terminology like tokens, context,
windows, that kind of stuff.
You can confidently code using the chat completions API and maybe even a couple of other APIs too.
Now, and you can build a multimodal AI assistant with a greater UI and making use of tools.
And if you've done the challenge for the week, you've figured out how to apply this to your business.
You've built something with commercial value for you, and you've shown it to people around you.
You've put it in community contributions.
You've you've posted it on LinkedIn.
And I've weighed in and congratulations to you.
That is a big week accomplished.
Okay, week three is like completely different.
It's completely different in so many ways.
We're going to be working with open source models, not not these frontier closed source models, and
not using Allamah, which is like the packaged way with like an open AI compatible API.
No more of that.
We're going to be using hugging face code so that we actually have the code of a neural network, and
we are running it ourselves, and we're going to use that as an opportunity to get a little bit deeper
under the hood of what these things actually are.
And we'll be working with tokenizers, pipelines, Transformers, and we'll be running inference of
open source models.
We'll be using GPUs, graphics cards using this amazing thing, Google Colab, which is going to give
you access to GPUs on the cloud, even if you don't have one on your on your box, or even if you do,
there'll be a more powerful one on the cloud for you.
And it's free.
Uh, okay.
Lots to look forward to.
It's a really it's a gritty week next week, but it's a fun one and I can't wait to see you then.
060 - Yes, I know that the week is already finished, but I wanted to slip in a little bit extra something.
Just.
Just a nugget.
Something that I think will entertain you.
It will only take a couple of minutes and I think you'll agree it'll be worth it.
Please humor me.
Come on in with me to week two and to this new notebook.
Extra, extra.
Did you see it hiding there?
This is something that's a special extra that I want to go through with you.
This is something inspired by the tech writer Simon Willison, who has a wonderful blog.
And one of the things that he likes to do is put models to the test by asking them to draw pelicans
riding on bikes and some other things.
And we're going to do something similar now just to explore a bunch of different models, doing a task
as a as a preview, as a teaser for what's to come in the future weeks, including particularly week
four when we pick the right model for a task at hand.
All right, let's get into it.
We are going to ask a bunch of models to come up with a picture, draw an image, a silly image to test
them out.
But here's the thing to keep in mind.
We've already seen how to use image generation.
We've already seen how to drive a model to actually draw.
Create an image.
And you may know that it uses these diffusion model things.
We're actually going to use one in week three coming right up.
But we're going to do something different.
We're not going to ask it to generate an image, but rather we're going to ask it to draw an SVG.
And SVG is a type of image file, but in fact what it contains within it is just a straight up description
in in like in letters of how to draw the lines and shapes that make up an image, it's literally like
draw a line here, a box here, fill it in, draw a box here, laid out as a series of steps in a in
a document that's like an XML style document.
That's what an SVG is.
So in many ways, asking a model to generate an SVG is actually asking it to think through.
How would it go about constructing this image and drawing it line by line.
And that's really interesting because it's more about a model's intelligence of being able to to craft
this painting than it is about image generation, which is more about using special kinds of models
that are good based on all of their training data.
Okay.
That's the backdrop.
The other piece of backdrop is about open router.
I know I've mentioned open router before, but open router is a platform that gives you access to many
models.
And it does so by routing your request to the different models.
And one of the great innovations about Open Router is that you can use one API key, your key to open
router themselves and use that as your sort of gateway in.
It is of course, it's it's not an abstraction layer.
It's a router.
We talked about the difference between them.
So I'm going to use open router.
You can either just watch what I do.
You don't need to run this if you don't want to.
But if you'd also like to do this then you should do it too.
So I've got some imports as usual.
And here you remember from guide nine in the guides folder that we can use open router base URL.
We can take an API key.
I'll just check that the API key is set up and it looks good so far.
Hopefully you got that.
And now I'm creating an instance of the Python client library that's configured for open router.
Okay.
And now for the assignment.
And I don't mean an assignment for you, I mean an assignment for the model.
So we are going to come up with a challenge.
And in my case I'm going with a panda rollerblading to work.
But you should come up with something different and interesting.
Not too complicated.
You want to give it some creative freedom and something that it could realistically do out of lines
and shapes.
So the prompt generate an SVG of this challenge and respond with the SVG only.
That's the setup.
And then I have a function artist that takes any model we want to give it, and it calls open router,
create passes in the model, the messages and the reasoning effort.
And it times it and it returns the sum summary of it and the results.
That's the function artist.
Okay.
Now let's look at the models.
So we're going to call artist repeatedly for a bunch of models for the open source version of GPT 120,
be the GPT five nano with low reasoning.
We're getting stronger and stronger, I think.
Deep seek the latest version for me.
3.2 Kimi Katou thinking is as of for me right now, beginning of 2026.
The strongest open source model on the planet, I do believe may be different for you, and you can
feel free to pick whatever you want.
This is from moonshot AI.
Chinese AI startup then grok 4.1 fast from Mr. Musk, then Claude.
Opus 4.5 the top model from anthropic right now GPT 5.2 with high reasoning.
The strongest model from OpenAI for me right now.
And finally, Gemini three Pro preview.
These are our models.
And when I run this off it goes.
They are all going to run.
Now they are running one after another, doing the processing and storing back the results.
And for anyone that's taken the Agentic track or some of my other courses, you'll know well how this
could be done as async code, which would mean that they would actually run in parallel rather than
one by one, but I didn't want to overcomplicate by putting it here.
So because I've done it like this, this simple, straightforward way, it's going to take like five
minutes for this to run.
But for you, if you if you know it, feel free to turn this into something that is async and it will
take just just a minute or two, but I will see you in five or so minutes when all of our artists have
wrapped up.
Okay, that did not take five minutes.
That took 12.5 minutes.
I'm sorry if it took that long for you to once.
It took me five minutes.
I think there's quite a variability, but it's time for us now to view the results.
It's going to draw each one.
I wrote a little script called revealer, which just means that it paints the SVG line by line so we
can see it coming.
Let's now run this to see model by model.
What kind of drawing did they come up with for our panda?
Okay, I've zoomed out a bit and now we're off.
This is the first one.
This is GPT OS 120 b.
That looks pretty good.
I quite like that.
Nice rollerblades.
Well done.
An open source model did a fine job.
All right.
And after a bit of a pause, this is the next one.
This is deep seek 3.2 ha with, uh, rollerblades at different heights.
There's the road.
A nice and big diagram it's given us that is deep seek.
Here is now Kimi Katou, the strongest open source model on the planet.
And wearing a hat or a speech bubble.
I'm not sure what that is.
Maybe you could tell what that is.
I'm not sure.
Seems interesting.
An interesting interpretation here is Grock 4.1 fast.
And that's fun.
That's fun.
Uh, again, some hat situation going on.
Work written assertively here.
And rollerblades for sure.
This is Claude, opus 4.5 Anthropic's strongest model as of today.
Quite impressive.
Rollerblades, little action lines and the office written as office in case we were in confusion.
And now GPT 5.2, the strongest model from OpenAI.
And look at this.
Look at this Panda.
And there's like action lines coming I love it.
Swirly action lines.
Last but not least, Gemini three Pro.
Oh, wow Wow, look at that.
Look at the flailing rollerblades in the action lines.
That's quite an image.
That is quite an image.
Okay, I would say Gemini three Pro for the win.
That's an impressive bunch of images.
I absolutely love it.
So GPT five nano was the only one that wasn't able to make it.
It had a problem generating, but everybody else did a fine job.
A great set of drawn svg's, line by line.
Uh.
Really impressive.
Hopefully you twisted it.
You came up with something different.
You've got a great set of images, and you're enjoying this hands on experience, exploring the capabilities
of frontier models and open source models through the Open Router API.
And that now, finally, really is the conclusion of week two.
That's the end of the extra.
I hope you loved it.
Hope this left you excited about the real scientific ways coming up in week four, but for now, it's
time to take a breather and then go in to week three for open source models.
I can't wait to see you then.
061 - So today I went to the dentist and and I tell you this for two reasons.
One of them is that I have nice teeth, as you may have noticed.
But the other reason is because this week, week three, might feel a little bit like a trip to the
dentist.
There is some hard work ahead.
Week three is a time when I think a few people do think, well, there's rag week just around the corner
and everyone is excited about rag.
And maybe I could just skip ahead to rag.
But no, week 3rd May be a little bit harder than week two, but it's gonna be amazing.
I have great fun things for you, even though we are going to go a bit under the hood and look at some
technical, gory detail, but I'm gonna make it incredibly fun.
Okay, welcome to week three.
Let's get going.
And at this point you can already talk about Transformers at a high level.
At least you can talk about tokens, context windows.
You can code with the chat completions API and you can build an AI assistant.
But not just any AI assistant.
A multi-modal AI assistant with images and sound.
And you can use tools.
And today it's going to be about a couple of things.
Two different amazing platforms, Hugging Face and Google Colab are going to be going into both of them,
setting you up, showing you new ways, including doing some fun stuff on high end GPUs.
But first, just since it's the beginning of the week, a quick look at the timeline.
Here it is the eight weeks you started there.
That's where you were.
You agreed to spend eight weeks with me.
I don't know if you knew what you were signing up for, but but this is what you got.
And your two weeks done, the foundations week and then the frontier models UIs Gradio isn't gradio
incredible and multi-modality.
And then this week it's open source week with hugging face.
And then next week is going to be about picking the right LLM.
LM and then we do rag.
Finally it's rag.
Don't skip there.
It's going to be so good.
But it's worth the wait.
And then six is when we do fine tuning of a frontier model and also some some core data science and
a bunch of data stuff.
Week seven is fine tuning an open source model, and week eight is the grand finale.
That's where we are.
And that would bring us to you being able to say, I am officially an LM engineer.
Okay, let's talk about hugging face.
What is hugging face you've been wondering all this time.
Well, you know, because you've made a brochure at one point and you printed out everything about hugging
face, uh, a New York City based startup that I think it started out as, like a chatbot.
They had a funny history, but they ended up falling into the open source world, and they are now absolutely
ubiquitous as the people behind open source transformers and open source models.
It's, uh.
It's everywhere.
Uh, and you can't escape from hugging face.
And in particular, there are two parts to hugging face, two different things that that I'm going to
cover on two different slides because they're that different.
They belong on different slides.
And this one is all about the hugging face platform, like the website.
If you go to Huggingface, you sign up for an account.
This is what you get.
And it has three things.
It has models, a bunch of open source models that you can download.
When I first did this slide about a year ago, there were 800,000 models, and I remember saying 800,000
models.
What could you possibly do with all of these models?
Uh, 800,000 open source models?
Well, now, as of just a few minutes ago, there were 2,134,255 models.
And no doubt there's a whole lot more by the time you look at it.
So tons and tons of open source models that people have published for you to look at on the hugging
face platform, and it is basically a repo.
It's like GitHub, but it's GitHub for data science models.
And then very similar to that, it's also GitHub for data sets, for for sets, for information that
you want to share with other people.
And again, I put last year a treasure trove of 200,000 data sets, which sounded like an awfully big
number of data sets.
But now there's there's half a million of them.
Lots and lots of data sets.
And before Hugging Face, Kaggle was the place to go for datasets.
Kaggle was where everyone went and and now I mean Kaggle.
Of course, it's still a big deal.
A lot of a lot of great data sets on Kaggle.
But when it comes to, uh, to the sort of generative AI to to the new world, to Transformers, people
do tend to converge on hugging face.
So the data sets.
The second thing available on the platform, on the website, and the third thing on the website is
something called spaces.
And spaces are like hosted apps.
They are hosted bits of software that you've written that you want to have up there, available for
others to see.
Uh, like a bit like, I guess a Vassal or Heroku, but in a, in a smaller way, in a, in a way that
is very efficient for data scientists and in particular, one of the types of app that is super easy
to host on hugging face in a space.
Our gradio apps and which we know well.
Uh, and you remember when you, when we did like share equals true that Gradio would host it on their
servers and but it was a bit janky.
It involved like this HTTP tunneling thing which, which various corporate networks would get very cross
with you if you do it.
Uh, but there is a more robust way, which is to use spaces.
And if you just type gradio deploy in, uh, it automatically lets you push your code, your Gradio
app to be a hugging face Huggingface space.
And that's so easy.
So when you go onto the Huggingface platform and you look on the website, you'll see that there are
models, datasets and spaces.
And if you go to spaces, you can just use any of these deployed apps that people have put up there.
They're just all available as part of what Hugging Face shares with the community.
Well, let's go and have a look at this thing.
Okay.
Let's go to Hugging Face.
This is what it looks like.
Remember this is one of the two different things the hugging face is.
Don't lose sight of that.
I know it's confusing.
This is the platform.
This is the hugging face platform, the website.
And I'm not currently signed in.
That's why there's a login screen here.
So this is like just what it's open to the to to anybody.
Anyone can see this.
And at the top here you'll see in the main nav the three main areas you can go to the models, the datasets,
the spaces.
And then there's a bunch of other stuff because there's lots of other things Hugging Face does as well.
But but these three are the main three.
So we go to models.
You click on models and there you see I didn't make it up 2 billion and something.
Uh and what you get here, these are all the different models that are available, open source models
that you can use at any point on hugging face.
Uh, or you can use them locally and, uh, yeah.
So, so the way it would work if you, if you want to, to find a model which is difficult because there
are so many of them, you typically start by saying, what kind of thing are you looking to do?
Text generation is the most common gen AI task, but you might be doing like a text to video.
You might be doing text to image image generation, uh, in which case you would click here and then
it filters over on the right here.
Um, and then there are the most of the models, uh, use PyTorch code, which we'll talk about these
things later.
But there are other things too.
And then there's, there's other, other sorts of things you could choose from.
There's also languages if you want to be looking at foreign languages, different types of open source
license.
Uh, and yeah, there's so many different things you could subselect from, uh, and a number of parameters,
of course.
How big it is.
This might be something you might be like, oh, I only want anything less than 12 billion parameters.
And you can see it's just filtered over here.
And when you're looking at these names of models, the first word is the name of the provider, the
company, the account, the hugging face ID.
And then that is the name of the model that comes right after it.
Let's make this a bit bigger.
Uh, and then over here is how you can sort it by trending or likes or downloading.
And I most of the time I either go most likes or I go for the most downloads.
Those are all good indicators.
And then sometimes it's it's recently updated as a useful one filter on as well.
So these are typically how you navigate around the 2 million models out there on the Hugging face hub
as it's, as it's sometimes known the hub.
Okay.
And then data sets, you click here.
And it's the same kind of thing.
There's the As the 500,000 data sets.
You can see them all here.
You can then filter on on them, what kind of data set it is on the size, and then you can come in
and filter by name and by type.
If you're interested in something to do with like financial services, like something maybe to do with
uh, stock tickers or something like that.
You could.
I'm spelling it wrong.
Finance.
You can see there's Yahoo finance, data finance, tasks, finance, math, finance, complaints, um,
all sorts of stuff that you'll see here that are different data sets related to finance.
Why don't we do like, like uh, equities to see particularly something about equities.
Uh, nothing.
Did I spell that wrong again.
Nope.
Maybe I should do stock.
See what we've got here.
Stock market tweets stock tweets sentiment.
Airbnb stock prices too.
So lots of stuff that you could come into any one of these and read about what it is.
See examples of the data.
The data set card.
This tells you the historic stock price of Airbnb, an American company.
Blah blah blah blah blah.
And, uh, yeah, you can then go in and look at the data.
And often the, uh, this is actually taking this is obviously also on Kaggle.
Uh, often these are parts of people's projects they've used to train a model.
And that's one reason why something might be trending or popular.
Um, anyway, this is how you can go about, uh, browsing the data sets available on hugging face.
And then the third of the things I mentioned to you is spaces.
And spaces.
Are these like running AI apps that you can interact with.
And there's a whole bunch of spaces here.
And if you were to to to look through it all, you'd find that I have a couple of spaces myself and
one of them you've already seen because Outsmart, the game we played the other day, is a space.
It's deployed as a hugging face space.
It's running as a space, and if you're running your own space, you can embed it inside your website,
which is what I've done.
So that's a classic example of a hugging face space.
Uh, and spaces can be radio apps, they can also be Streamlit apps, and they can just be anything
that will go in a Docker container.
So there's lots of different ways that you can deploy your AI apps to become a space.
And if you're signed in, you can just press that new space button and get going, deploying your own
that way.
And before going further, it's time for you.
If you don't already have a hugging face account, if you must be the only data scientist AI engineer
in the making on the planet without one, you need one.
You need one right now.
So go to huggingface, click on sign up and then there's a human security check.
Uh, not sure if I'm human.
Uh, go ahead and make sure you pass the human check and then fill in your details to set up your hugging
face account.
It is free.
Do not do not get the pro plan.
We don't need the pro plan.
Everything we do is part of the free plan on this course.
So keep it on the free plan.
Sign up and then I will see you to talk about the other side of hugging face in the next video.
062 - Okay, so this is something completely different.
That hugging face is.
And of course they're related.
But but nonetheless this is different as well as being this this this platform, this hub that's online
that is basically a bunch of repos of data sets and models and also spaces.
Hugging face also has code, open source libraries that they've made available that everybody uses.
Everyone.
And these are these are open source libraries that implement open source transformer models.
So using PyTorch and also TensorFlow which is and also Jax.
These are all different deep neural network libraries.
But PyTorch is the most popular and that's the one that we'll use most.
And they've they've written Transformers in PyTorch so that you can then just import some Python code,
download some weights, and be running the model yourself in, in like in JupyterLab in cursor, or
as we will in a minute on Google Colab.
And so the first thing you might have in mind is, okay, what's the difference between running an open
source model that way versus running a llama, which we did in week one?
Well, I mentioned this at the time, but I'm going to do it again now.
But hopefully you're like, I get this llama is like a software product.
It's something that's been written.
It runs on your machine.
You don't get to run the code of it.
It's like an application and it is able to take files which are very efficient packaged models like
Gemma and Llama and the others.
They've been packaged into this file called a GIF file, and then it runs it with efficient C++ code
locally in a box, and it listens on a particular port, which and it provides an endpoint that's compatible
with OpenAI, as you know.
So you can just use OpenAI's libraries and connect to it.
So think of it as fast packaged pre-baked software.
Hugging faces libraries is like you get access to the actual code, the Python code, and you can step
through that code and you can run the model yourself in, in cursor or wherever, and in doing so,
you can change it as well.
You can mess around with the tokens.
You can swap out some layers of the neural network if you wish.
You can.
You can do things like fine tuning, and none of that is possible with a llama.
And so it's so completely different.
And I hope that now does make sense to you.
So the other thing that Hugging Face offers is a set of open source libraries for running Python code
to run neural networks with, with transformers as part of it yourself.
And that that that is the huge thing that they offer and something which is used everywhere.
And it started out that one of the the early models that you could run was llama, the model from Mata.
But but now almost any open source model you could imagine you can run using hugging face libraries.
And in particular there are six different hugging face libraries that we will use together during the
remainder of this course.
And the first of them is a little bit confusing, so bear with me here.
The first library that I will mention to you is a library called the Hugging Face hub, which you may
remember I told you was the name of the other thing.
That Hugging Face does the website and you were like, what?
And the reason is because this is a Python library that lets you connect to the hugging face hub to
download the models or the data sets that you can see on Hugging Face Hub and have them in your code
immediately.
So that's the kind of connection between them.
So you can import something which is like hugging Face Hub.
You can log in through code and you can say, I want this model in code talking to this, this, this
hub library, and it's connecting to the hugging face platform so that that's the first library.
Hope that makes sense.
And then the second library is called data sets.
And that particularly is a library that when you use the hub library to connect to the hub you can then
download a data set.
It becomes part of this data sets library.
And each each object represents a data set.
And you can do amazing things with it.
And it's super efficient.
And it allows you basically to manipulate vast amounts of data in an effective way.
And the third library is the big one Transformers.
This is the library that lets you say like like I want this particular model and I want the code for
it, and I want to be able to actually run it.
I want to train it.
I want to do anything with it.
You do it with the Transformers library that that is the iconic library at the heart of hugging face.
Then, pfft, we're now on this.
The second row is some of the more advanced library.
PFA is something we'll be using a lot in week seven.
It stands for parameter Efficient Fine Tuning, and it's a way to, uh, be able to train a model yourself,
but in a way that doesn't require you tweaking 8 billion weights or however many parameters there are
in this model, you can do it in a more efficient way.
And the library is the library that lets that be possible.
Also uses a technique that is known as Laura or Laura that maybe you have come across.
And then t which, uh, may remind you of some some ancient MTV show, but in this context, it's not
that it is the Transformers Reinforcement Learning library, which is again all about training Transformers
and Accelerate is a particular library that allows you to distribute models across multiple GPUs.
So this bottom row are the more advanced things that we may touch on distributed training and fine tuning
and and other stuff.
So this this set of libraries, this is at the heart of of so much work that happens with open source
with models.
And this is the the other part of hugging faces, the two things.
It's the the platform, the hub as it's called with with repos of datasets, models, spaces.
And then it is the software, the open source software, the libraries that you can use as Python code
yourself.
And we will we will use it a lot.
And then somewhat confusingly, one of them is called hub and allows you to connect to the hub.
All right.
All is clear.
Uh, let's, uh, let's let's now move on to the the other big topic.
063 - The other big topic is Google Colab, and that is the other thing that we're going to be using today
as we we it's all about new stuff today.
So Google Colab, you may have already used it.
A lot of people have used it already and they're like, why don't we start with Google Colab?
There's a lot of a lot to love about Google Colab.
First of all, what is it?
So it is something which allows you to to run a notebook.
Notebook is this kind of interface we've been playing with in cursor when you have like, like cells
of code that you run a cell at a time, there's very experimental way of interacting with code.
So Google has built something that lets you run a notebook like that, except you're running it in a
browser, you're running it in a browser window, and it's actually running on one of Google's computers.
So you can like bring up a like a Chrome page, point it at a Google URL, and then you effectively
have like like a boxes there, and you're remoting in to a Google box and you're able to run the code.
And when you run the cell, it's as if it's running in your browser, but of course it's not.
The code is executing on one of Google's machines out there in the cloud, and you're seeing the results
immediately.
So it lets you remote in to a to a remote box running on Google's cloud.
And there are a few things about this that are really great.
One of them is that it allows you to collaborate in this super seamless way with other people on the
same code.
Like in the same notebook construct.
Google is famous, of course, for Google Docs for really bringing the kind of collaborative office
idea, uh, to, to the mainstream.
And so everyone's very familiar with this idea that you can share a Google doc and share a sheet and
be able to to work together with someone else in it and really collaborate.
And Google Colab is bringing that same mentality to a notebook so that you can be coding with somebody
else.
It's not quite you don't quite get to see the changes in quite the same way, but it's almost as good
as that.
And you can both be adding code and running things.
And so it's such a great way to work together with people and, you know, it's like a it's a different
mindset to something like a using a repo where you where you check stuff in and merge it and so on.
It's much more like live working, but it suits the notebook mindset, that experimental mindset, it
works so well with that.
So very collaborative as as the name suggests.
Uh, and it's also integrated with, with the other Google services.
So, so later this this week we're going to to pull Google Drive in so you can have your Google Drive
docs available there too, which is very convenient.
So for many reasons it is convenient.
But above all else the real the.
So what is that?
It gives you access to high end GPUs.
That's that's the big deal.
And I probably need to mention, just in case you don't, uh, you haven't got the connection between
what we're doing and GPUs.
I mean, obviously everyone knows about Nvidia stock and that GPUs are at the heart of, of modern AI.
But but if you're wondering why, when we talk about these models with these huge number of parameters,
these tons and tons, these 8 billion numbers, when you when you're predicting the most likely next
token, the way you do that is by taking all of these numbers and multiplying them repeatedly by the
sort of input sets of tokens in some very clever way, which is known as the transformer architecture,
which is the way that these things will hook together and you're doing lots of multiplications and adding
multiplications and adding is basically matrix math, linear algebra.
It's lots and lots of matrix calculations, and they can all happen very efficiently in parallel with
one another.
They're all sort of independent.
So they can all run together in this very, very efficient way.
But they all have to run.
And it turns out when, when all this is becoming a big thing, in the early 2000, people were saying
what we really need is like specialized custom hardware that is that is efficient, that is designed
for matrix calculations in in fast, real time.
And you can imagine all of these scientists sitting around there thinking about this.
And while they were doing it, the other people in the room were busy playing Doom or Quake or whatever
was big in those days and, uh, using using PCs with which were like hammering away at drawing this
3D graphics.
And the way that you do these kinds of games is by doing a lot of quick polygon calculations, which
involves lots of efficient matrix maths.
So the graphics cards, everyone was trying to buy a PC with a bigger graphics card.
Those graphics cards were basically custom hardware designed to run matrix calculations, multiplies
and adds in parallel like huge numbers of them at the same time so that it could draw, uh, screens
like 60 times a second or whatever.
Uh, and so it turned out that this kind of hardware was absolutely perfect for the kinds of AI that
we were doing at the time and that we are still doing to this day.
Uh, and luckily for Nvidia.
And so that is why GPUs you probably do all that already.
So I'm sorry.
That's why GPUs are so essential to to modern day AI.
And they're quite expensive.
And what you really need more than anything is you need them to have a lot of memory, which typically
you need, like it's different to the memory of your computer.
The GPU also has Ram, as games players all know, and you need to have enough to fit all of the model
on.
And if you're training, you need a lot more than that too.
And so you need a lot of memory on your GPU for it to be able to run efficiently.
And that's a problem.
And as, uh, that's not a problem, that's expensive and is the constraint.
And Apple people will know.
Well, like I might happen to be a mac person, uh, that, uh, one of the great things about Apple
Silicon is that you have what's called a unified memory, which means that the memory that your CPU
uses is the same as the memory the GPU uses.
So you can you can share it together, which is really amazing.
But for PCs, you typically have to get a graphics card with big enough memory.
And they're expensive.
They are many thousands of dollars and boxes which have big Nvidia chips on on them.
Graphics cards are very expensive.
You can buy good ones for like $6,000 or something.
They're expensive, but there's an alternative.
There is an alternative and it's called Google Colab, where you rent GPUs in the cloud instead.
And so here are the details you get when you connect to Colab.
You choose a runtime and runtime is it's name of like the, the, uh, like the instance that you're
connecting to on the cloud.
And it includes like a kernel, like we're used to a Python process that's, that's running there.
And you can get some that are CPU based, meaning that there's no graphics card at all, there's no
GPU, so you can just use it for everyday tasks, a bit like you can on your own computer.
You can have ones with a lower spec GPU.
It's still pretty mighty.
It's still a powerful GPU.
The typical one is the Nvidia Tesla T4.
The T4 is the typical one.
It has 15GB of GPU Ram, which is a lot.
And here's the thing.
It's free.
It's it's completely free.
You can have a Google Colab with a T4 GPU, and you can have it for free at any point.
And we're just gonna do it in just a second.
Can you believe it?
And that's what you'll be using for this week, for week three and for week seven on this course when
we are running on GPUs in the cloud.
So that's amazing.
And then if you want to splash out you can pay to have a higher spec one, including an A100 for 40GB.
But when I say splash out, we're talking about like a few bucks an hour.
We're talking about like, you know, a Big Mac an hour kind of level.
I believe we'll do the maths later to see exactly how much it costs.
But, uh, it's it's, uh, I was going to say it's cheap.
And you might disagree with me there.
You might say a few dollars an hour is not cheap at all, but compare it with the cost of buying an
A100 on a PC that you're going to have for yourself.
That that is an expensive proposition.
And when you think of it in that light, to be able to run it for $2 an hour only when you need it,
and then you don't use it anymore, you don't keep it running.
You just you only pay for the minutes that you have it alive.
That's it.
It seems like it's actually a really great deal.
And I feel like we are lucky to have this ability to rent super high powered horsepower whenever we
want it.
And so, yeah, I think this is fabulous.
And that's why I always when people say to me, I want to buy a box with blah, blah, blah, blah,
I say, really, really, because you know that that you can have as many a100s as you want for a fraction
of that, uh, just, you know, every weekend.
So anyways, the, the other the final sales pitch for it and then I'll shut up the, the other point
to make is that GPUs do go obsolete pretty quickly.
The GPUs that are hot today might not be hot in a year's time.
And if you buy one, you're kind of stuck with it, but with with Google Colab, you just get the whatever
they have on offer.
They have a range of different boxes that you can get.
And so it's also a nice way to always stay current.
I guess it's like leasing a car, you know, it's like it's the buy versus versus lease kind of conundrum
that people think about.
Anyways.
That is Google Colab.
All right.
So I just took like ten minutes of your time just talking about this thing.
We need to go and see it.
Let's go and see it.
So look there's people constantly ask me how to find the link to the Google Colab that we use in these
courses.
And I've put the links everywhere, but but so one place they are is that if you go into the repo week
three, day one, there is a notebook there in in cursor with a link to the Colab.
But also if you look in the readme, there's a link to the Colab.
If you look in the class resources, there's a link to the Colab.
Like I don't know, you have to just not look anywhere, look up at the ceiling and you won't see it,
but it's everywhere else, so you got no excuses.
You can find the link to the colab and I will see you right there.
064 - And just to really prove my point, I haven't gone to Colab.
I've gone to cursor.
This is cursor right here.
Here is week three and here is day one in week three and day one in week three.
Introducing Colab.
To see what Colab can do, follow the link below.
This will be your link to Google Colab.
Here it is.
I click on the link up.
It comes now the first time you go there.
If you've never used Colab before, you will need to log in and and presumably most people have a Google
account.
If you don't have a Google account, you will need to have a Google account.
Don't hate me.
You'll need to have like a like the basic Google Gmail thing, but they're useful things to have.
And once you have your come in, it's free.
You don't need to pay a penny, don't pay anything.
Come on in and you should see yourself on this screen.
Week three day one Colab.
If you have your browser set to light mode, you might see this in like a white background or whatever.
But.
But otherwise you should see exactly this.
You are now in Google Colab, and what you're looking at here should look somewhat familiar, because
it is basically a Python notebook or sometimes called a Jupyter notebook.
It's a notebook with code and with with some text, and it's one that we will spend the next few minutes
of our lives in.
So let me make this a little bit bigger for you.
And I'm just going to start with the basics of Colab, with apologies for those that know all this stuff
already, but just to ground you in this.
So first of all, you'll see up here is a share button.
And this this is where you can share things just as you can with any Google doc.
You can share it with another Gmail user, because this one is my one that you'll be in read only mode.
The first thing you have to do is do file, and you'd have to do save a copy in drive to save a copy
of this for yourself.
Then you could share it with somebody else if you wish to.
Standard stuff like with any other Google doc.
Very familiar construct.
Next thing to show you over here on the right this thing here connect and this word T4, this is everything.
If I press this button it's going to connect this browser.
So I'm then talking to a T4 box which is one of these small GPUs which is free.
And, uh, at the moment, this is just static.
This looks like code, but it can't do anything until I press connect.
Now I'm not going to press connect.
I'm going to go to this little drop down here and say change runtime type.
So should you.
And this is where you see all of the possible things that you could connect to.
A CPU here means I just want to have a plain old compute CPU like my own box, but up in the cloud.
And so you can do that and it's free.
A T4 over here is what this is set to by default.
And it's also free.
Now there are some downsides.
So we will talk about but but basically it's free.
These are different various boxes.
This a100 this one you have to have a paid account for.
And I do have a paid account.
So I'm allowed to select it.
And I can choose high Ram which is like really beefy too.
But I'm sticking on the free one on low and not on high Ram and the free T4 because that's what you
have access to without paying a penny and everything else you leave as the default.
I press save there and then I can just go connect to a hosted runtime, T4.
And it's the same as just pressing that button.
And I'm going to do it right now.
It says connecting.
It says three dots.
It says connecting to T4.
Done.
Green tick.
All this looks green.
Green T4 down on the bottom right.
These are all your cues that we are connected live to a T4 box running in the cloud.
Okay.
And a couple of other things to show you back here to this drop down.
And you go to View resources.
And this pops up and this is what you need to know about you need to look for this.
This tells you the health of the remote computer.
And I'm just going to shrink that down a bit.
Otherwise it takes up way too much room.
But it tells me my, my the memory of the main computer.
Uh, 12GB.
It's perfectly decent.
The GPU memory is a whopping 15GB.
That's fantastic.
And then the disk is a big old disk with 235GB.
So this this is the thing to watch, and particularly the GPU, because if you fill it up and things
go wrong, you'll see this going wrong.
Occasionally Google will be nasty and will bump you off this box.
That is the trade that you make when you agree to having free compute.
You're saying to Google, I understand it's a best efforts thing.
If you get too busy then you might kick me off.
But worse than that, it sometimes kicks you off and onto a CPU box and it sometimes doesn't tell you
that it's done, that.
So suddenly things stop working and you're like, why aren't things working?
And you don't realize you've been bumped onto a lower spec box?
So watch out for that.
Keep that in mind.
If it happens to you, then you'll know what's going on.
You simply have to start again.
You have to connect to a T4 and go back to the top of your lab.
Okay, a couple more things to tell you.
And by the way, all this is written down here so you can have a look, but the runtime menu has a couple
of really important things.
Restart session.
That's basically there's of course a Python kernel running behind here and it restarts that Python kernel.
All of your memory here will clear back to zero again.
Everything will be reset ie.
You have to do that quite frequently when things get get full.
Uh, the other one here is disconnect and delete Runtime that gets rid of everything and you then have
to reconnect again.
Now, the difference between them is that when you do that, if you've had to do any Pip installs to
install packages or install them on your machine, you'll have to do that all over again.
It's like you're getting connected again for the first time.
If you do just a restart session, you don't need to reinstall things, you're just simply flipping
the Python process.
But if you do a disconnect and delete, you're starting again, like here from scratch.
And that brings up a good point that you should rest assured that every time that you do leave Colab,
your data is safe.
It's gone.
Everything is wiped.
This box is completely fresh every time.
And so, as I say here, the benefits free access to T4's.
Hooray!
Share code and collaborate.
And also, one thing I didn't mention before, one of the great things about Colab is that everyone
that's using this colab will be using an identical piece of hardware and software.
If you're connected to a T4 and you're using this, it is guaranteed to be identical.
And that means that all environment differences and nonsense is taken out of the picture.
So if you have a defect and you're stuck trying to solve something, and you're trying to work with
me on it.
The best way to do it is to put it in a colab and share it with me, because then we can work on it
together, and we know that we're working on identical spec, and it just eliminates all the noise of
not knowing.
Is it an environment problem?
Are you all these things done right?
So that's always good to know.
But the downsides is that it's free.
So Google might bump you off at any point.
You need to pip install every time you get a new box, and that can be pretty annoying.
It can be slow and just generally using it.
There's some latency.
It's not running on your own box, you're going off to the cloud.
And so it's not as interactive.
And you feel that um, so always start by connecting.
Uh, always look at the resources if things go wrong.
Runtime disconnect and delete, reconnect.
Start again and start from the top.
Always start from the top of the notebook.
That should be your your absolute marching orders.
Things go wrong.
You disconnect.
You reconnect.
Start from the top.
Okay, that's enough of preparation.
It's time for us to to to do some stuff.
Let's let's do some coding.
065 - All right.
So first of all I'm going to take my mouse.
I'm going to hover around here.
I'm going to press the plus code button.
It's very like cursor.
Uh and I'm going to go here and type two plus two and hold down shift and press enter.
And we just used a Tesla T4 machine, uh, on the cloud in order to do this important operation.
Uh, and, you know, we can we can do bananas.
Uh, and uh, there we go.
We get we get bananas.
Um, and, um, yes, you you can imagine all the other great things we could do.
Uh, a lot of stuff comes installed automatically on radios that you don't even need to pip install.
So I can do like import gradio as GR.
And I think that will just run.
Doesn't need anything installed.
Gradio just comes on the box.
So it's as slow as it is on my machine.
Look at that.
Uh, you get used to this.
Obviously that's the stop button.
You can press the stop at any point if it's taking too long.
But it did finish.
Um, if you need to pip install something you can't just do like pip install pip install requests or
something.
Uh, you would have to put an exclamation mark in front of it, which is a way of saying don't run this
as Python, run this as an underlying shell command.
That's what that would do.
But for this notebook we don't need to do any Pip installs.
Everything is good to go.
The first thing we're going to do is a little bit of code here.
Uh, to check the GPU of this code, of this box, whatever this is running on out in the cloud by calling
this this shell command Nvidia SMI to get the GPU info and find out what it is and print it if it is
a Tesla T4.
Let's run this code.
Bam!
Here's the results.
It is indeed an Nvidia chip.
And there we go.
It is a Tesla T4.
Good to know.
And it has 15MB on it.
And that makes sense because we can see just over here it does indeed, according to Colab, have that
as well.
So the code that's running is giving us a consistent story.
That's good to see.
Okay, next up comes the most important thing we're doing today.
Pay attention please.
There's a fiddly thing to do now.
One fiddly thing one time only and then fiddly ness is over.
Okay, we need to connect this colab to our hugging face account, and in fact, we're connecting any
colab when we're logged in by using a feature that's secrets that are built into colab.
And this is the alternative to the EMV file.
You don't have a dot env file on Colab because we don't.
It's not on our file system, it's out in the cloud.
Here's how it works.
First of all, you need to have got yourself a hugging face account, which you did in the last video
or two videos ago.
So you're good there.
Thank you.
You you you listen to me.
So at this point, please.
Let's go to your hugging face account.
Here.
I have mine open, conveniently hugging face.
So this is me signed in, and, uh, you go to your avatar, you go to your profile.
That is my hugging face profile.
And I have two notifications.
I don't know what they are.
Uh, here are his his, my two apps and some fun things from another course.
Uh, and, uh, then you come along here and you go to settings.
So you're looking at your avatar page, you press settings and you go to API to access tokens.
Access tokens.
This page here, look at this.
Now here is the thing.
Here is the thing.
Listen up.
You press create new token.
Here comes the new token.
You see this page for the new token.
The next thing you do is you find this word right.
You need to press that word right and give it a token name.
Give it whatever token name you like.
This can be, you know, my my favorite token.
And then you press Create token.
Now the reason you need to write permissions is first of all that gives you access to download models
from from any repo which you'll need when we download open source models.
But also we are going to be writing our own models at future weeks.
And if you don't have this permission, it will cause lots of troubles later.
So do have write permissions.
Give it a name, create the token and copy it into your clipboard.
It should start h underscore and that should now be in your clipboard.
And now we go back to Colab okay.
And in Colab you now go to the left here to this little key, and you press the key and it opens up
this thing that says secrets and secrets are they are just like the dot env file.
They have a name and a value, just like the dot env file has something equals something.
And the name for hugging face is underscore token.
And in that value cell you paste the the lowercase HF underscore and that key.
And you put in exactly as it is with no spaces and no nothing random on the beginning or end, just
as it should be, so that you have that in there and you make sure it's switched on here for notebook
access, which means that this notebook here will have access to that secret.
And once you've done that, you're golden.
You've done the fiddly part.
You can now access this hugging face token from your code, and it even tells you right there that it's
super simple over here to have access to any of these keys with code that looks a bit like that, but
instead of secret name, you would put this word here, that word would go there, and then you'd be
able to access this value.
It's just a way to have secrets stored separately.
And these secrets here are associated with your Google account.
If you share this with someone else, they won't get access to your secrets.
The secrets, of course, are secret to you.
And as an added benefit, anytime you're logged in, you'll have access to all of these secrets, which
makes it super convenient.
It's like a EMV file that's everywhere on Google Colab for you and only for you when you're logged in.
So that's the fiddly part.
Done, sorted.
You've got it set up.
Brilliant.
Let's go on.
Okay.
Game time.
You've filled in your secrets.
You've connected to a T4.
You're looking all good there.
Scroll down.
So first of all, this is exactly the code that you may remember you saw just here.
It's the code which is going to allow us to access our HRF token.
And it's going into a something called HRF token, a variable called that.
And that's coming from Google Colab importing user data.
So user data is basically the secrets on the left.
We're getting HRF token and there it is.
And then we're calling something called login with HRF token.
And what is that?
That that is a function from a package called Huggingface hub.
And this is the first of those libraries I told you about.
This is the Hugging face library that's related to connecting to the Hugging Face Hub.
Okay, let's do it.
Let's run this.
And if all is well, if you've done the key properly, if you've copied and pasted, if it has the right
permissions and everything, you'll have a green tick there.
And this running on the cloud is now connected.
It's logged in to Huggingface.
So what I'm now going to do is run a piece of code that I'm not going to explain how it works, because
we'll be dealing with that another time.
It's using something called pipelines.
And we are going to be first.
We are going to be, uh, let's see what order do I want to do these in?
Yeah okay.
Okay.
So first of all, we are going to be using, uh, something that isn't going to be using a model, a
model from the Hugging Face library.
But it is not a transformer.
It is actually a different kind of model.
It is a diffusion model that you may have heard of.
It is a kind of model that's good at generating images.
And we're making one from a company called stability, uh, which is, uh, the, uh, the, the stability
diffusion model, and it's called Excel Turbo.
And we are going to ask it to generate a class of students learning AI engineering in a vibrant pop
art style.
So that is our prompt.
We are using something called pipelines that we will tackle.
We'll actually explain this tomorrow, but I'm doing it because this is now hitting our our T4.
So we should start to see work happening down here.
It says it's been executing for 22 seconds on the T4 and things are happening.
Whoa.
Look at all this.
Lots of status things.
So a lot of the time that you spend on Colab is actually spent downloading stuff, because the downside
of it being a completely clean box every time is that it doesn't cache any files you're downloading
things from the Hugging Face Hub every single time.
So all of this is downloading.
You can see here it says that's almost a 1.4GB of data coming there.
Uh, and uh, well that's, that's that's five gigabytes of data associated with this model.
And that's going to take a minute to download.
You can see the system memories coming up, but so far the GPU memory hasn't really moved at all.
Uh, and this is looking like we're filling a lot of CPU.
But fear not.
Once this thing is loaded, it's going to slam over to the GPU and we're going to run against the GPU.
Now hopefully you're doing this too because it's free, so why not?
So you are currently running this.
You press shift enter.
You are seeing the stability AI model running for a class of students learning AI engineering in a vibrant
pop art style.
All right, I'm gonna I'm gonna vanish for a second.
It'll be a few minutes for me.
It'll be a second for you.
And when I'm back, we'll see what comes of this.
066 - Okay, it just finished and you can see sure enough that the GPU Ram zoomed up there and is at 8.5GB.
One one thing that was important that I didn't mention is that this parameter here number of inference
steps.
So, uh, this is a bit hand-wavy, but you may know, the way these diffusion models work is that they
started with a picture which was had a description of it like a, like a prompt.
And then they gradually dissolve that away into white noise through through various steps.
And the way a diffusion model is trained is then doing that in reverse, starting with the fuzz with
a prompt, and then trying to iterate to get towards the full picture.
And the number of inference steps is how many of these kinds of steps of changing something that is
noisy into something that's a real picture based on a prompt.
So this model, this very, very small scale turbo model achieved this.
Aha.
Which is sort of fun.
Uh, this is is this you?
Do you look like this?
This is the class of data scientists in a vibrant pop art style.
And it's colorful and poppy.
And, you know, of course, it's not like the OpenAI ones that we saw with the amazing pictures of
of London and Paris and New York.
But but, uh, it's free.
It's a free model.
And you have all the code, this, this hugging face code we're using here.
But this pipelines, which is part of one of these hugging face libraries, you've got all the Python
code running on this box generating this picture.
And that's kind of cool.
It's, uh, yeah, it certainly feels very tangible.
Okay.
The next thing we're going to do is reset the kernel to bring everything back down again and run another
model.
You can reset the kernel by going to runtime and restart session.
I've also I've put it down here as some code that you can run yourself just by doing this.
It will also do it.
It's going to prompt me and tell me that the kernel is gone.
Uh, and uh, there we go.
Your session crashed.
It says automatically restarting and back.
It comes with everything back down to zero again.
Same as as as.
Runtime.
Restart.
Okay, we're now going to kick off another model, which is also another one from stability.
From stable diffusion.
It's the stable diffusion uh, Excel base which is a bigger model.
And we'll let this thing run.
This time we're going to be doing 30 inference steps.
It's actually it's a bigger image.
It's going to produce.
It's not it's not significantly different quality to this one in case you're expecting big things.
Don't.
We're running on a tiny box when it comes to image generation.
They consume a lot of power, but it's still cool to be running ourselves on this free kit.
And I hope you're doing it too.
And you know, there's definitely something very tangible about doing it.
I will see you for the outcome.
And here we're just watching the end it all loaded.
You can see the 30 iterations that it's doing.
This one was on 30 inference steps.
They're running pretty fast and at the end of it, up pops the image.
I hope there it is.
So, you know, it's a bigger image.
There's more going on.
It's still a bit a bit messy, but I think that's maybe part of the pop art style.
Uh, and something a bit surreal and strange happening around here.
That looks like a bit of a of an AI artifact.
Uh, but nonetheless, this is something kind of cool to be built, uh, coming just again on our free
box.
And then, uh, you can see as well look at the GPU, uh, went all the way up to to 12.7 there.
So, uh, we're going to restart the kernel again and go back to blank.
And now I think we're now probably getting to the, to the area where to run this next one.
It may not run on a typical box.
It may be time for us to run on a powerful box which I have, which you probably don't have, which
I want to do just to show you what it's like to run on a more powerful box.
I will just try it first on a T4 to see whether it runs.
So this, while it's running, let me just tell you, is a again, it's the same, um, Excel based
one zero, which is a larger model that is able to, to build this bigger, uh, this bigger look.
But we're also bringing in a second model to act as the refiner.
And you can see that, uh, that we, uh, split it 80 over 20 and that that, uh, yeah, the the refiner
gets to work on, on making it just that little bit better.
Uh, so that is running now, and we'll see whether it runs on this T4 box.
I think it probably won't.
It'll probably run out of memory, which will be a nice time to show you what it looks like when you
run out of memory on a T4.
And at that point I will switch to an A100, a powerful box instead, but we'll see what happens.
I'll see you in a second.
Okay, so this two stage diffusion did complete successfully on the free T4 box.
Here's the result.
And it's definitely a step better.
There's no doubt it's still got artifacts and some weirdness, but it's kind of cool as well.
And again, when it comes to a free open source model on free hardware, it's kind of cool to be doing
this.
So hopefully you've had this experience too.
You've also seen some interesting pictures.
You may be able to prompt it better and get something crazier or more fun or whatever.
Um, but this is our pop art style data scientists aspiring to be expert AI engineers.
That would be you.
All right, so with this, we are now going to, uh, to change and move on.
Oh, no.
Just just before just before we move on to an A100.
I have one more thing to show you on your own T4.
Let me show you something else.
So this time I'm going to do it the other way.
Runtime.
Menu.
Restart.
Session.
Restart.
Okay.
again, look at how close we were to the top of the memory there.
We really.
It only just barely squeezed onto our T4.
But now we've done a restart kernel.
Everything should be bam all the way back down to zero again.
And now I'm going to run this next cell.
So we are now using Transformers, the main library from hugging face.
Not diffusers, not the image generation.
But we're back to normal transformers.
But we're not using it for text generation.
We're going to use it for to use a free text to speech.
You remember the TTS model we looked at last time?
We were using a paid model last time.
This time it's a free one.
It's from Microsoft.
It's the Microsoft Speech five TTS.
We're loading it in and we're going to say hi to an artificial intelligence engineer on the way to mastery.
And of course, it first needs to do a fair bit of of loading in.
And this would be a one time thing.
This wouldn't if you had this model loaded in memory, you wouldn't need to do all of this downloading
from hugging face that we're doing now.
You would only need to do the part that actually runs the model, which is hopefully relatively fast.
Um, but we'll just let this finish.
There it goes.
Coming across uh, and um, okay.
It's still it's got to, to download some more of the model.
It's also going so fast.
I know as soon as I stop it's going to finish, but I will see you in one second.
And actually for that to work I had to do a little pip install right here.
So I've added that in there.
You will need to run that first for this to work properly, but when you do then run it, you get this.
And then when I press play we'll see what we get.
Hi.
To an artificial intelligence engineer on the way to mastery.
There we go.
So we just generated some lovely audio on our free T4 box.
That was successful.
Congratulations!
You've used Google Colab to connect to a free GPU box in the cloud and use it to generate a number of
images, and you've used it to generate audio as well, using diffusers and using a transformer.
One more thing to do.
Okay, so I'm now going to connect to a powerful A100 box.
So I'm going to leave you as I go over to this.
If you wish you can come along with me.
Uh, the I'm going to let me do this now.
Change runtime, type a 100, disconnect and delete runtime.
Yes.
And save.
And are you still there?
I'm not a robot.
There we go.
It connects.
I moved so fast, it thinks that I'm automated.
Uh, so, um.
It's happened.
It's connected to an A100.
You can see, because I have 40 gigabyte Ram on my GPU, which is enormous.
Uh, and, uh, this is going to cost five compute units per hour and $10 costs about 100.
Sorry, $10 gets you 100 computer units.
So $1 gets you ten computer units.
So basically an hour is about $0.50.
That's about how much you pay for an hour use of this.
Come on.
It's not that bad.
I said I thought it was a couple of dollars.
It's it's not too bad.
And just to prove it, let's just print the name of the GPU.
The same code as before.
You can see now that it is an Nvidia A100 GPU, and it should have.
There we go 40GB of Ram.
And now I'm going to run another image generator.
And I'm using the famous Black Forest Labs Flux one, which is a model that that image people love to
talk about.
It comes in three different sizes.
Chanel and Dev and Pro.
And we're going for Chanel, which is the smallest, cheapest one.
Uh, because we don't have that much time to leave this running.
A class of data scientists learning AI engineering in a vibrant, high energy pop art style.
And with just four inference steps.
So leaving this running, I just got some code to time it as well.
Again, we're using this thing called a pipeline, which is the easy way to use hugging face code.
We're going to talk in the next couple of days about the easy way and the hard way and the easy way
are these pipelines that come kind of pre-baked.
So the pipeline is running.
It's starting by downloading tons of stuff in.
It all comes and then the A100 will be at work.
This is a super powerful, a beefy box that we're remotely connecting to right here.
And I will I will go away and wait for a while for this to complete, and I will see you when it's done.
Okay, that just completed.
So this was the famous Black Forest Labs, the flux one Chanel model.
The prompt, you remember, was a class of data scientists learning AI engineering in a vibrant, high
energy pop art style.
Look at that.
It's used 36.8GB of the 40GB available on the A100.
So it certainly, uh, we made the best use of our hardware.
Uh, let's see what Chanel was able to come up with.
Here is the result.
And I got to tell you, I think this is pretty cool.
That definitely looks like a vibrant pop art image of a bunch of aspiring AI engineers.
I'd say that is great.
And this time it wasn't running on free hardware, but the model was free.
Free open source model running.
And I guess, well, actually, you may be wondering how much it costs to do that.
So I did a little calculation here.
I got the total number of seconds, calculated the units per hour, and then turn that into an estimated
cost based on the fact that it costs about $10 to have 100 units.
And so it ends up that that actually in the end, it took 200 and 40s.
And my estimate, if I've done the maths right here, is that that cost $0.04 for us to create that
image in terms of our time on Google Colab, uh, which is actually quite similar to the cost, if you
remember that we paid for OpenAI, which just goes to show you that all these things end up being being
pretty similar in the end.
Uh, so there we go.
There you have it.
That is the result of us running image generation on a beefy A100 GPU that we have got access to by
running in the cloud on Google Colab.
And this colab, of course, is shared with you.
So you can come through and run this and have all of the T4 experience yourself.
And then should you wish to splash out a little tiny bit more, then you can get this A100 experience
too.
And of course, where they get you, is that sure?
It only costs $0.04 to actually generate that image, but I'm still running that A100.
You have to remember to go to runtime and say disconnect and delete runtime to to stop paying for it.
Uh, at any time you can come here and go to manage sessions to see all of the sessions you've got running
and make sure that you stop like this.
Terminate.
Off it goes when you're finished with a session.
And with that, that wraps up our exploration of Google Colab for today.
Okay.
And we got a lot done.
That concludes week three, day one.
It wasn't that much like pulling teeth in a dentist office.
There was some cool stuff there.
And in the meantime, you've been exposed to navigating the hugging face platform.
You've had your first little look at some of the hugging face libraries, although we haven't gone into
them yet, but you have run code on Google Colab, and in addition to that, you can of course confidently
code with frontier models and build a multimodal AI system with tools.
Congratulations!
Next time we're going to talk about the two different flavors of Hugging Face API.
We're going to dig into pipelines and use them for a bunch of AI tasks like generating text, generating
images and audio.
So much to do.
See you then.
067 - Well, if you're back here, then you won't put off by week three, day one.
And in fact, you want week three, day two.
And who am I to hold that back from you?
Here it is.
Welcome to more open source work.
And today we'll actually look at some code.
Well we looked at some code yesterday but we're actually going to go through it today.
You're already of course at a point where you confidently code with frontier models.
You build multimodal AI systems with tools.
And now you know about these two new platforms, Hugging Face and Google Colab and hugging Face itself.
You also understand is two things.
It's the hub, it's the code libraries.
All of that is clear to you.
And now we're gonna dive in to hugging face.
We're going to understand the two again.
Number two.
Two.
There are two different levels of code in hugging face, which is itself one of the two different things
you can do with hugging face.
And we're going to be focusing on pipelines today.
We're going to be using pipelines for a bunch of different inference tasks generating text, images
and audio.
Let's get started.
Okay, so yesterday we established that hugging face is a couple of different things.
It is the hub, the the website, and then it is the code that they have written that you can use and
that code itself, the hugging face API, the libraries itself also can be divided in two.
There's two parts to it.
Uh, there is the lower level code that we will be using a lot on this course.
When you actually mess around with tokens, with individual calls to models, you're looking at the
deep neural network, that code, that's where the really juicy stuff happens.
And a lot of time we're going to be spending, particularly in this week, in week seven, digging into
that.
But there's a bit of a learning curve to get there with that code.
And so hugging face built another another level of library on top of it, which gives you a kind of
simpler interface so that you can work very, very quickly on common tasks and not have to get into
so much detail with all the bits and pieces.
And so there are these two different levels, the higher level one and the lower level one.
And the higher level one is called pipelines.
It's a high level API.
It lets you carry out common tasks very easily.
The lower level one is is talking about tokenizers and models.
It's the real granular API where you get to work with the underlying deep neural network, and it gives
you the most power and the most control pipelines.
Quick and simple.
Get running fast.
Tokenizers and models are where you get to the raw power, so you use pipelines.
Then when you want to do something that's an out of the box pre-configured task, an inference task.
So one, when you're trying to run a model to achieve a business objective and the model has already
been trained, and you could do that with a bunch of code using the hugging face, lower level libraries.
But they've they've made it simpler for you by just just coding it for you for some common use cases.
And you can just use these things, these pipelines to make life simple.
So for example, sentiment analysis is one saying whether a particular sentence is is a good a happy
sentence or a sad sentence, a positive movie review or a negative movie review.
A classifier, something which takes something and says is this, say a person or a place?
A named entity recognition task is one that takes a sentence and tags words and says, are these people
or places?
Uh, question answering is a core Jen AI task of given a question and some contexts can you answer it?
Summarization.
We did of course, in week one.
You know it's so well as a core Jen AI task.
And then translation is another one that we we haven't necessarily directly talked about it, but you
may have built it in as part of the exercises in in week one as well, and also in week two.
So these are all super common inference tasks.
You've got a model, you want to run it.
And this gives you a way to do it in just a few lines of code using hugging face pipelines.
And we're now going to go and generate content using pipelines.
We're going to do some text and images and audio, which we already did, but we'll just do it again.
Now that you know what pipelines are, you'll have a little bit more to look to.
And so with that I'm going to first, of course, we're going to go to Google Colab, which is where
we run this.
But one more time I'm going to start by going to cursor to show you where the link is to Colab.
Let's go there.
Recognize this.
It's cursor.
Here we go into week three folder.
We go to day two which is where we are right now.
Week three day two hugging face pipelines.
You click the link that's right here.
And up comes Google Colab.
Week three, day two.
Let's go.
And so again, the hugging face gives you these two different levels that you can work at.
One is the lower level one we'll do tomorrow.
But today we're doing with pipelines.
And pipelines is so simple.
You create a pipeline with something like this.
You create a pipeline by by telling it what task you want to do to create a pipeline object like this
that doesn't run the task.
It just creates this thing, my pipeline, which is in fact a function you can call you've now got something
built.
And at any point you can call that pipeline with input and you'll get the result and that's it.
It's as simple as that.
You create a pipeline with various parameters, the task potentially other things too.
And then you call it with different inputs.
And you can obviously do this multiple times in many different inputs.
This is like a one time activity to build your pipeline.
That's the pipelines API.
A couple of Google Colab Pro tips to get you started.
I want to mention that data science code, like the code we're going to run often, is quite chatty.
It will give you lots of messages.
It will give you warnings quite often.
They love to give warnings, deprecation warnings, which is just telling you that something might be
removed and it will probably will be removed in the future, but it's still there now.
But this is telling you it's going to happen at some point.
And other bits of text and warnings, and you should be somewhat immune to this stuff that plenty of
it comes along and look at it, glance at it.
If something alarms you, then sure, dig into it.
But otherwise just take note of it.
And if something goes wrong later, remember what you saw and see whether any of it is a clue as to
what's happened later, but don't let it hold you up.
I do get lots of questions from people that see warnings and are worried that there's an error, they
say.
And it's not.
It's just hugging face, being chatty.
You can just safely ignore it and push on.
So building that instinct for what's a real error and something is broken versus it's just hugging face,
being talkative.
That's something just to get with experience for the time being.
Just just let it let it wash over you when you see various notes and warnings.
The other thing to mention is that at any point today or yesterday, or in any of these colabs in the
future, you might find you hit something like this a runtime error Cuda is required but not available
for blah blah blah.
Please consider installing blah blah blah.
It's a very misleading error message.
People often hit that and then they're like, oh, I need to install things and they start installing
stuff, and then they email me and they say, I'm stuck.
And there's like pages of installations and oh my goodness, what are you doing?
Uh, and, uh, the reason is this what's actually happened is that Google has decided to bump you off
a GPU box and has put you onto a CPU box in the middle of what you were doing, and you didn't realise
because Google doesn't always.
It puts like a note down here somewhere.
I think it's easy to miss.
And so suddenly you're in a different computer without a GPU and nothing's installed and working.
And the solution to this, when it happens is simple.
You have to go through the steps I mentioned yesterday when you go to the runtime menu, uh, disconnect
and delete runtime, and then you go to edit and clear all outputs.
So everything is reset.
So you're not confusing yourself.
You don't need to do that, but it just means that you're quite clear.
And then you go back to the very top of the lab and you run it from the top, sell any Pip installs
on downwards and all will be great.
And that getting getting into the discipline of doing that if something goes wrong and if you're bumped
off the box that's something to to to to keep, keep in mind watch out for that.
Uh, and don't get sidetracked into lots of weird installations.
All right, with that out of the way, let's get on.
068 - Okay, so you'll see over on the right here.
I have already connected to a T4.
You may have to press that button, connect to T4.
Remember go drop down.
Make sure this says connect to a hosted runtime T4.
If you're not sure if it's not a T4, change the runtime type.
Make sure T4 is selected and always go here and to view resources so that you get this little picture
here of what's going on.
Check your gpu Ram.
You can see I already ran this and look at that gpu Ram, but I've since I've gone to runtime and I've
done restart session which is cleared up all of my Ram, but it's kept my disk together.
I'm gonna make that a little bit smaller so it's not using up too much room, but I keep an eye a healthy
I always over on the right.
Okay.
Uh, the another little bit of talk from me.
I know I said this a fair bit during during last week, but I just want to mention one more time the
distinction between training and inference that many of you know.
But just to reinforce, in case you don't, when you use a data science model for the first time, the
first thing you need to do is feed it with lots of data, lots of examples to train it to be good at
doing what you want it to do.
And of course, with GPT, the P in GPT stands for pre-trained, which is saying that OpenAI spent like
$100 million pumping all the data on the internet and lots more through it to try and get it very good
at predicting the next token.
And that training process is a huge palaver, which happens.
And when it's done, you have a pre-trained model.
From that point on, the activity you're doing is called inference.
It's you're saying we've now got a new input which you haven't seen before.
You didn't see this during training.
It's something different.
And we want you to predict what should come next.
We want you to do your task for this new input and that whole thing.
Running a model that's been trained is called inference.
It's a fancy word, but it's just saying run the model and we'll be doing inference today.
The pipelines API is all about inference.
Okay.
Then the first cell.
Here is a pip install.
Remember the top cell is always where you put your pip installs and you always have to rerun this if
you get bumped off.
If you're wondering what this does, pip install minus q means please be quiet.
Don't give me lots of output.
Otherwise pip installs can fill up screens with information.
Minus minus upgrade is saying even if you already have this installed, I want you to reinstall it carefully
with the instructions I'm going to give you.
Data sets is one of hugging faces famous libraries and it comes already Pip installed on every colab,
but I want to force it to use version 3.6.0, which is a version from about six weeks ago.
Because after that, hugging face just released an update and they changed a bunch of stuff, which
means that some some of the hugging face code doesn't doesn't work with that version, blah blah blah.
This process is known as pinning a version.
It's pinning data sets to 3.6.0.
And when you look in this cell, you might see that I've pinned lots more and you might have more in
future colabs.
And that's because over time, things change and and people break things all the time.
And so poor people like me have to come through and pin versions of libraries to make sure it all still
works.
It's very common activity that people get into.
All right.
So the first thing to do is to run this cell.
And for me it should run nice and fast because I've already installed that version.
It should see that, uh, and that that will be happening right away.
It's done.
Okay.
So the next cell is the same one we did last time when we just check the GPU.
If you've done everything right, then we'll be on a T4.
It should say here Tesla T4.
There it is.
Great.
And do we have our memory.
We do have 15GB of of GPU Ram which we love.
And the next is a whole ton of imports.
And you'll see here that we are importing some pipelines from transformers import pipeline.
Uh, that that is the key import we've got here.
And we've also we're also importing something called diffusion pipeline, which is another set of pipelines
for diffusion models that we met last time for the first time.
But they are like they generate images rather than text.
Okay, that is run.
The next one is connecting to a hugging face account.
Now, you did this yesterday because you were great and thank you.
But if you didn't, then you were bad and are disappointed.
But you can rectify the situation quickly by going to hugging Face.
Set up a free account creator.
Go to the avatar menu tokens.
Create an API token.
Be sure it has write permissions.
If you don't do that, everything will go wrong.
Uh, and then uh, remember, you add it to your secrets.
You press this button here and actually you will need to do this.
Even if you did it yesterday, you still need to activate it.
Give this notebook access every time it remembers the token.
You don't need to paste it back in, but you need to give it access to this colab.
Um, and so, yes, as I say here, even if you already did it, you do need to click on that key button
and turn on the switch.
And then when you run it you should see hugging face key looks good so far.
And it should log in.
Great.
Okay.
Onwards.
So as I mentioned before, there are two steps to using pipelines.
The first of them is when you create the pipeline that you want to use.
And when you do so, you do it by specifying a task.
And optionally you can specify other things to the task is something like I want to do summarization
or whatever, whatever you want to do, the model you can specify is which open source model you want
to use for this purpose.
You don't need to specify one because hugging face can just pick one automatically.
So we start by just not specifying.
And device is where you can say if you want it to use a GPU and we do.
And the device you specify if you want to use an Nvidia GPU like we have is Cuda.
Cuda is the name of the specific technology invented by Nvidia, which runs on graphics cards, which
allows you to do this maths in parallel.
Massively.
Uh, it's like a it's a programming language.
It's it's similar to C++, but it's intended for this kind of parallel compute.
Uh, and then uh, if you are doing this, if you're trying this locally on your computer.
Uh, which is bold of you, then if you're using a PC, then Cuda would be the way with an Nvidia chip.
If you're using a mac, you have to use something called MPs, which stands for Metal Performance Shader,
which is the name of Apple's graphics libraries for Apple Silicon if you're using an Apple Silicon computer.
So, uh, once you've done this and you've set this thing up, you can then call it as often as you
want with different inputs.
And, uh, it will do that.
All right.
You're like, enough explaining.
Let's do this.
Okay.
So here we go.
Sentiment analysis.
My simple sentiment analyzer, you can call it what you want.
This is just creating the pipeline.
The task is the first thing you pass in.
Sentiment analysis is an example of a task.
We'll get all the tasks later.
Devices Cuda is saying I want to use I've got a T4, I want to use this Ram over here and I want it
to classify.
I'm super excited to be on the way to LLM mastery.
So when I run this it starts with a bunch of texts and warnings and stuff.
And like I say, it's like, who cares?
It's saying no model was supplied defaulting to and the name of a model and revision using a pipeline
without specifying a model name and revision in production is not recommended.
Well, good for you Huggingface for not recommending it.
We're doing it anyway, and we're not in production right now.
Uh uh, and uh, but this is and device set to Cuda is just like, hey, I want to tell you we're using
the GPU.
Good.
Uh, this is the result, uh, the the, uh, assessment from this particular model is that this is
a positive statement.
Uh, it's a happy statement, and it gives it a score of, like 99.9% chance of it being positive like
that.
Fantastic.
Your first task that ran on, on not on your computer, but it ran on the computer you're renting from
Google and it ran pretty easily.
Congratulations.
Okay, let's up the ante a bit.
Let's let's try this thing here.
Remember, because we've already created the pipeline, we can just call it as much as we want with
different inputs.
And we're going to call it with this input here.
I should be more excited to be on the way to LM mastery.
And that's a hard one because of course the sentiment is sort of iffy.
That's not such a great sentiment.
I should be it's really saying I should be more excited.
Uh, but that's super hard to, to to see that.
And you imagine any kind of obvious clues something's looking for is going to see that as being a positive
sentiment.
And sure enough, if we run it, it does give it a positive sentiment.
Uh, it gives it a bit lower percentage chance, not 99.9.
Now it's just 90.1.
Uh, but nonetheless, it misclassifies that, I guess, I don't know, maybe it's debatable, but that's
probably not the right answer.
So let's try a different model.
Remember that when you're creating a pipeline, you can specify a model.
And the model that you put here is anything you can take from hugging face.
Remember when we were hugging face the the the platform the the hub?
One of the options, one of the navbar items is models.
And when you're in there you can search for different models for different tasks, and classification
or sentiment analysis is one of them.
And you can then look at different models, use that as a way to browse models and read about them,
see who makes them, see their results, and see how many stars they're getting, and use that as a
way to select and try out some models and do some experimenting.
In terms of this name of this model, just to explain, Bert is a super famous model that was created
in the early days by by Google.
It was one of the first of these Transformers.
Um, the, uh, the uncased word there means that this particular model doesn't care whether something
is in uppercase or lowercase.
Everything is just is just converted to lowercase or whatever.
It ignores.
Case.
Case insensitive.
That's the word I'm looking for.
Uh, it's a sentiment model, multilingual.
So it can do this in different languages as well.
That's interesting.
Uh, so otherwise this is this is now going to be us exploring, trying out a different model.
And so let's try first of all, I'm super excited to be on the way to LLM mastery.
So this is actually this is a uh giving a Star rating rather than just the positive and negative.
So it's a bit more refined, and it says it's 60% sure that this is a five star rating.
Okay.
That's interesting.
This is the I'm super excited one.
Let's change it to the more interesting.
I should be more excited.
Let's try that.
I should be more excited, which is probably not awesome.
Uh, let's see if it can figure that out.
Yes.
So it predicts that this is a three star review.
And obviously we all know from from reviews that in practice, a three star review is distinctly iffy.
Uh, so I would say that's quite accurate, that it is.
It is seen that this is in fact a sort of three star territory, not more than that.
So of course, the action for you is to now go look in the hugging face Harbor, go to models, find
different classification models, experiment and explore.
See what you learn by trying different popular models and seeing what you can get to give different
results here.
The great thing about pipelines is it's so easy to experiment.
069 - Okay.
Next up, this thing called named entity recognition that I mentioned is the thing that can tag words
as whether they are associated with different types of thing.
So here we have a sentence.
Uh uh, well, first of all we're going to create our pipeline.
The task is ner named entity recognition devices Cuda.
Uh, we're then once we've got our NER pipeline, we then can call it and we'll call it with an input.
AI engineers are learning about the amazing pipelines from hugging face in Google Colab, from editor
Donna.
Lots of entities in that will iterate over the results and print each one of them.
Let's run this.
We get a bunch of warning stuff.
Ignore it, ignore it.
Uh, and uh, look at that.
I haven't even read what that is.
It's obviously unhappy about something, but I don't care.
The.
Okay, so we've got a bunch of these entities.
Uh, some of them are org, some of them are misc miscellaneous, and some of them are per person.
Okay.
And uh, let's see what they are.
So they each are given an index.
Uh, the first of them is AI and the next is engineers.
And then you'll see that hugging face got split up because it's doing it like token by token, uh,
which I guess we're going to come onto tokens in a bit, but but you remember them from, uh, from
from week one.
Uh, so each token got tagged, but they are all done as, like, as a thing hugging face.
And, uh, Google Colab gets also done as a, as a misc.
It doesn't know what that is, but editor Donna gets a person there I am.
So it's correctly categorized the different things in this sentence.
Uh, and gives you an index into them.
So that is the named entity recognition task.
And there are a lot of, of business activities when it's important to be able to do this, be able
to pull out of a sentence, what are the things that are being referred to?
Next up is our nod towards our first time of doing something which is just a baby step towards the The
Mighty Rag.
It's about answering questions when you're given a bit of context.
So supposing we have a question like what are hugging face pipelines?
And we've got some context which is a bit more detail about it.
Pipelines are high level API for inference of llms with common tasks.
So we can then have a pipeline.
We can make a pipeline that we'll call question answerer which is good at answering questions.
And the idea is you can always call it with a question and some context.
And then we will print the result.
So I'll just run that right away.
And no doubt it will do a decent job of uh uh, there's it's answer.
Inference of llms with common tasks are pretty simple.
Nothing.
It's not rocket science, this one.
Uh, but we are using, I think, quite, quite small models.
By the way, if it's taking a lot longer for you, that's because I already ran this, so I downloaded
all the models already.
When you run this, it's going to download the model each time.
It's going to take a lot longer as it did for me the first time, but I didn't want to be wasting around.
Uh, so so be be comfortable with the fact that it will take a bit longer, but obviously that time
has only been spent building your pipeline.
Once you've you built it, you can run it quickly, as often as you want.
Same kind of performance as me.
Um, and.
Yeah, just to tie the last two together, you might be saying.
Okay, well, that's very well, but the only way you'd be able to do that is if you were able to,
to always provide relevant context that matches the question that's being asked.
Well, here's a thought.
You could run a named entity recognition on the question.
And then for the entities that come back, you could look them up in your database to retrieve anything
you have any information.
If it's a customer chatting with you about a different product, you could use named entity recognition
to pluck out the name of the product they're asking about.
And then you could just look that up in your database and put that in as the context and ask the question.
You see it all.
It all comes together.
That's how you could use these different tasks.
Now of course, there is a better way and a more general way.
And we'll be dealing with that in a couple of weeks.
And it's called Rag.
But this gives you some of the interesting building blocks that you can put into practice right away.
And then the next two are just such standard Genii things.
First of all, summarization.
This is a pipeline.
The task we pass in is summarization.
We then have some text where I blathered away about the hugging face Transformers library, incredibly
versatile and powerful tool for blah blah blah.
And then we ask it to summarize it.
We give it some fields like maximum length and so on.
And here we get back something nice and concise.
Uh, the hugging face Transformers library.
Incredibly versatile and powerful tool for natural language processing.
It's not that not not that concise, but it's more concise than my waffle here.
So there you go.
That is summarization, uh, in a hugging face pipeline.
Um, and now translation translating, say English to French.
We'll use this pipeline translation Ian to fr.
And here is a sentence.
The data scientists were truly amazed by the power and simplicity of the Hugging Face pipeline API.
And we will translate that, uh, and uh, for the French speakers on you, you can see whether you
think this is any good.
We'll see.
Uh, it's thinking about that.
Okay.
I'm not.
I'm not gonna read it out.
Um, my high school level French is not going to survive.
Uh, you're scrutiny, but there you go.
That is the answer.
Hopefully that is acceptable.
Uh, now, uh, you can also translate between other languages.
And I put a link there to the Hugging Face Models page already filtered on translations.
And you can you can pick you can pick by the language.
You can filter on language and then pick the model that will translate for you.
There are some very specific languages.
There's a big movement towards making translators for rarer languages, uh, where this is something
that could be like a language that's, that's, that's fading out, that people want to encourage and
have people use it more.
And it's really great that there are so many models for that.
So stop talking and run this thing.
Uh, we can also use this particular one to translate it into Espanol.
And again, my hopeless level of Spanish is, uh, is not Not yet as good with that as I am with that.
But but, uh, hopefully this is a good translation.
You will be able to confirm.
All right, so those are the two classic, uh, gen AI use cases.
And you might be thinking, hang on, editor, I can just use ChatGPT for that.
Or I can just use GPT AI and do summarization and do translation.
And of course you can.
Yes, but you have to pay for it and you're doing trillions of calculations.
This time we're using a much, much smaller open source model that has been optimized just for translation
or just it's been fine tuned just for translation or just for summarization.
And so you're able to do something basically for free or, you know, we're on a free box here, but
if you wanted to do it at scale, you'd have to pay something, but it would be very cheap and very
fast.
And you have all the code and the weights.
So by focusing on a task and using a small model that is specialized on that task, you can do more
with less.
You can get get more accomplished at a very cheap price point and very fast.
So that that is the point.
Uh, let's move on.
Classification is something where you can pass in a classifier.
A zero shot classifier means I'm not going to give you any examples.
I'm just going to give you a sentence.
I'm going to give you some buckets.
And I'm going to say put the sentence in a bucket.
And so our sentence is hugging face.
Transformers library is amazing.
And the labels are technology sports or politics.
Uh, and uh, let's see what it says.
See what it says.
It's going to put it in a bucket.
It's going to give us some warnings first because it just loves doing that.
And here we go.
The labels.
It's putting it in technology, sports and politics.
It gives it a 95% chance of being technology.
It gives it a 3% chance of being sports.
And it gives it a 1.8% chance of being politics.
Uh, so so there you have it.
You should experiment with this and figure out what what kinds of buckets, what works.
Well.
And you can also experiment with different models too, and see if anything can can be absolutely confident
that it is technology.
Okay.
And then the next one is the final text.
Text related one is going to be, uh, text generation.
That obviously the main thing that Llms do, if I want you to if there's one thing I want you to remember
about using Huggingface pipelines, it's and now this is going to be using Gpt2 by default.
Gpt2.
Remember that timeline Gpt2 is from a bygone era, but it's kind of fun to do this because it gives
you a little sense of what these models used to do with this.
Uh, it's going to be super random.
And it's I do I like to tell people that it's very similar.
GPT two is very similar to like picking up your phone and just pressing the predictive text button again
and again.
If anything, it's even worse than that.
Even predictive text is better than that.
Now, if there's one thing I want you to remember about using hugging face pipelines, it's that you
don't need to be a programmer to understand how they work.
That's pretty good.
The best way to learn about them is simply by using it for a few days.
I can't disagree with that.
However, there are some things you should do to learn the tools.
You can use the following commands to add some features into your Hugo lists.
Now, now we're off.
Now we're into into some random territory.
And basically, you know, you can see all this stuff is now complete nonsense.
Because remember, what llms are actually doing is just generating plausible text.
They're not they're not actually trained to give you the truth, just believable.
They imitate the believable tokens.
The fact that the bigger models are so often truth is something that is remarkable and somewhat surprising.
But this is what you see when you use a smaller model, an early model, you see this kind of nonsense.
It's believable nonsense.
It starts to to, to come up with, uh, this means you can use any tool, such as hugging faces own
plugin, for example.
I love the way it's so earnest with its like, like parentheses, but complete drivel.
So there you have it.
That is text generation using the default model GPT two from back in the day.
070 - And for my next trick, I want to go back to image generation.
This is the same as the thing that I showed you yesterday.
Uh, but, uh, now you just know a little bit more about it.
We're using pipeline again, but using pipeline for diffusion models rather than transformers, the
image generation models.
I'm using this one.
I think the first one I showed you yesterday, the stable diffusion, I think I called it stability
diffusion yesterday when I was like I suddenly got confused with I was like, that doesn't sound right.
Stable diffusion is the name of the model from stability AI the company stable diffusion Excel turbo.
Uh, and uh, this is uh, the prompt we did yesterday, our class of students learning AI engineering
in a vibrant pop art style.
And you'll remember it's not like it's fantastic, but it's a it's a perfectly decent image, given
that we're running on a tiny free, uh, box a T for up in the cloud.
Um, look at that.
It's got that complaint.
Use dtype instead.
Well, well, we probably can make that change.
Uh, you can feel free to change torch dtype to dtype as it's complaining with something that is deprecated,
but it's still going to work just fine.
We will let it do its thing and I will.
This.
This one can take ten minutes.
So I will see you when it's done and it's finished for me.
And here it is again.
Another kind of crazy, hokey but fun image generated of you and I guess me together doing a class in
a pop art, vibrant style.
You can see that it's really almost maxing out my GPU.
It's possible that you'll need to have restarted.
You need to go to runtime restart session and remember to run that pip install.
Oh sorry, you don't need to run the pip install if you just restart the session.
Don't need to bad me.
Uh, so just restart the session and then uh, you could rerun the pip install, but it won't make any
difference.
It's already installed.
You just rerun this cell.
Uh, and, uh, that should work nicely.
And finally, audio generation.
We did this as well yesterday.
I'm going to try and run this two on this computer, but it's obviously it's a very nearly maxed out.
We'll see if it can handle it.
This is the using again the Transformers pipeline.
It's done it.
It's the Microsoft Speech five text to speech synthesizer.
And um, if you get an error about data sets, then that means that you don't you hadn't run the pip
install at the top.
You'll need to, uh, start again with a new server and then run that pip install.
But let's hear it.
Hi to an artificial intelligence engineer on the way to mastery.
Very nice.
Okay.
Hello to you too.
There we have it.
That is using pipelines.
You can see it's just exactly the same format.
We create our pipeline, we call it synthesizer and then we call the synthesizer.
We just also have to pass in this this special thing which is like a describes the type of speech we're
looking for.
Okay.
That is our tour of the main pipelines available to you from hugging face.
But wait, there's more.
There's many more.
There's lots of available pipelines for transformers and diffusers, and a student suggested that I
include links to it, which is a great idea.
And here it is.
If you go to this page here, previous page sending you there, you get a list of all the different
kinds of pipelines that you can pick from in the pipelines documentation.
And then separately, I've also linked to the diffusers page which shows you all these different types
of diffusion image related pipelines.
So the the mission for you is to go and explore and experiment.
This is your moment.
Pipelines are so easy to use.
You don't need to worry.
It's going to be harder when we get a bit deeper tomorrow.
But for now, this this is all about experimenting.
And the thing to keep in mind is that you're using open source models, so it's all free.
So this is all stuff that people have built and shared and it's yours to enjoy.
So so go do it and take it as an opportunity both to do some serious learning and also some serious
fun.
But as you're getting to learn more about Google Colab, I do think it's important that I give you at
least one more pro tip so that you have a lot of the features of Colab at your disposal.
So there's one special setting made available in Google Colab that actually a student brought my attention
to.
So if you could go to settings, Open Settings to make sure that that you're taking advantage of this
to miscellaneous and then tick Corgi mode, this setting right here, an important one, and you press
save.
Uh, and Corgi mode is a technical term for a mode you can set that has a Corgi running across the top
of your Google Colab.
Uh, and you may ask yourself, why exactly did Google feel the need to have a Corgi run across your
colab?
And I think Google would say, why not?
Uh, so so you can you can have Corgi corgis, multiple corgis going across your colab, but you don't
need to stop there.
You could also have, uh, there's another corgi coming.
Lucky us.
You can have kitties and crabs as well should you desire.
And if your manager is ever concerned that you're not working hard enough, you can demonstrate how
hard you're working.
Um, but then also there is a setting here for the power level of the of the Colab.
You might be concerned to see that it's set to no power.
It's it's worth having some power in your colab.
And if you turn it to some power, then if I say, what exactly is this doing, I wonder then, uh,
I don't know what happening.
Uh, it all goes a bit crazy.
Uh, it has sparks, and then you get a combo score on the right to demonstrate your power, and.
Okay, this is you're thinking.
Come on.
I got some learning to do, but many power used with caution.
Uh, I always work with many power.
Uh, so some silliness.
Google having some fun with you?
Uh, should you wish to entertain others, then feel free to use the miscellaneous settings.
But I think at this point I will maybe turn this back to no power for the remainder of the course.
Wow, you've reached the 30% point with 30% on the way there.
To you being LM experts, you can confidently code with frontier models.
You can build a multi-modal AI assisted in your sleep, and as of today, you can use the hugging face
pipelines for a very wide range of different common inference tasks.
And additionally, you can do it with corgis running across the top of your colab should you so desire.
All right, next time we roll up our sleeves, we dig in.
We go under the hood to look at tokenizers translating between text and tokens, understanding special
tokens, chat templates.
And there's going to be what I hope will be like an aha moment for you when you get a real sense of
how these things work under the hood.
All right, prepare for that.
I'll see you then.
071 - Well, it's about to get real.
Everybody, welcome to week three.
Day three.
This is where we dig in.
You're already confidently coding with frontier models, building AI assistants and using the pipelines
in hugging face.
Remember them, create a pipeline and then call it as often as you like with different inputs.
But now we're going to actually run the code that runs anyway when you create a pipeline.
But we're going to go and do it ourselves, and we're going to start by looking at these things called
tokenizers.
Tokenizers the things that translate between text and numbers for that a model.
They are mathematical things.
They deal with numbers, not words.
And understanding the special tokens and the way that chat templates work, it's a big deal.
And so to introduce the tokenizer.
So the tokenizers are a bit of code that maps between natural language and numbers, that represents
that natural language, and that's its job.
And to be clear, there are actually two steps to this job.
And this is something which causes some confusion.
There's a bit of a terminology glitch here that a lot of people get slightly wrong, including myself,
and it doesn't.
It doesn't really matter.
But people use these terms loosely sometimes.
But to be to be strict, the stuff you begin with is natural language.
It's words and letters that make up a sentence.
That's your starting point.
A tokenizer first turns this into a bunch of things called tokens, which are these little chunks of
words?
Very much like when we did this in week one in the user interface, we saw this colored in chunks.
Each of those is a token.
A token is a block of letters together that makes up a part of a word, or it can be a whole word,
or sometimes it can be two words, but that is a token.
And then a tokenizer turns that into a number.
Every token, every possible token has a different number associated with it.
So the word and I think we saw had a number 300, something I've forgotten with, with GPT.
Uh, so, so uh, each, each of the possible tokens is mapped to a number which is sometimes called
the token ID, and that is like its index in its list of all possible tokens.
And so to be strict, there are these there are these two different terms token and token ID.
The token is the fragment of word.
The token ID is the number that represents that.
People often say token when they mean token ID and it doesn't really matter.
But but strictly speaking the token is the chunk, the ID is the number.
And so the tokenizer has a dictionary.
And I mean that both in the Python sense.
But also just like in the normal sense, it's got like a lookup thing which has a list of all the possible
tokens that it knows about, and an ID associated with each one that it will it will use to look up
a chunk and replace it with its ID.
And that dictionary contains that that vocab, all the possible things that it can that can break things
down into all the possible tokens.
And it also contains a few special tokens that don't map to any natural language word, special tokens
that are going to be used to inform the model about something.
An example special token.
There is one that represents.
This is the beginning of a prompt.
This is the start of what I want to tell you.
That's a special token.
And so that that is something that has its own number.
Like let's say it's the number ten.
Then the number ten will be used in the numbers we pass into the LM anytime we want to represent.
This is the start of a prompt.
We're going to put in the number ten in there.
And that's how it will know.
This is the start of a prompt.
And let me be super clear, just in case you've got any confusion on this point, when I say that the
LM is going to know that ten is the start of a prompt or something, I'm not suggesting that there's
something in the neural network where we've configured it so that the number ten means the start of
the prompt, or that there's anything inherent in the transformer architecture that's expecting special
tokens.
All I'm telling you is that we reserved the number ten for this purpose.
And in all the training data, the masses and masses of training data.
We repeatedly use the number ten at the start of every single prompt, and because we always did that,
the neural network learned over time from all the examples that that that that is an indication that
what's coming next is the beginning.
And it got better and better at predicting next tokens when it saw similar kinds of constructs.
So it's the same as like the old fashioned models that predict someone's credit rating based on a few
factors.
You're giving it information, and by giving it enough examples, over time, it learns how to weigh
up these different factors to to predict someone's credit rating.
Well, obviously this is the same thing, but but many, many orders of magnitude bigger.
And given enough examples, with the number ten always starting a new prompt, it has seen those patterns
and it replicates those patterns.
And so starting a prompt with the number ten with that token ID, uh, orients the statistics correctly
so that it predicts patterns better.
That's the point.
I hope that made some sense to you because it's really important.
We will come back to it a few times, but this idea that special tokens, they're only useful because
we've done it that way in all the training data.
That's the point of them now, different Llms don't need to use the same approach for tokenizing, for
turning text into token IDs.
In fact, they typically don't.
Typically when when someone's building a model, they build the tokenizer that they think makes the
most sense, that treats words, that turns them into IDs in the way that they like, and uses special
tokens in the way that they want to for training.
And so you have potentially a different tokenizer for every model that you work with.
Um, meta led the way for open source llms with the llama model, and there's a llama tokenizer, Microsoft
is fi.
We'll look at its tokenizer.
Deep seek has a tokenizer.
We'll use its one deep seek is now on deep seek 3.2 for me.
But that's still an experimental model.
So we'll stick with Deep seek 3.1 And then we'll look at a coda tokenizer for Quinn 2.5 coda.
And so we will play with these different tokenizers in a second.
And the important thing to keep in mind is that a model has its own tokenizer.
There's no reason why a particular model needs to use the same tokenizer as another model.
It's just part of how they decided to map words to numbers for the purposes of that model, and to to
just cover two typical questions people have.
One of them is that, uh, people ask, okay, so does it matter?
Is one model more efficient because it's able to use fewer tokens for the same sentence, so it's cheaper?
It's honestly not worth worrying about anything like that.
These decisions are very small, trivial decisions that people made to try and get a bit more juice
out of their model.
If one tokenizer makes fewer tokens, then maybe you're saving like a fraction of a cent in terms of
your your input token use.
But maybe the model gives slightly worse results or slightly better results.
You know, that's a much more important factor is the quality of the results.
Given the input you give it, rather than exactly how many tokens it maps to and how that works.
That's something of a red herring, so you don't want to get too bogged down in why different tokenizers
produce different numbers of tokens.
It's more just important to understand that a tokenizer belongs to a model without getting hung up on
on the kinds of tokens it creates.
And then the final point that is a confusion to some people that have already heard about vectors.
Vectors is an important property of llms and we will come back to vectors a lot.
And tokens are not the same as vectors, and vectors come from deeper within the neural network after
the tokens have been what's called embedded into a model.
And so for those that know about these vectors, just just keep in mind that that all models, including
models that that create vectors, take in tokens as their inputs.
Because statistical models can only talk in numbers, they don't they don't know what it means to have
a word.
So that you have to input something in the form of numbers.
And the numbers that we choose are the token IDs.
That's how we first feed information into a model.
What comes out might be a vector embedding.
It might be the next token.
It might be lots of different things we might get out of it.
What comes in is token IDs for all models.
And so tokenization is like a step before you get to things like vectors that we will cover later.
So just in case that was confusing you just to clear that up okay.
And with that we're going to go to Google Colab again.
And this time I'm not going to get a cursor and say it's in the week three day three, because you know
that now you know where to go.
You know how to bring it up.
You're not going to ask me.
So we'll go straight to Colab.
And remember, we're looking at the deeper, grittier way of interacting with hugging face.
And the real power of it is about using models, which we're going to do tomorrow.
What we're doing today is like a prequel.
It is the the Tokenizers, which is setting the stage for what we do tomorrow.
But let's go now and work with some tokenizers.
072 - Okay, so here we are in Colab, the week three day three Colab.
I want to start by saying that that by the way, today's lab is going to be basically something you
could run on your own computer if you wish.
We're not really going to use any colab features, and it doesn't need to run on a T4 GPU.
You could run it on a CPU box in Colab if you want, but I'm just going to stick on the T4.
Keep it consistent with the other days just so that we're not not changing things, but but bear that
in mind.
So you brought up this colab.
You might as well connect to a T4.
I'm going to remember to view resources.
So you see what's going on.
Let's make that a bit smaller.
And also remember to go to the key button and turn allow notebook access for your hugging face token.
If you don't, it will prompt you and say do you want to at the right point.
Remember the pro tips.
Don't worry about warnings.
They come up all the time.
And remember, if you get some kind of Cuda error that you won't get today because we're not going to
do it.
But remember that for the future, you just have to start again with everything.
All right.
So we're going to start with some imports.
And we're going to do our logging in to hugging face and checking that we've got a Google Colab, uh,
GPU.
Uh, not that you need one, but but if you're doing things by the book, uh, and we do and it has
15GB.
Excellent.
Okay.
Next up is a little process to go through, which is like a super common thing that people go through
as AI engineers.
And it's called accepting terms of service with a model provider.
And here's the scoop using llama 3.1 llama, which is Meta's open source model.
A confusingly, O llama was named sort of an homage paying homage to llama, but that's why the names
are confusing.
But Llama is Mata's model.
Llama 3.1 is what we're going to use, even though that's like more than a year old now, it's still
for this particular size for like a 8 billion parameter model.
This is a great one that a lot of people use.
It's something of an industry standard, so I want to keep using it because you'll come across it a
lot.
But in order to use it, you need to agree to metas terms of service, which sort of says, look, I'm
not going to use this for for nefarious purposes, things like that.
And the way you do that is you have to visit their model page in Hugging Face.
So you click this link up, it comes click on here.
Here we have the model page.
This is the Meta Llama Llama 3.1 page for meta.
And if you look up here it says gated model, which means that you're not allowed access until meta
approves you.
You have been granted access because I have.
You will not have been yet unless you've done this before, in which case what you will see here is
instead a little form to agree to metas terms of service.
And here's the thing, though there is a little tiny process to go through.
It's going to ask you for your email address, which they want to have on record again, to make sure
that you're not using it for bad purposes.
And there's a trick, which is that when you give your email address, you need to make sure that it
matches the email address associated with your hugging face account.
Otherwise, I believe that that causes extra review, extra process.
So if you want to make sure that there's that this is just going to be easy peasy, then try and use
the same email address.
The other thing is that it will ask you for your organization affiliation at some point.
What what what what company associated with.
And my recommendation, of course, you should do whatever, whatever you want to do for this, but
I recommend that you think of what we're doing right here as being an educational endeavor, which it
is.
And I would suggest that you put down there something like, for me, I put down like Ed Donna, personal
Education.
And that was what I called my affiliation, because meta is using this as a way of checking that you
don't actually work for a competitor of theirs, and you're not trying to build something which will
then end up taking stuff away from them or something like that, using it again, maybe for nefarious
purposes.
And so giving them something that is a company that they have to research is something which could slow
down the process.
So I suggest making it clear that you're using this for personal education purposes.
Include your role as like AI developer, AI researcher, AI experimenter, whatever you want.
Something like that.
Um, be sure that you're communicating to meta that you're using this for educational purposes and that's,
you know, make make sure that you don't give them some information.
That means they think, oh, goodness, we've got to do some some more review on this.
So in my experience, when you do this, uh, one of three things happens.
You either get approved within a matter of minutes or even seconds.
The first time I did this, I refreshed my screen.
It was late Saturday night.
Uh, like in the middle of the night in England.
The first time I did this.
And it was approved almost immediately.
And so I imagine it's somewhat algorithmic if you fall into various, uh, basic parameters.
Uh, I've heard of people where it's taken a day or two before they get approved.
And then I've heard of some people where it's taken several weeks, and I imagine the day or two is
if it needs just a quick human eyeball.
And the several weeks is if something that you answered doesn't map to their to what they're expecting.
And so it needs a deeper review.
So try and avoid being in that category.
Do it the simple way if it happens to you.
I've put together a troubleshooting sheet that walks you through the different, uh, different steps
that you might have.
And at the bottom of it, here are some other tools and tips for how you can make sure.
And I say that thing about putting your name personal education right there.
And at the end of the day, if you're not able to get approval by with Lama it really doesn't matter.
The other models we'll look at, many of them don't need approvals at all.
I don't think deep seek does.
I don't think Quen does.
Quen I know doesn't.
And they are they are great.
These are great models.
You can use them instead of Lama throughout the entire course.
You might even get better results.
So I focus on Lama because it's so common in industry.
I think it's good to give you the visibility to models you may well use on on the job, but you really
don't need it.
Um, and if you have have any problems at all, just use Quen instead.
And so hopefully you got approved for Lama 3.1 immediately.
If not, just watch me instead.
Uh, and what we're going to do now is create our first tokenizer.
We do that using a hugging face class called auto tokenizer, which has this one static class.
This class method Frompretrained, which, uh, takes in a name of a model from hugging face.
So the hugging face model names.
It starts with the hugging face ID, which is the meta llama that is Meta's name of the Meta Llama account,
and then the name of the model itself, meta llama 3.18 B.
So you pass that in from pre-trained means.
This is a pre-trained model.
I want you hugging face to look this up.
And auto tokenizer means please create the right kind of tokenizer for this model and return it into
this variable tokenizer.
So I will do that.
You can see I already ran it, so it ran fast for you.
It probably takes like 20s or something.
All right.
So now I'm going to take some text.
I'm excited to show Tokenizers in action to my LLM engineers.
And I call tokenizer of that text.
And that encode is one of the, the main, uh, things, the methods you can call on a tokenizer turns
the text into tokens, and then I will print them.
Or to be pedantic, it is actually turning text into tokens.
It's turning text into token IDs.
But but again I'm being sloppy.
And people often I say tokens when you're really, strictly speaking, mean token IDs.
And here they are, because the tokens are just the word fragments.
Uh, here are the token IDs.
There they are.
Uh, you can see there's a bunch of them.
Uh, let's see how many there are.
So in that sentence, there were 61 characters that consisted of 12 words, and there are 15 tokens.
Seems roughly in line with that rule of thumb.
You remember the rule of thumb.
Rule of thumb is it's about about 0.75, uh, of a word to a token.
On on on average.
So there you have it.
These are the tokens.
These are the numbers.
These numbers like this make sense to an LLM.
It's expecting it's been trained off lots of numbers like that.
It wouldn't you couldn't put that text into a statistical model.
A weighted thing with lots of parameters that combines numbers.
It needs numbers.
You need numbers to combine numbers.
And here are the numbers that it would expect to receive.
And so I said encode is one of the key methods on a tokenizer.
The other one is decode.
So if we have a bunch of tokens or really token IDs, we can decode them.
And what we will get back is this.
Well that's interesting isn't it?
It's not exactly the same as what we started with because it's got this funky thing at the beginning
of it.
What is that?
Well, of course, as you probably guessed, that is a special token getting decoded.
What happened is, when we turned this into token IDs, we got this massive great token ID at the beginning
of it, which is not the I.
I do believe that 40 is I.
This huge number here, 128,000, which I think is actually the maximum, I think that is the number
of tokens there.
We'll check that in a second.
Um, that is mapping to this special token begin of text.
And it's like I told you, that is a special token which tells the LLM, hey, this is the start of
some text to you.
And it's not like like I say, nothing special in the in the neural network architecture.
It's just that that's how we did all the training data.
So the pattern matching that happens within it expects that kind of pattern.
Okay.
And then one final thing to show you is tokenizer batch decode.
Batch decode is a bit different to decode.
How is it different.
Well because it just gives you instead of giving you the whole sentence like this, it turns it into
the individual tokens.
I am excited to show Tokenizers in action to my engineers are are.
And that's showing you the individual token breakdown.
And notice that space on the front.
Do you remember that from week one that is showing you that some of these tokens have like a beginning
of word meaning ascribed to them, whereas this LLM here did not.
That was just a token showing a fragment of a word containing LLM.
So that is encoding and decoding with Tokenizers.
073 - And there's another method we can call get added vocab.
And this gives you a list of all of these special tokens that are in its vocab.
There's all of this, uh, there's like this begin of text that we saw.
So so I was I it does go beyond one 28,000.
It comes I think I think this is really the limit down here.
Uh, it, uh, there we go.
I think that might be the biggest number.
The, uh.
Um, so get, uh, we see there's a begin of text, special token, there's end of text, and then there's
lots of reserved things.
There's a header, uh, all this stuff that's a special vocab built into the vocab associated with the
tokenizer.
And in fact, the tokenizer has a field vocab which gives you its dictionary of everything, which is
big.
So I'm not gonna I'm not gonna print it, but I will get the length of it so we can see actually how
many things does it have.
And that's right, it has 128,256, because there are the 256 extra special ones shoved in at the end
of the 128,000.
That is the total size of llamas.
Tokenizer.
All right.
Now taking this one step further, this this llama model we've been looking at is an example of something
called a base model.
You remember that I mentioned way, way back that there are like base models and chat models and reasoning
models.
And this is a base model, which means it's not been it doesn't expect things like system prompts and
user prompts.
It's not have that in its training data.
It's there as like a fairly blank canvas.
It's a lot of training data, so it's not very blank, but but blanker than some other canvases.
It's ready for you to take it in a different direction if you wish.
There's a there's a variant of these models that are known as the the chat variants.
They're also sometimes called the instruct variants.
And these are ones that have been specifically trained more with system prompts, user prompts, assistant
responses, the kinds of backwards and forwards that we've have been playing with for the last couple
of weeks, those are known as the chat or instruct models.
And in fact, it is common in hugging face to refer to them with the word instruct rather than chat.
Although you do see both.
The instruct variants are the ones that have been specifically fine tuned to expect these series of
of prompts, and the kind people at Hugging Face have written a special utility called Apply Chat Template
and Apply chat template will take a an input in the form of the list of dictionaries that we know and
love from using OpenAI's API, and it will convert that into a set of special tokens and texts that
would be suitable for a prompt.
Now, you might be wondering.
You might be thinking, wait, wait wait, what?
What is that doing?
And I'm going to it's going to land for you in just a second when I show it to you.
So first of all, let's get ourselves a tokenizer, but not the one we did before, which looked like
that.
But this time we're adding hyphen instruct to the end of it, which means we want the instruct variant,
and that has a different tokenizer than the base model.
Okay.
So now we're getting this different tokenizer.
It's loading.
And it's different because it has more special tokens in there.
And let's see them.
So we're going to come up with a messages uh thing which is using the OpenAI format that we know a list
of dictionaries, roles, system content.
You're a helpful assistant role user content tell a lighthearted joke for a room of data scientists.
There we go.
A nice example set of prompts to a model, and I'm going to call tokenizer dot apply chat template,
which is a way that you can say I'm going to pass in a list of dicts.
And I want you to turn this into the right kind of thing that could be put into a model.
Let me run that and let me show you what you see.
We see this begin of text thing here.
Start header ID system end header ID.
It's actually inserted something in here knowledge cutoff date.
And today's date which is a different but also a long time in the past.
But it's for this particular chat template.
You are a helpful assistant that came from here.
And then this special token EOT and then start header user end header.
Lots of stuff happening here and then assistant.
Yeah and look at this ending here.
Then start head ID assistant end header ID.
What is going on here.
So this is the moment for you to have like this eureka moment which you may you may already know this,
but but if not, then you're going to have a eureka moment.
Uh, I have been giving you this, this idea for the last couple of weeks that this OpenAI format is
somehow like part of what an LLM expects, like the data science model is looking to have this, this
kind of list of messages passed in as if like the deep neural network, the transformer architecture
has like a sort of maybe a section for the system prompt and a section for the user prompt, and they
get passed in in various ways.
But that is of course not the way it works.
And LLM is a data science model.
It takes a sequence of numbers and it predicts the most likely next number.
It just deals in a set of numbers.
It doesn't take multiple sets of numbers.
It certainly doesn't take JSON.
It's not something that is like software.
It's a data science model.
Uh, and so there is this moment when you realize what's actually happening here.
What's actually happening is that when you type in, when you create this list of dicts and all the
rest of it, that gets converted into something which has a sequence, a series of words with special
tokens slotted in to say like, this is the start of a system prompt.
This is an end of a system prompt.
This is the start of a user prompt.
This is the end.
This is the start of the assistance response.
And that is what this thing is right at the end here.
And what the model is going to do.
It's going to predict whatever comes next.
And it's just going to feel obliged to predict something that seems consistent with an assistance Students
response to everything that came before it.
And the reason it's obliged to do that, the reason that it knows what these special tokens mean, is
not because of anything built into the neural network.
But again, it's just because the training data looked that way.
Tons and tons of training data was built with these special tokens in there with user message assistant
response, user message assistant response.
And so it's seen so many examples that statistically, it's likely to predict tokens that are consistent
with an assistance response.
That's all there is to it.
And hopefully that is the final piece of the puzzle, which for you is like, right, I get it now.
There's nothing special about user prompts and system prompts and all the rest of it.
It's just that they're identified with special tokens.
And there was tons of that in the training data.
So the pattern matching that is an LLM is used to seeing those patterns.
And so the tokens it generates are consistent with our objective of getting an assistant response.
That is it.
074 - And we will continue our exploration of Tokenizers by looking at a few others we're going to look at
five for from Microsoft Deep SEQ, 3.1 from Chinese upstart deep Sky and encoder 2.5 from Alibaba Cloud.
So I will load in those variables.
As always, it's the hugging face username Microsoft followed by the name of their model five for mini
instruct.
So it's an Instruct variant and then we will take some text.
I am curiously excited to show hugging Face Tokenizers in action to my LLM engineers.
Let's turn that into tokens or really token IDs and then decode them.
And we'll do it for Lama and then for five four.
So for Lama you can see here there's like a beginner text token.
And then I am curiously excited to show her hugging face.
Tokenizers.
And if you look down here, what you'll notice we're looking at the five four version.
So the numbers are completely different.
That's the first thing to notice, just different IDs.
It's been trained with different numbers and that doesn't matter at all.
So whatever numbers it's been trained with have to be consistent.
And it doesn't start with a special token.
So they've got a different approach, a different structure.
They've experimented, they've decided this suits their model better.
And you'll also notice that mostly the words matter the same way.
Except look at that hugging face when it came to llamas.
Tokenizer was hugging face, but when it came to Phi four it was hugging face.
So different.
Different tokenizers slightly different behavior.
And it's just worth appreciating that they're different but not worrying about it.
Uh, and uh, this is showing the apply chat template.
Uh llama we get these beginner text start header.
You'll notice llama has something that they also insert in there.
Uh but then and then there's these these headers.
The five for one is quite a lot simpler.
It has system end user and assistant.
And then the response.
So that's the difference between them.
The apply chat templates look completely different.
And all that matters is that this was used consistently during training okay.
And now we look at deep six tokenizer.
Um and so what I've got here is just showing side by side llamas tokens.
And this is five four tokens.
And this is deep six tokens for the same sentence.
Just to illustrate again the numbers are completely different.
Different vocab different IDs.
All that matters is the consistency with the training data.
Again if you look at deep six chat template it looks totally different.
It has a special token for beginning of sentence and then user and then assistant.
And the assistant prompt is just comes at the front of the whole thing.
That's how it's organized.
For deep seek you can see these subtle differences between them.
And then the final one I'm going to show you is a tokenizer for code.
So this here is the tokenizer for for um Quinn coder.
And so we bring in the tokenizer I've got some code as def hello world person print.
Hello, person.
Uh, a very complicated Python program there.
And we are going to then tokenize it and then just print out separately the, uh, the results.
Here you go.
You see, what I've done here is I've put the name of a token and then what words it represents.
And you can see that, uh, for example, underscore world is something that maps to some token.
And yeah, you can see that there are some constructs like, uh, close brackets.
Colon gets one token.
So and that seems to be quite, quite an early up token.
And I haven't done a deep analysis on this, but I rather imagine that there are much more common tokens
in this tokenizer that are related to common coding constructs than there might be in a tokenizer that's
not designed for a coding model.
So they might have optimized their tokens to make sure that they can get the most meaning associated
with the token in the way that they tokenize.
So just worth understanding that the tokenizer is associated with the model.
Different models might have a different strategy for how you convert natural language into these token
IDs, because its token IDs that models understand the numbers.
It's not like language or even lists of dicts get passed in to these models.
So today was a bit of a gentle day.
We just got through that pretty quickly, but I will make up for it tomorrow.
Tomorrow will not be gentle, but what you can do now, you can code with frontier models.
You can build a multi-modal AI assistant.
But importantly, not only can you use hugging face pipelines, but you now know about Tokenizers and
how they turn language into numbers, words into numbers, and fragments of words into numbers.
Next time we then dig into hugging face.
We use the models.
We use hugging face models to generate some text, and it's basically doing the same thing as we did
with the pipelines.
But now we are actually driving the model inference ourselves, which is really fun.
And there's other stuff for me to show you tomorrow.
So, so prepare for a big day and I will see you on the other side.
075 - Today is going to be great.
Today is a day when we get into some technical detail.
It's a day for the nerds like myself.
If you're not so much up for the day's for nerds, then this one you know I'll try and make tomorrow.
Be not for nerds.
Tomorrow is more commercial, but today.
Technical detail.
Let's get into it.
So what you can already do, of course, is code with quantum models, build AI assistants and now use
hugging face pipelines and Tokenizers.
Today though, is when we get more into models you're going to be working with hugging face transformers
library.
The models part of it.
We're actually going to be running and comparing five different open source models, from running the
actual Python code that drives a deep neural network ourselves, and we're going to use it as an excuse
to get a little bit deeper in the in the real stuff about how these neural networks work, what they
do, what are the layers of the neural network dimensionality, stuff like that.
But always from a practical point of view.
That's how I like to explain these things.
So by the, by the by we're going to cover three other things today.
Uh, that uh, I'm, I'm interested to talk to you about.
The first of them is something called quantization, which comes up in various places.
And it is a kind of a trick.
It's a it's a hack probably, if you will.
So most of working with these deep neural networks involves dealing with lots and lots of numbers,
lots of numbers, which are these parameters.
If you've seen my YouTube video that you know all about these parameters, there's a lot of them.
There's billions of them.
We've looked at line lines of how they've changed over the years, billions of these parameters, which
are numbers which get multiplied and added to other numbers with big matrix calculations on GPUs and
all of these numbers, basically the set during training time, they are all typically either 16 bit
or 32 bit numbers.
And probably most of you have a good sense of what that means.
It means that they're composed of of the ones and zeros in a computer, the binary digits, there's
16 of them, or 32 of them that make up the number.
And that means that they can take a very large variety of different values.
They are they can be massive numbers and they have a lot of precision.
Well, so there is a simplification.
You can do a way of cutting back the amount of memory that you use up by saying, look, we take each
of these numbers.
We store them using these either 16 or 32 binary digits, binary ones and zeros to make up this number.
What if we stored these numbers at lower precision?
We had we used fewer bits to make up a number.
It's equivalent.
If you imagine each of these weights, you could think of it like a dimmer switch for your lights.
And you turn the dimmer switch and your lights get brighter or darker.
And with 32 bits, or even with 16 bits, there's so many possible settings that it's almost like it
turns smoothly.
You can represent almost any number that you can think of with lots of decimal places and that that
that knob turns very, very smoothly when you're reducing it down to fewer digits, like eight bits,
which means that there's only 256 possible values, or even four bits.
A four bit binary number can only have 16 possible values.
Then it's like this dimmer switch is suddenly becoming a kind of click, click, click, click click.
And like your lights can't go from bright to dark continuously.
They can only take 16 possible levels of brightness.
That's what it's like to take all of these parameters, all of these dimmer switches all over your neural
network and reduce the precision of all of them down to eight bits or four bits.
And doing that is known as quantization, because you can think of this as like a quantitative, you're
like a quantizing, turning it into something which has discrete possible values.
And you're reducing that, reducing the precision so that you can squeeze more into less memory.
You could take a up much less memory, and the calculations are way simpler.
That's why you do it.
And you can do it.
If you're going from a typically like a 16 bit floating point number, as they're called, a 16 bit
number, all the way down to a four bit number, you're suddenly saving four times the memory.
Now wait a minute.
I hear you saying, okay, hold your horses.
Wait a second.
You're telling me you're telling me we've got all of these parameters and we're going to keep all these
parameters.
We're just going to reduce the like the information in each one of these parameters by a factor of four.
We're going to make them four times more simplistic by making it change from having lots of possible
settings just to having 16 possible settings.
Surely that is somehow equivalent to just saying, let's take all of these parameters, keep the same
precision, and just throw out three quarters of them.
Have a quarter of many parameters with the full precision.
Surely that's kind of the same thing.
Like, okay, there's some neural network stuff with connections or whatnot, but you've got the same
amount of information at the end of the day.
So that's all you're doing.
You're just trading information in one place for another.
And I hear you.
And that sounds like a very sensible argument.
But it turns out, for whatever reason, that by reducing the precision of all of these numbers, you
do indeed you degrade the quality of your neural network.
It becomes less accurate.
All of its all the measurements, all the ways you tell how well it's doing go down.
But they don't go down by that much.
They just go down by a little.
And if you were to cut out three quarters of these weights, it would go down by a lot.
And so it turns out that reducing the precision is like an efficient way to pack more information in.
And it's not like we're super sure of why that works the way it does.
We think it's because we didn't need so many parameters in the first place.
And so this just happens to be a good way to, to to sort of synthesize more of the data into a smaller
space.
It just turns out experimentally to work quite well.
So quantization is this kind of hack that reduces the memory a lot and only causes performance accuracy
to come down by a little.
And so we often do it.
That's the story behind quantization.
Very experimental very hand-wavy.
And it just kind of works.
And one more thing I'll say about quantization.
You're like for goodness sake, how much how long are we going to talk about this, these numbers?
Uh, the people in of you that already know about bits and know about, uh, the like, uh, the precision
of numbers when you hear a four bit number, you probably think I'm talking about like a four bit integer,
literally the number 0 to 15.
And you're thinking, okay, but if the numbers used to be like a proper floating point number, and
now we're going down to a number from 0 to 15, 0 to 15, that's not going to work very well.
And the answer is sure we don't.
It's not a four bit integer.
We take these four bits and we use that to sort of represent the floating point space in some way.
And there's just a technique for doing it.
It's a data type that's called nf4, which is like some four bit representation of floating point numbers,
imagining that they're normally distributed.
And it just turns out, again, it sort of works fine.
It sounds crazy.
If you Google Nf4, you can read sort of write ups the paper about it and see how that kind of works
and how it's mapped.
And it's super surprising that it works fine, but it does.
We're about to try it ourselves, and we'll see that, okay.
And other things we'll cover.
We're going to look inside our model and look at some of the layers of a neural network.
Briefly, to give you intuition, I'm not going to go deep into it.
I'm not going to show you like a neural network architecture diagram.
And we're also going to talk about streaming, uh, when you're working with open source models.
Just a little extra, extra teaser on that.
These are the topics that we're going to see in our lab.
Okay.
And you're probably thinking fine, but when are we going to see them in this lab?
And the answer is right now let's go Colab.
See you there.
076 - Okay.
Welcome to the Colab for week three.
Day four.
You found this link because you went to cursor.
Uh, or you went to the Readme, or you went to any one of the million other places where you'll find
a link to the scroll up, but hopefully you've got it.
Week three, day four.
We're going to be looking at the low level API to the Hugging Face Transformers library.
Working with models directly, they wrap the PyTorch code that actually goes through the layers of the
neural network.
We're going to be looking at that code.
Uh, remember, if you get some sort of funny Cuda error, then disconnect the runtime, connect to
a fresh T4 start again from the top.
And over here, uh, you should have connected to a T4.
It should say connect to hosted runtime T4.
You should be able to view the resources and you should see the GPU Ram.
It should be nice and fresh, 15GB left to fill.
And today we will fill it.
The first thing to do is to run these Pip installs and they will take a minute.
Even even on quiet mode, it still insists on being talkative.
We are installing a couple of libraries here.
Bits and bytes is the name.
Of hugging Faces library, which deals with quantization.
The topic that I just jabbered away about for ages.
Accelerate is also like a companion library that is to do with being able to run efficiently on GPUs.
So we bring in both of these, and we are then going to, as usual, bring in a few, um, uh, import
a few packages that we need to do, and then we're going to sign into Hugging Face.
But remember you need to go to the key here.
You need to turn this on or it will prompt you.
If you don't and which is fine, you can just say yes and then come here.
Run this so that you log in to hugging face.
Okay, so, uh, just to talk for a second about having access to the llama models.
So yesterday, if you followed my instructions, you will have got approval to access llama 3.1.
Uh, now, today I'm actually going to use a different model llama 3.2.
And I think in some situations you have to ask again to have access to this or you may already have
been granted access, but if you click on this link it will come up.
So click on this link right now go there.
It's going to come up.
And I see that I've been granted access to this model.
You may have to do the same.
Maybe you have to ask again.
Maybe you already got access.
If you have to do it again, feel free to just use 3.1.
It's a bigger model, so it's going to take longer for you.
But and 3.2 is much quicker much smaller.
But but you should do whichever one you want.
And if you weren't given access to llama then just skip the llama section of this and do the others.
Okay.
And so with that in mind, here are the names of the models we're going to look at today.
We're going to look at llama I've got 3.1 and 3.2 in here.
You can see that 3.2 is going to I'll comment out this line to avoid confusion.
If you want to use 3.1 uncomment that line.
Uh there's llama 3.2.
And then we'll also look at five from Microsoft, five for Gemma, three from Google.
We're going to go with the really tiny one, the 270 million parameter one tiny tiny Gemma.
And then Quinn.
We're going to use Quinn three the 4 billion.
So a medium size quite big.
And we're using the instruct variant, the chat variant.
And the one that's that's for me anyway, fairly recently a few months ago I believe that's that's meant
to be 2025 and July.
Um, so whatever four months ago, uh, and uh, then, uh, just here, we're also going to use deep
sea because, you know, deep sea is cool, and we're going to use the version of Deep Seek that was
distilled into Quinn.
Remember how I explained that they trained Quinn with data produced by Deep Sea, and we're using the
1.5 billion variant of Quinn, a small Quinn.
So these are small models.
But the important point is that these ones are all instruct variants, chat models designed to have,
uh, user prompt assistant.
User assistant.
Quinn.
This one here, deep seek distilled into Quinn is a reasoning model.
So it's going to be our first experience running a reasoning model through the code.
So these are the models I will run that.
And now this is going to be our message.
It's going to be tell a joke for a room of data scientists a nice and simple message that we've got
from them.
Got from them.
I mean simple message we got for them is right here.
Okay.
Okay.
So, uh, we are now a quick reminder that you need to accept Meta's terms of service, if you haven't
already.
I'm sure you have.
But if not, then do follow the instructions just as before.
Um, and if you have problems with meta, then do go to this troubleshooting colab.
Okay.
Um, let me see.
What we're now going to do is, uh, build something called a bits and bytes config.
So this is where we specify what kind of quantization we want to do to reduce the precision.
And so um, it's bits and bytes, which is a sort of jokey name.
It's bits bits and bytes but spelt the geeky way.
Uh, for eight bits.
So we're telling it that we want to load in four bits.
We want to reduce the precision all the way down to four bits.
This is like an extra thing which allows it to it does it two times.
And for extra efficiency you can look up why that, why that works well.
Um, and then this here is the important one.
This is where we say we want to use this nf4 data type.
This data type which we're not going to interpret these, these four bits like a number from 0 to 15,
but rather we're going to map these four binary bits into some normally distributed floating point number.
Uh yeah.
If you, if you know what that that's all about.
So we'll run that.
Um, okay.
Now this is where we are going to now create our tokenizer.
Same code as as yesterday.
We're going to do frompretrained for the llama model.
This line here is is just something that you have to do.
And you always see it in the code.
It's some fiddly thing that, uh, the tokenizer has some special tokens.
We saw them yesterday.
A bunch of special tokens, and one of them is the end of sentence token that comes at the end of the
sentence.
EOS and another of them, the hugging face expects is called the Pad token, and it's one that hugging
face uses to to add extra spacing if it needs to.
And the uh, for some reason, most of these tokenizers don't have this set, and it needs to be set
by default to be the end of sentence token.
And if you don't set that, then you get an error somewhere else.
So you'll see this in the code everywhere.
People do this and I wonder why they don't just put this as a default somewhere to to avoid it, but
for whatever reason you see tokenizer pad token equals tokenizer eos token.
So we just do that.
Uh and then we do tokenizer apply chat template.
We pass in the messages that we just did.
And we want to put this on the GPU, something we didn't do last time.
But because we're going to run it we're going to we're going to take this these tokens that we're going
to make these token IDs, and we want them to be sent off to the GPU because we're going to run fast
matrix maths.
And so you have to know that that first of all, you have to have this converted into PyTorch types
of, of data structures which, which are ready for the GPU.
So this return tensors equals DT stands for PyTorch.
It's a very very technical.
But you just you need to do that.
If you don't do that there'll be an error.
And then you do Tokuda.
Remember Cuda is the name of Nvidia's GPUs technology.
So that's saying please go and push that onto the GPU.
This is all if you're thinking how am I going to remember all this.
This is super standard.
You see this everywhere.
It's one of those things you just do it this way and it will just work.
So we do it now.
And as I promised you, it will just simply work.
That's happened.
We got the inputs.
They are now sitting there.
Let's have a look at them.
Hang on.
Code.
If we look at inputs.
Here it is.
It's it's this is like a PyTorch tensor.
A tensor is basically a fancy name for, for a matrix.
Uh, essentially uh, and uh, it's a matrix of numbers and it's sitting on our GPU.
And that is what we've just built here.
And I know I'm not giving you like super detail on this enough so you get some intuition.
You don't need to be able to to know this back to front.
Okay.
So next up you remember the way we created a tokenizer just here we're going to do very similar thing
to create a model.
So here it is.
We're saying we want to use just like we used auto tokenizer before.
We're saying auto model for causal lm.
A causal lm sounds like a bit of a mouthful.
First time you've heard of this, it just turns out that's the name that Huggingface gives to Llms that
that generate content the way that we do, they're called causal Llms.
There's another technical name that some of you may have heard of called autoregressive LLM.
It's the name for one of these things where it spits out a token, and you put that back in and run
it again, that kind of generation LLM.
So the general word that that Huggingface gives for it is causal LLM LM these days, when people say
LM, that's typically that's all they're referring to.
There are other things that are like encoders and stuff, but but you normally would then describe that
differently.
So, so you know causal LM and just LM for pretrained.
So we're saying we want the one for llama.
This this is saying um pick pick what.
This is basically going to pick Cuda because we've got a box with Cuda on it.
And we're passing in our quant config.
I should run this because it's going to take a minute.
It's now going to go off and download the files from llama.
If you've picked llama 3.1 this will now take like 5 or 10 minutes.
I think Colab used to have a stronger network connection, but Google might have been might be saving
some money and it takes longer these days.
Uh, even this much.
We're using a really small llama here.
Uh, 1 billion parameter llama.
It's still going to take a while.
It downloads the full precision, and then it reduces the precision for what it has in memory.
So that's all going to go on.
And I will see you in the next video when it's happened.
077 - All right.
Do you have a cup of coffee?
Things are about to get real.
We've downloaded the llama model.
We've quantized it.
We've got it in memory.
I'm just going to run this code to show that the memory footprint is one gigabyte.
We filled up a gigabyte of memory with this model.
And we are now going to look at this model.
So it's in this it's in this variable model.
And we're going to we're going to we're going to inspect it and see what is in this model.
But but let me just describe it to you.
So this model contains PyTorch code to run the llama 3.2 model and llama 3.2 model.
It's it's been written using this framework called PyTorch, which is a Python library for writing neural
networks.
The first step I have for you is if you don't know what like things, what a neural network is and the
the parameters in it, then please watch my YouTube intro playlist.
Take a quick pause to watch my playlist.
I realized for at least as of now, that that I've sort of stopped two thirds of the way through.
Like I keep saying, there's going to be another video and there isn't yet, but that doesn't matter
because you only need to get up to that point to have the intuition you need.
And if you've got there, and you may already know all this very, very well, you're aware that basically
a neural network are these layers upon layers, upon layers of sets of little algorithms which basically
blend the information in the layer above?
I sometimes describe them as, as audio mixers, because you can think of them as like little sliders
that control the signals on the layer, blend them in a different way, and then spit out some combination.
And the transformer is the name of the particular architecture that, as I said before, turns out to
work really efficiently for being able to get all of this information flowing layer to layer and being
able to train it or tweak these mixers slightly tweak the way you blend the information so that what
comes out of the out at the back of it gets better and better at doing what it is you're trying to do
based on all your training data.
That's that's what the game is all about.
So with that, what we're going to do is actually print it out and look at it.
That's the way that I like to teach this thing.
A lot of people like to have tons of diagrams, and I don't mean to be dismissive.
A lot of people I know, actually many people prefer to learn from diagrams.
And I guess there's some diagrams on my on my YouTube videos.
But I like to learn from code, and that's what we're going to look at now.
So one of the really nice things about this kind of PyTorch thing models is that you can just print
it and you get this kind of visual look, the structure that describes the whole neural network.
So each of the rows, each of these rows that you see that are printed out here represents some some
object or group of objects that sort of fall under model.
So model itself is called Lama for causal LM.
That's, that's the kind of object it is.
And it contains this model, the llama model, which contains all of this.
So you can think of this like a little tree structure of what contains what.
And and all of this is encapsulated within this one model object that we've got right here.
So what is there?
Well, at the top level there are these three things.
There's there's something called embedding this this one up here.
And then there's this, this big thing called layers and layers is 15 layers, 15 chunks, one after
another, 15 layers.
And then at the very bottom there's something at the end called LLM head.
So it's embedding then it's it's sorry, it's not 15, it's 16 0 to 15.
Uh, sorry embedding and then 16 layers and then LLM head at the end of it.
So what are these these things I'm going to first describe these three big sets.
And then we'll we'll dig in to the 16 of these layers right here.
And if you're looking at llama 3.1, there are 32, not 16.
There's twice as many.
All right.
Let's let's talk about each of them.
So first of all I'm going to highlight this.
We're going to mention this embedding thing.
And I do want to mention that what comes in the brackets after here is trying to describe what's called
the dimensionality of that layer.
But how many dimensions comes in and how many dimensions comes out.
And what that means really is how many, how many different numbers are going to be fed in for each
of these?
How many possible values will be sent in?
I'm being a bit hand-wavy if you if you, uh, yeah.
I mean, I understand that I'm oversimplifying a bit just to give you that intuition.
So this embedding layer is something that takes in something that can have all of these possible, uh,
parts to it.
And what comes out is just something which has 20, 48 dimensions.
And what this is doing, this embedding layer, it's sometimes known as vector embeddings, sometimes
known as encoder layer.
This is something which is just taking the tokens that are coming in as the input.
And for each of those tokens, it's turning it into something which is a bunch of numbers that best
represents its understanding of what that token represents.
It's like a mixed set of mixers that mixes every possible token into a whole.
2048 different numbers, and this happens to be the number of possible input tokens.
Do you remember we counted them with llama and it was 128,000, which I thought to start with.
It was 128,000 and 256 because there were some special tokens.
Well, here they are.
This is this is all of them, all the possible input tokens coming in.
And every input token gets, gets mapped into some compressed set of 2048 numbers.
That represents that word, that token in in some way that really makes sense to the other layers that
come below.
So very hand-wavy.
This is something that's called vector embedding.
It's basically translating a single word into a vector with 2048 dimensions.
Vector embedding.
That's how it's known.
And in particular Lama uses a particular technique for this called rotary embedding, which is a particular
way that makes sure that words in a sequence that the order in which they appear is sort of affected
in some way that's taken into account.
And if you want to drill deeper into that, then Google it.
You'll you'll see all about it.
Okay.
So that's the embedding layer.
It's turned our tokens into this, this, uh, this vector of 20, 48 dimensions, the next 16 layers
is where all the action happens.
That is stack upon stack of mixers, as I call them, things that are blending the information in some
way with lots of parameters.
That's all happening.
And we're going to drill into this in just a second, only for those that want to, uh, and then at
the end of it, this LM head, this thing at the very end, which stands for language model head, that
is the very final layer.
That is something which takes in these 2000 dimensions till 2048 dimensions.
What it spits out has, interestingly, you may think the same number of dimensions as the number of
tokens.
That's what comes out at the end.
And the reason is because what's going to come out is going to be, for every possible next token,
a probability of how likely is it that that is the token that should come immediately after the input?
That's the whole game here.
That's what this entire set of, of, uh, matrix calculations is trying to achieve.
And so this is this is known for people in the field as a fully connected layer.
And it outputs the probability of the next token.
So for people who've who've got any experience with traditional data science, this whole thing could
be called a classifier.
It is classifying.
The next most the next token.
Because what's coming out is the probability of the next token being in any one of the buckets of 128,256
possible buckets.
That's what's going on.
And so that is why this is a next token prediction machine.
So again there's the embedding layer that turns tokens into vectors.
There is then 16 of these layers stacked up against each other.
And then at the very end there is this language model head language modeling head which comes out with
the probability of the next token.
All right.
So that's the the high level that gives you some intuition for this.
And next I'm going to drill in a little bit more into these 16 layers, but only for those that want
it.
You can also choose to speed me up and zoom through it, because I will be coming back to this during
during the course to give you that little bit more intuition every time.
078 - All right.
You're hanging on in there.
You've decided you're gonna go deeper.
Fine.
Haha.
You're calling my bluff.
So we had the embedding layer at the top that turns things into this 20, 48 dimensional data.
We know we've got the thing at the very end.
So what is going on in the middle?
What are these 16 layers?
They're called the modules.
Each one of these things, each one of these is called a Lama decoder.
Layer 16 Lama decoder layers.
Some people may know that transformers are often described as combining encoders with decoders, and
a lot of of the modern day transformers only have decoder layers like this.
No encoder, just a lot of decoder layers.
So the decoder in Lama's architecture consists of basically these these three chunks attention layer,
something called an MLP, a multi-layer perceptron.
And then this stuff here is called layer norm.
So what are these all about?
Well, this one here, this attention piece, this this is the thing that Google invented when they
put out that paper.
Attention is all you need.
This is something which is a set of these blending, these mixers, these algorithms which are designed
to try and mix the layer above, but in particular, what they try and do is figure out what is it about
the layer before me that I should be paying attention to?
And they they learn over time what their their weights are set to, determines how they incorporate
all the information in the layer above.
And they do it by learning for different things something called the query, which is what am I looking
for?
The key which is which is what is each one trying to inform me?
The value which is what is, what's the information in each part of this?
And oh, the output is the final output from doing all of this super hand-wavy I know, but I just want
to give you the intuition that those are the query key value output, which are the four types of parameter
that get learned by a self-attention layer.
And so that's what happens here.
And you'll see that that the the the input dimensions, this whole thing are 2048.
The output at the end of it all is also 2048.
But there's some other stuff going on here and I've linked to this.
This ChatGPT write up is something.
It's for llama 3.1 rather than llama 3.2, but it gives a really good walkthrough of some of this.
And you can also it's one of these things where you can absolutely drill down.
There's so much that you can get to on, on YouTube, on from talking to ChatGPT, and even from reading
the original self-attention paper, attention is all you need to get if you want to go a little bit
deeper.
But for now, I just want to give you that intuition.
Self-attention is all about figuring out what matters.
From the layers that came before me the multi-layer perceptron.
This is one of the like the core building blocks of deep neural networks.
This is absolute bog standard deep neural network stuff.
This is where you connect together your your your layer above to your layer below.
And the way that it works, the up proj is something which explodes out the number of dimensions from
2000 dimensions to 8000 dimensions of your data.
Tons of data.
The gate is then basically something that's figuring out what matters with all of these dimensions.
How can I filter the stuff that matters?
And part of that gate is what's known as a non-linearity, which I will explain in just a second.
And then after you've done that, after you've gone through the gate, there's a down projection which
converts it back to the 2000 dimensions that we had before.
So it's 2000 dimensions, explodes out to 8000, goes through the gate back down to 2000 again.
That is the multi-layer perceptron layer in each of these 16 chunks.
Okay, you're through most of it now.
It's easy.
Now, this stuff, the the layer norm is just about it's just mathematical trickery to try and make
sure that the numbers behave themselves.
And don't don't go flying off either to, to too much or too small.
So this is all about what they call Normalizing the numbers so that they behave nicely.
Mathematical trickery.
Not super important for it all.
And that's it.
Those, those.
And then there's more norming that happens here.
So that's the overall construct.
It is the embedding.
And then 16 of these modules which have attention and multi-layer perceptron.
And then you end with the LM head.
That's how it all fits together.
That is the transformer architecture in a nutshell.
Uh, and and it's this, that, that just happens to work so well when you pump in lots of data and
you train it in a way that we will do in week seven.
So I'm not really talking about how training works yet, but when you train it, it gets better and
better at the outputs mapping to probable next tokens in a way that starts to exhibit this intelligence
and quite why that last part happens.
No one's really very sure, but we do know.
We do understand why it gets better and better at imitating plausible next tokens.
It's just a bit confusing that it also turns out to to to be so good at true and accurate.
Next tokens Okay, so the final part of the puzzle I just want to mention is this activation function
Selu.
So first up, if you've watched my videos then you know that I like talking about these these neurons,
these individual little algorithms, these matrix calculations like they're audio mixers blending the
signal in the way above.
And you might think that sounds like it's a bit of an oversimplification, but it's actually not.
What they do is literally multiplying by weights and adding them together.
That's the matrix calculation that happens.
Also known as matmul that you see all over the place.
But but it is just that calculation.
It's also what one would call a linear combination.
It is just a weighted combination of the inputs.
And there is something uh, that's that's very mean about linear combinations.
There's there's something unfair about them.
And the mathematical way of saying it would be to say that a linear combination of linear combinations
is itself just a linear combination.
I don't know if that meant anything to you.
I'll say it again.
A linear combination of linear combinations is itself just a linear combination.
And what do I mean by that?
What I mean is imagine that each of these little, little algorithms is, as I keep saying, like an
audio mixer that's mixing four volumes, let's say, and let's say that at the beginning, the top,
the input, the very first input is let's say it's four singers with microphones.
It's the it's the four Beatles.
Uh, the four Beatles are sitting there in front of us, uh, and uh, they, they are singing and we
have a mixer that is able to to blend the four voices into the perfect blend of the four Beatles.
And it's doing that.
And the output from that mixer is going into more mixer.
Another set of mixers.
And lots of other people have their mixers and they're mixing the four Beatles.
They're all going into more and more mixers and more mixers, and there's a billion of these.
And out at the very end of it, there's a speaker attached to the final mixer and it's playing.
Here's the thing.
If you were to listen to my mixer, it would be some blend of the four four Beatles singing.
When you listen to the one at the very end?
The bottom line is, it's still just going to be a blend of the four Beatles, with some proportion
of each of them.
Nothing else.
There's no way in all of these mixes connected to each other that anything has changed the signal in
any way.
That means that the final output is anything more than some different volume of each of the four Beatles,
which means that you could replace all of this billion mixes with one mixer, which just had different
settings on it that represent some kind of, some sort of an average of all of the mixes out there in
some in some way.
There would be some setting you could set it to that would just replace everything.
So with all this fancy stuff, with all of these different, with this, this Q and K and V and O projections
and all of this technical stuff, you could replace all of this with just one simple linear combination
of the, of the tokens and one number coming out.
And there's no need for any of these billions of parameters when you could just do it with, with with
100,000 parameters.
That would be it.
Well, that seems like a pain, right?
So all of this is for nothing?
No, as I'm sure you can imagine, there is a trick.
The.
It turns out that if you have all of these mixers connected together, then if you are able to introduce
out of each of these mixers some tiny distortion to the sound, something that's just maybe the same
for every single one of them, but something that messes with the sound in some way that isn't just
a linear combination is what we would call nonlinear.
Not not a linear combination.
Something else.
As soon as you do that, then each mixer gets to influence the final output in a slightly different
way.
And suddenly all of the all of these, all of the mixer levels, all these parameters are meaningful
and you can't replace everything with one mixer anymore.
And so introducing this non-linearity becomes absolutely crucial to making sure that that all the parameters
matter.
And this was a discovery I think back in like 1950s or something, when people were first thinking about
how do we how do we build these in a way that could be sort of imitating, inspired by the human mind,
and they realize the tyranny of linear regression.
And then they had this idea that was that was kind of inspired by the way a human neuron fires.
It either fires or it doesn't.
And that's quite nonlinear.
Uh, so this idea is that in this gate process, when you go up to lots of dimensions, you then introduce
something nonlinear in the mix, and then you go down again.
And by doing that, suddenly everything counts and all these parameters are meaningful.
And it turns out that what you use for that nonlinearity actually doesn't matter that much.
Like there's lots of different things that you can try that just twists the output in some way, and
it just turns out that some just work better than others in terms of how quickly you can train.
And one of the very common ones that you see used all over the place is called ReLU, which sounds very
technical and actually stands for it stands for rectified linear unit, which does sound very technical,
but it's this super simple thing which is like if the input is less than zero, then just flatten it
to zero, and if it's more than zero, just return the input.
And this thing which is which is called a non-linearity, because the relationship between input and
output is not a straight line.
It's not linear.
That's good enough.
That makes the whole neural network do interesting things.
So ReLU super common.
The one that's used in llama is called Selu uh, which is called a sigmoid linear function, sigmoid
linear unit.
And it looks like this.
It's very similar to the ReLU but it's just a little bit smoother.
And it just turns out that it works well.
So that's why it's used.
It's super experimental.
In the early days, everyone used to use a thing called sigmoid that was very common.
Then ReLU and now Selu is super common.
Uh, and so it's not all that important to, to sort of know about this or know why, just to know the
reason behind it is to get around this, this tyranny of linear regression so that the whole neural
network can't just be replaced by by one tiny weighted combination, but actually everything is meaningful.
That is what is going on.
079 - Oh my goodness, that might be a lot more than you bargained for.
But you got it.
And there's more if you want to read about it here, I've got, uh, stuff, but but I do want to say
that, uh, please be assured you don't need to go into this stuff into detail.
Your job as an AI engineer is about selecting, optimizing, tuning, and applying llms rather than
writing this kind of PyTorch code.
But, uh, it it can be interesting.
I think it helps to have the intuition, and that's why I cover it.
Okay, enough, let's run this model.
So the way that you run the model is you just call model generate, you pass it the inputs.
These are the token IDs that are on the GPU.
We say don't don't make more than 80 new tokens.
Please.
Let's print the outputs.
That's going on right now.
It's going to do everything I just said.
It's going to pump it through all these layers.
And one thing I didn't even mention on these layers you probably saw is that they have they've got this
linear four bit.
They have been downgraded to four bits.
If you're not using quantization, you wouldn't see that linear four bit.
So right now all of that's going to happen.
It's going to happen while we watch.
There's some warnings we don't care about warnings uh tension Attention.
Masks, stuff.
I'll tell you about attention masks another day.
And here.
Here is the output.
There it is.
Well, well, great.
That's a funny joke.
It's told us, uh.
Ah, yes.
This this output, which is a tensor.
It's on the GPU.
That doesn't make much sense to us, but luckily, you may remember that we can call tokenizer decode
and see what on earth it's trying to communicate to us in these numbers.
And here it is beginning of text start header system.
And that's all that okay, here's a joke tailored for a room of data scientists.
Why did the panda pandas go to the statistics club?
Because they wanted to analyze their love for data, and it was a pandemonium of numbers.
This joke combines a popular pandas species with a statistical concept and a playful pun on pandemonium.
I mean, remember, this is a 1 billion parameter model that we've downgraded to only have have 16 possible
positions.
So it's not with that with that handicap in mind.
Not bad at all.
I think that is perfectly, perfectly possible for a tiny 1 billion parameter model at a quarter of
its of its size.
So I'd say nicely done.
And now sometimes it's good to clean up the memory that's being used because this stuff hangs around
on the GPU.
And these are some things to, to run.
And, uh, student uh, helped iterate on this and get it better.
So after you do this, sometimes it cleans up the GPU memory, but sometimes it doesn't.
It sort of hangs around there, but I think it still has freed it up, even though it doesn't show it
visually on here.
All right.
So I've now wrapped that generate function in this big block and this big function here.
And I've put in some more more parameters.
I'm making it.
You can choose whether it quantizes or not.
You can set the maximum number of tokens if you want.
I've also got some stuff here about the attention mask to stop that warning happening.
And if you want to find out about attention masks, then do Google it or we will.
We will be forced to talk about attention masks in week seven, so you can look forward to that.
Uh, and then I'm also going to use be streaming.
That's just a hugging face feature that you can have something called a text streamer.
You have to tell it which tokenizer you're using, and we will then stream back results.
When we call model generate we pass in the streamer, but otherwise this is the same.
It's going to be it's going to take a model.
It's going to look up the tokenizer.
It's going to have the janky pad token equals end of sentence token.
Who knows why we always have to say that.
Uh it's then going to get the input IDs, turn them to PyTorch, put them on Cuda.
It's going to get the attention mask.
And it's going to then choose whether to quantize the model or not.
Get that model and call model generate.
That's what this function generate does.
And so now we can call that function for Phi five for from Microsoft.
And now this is a bigger model.
This is like a 4 billion parameter model.
So you can see it's got like seven gigabytes.
And this does take this takes like 5 or 10 minutes or something to come through.
So I'm going to head off and get myself a coffee.
And you?
Well, I guess the video is going to flip on right away, but if you're running this yourself, you
may need to go and get a coffee too.
And I will see you in just a second.
Wow.
And if it feels like it's been ten minutes since you kicked this thing off, well, that's because it
has been ten minutes since you kicked this thing off.
It fires it like it's a 4 billion parameter model, and it runs quite quickly.
It's the downloading the model that takes so long.
And when you run it on your own machine, it gets it gets cached on your on your hard drive.
But when you, when you run it on Colab has to download it every time you have a new runtime.
And uh, yeah.
So let's hope the joke is worth it.
Let's see, why did the data scientist break up with a computer?
Because it kept dumping data on them and they just couldn't handle the relationship anymore.
And then a special end token that was well needed.
It was.
All right.
Um, but yeah, I think I preferred llamas.
One.
Okay.
Uh.
And, uh.
Yes.
Then then, uh, we'll move on swiftly to smaller models, starting with the absolutely tiny Gemma three
270 million parameters.
If you happen to skip fire, I don't blame you.
Let's go to Gemma.
Okay, so, uh, yeah, apparently nowadays you do also need to get agreement to use Gemma as well.
I've been granted access to this model.
You have to sign the terms.
But I gather with.
With Gemma.
I've never heard of someone not being approved.
But you might be the first.
But let me know if you if there's any problems with it.
But otherwise it should be possible to come in to Gemma.
I discovered that that you can't use quantization with this tiny Gemma model.
I don't exactly know why, but I got some horrible PyTorch error when I tried, so I have rapidly turned
that off and it seems to be working fine now, so this should run hopefully a bit more quickly than
five four.
I can already see it's only it's got half a gigabyte to download, which it's uh, halfway through.
You can see it's executing down there on, on our T4.
And then once that's done we're going to do Kwon and then Deep seek and then we'll be done.
I will come back in a second.
When?
When this is ready.
Okay.
And so Gemma has finished.
And Gemma's joke to lighthearted joke for remote data scientists is, why don't scientists ever go to
the beach?
And then Gemma stopped.
So whatever Gemma had in mind, we will sadly never know.
And similarly, it gives other random stuff if you run it.
So you probably had the same experience.
The fact that it even had like an attempt at a setup is in itself admirable for a 270 million parameter
model.
Really very tiny indeed.
Okay, that is Gemma.
Moving on to Quinn.
I have already run Quinn because this is, again, I think, a larger variant of Quinn.
So I let it do its downloading.
Look at that.
You can see that it brought in like eight gigabytes or so.
You could see as well.
My GPU Ram is really stuffed full.
So here it says tell a light hearted joke for a room of data scientists.
And it says sure, here's a light hearted, data savvy joke.
Why did the data scientist break up with a statistician?
Because of the correlation.
It was just a coincidence.
They were always together, and it was not a strong enough p value to justify staying together.
Oh, it's all right.
It's like nerdy.
Uh, I guess it's kind of, you know, correlations and all that.
I suppose we'll, we'll, uh, we'll say that's all right from all right performance from Quinn.
Uh, and, uh, it wanted to keep going, but I but I stopped it after it's 80 tokens.
And then finally I wanted to show you a reasoning model.
So deep seek R1.
It's the the famous reasoning variant of deep sea.
Uh, it's been compressed into a small 1.5GB version, uh, gigabyte, 1.5 billion parameter version
of Cran.
And I've said it can generate up to 500 tokens.
And what you'll see is that the first thing it generates is the reasoning message, the thinking through.
Okay, so I need to come up with a light hearted joke for a room full of data scientists.
Hmm.
Where do I start?
Well, uh.
And off it goes.
It rambles away.
You can see lots of this stuff.
And guess what else you can see?
Wait, you can see maybe blah blah blah blah blah.
Another angle.
Or maybe wait another thought or maybe something like.
Alternatively, and you may remember when I told you before that just this slipping in the word wait
is one of the tricks that I used, and I believe that alternatively is another.
So you can see like wait wait wait.
Alternatively and these, these, these tokens are slotted in there while it's in inference token by
token that's thrown in there to force the model to self-reflect and keep going.
But in this case, it kept agonizing over this joke, and even in 500 tokens it wasn't able to come
to a joke.
So whilst we can have some insights into the thought process of a small model, we don't actually get
a particular joke at the end of it.
Maybe you did better.
I'm not sure.
Anyways, the conclusion is that open source models are super fun to experiment with and easy to run.
Downloading them the first time can be a bit of a bore and but but you get to use them.
It's for free.
And as an extra piece of information we've gleaned, they're not very good at telling jokes, but they're
very good at lots of other stuff.
And so you should experiment and try find out things they're good at, because we are going to discover
one of them tomorrow in the commercial project that we'll build, rather than this silliness.
I think probably llama 3.2 won the prize for for today's session.
Anyway, that is our exploration of open source models using the model part of the Transformers package.
And as part of this, we really dug in to what it looks like to have a deep neural network in PyTorch
code as part of the Huggingface Transformers code.
And that's a wrap on day four of week three.
We we really did get get more technical today.
I hope you enjoyed it.
Now, in addition to coding with frontier Models building assistance, you now can use hugging face
pipelines, tokenizers and models.
And hopefully you're starting to build some intuition about how these things work, how they fit together.
And tomorrow I'm going to to we're just going to practice.
Tomorrow it's going to be about really building up the strength of these skills, this expertise by
some repetitive work of of building stuff and hopefully a more useful commercial product than telling
jokes.
And we'll also be be looking deeply into running inference.
And I also have a little, little nice thing to show you.
I just want to, to do to open your eyes a little bit more about how inference works, how how it is
that generating the next token ends up giving the kinds of outputs we see.
So I want to show you something, a visual for the visual people that feel like I've been doing too
much coding.
I've got something visual for you that I think you will like, and I've got that in store for you tomorrow
as well, which will then wrap up week three.
I can't wait to see you for week three.
Day five tomorrow.
080 - Well.
Hello.
You're back.
It's time for day five of week three.
As we as we bring week three to a close, we're going to be practicing and building confidence.
You're already confident with frontier models and assistants.
And you're just getting there with the pipelines, tokenizers and models.
We're now just going to keep going, doing some work with Tokenizers and models to build a nice little
commercial project and be able to run inference and open source models and implement an LLM solution
that's going to use both frontier and open source models, and should be nice and satisfying.
Another fairly technical one, but way to to really look at in in the weeds a bit.
Um, so, so let me tell you what I have in store.
So we're going to create an application that's able to make meeting minutes.
It's able to take an audio recording of a meeting and turn it into a summary and actions.
And that's the kind of commercial tool that you actually get built into popular products.
So people are building this and making money from it.
It's a real thing that we're going to do.
And sure, we're going to do a more of an experimental version of it.
It's not like it's ready for you to make your fortune off it just yet, but it's certainly a step in
that direction.
You'll certainly see how you could extend it.
It's going to use a front end model to turn meeting audio into text.
Previously we've done text to speech and this is now speech to text.
Uh, we're then going to use an open source model to generate the meeting minutes.
And then since we can, we're going to stream them back and show them and mark down.
We're going to do all of that.
That's going to be our commercial project and a way to build up our expertise.
But first, I have something fun to show you.
Let me let me take you back.
Would you believe back to cursor.
Let's go to cursor for a second.
So I'm back in cursor.
I'm going to week three.
I'm going to day five.
And of course day five begins with a link to Google Colab.
But I'm not going to go there.
I want to show you something first.
Something I think that you'll like.
So I slightly glossed over this yesterday, but I did refer to it in prior weeks the way that models
actually do inference, the way they generate output is really a multi-step process.
What you discovered yesterday is that the way that these transformers work is that the input is a sequence
of tokens, and they only have one output, and that output is a set of probabilities, a probability
for each of the possible next tokens.
So maybe it's not one output.
It's a lot of outputs.
It's a 128,000 outputs its outputs.
That is a probability for every single one of the possible next tokens, just the very next token to
follow this input sequence.
And you may remember when I explained this in week one, I think maybe it's week two, that the way
that it works is that you put in your input sequence, you do this process and what comes out of these
probabilities, and then you pick which one of these you say is going to be the next token.
And it's common just to pick the one that it gave the highest probability to the most likely next token.
Now there are other ways of doing it as well.
But you take that.
Let's say you take the most likely and then you say, okay, now let's take that input sequence and
put that likely token at the end of the input sequence and pass that all in again as a new input to
the same transformer.
And it's going to produce a distribution of the probabilities of the second token.
And you take that, you pick the most likely, you shove it on the end, you pass it in again and you
repeat.
And that way this transformer ends up sort of spitting out token after token.
And that's why we have it streaming back results and why you see the typewriter animation.
Because it's really generating these predictions a token at a time.
And somehow it's this process of doing things a token at a time that allows it to come up with this
very meaningful kind of, of response, and that allows reasoning models to sort of think through token
at a time what they're going to do.
And then later tokens are more likely to be accurate because they want to be consistent with the prior
tokens.
It's a strange effect, and when I try and explain it to people, I say people sometimes just sort of
don't believe me.
And and so I wrote this to to to help, help convince people that that's really what's going on.
And in particular, someone said one of the questions I often ask models is this 1 in 1 sentence, describe
the color blue to someone who's never been able to see.
It's the kind of thing that these models give such great answers to.
Let's put it to GPT for one minute.
I think I think we did this in the past.
So what I'm going to do now is I'm going to put it to GPT four on mini, but in a rather interesting
way.
There is a way that you can call GPT through the API, and it won't just give you the most likely next
token, it will actually give you the most likely few tokens, and it will give you the probabilities
of each.
And you can call it in a loop and collect each one.
You can also do this with hugging face code as well, quite easily.
Uh, but I've done it with, with with OpenAI here because it's nice to see such a powerful answer.
And I've written some code in visualizer, which you can look through.
Uh, if you wish.
It doesn't matter how I've implemented it.
That's not the point here, but it draws it into like a graph in a way that I want to show you.
I'm going to run it right now.
I'm going to ask GPT four or mini this question, and I'm going to visualize the results.
Let me show it to you.
So that's running right now.
And here are the results.
And let me walk you through this.
And I think this might be a like another aha moment for you.
So for the first token, the first token that should come after the sentence, describe the color blue
to someone who has not seen before in one sentence.
The first token it thinks is most likely to be the word blue, with up to 3 to 1 decimal place 100.0%.
But if you were to keep going, it would be like 99.9999.
So it's almost 100% perfectly going to be blue.
The second most likely also appears to be blue.
But that's because there's, there's like, uh, it's blue without a word ending or something.
So that it's a different, different form of that token.
And then the other possibility is that it was thinking that it could start with the word imagine, but
very unlikely.
So it could think to a question like describe the color blue.
The first most likely word by token, by a long way is the word blue.
So blue gets selected and blue gets shoved on the end of that sequence.
And now it's saying describe the color blue to someone who's never been able to see before blue.
And now the model is going to generate the next token.
And for that it comes up with these.
These are the top three possibilities.
Blue is 62% possible, blue feels gets 38%, and blue can is much smaller.
And this all feels very believable.
You know, like I it doesn't surprise me that you could write a statistical model based on all the data
in the internet that would know that blue is is the most likely first word, and that is blue is.
And blue feels would be very plausible.
Second words.
The second word to come after the word blue and we select is.
So now we've got blue is and that's what we pass in again to GPT.
And the next thing it could it could come up with blue is the or blue is a or blue is like.
And again, that doesn't seem so far fetched that a statistical pattern matching program could see that
that is a very plausible next word.
So it selects blue is the, which is the most likely first three words to come after the sequence we've
had.
Sure, I buy that.
That doesn't seem so far fetched.
Blue is the cool or blue is the feeling, or blue is the calm and cool gets 87% feeling and calm.
They all do feel like very realistic sorts of words.
Blue is the cool and comma calming feeling of a gentle breeze on your skin or the And I encourage you
to look through this.
Look at the probabilities at each point and see you're getting to see like like to the Wizard of Oz
analogy, the the man behind the curtain.
You're getting to see some of the machinery of what's going on, how it is selecting probabilities of
tokens, and how by virtue of selecting the most likely next token, it's yielding this very expressive,
very poetic response to a very difficult question.
And I'm hoping that by stepping you through this, a little bit of the magic of what next token prediction
is about is kind of, uh, fading and you're thinking, oh, okay, so that's how it works.
Uh, so that's that's what I wanted to show you.
Uh, and you may have already seen it on my YouTube videos, in which case this is like, okay, I've
already seen this, but I love this.
For me, this was such a moment, even for me personally, because.
Because I knew this, of course.
But it's not until you you really see it, and you really agonize over it, that you get to feel this
for real and and you get that sort of sense of these are the ingredients, like, like I think I saw
in one of my videos when you know, the recipe behind some, some, some treat, it sort of loses its
sparkle a bit.
You're like, is that all?
And and it feels a bit like that here.
And what I do encourage you to do is just try changing this around like experiment with something else.
Describe the color orange to someone who's never been able to see.
And obviously you'll get some different response.
And then, uh, yeah, more about warmth and vibrancy.
And as you do this and you experiment with this, you just get that, that more and more tangible,
concrete understanding of what's happening and that these, uh, awesome LMS, these astonishing LMS
are really just statistical prediction machines.
So even if you'd seen this on my YouTube videos before, you've now got the code.
You should experiment with it.
Get that hands on.
Feel yourself.
You can also reimplement this for hugging face models now.
And that's actually very easy to do, and I'm sure GPT or Claude could do it for you as well.
Just just update my visualizer code to use the models classes instead and play with those models.
Get that hands on experience.
One final point to make is to to describe something called temperature.
You may already know that when you're calling OpenAI, you can pass in temperature as a field.
When you're doing the OpenAI create, you can say model equals messages and temperature equals.
And you may know that temperature equals zero means that you want it to, to be, uh, always, always
produce the same output like be very consistent in what it produces.
And a higher temperature gives you more variety in terms of its answers.
Some people describe it as being more imaginative, but I think that's not quite right.
It's more about the variation that you get.
The way that actually works in practice is is really just that when it's doing the inference, the code
that does this inference, this loop that picks the next token.
It's all about how it gets to choose that next token.
If you've put in a temperature of zero, then it's simply always picks the token that got the highest
probability.
That's the one that gets selected.
It always picks that one.
And that's why it's always going to be like the same with some randomness to it.
But basically when you have a higher temperature, rather than just always picking the token with the
highest probability, it samples from the tokens where ones with higher probabilities are more likely
to get selected, and the higher the temperature, the more willing it is to look beyond the token that
got the highest probability.
And so that's all that temperature is.
And so if you've used it before and you're wondering quite what that means and how that's incorporated
in the transformer, it's all about this this inference technique and how it selects the next token.
Okay.
Well I hope you enjoyed this.
This little look under the hood.
Now it's time for us to go back to actually go to Colab as it is here and get on with our week three
day five project.
081 - And welcome everybody to the project to conclude week three on day five, creating minutes from an audio
file.
And in case you're not feeling like this is interesting enough to you, remember this is multi-modal.
We're going to be using open source and closed source models.
We're going to use pipelines and the models tokenizers.
We're going to do a little bit of everything.
It's great practice.
You should definitely do this.
And it's just in Colab for you to try it all out and a little bit of extra.
I want to give you another piece of useful functionality, which is about connecting your colab to Google
Drive.
If you use that, and that's optional, you don't need to do that.
But but I find it very helpful, very handy indeed for keeping files and being able to easily use them
in Colab.
So we're going to write this program to be able to to collect minutes, take minutes, and to do's and
actions from a recording of a meeting and I found and in a data set, the minutes of the Denver City
Council are.
Seems like there's some riveting meeting minutes, should you wish to listen to them.
But it wasn't useful for me to take them to transcribe.
And I, uh, have uploaded them onto Google Drive, and I've got it so that you can download it.
And I've taken a snapshot of it, a small chunk, so that we're not spending money on APIs doing the
transcriptions.
Um, although there will be a completely open source version of this if you wish.
Um, so this is this is where you can download the file from my, where I have shared it.
So you can go here to, to download this file where it is available for you.
Uh, and also I've got the original data that I've linked to the hugging face data set where you can
go to see this is the bank of all the Denver City Council data.
And you can download the specific audio by going to that second link right there that will take you
there should you wish to get the audio yourself, and then sort of take a snippet that you want to analyze.
But I've already done that for you if you wish.
This is what we will use for our project.
Okay.
So you've downloaded this file to your local disk, and we will soon figure out how to upload it to
this Google Colab, because obviously it's not much good on your local disk.
We need it on Colab box.
So again remember if things go wrong with a Cuda error, you know what to do here.
The first step is to do some Pip installs just the same as yesterday.
Bits and bytes and accelerates.
That will be a common thing for us.
Then we've got a bunch of imports to run.
And of course you need to first make sure that you are connected to a T4.
Let me view my resources.
I have already run this so you can see I've been I've been hammering my memory.
We'll see if I survive without having to restart.
Uh, so done some installs and imports.
Uh, we're going to use this llama 3.2, so you need to have that permission as we got it yesterday.
If you don't feel free to use llama 3.1 or use Gwen or Jama or whatever you want to use.
Okay, so I want to give you this new capability to attach Colab to your Google Drive.
And this is optional.
When you run this, it's going to prompt you if I do this.
Uh oh.
So I've already mounted my Google Drive.
When you do this, when you run this, it's going to bring up a pop up, which is going to ask you if
you're okay to give permissions to Colab to access your Google Drive.
And you'll have to go through and say yes to everything.
You have to click yes twice.
And on one of the screens that comes up, you have to scroll down a bit to say yes, to authorize Colab
to access your Google Drive and give it the ability to see it.
Now I had one.
There was one student that was very concerned about the implications of doing that, and he said to
me he was concerned about giving Google the ability, the Google, uh, the ability to to read his Google
Drive.
Uh, and I pointed out to him the slight logical flaw in that, that Google very much already does have
an ability to read his Google Drive, given that it is Google's drive in the first place.
The thing you're giving permissions is for this notebook, this colab here to have access to your Google
Drive.
So the thing that you're confirming is that you trust that there's no evil code in here.
Malicious code that's going to dig into your Google Drive and do something nasty.
Which, in other words, you need to know that you trust me and that you can read this code and there's
nothing in here that's suspicious.
And as you'll see, it's very vanilla code.
So you should have some confidence in that.
Despite the fact that I'm clearly a super devious person, uh, you could probably spot that this code
has no opportunity to do anything nasty.
So.
So it's not.
I think that's probably a manageable risk.
Nonetheless, if you have any concerns whatsoever mapping a Google Drive, you certainly don't need
to do it.
I do it because I do find it really handy once you've run this and done said okay and given it permissions,
you'll find that your Google Drive will be mapped.
And so to show you what I mean by this, I'm going to press this, this button just here.
Take a look.
It's in the sidebar.
It's underneath that passwords.
The keys button is this files button.
You do that and it opens up this files browser.
And this is showing you the file system on this Colab box in the cloud.
It has its own directory structure.
And every time you create a new instance, every time you have a new runtime, you connect to a T4.
It has this this sample data folder that's like a data that comes comes with it.
And you can put more files in here.
And whenever you disconnect and delete the runtime or it gets closed, everything is wiped and it's
put back just the simple sample data.
And you'll notice here this drive, that's because I mounted my drive.
And so my Google drive is right there in in here.
And yours will be too if you've run this.
But if you don't want to, that's no problem at all.
You can also just simply press this upload button.
You press that button and you can upload find a file on your local drive like the one that you may have
just downloaded from.
From me.
This file here you downloaded, you can then simply upload it and put it right there, or put it in
a folder or something.
It's as simple as that.
And then this is accessible from this machine.
So this is the local file system that this machine is running on.
That's all there is to it.
Using this code here allows you to have your Google Drive mapped.
Uh, making life pretty easy.
Okay, with that, I close this.
Let's have a look.
So you can you can use exactly the same file as me, or you can use your own, but, uh, but when you've
done that, then this is another link to the same thing.
Download it, put it on your Google Drive, and I put it in a folder called LMS in my drive LMS.
And then Denver underscore extract, which is the name of the file.
So if you put it there then this file name will be the right file name for it on the local box.
If you put it somewhere else, then just name it, name it wherever it is right here.
If you if you manually upload it, just just put my just put slash content slash Denver extract.
Simple as that.
Okay.
Did I run this cell I don't think I did.
There we go.
Uh, okay.
So next up, we're just going to sign in to Hugging Face.
And we're going to open that audio file.
And if that gives you any problems, it means that you didn't, uh, have the right file name or you
haven't uploaded the right place.
I'm sure that's that's, uh, you'll be able to to to figure that one out.
Okay.
So we've got two steps to this project.
The first step is turning the audio into text.
And the second step is to analyze that text and do meeting minutes.
And for the first step I'm going to give you an open source and a closed source alternative.
And I'll show you both and you can pick from them.
Let's start with the open source one.
The open source one is going to use hugging face pipelines.
So we're going to use this nice pipeline I don't think I need that import.
This is it.
We're just going to import pipeline.
Remember the great thing about pipeline is that you can just simply say the task give a model.
We're going to give a model called whisper a simple model that OpenAI has the English variant of it.
You can take that out if you want it to be multi-language.
Uh, and we're going to I think that's, uh, I think.
That's better.
Uh, and uh, we are then going to, uh, just simply run this and print the transcription.
Let's kick that off.
Let's see if this works.
The torch detect works as well, by the way, but I think that's the one we saw earlier.
I think when it says it's deprecated.
Now you're meant to say dtype.
Uh, so we're letting this run.
It's going to now uh, going to it's, it's using Cuda.
So it's going to be on my GPU, it's going to be running that extract of a Denver City Council meeting
through this model.
And it's going to be turning it from audio into text.
Now when you run this it will actually download the models.
It might take a bit longer, but I already ran this uh, look, my system Ram is really very full.
Uh, but, uh, it's now going to be going through and changing that audio into text, and I'll see
you in a second when it's done.
082 - Okay, the transcription just finished.
It took all of two minutes and here it is.
Um, merging of two rivers, the kind we've seen recently and politics in the world.
There's a very big issue.
Lots of stuff that came from transcribing this Denver City Council meeting.
And I'm just going to store that in a variable open source transcription, because now we're going to
use the other way of doing it.
We're going to use open AI.
It has a GPT four mini transcribe.
Now I just ran this and it cost me $0.03, but I'm not sure whether that was doing it once or whether
that's because I ran it twice.
So it's either cost one and a half cents or $0.03 if you do it.
So you would have to be comfortable with that, with that spend.
Or you could always check whatever the latest pricing is of this, but it's certainly not more.
It shouldn't be more of that order.
But as always, don't always have a minimum spend on your key if you're ever concerned about this stuff.
Um, okay.
Now, the first thing you need to do, though, is if you want to do the closed source and this is optional,
you can just stick with the open source one if you want to use the frontier model, then you need to
go to the keys over here and make sure that your OpenAI API key is here.
So it's got to look exactly like that.
Not open API key, but OpenAI API key.
You remember that it's got to be exactly right.
You've got to have your key in the value, you've got to have it turned on, and then you'll be able
to have access to that.
And so here we do it.
We get uh, the uh audio model is GPT four Mini Transcribe.
This is where I collect that key that we just put over there.
This is where I create a new OpenAI passing in that API key.
And then I call transcription is OpenAI transcriptions create, I pass in the audio model, name the
file and the response format, and then we will also print it.
Let's see what it comes up with.
Leave it running and I'll be right back with you.
And OpenAI finished.
And it took all of 27 seconds.
It was faster than the two minutes, and you can see just visually looking at the print there, that
it appears to be pretty similar.
But look where one of them where the open source one put a comma.
This put a full stop just showing different interpretations really, but otherwise it looks pretty similar.
We can print them both one after another.
I noticed that one of them is slightly longer, so maybe there's a max tokens I want to set somewhere
if I wanted to get the full thing, but otherwise they look pretty similar and you can just choose to
run one of those two.
But I wanted to show you the use of pipelines.
Some good practice there.
And back to using the OpenAI API as well.
So we've got some some frontier model in this too.
Okay.
That is step one.
We've taken some audio and we've turned that into text speech to text.
So now we've done text to speech in the past, speech to text today.
And we've also of course done done image generation two.
So we're covering lots of modalities.
Anyways next step is going to be to analyze this transcription and produce a report, a report of the
summary of the minutes and the actions.
Let's get to it.
And so as usual, we focus on our prompts.
I have a system message.
You produce minutes of meetings from transcripts with summary discussion points, takeaways and action
items in markdown format without code blocks, and the user prompt is.
Below is a transcript of a Denver Council meeting.
Please write minutes in markdown without code blocks, including these these things summary discussion
points, takeaways, action items with owners.
And then there is the transcription.
Maybe we should put in this.
This might make it clearer transcription like that.
Um, extra space.
Uh, so that's a nicely laid out, you might say.
There's a bit of repetition between these two, but repetition is never a problem.
In fact, it's always a decent idea to try and say things a couple of times because you're biasing the
model to be that much more likely to adhere to your task, to be aligned with what you want it to do.
So let's run that.
And now we're going to use bits and bytes to quantize to four bits.
You remember this?
This is the Nf4 data type that you can look up to.
Find out more about the normal distribution so that, uh, the four bit number with 16 possible values
can be mapped to a floating point space.
And now here of course, is the simple open source steps.
We get Lamaze tokenizer.
We we set the pad token to be the EOS token.
How could you forget this?
Haha.
Doesn't everybody set the Pad token to be token?
Uh.
All right.
And then we take the tokenizer.
We use the apply chat template utility so that we can pass in these messages and turn it into a sequence
of tokens with a special tokens slotted in there.
And then we get the return tensors in PyTorch style that's needed so that we can put it on the GPU.
And if this seems, you know, that practice is how you will, you will get familiar with this.
You should do this yourself and run this and look at it.
But basically it's something you just do by rote.
This is how you do it.
You apply a chat template to turn messages into a sequence.
You turn it into PyTorch, you put it on Cuda.
This is the streamer thing that I introduced yesterday that we're going to create a text streamer telling
it what tokenizer we're using.
And then finally the big guy we take our model.
It is the auto model for causal LLM causal LLM language modeling from pre-trained.
We give it our Lama model name.
We say we want it on the GPU.
We're going to quantize.
And then we simply say generate the output and use this streamer so that you can stream the results.
And we run this and it's now going to it's going to load in.
First of all Lama now here I'm suggesting you use the different models yesterday the 3 billion parameter
version of Lama.
So it's the you know a bit a bit chunkier than the one we did yesterday.
And my GPUs are very, very tight.
I'm not sure if this is gonna gonna run because it's the second time I'm running it.
Hopefully it will, uh, keep an eye on that.
It's always worth looking at it on your computer to make sure that your GPU memory is good.
Loading this in.
So far we're doing fine.
And of course, if you've if you've, uh, already run it, then then it should be faster the second
time.
Here we go.
It's running.
And this was the the input going in right here.
And here we see it streaming back.
Results are, are LM call is coming back with a transcription with a heading.
The summary 11 members, the location, the discussion points.
Councilman Lopez presented proclamation 1127.
In observance of the second annual Indigenous Peoples Day.
Councilman Lowman takeaways, action items, additional notice.
A lot about Councilman Lowman.
Lopez obviously had a lot to say in this meeting.
There we have it.
This this has been the results of our LM reporting, summarizing and giving the action points and takeaways
as a result of the Denver City Council meeting.
It has been successful, but obviously we don't know for sure it's been successful until we've seen
that marked down, printed out nicely.
So here it is.
Uh, this this is the summary formatted nicely.
The Denver City Council minutes summary.
There are the attendees, the discussion points, the takeaways, the action items and the additional
notes.
So there you have it generated by llama 3.2.
If you use a bigger model, you can get of course different kinds of results.
But this all ran for free except that we one of the alternatives was all completely for free.
There was also the alternative to have spent $0.03 doing the transcribing, but other than that, this
was an example of using free open source models in order to build some commercial functionality.
This is actually a capability that is built into different commercial products, uh, like, like zoom
and others and many others.
And so this is something that you know how to build yourself now with open source, and you can do it
and you should do it.
And I've got I've put in here a student contribution that builds stuff.
Put it uh, put this into Gradio, which is really cool.
And you can do that too.
There's so much you can do with this to turn it into a fully baked tool.
And you absolutely should.
This has given you some building blocks to experiment with, and the best way to build the expertise
you need is through practice and building.
Use open source models, experiment with them and build stuff.
If you can think of parallel ideas of how you could apply this directly to your business, then you
should do so and take take a look through this.
Make sure you run this yourself.
And if you come up with something interesting, that is a different twist on it that you'd like me to
to add in here, please do send it to me and I will add in links to your projects to uh, since since
it's not so easy to do a, do a PR for, for, uh, colabs.
That's the way I'll do it.
I'll include your examples in here so that other students can get to see your work.
Anyway, I hope you enjoyed that and I will see you back for the slides to give you your assignment
and for a wrap up.
083 - Okay.
And this brings us to the conclusion of week three, where at the end of week three, day five.
And that can only mean one thing.
It means it is assignment time.
It is time for an exercise to wrap up the week, and one that can get you to put open source models
to the test.
And here it is one of the the the core use cases of LMS of JNI that can be applied to almost any business
area is generating synthetic data using an LLM to create data sets that you can use in any project,
and building yourself a synthetic data generator, something which you can you can put in something
like, like, um, I want to have example, um, employee records.
I want to have example product definition guides, whatever it might be, be able to describe the kind
of data you need, how you want it structured its purpose, and build something that can generate lots
of these documents.
Uh, that that is something which will be incredibly useful to you, I guarantee it.
So that's the project that I'm going to suggest.
Write some models that can generate data sets, use a variety of different models, use that as your
way of exploring the capabilities of models, and it also will give you nice and varied data set as
well.
So it gives you diverse outputs and diverse experience too, which is what this is all about.
Uh, try quantizing, try not quantizing, try different different shapes and sizes.
And of course, why not make a gradio UI for your product as well so that you can you can look at it
and generate it and maybe even share it with other people at your company, and maybe, maybe post about
it on LinkedIn so I can jump in there and see it myself and try generating synthetic data.
Several students have done and it's great.
It's very impressive.
I used one of those to generate some data, and I've got of course, I've built my own, uh, synthetic
data set generators many times.
So it's a great exercise more than anything else.
Now it's about practice.
The best way to solidify this in your mind is to do it several times.
Then you'll never think twice about the Pad token equals iOS token because you just typed it out or
whatever, and they apply chat templates and all that other stuff, it becomes second nature once you've
done it like 30 times.
So, uh, build your synthetic data set generator and share it and, uh, and and enjoy the process.
And as I say, that's something that is particularly useful because you can use it in your day job.
You can use it with any sort of home projects that you're building.
Models.
It's the utility is so broad.
So a great project to make.
And with that, with that week three is complete and this week was it was definitely getting advanced.
You can now code with frontier models.
You can build an AI assistant, but also you can now build an LLM solution combining frontier and open
source models.
You can use the pipelines but also the model API in hugging face Transformers library.
And you're starting to get some intuition and feel for how neural networks work under the hood for for
the layers of a neural network, for the dimensionality embeddings and the self-attention layer.
Again, you don't need to know this stuff in too much detail, but you need to have good intuition for
it and the basis of an understanding.
And I do hope that you like that inference, that visualization, and that you've played with that a
bit yourself and got that perspective, that very rich understanding of what inference actually entails.
Okay.
Okay.
So that concludes week three.
Next week.
Next week it's going to be all about what is perhaps the single most important question that gets asked
with Llms, which is which one is the right one?
There's so many of them.
What's the best one?
People say to me, what's the best LLM?
Well, we're going to try and answer that very question next week.
We're going to be comparing Llms.
We're also going to be using a particular task.
We're going to be doing code generation as well with a bunch of different models.
And I know as well I realize that next week is the week before Rag week.
I know people very much like Rag Week, so.
But but next week is going to be great too.
I want to make sure that you're not going to want to skip it, because we're going to do so much great
stuff.
And so get to have a great break and refresh and then come in ready to go for week four.
Coming right up.
084 - Okay, it's week four and I have some good news.
And I have some good news.
The good news is that we've only got one more week to go until rag week, which is where everyone wants
to be.
And the other good news is that this week is really quite short and quick and sharp and, uh, yeah,
it's definitely, uh, going to be easier than the last two weeks.
So prepare for interesting quick fun week and then rag week.
And don't skip this week because it's quick and fun.
And we'll get to ragweed really fast.
Okay.
Let's get started okay.
So today we are going to be talking about the most important question that we will cover on this course,
which is which is the best LM that's the one that you'll be able to answer at the end of today.
And what you can already do is confidently code with front end models, with the chat Completions API,
build a multimodal AI assistant, and build solutions with the hugging face Transformers library, both
at the of the pipelines level and at the tokenizers and models level.
Okay.
Let's talk quickly about how we got to where we are.
You started out.
Oh, just a few weeks ago, we covered the foundations of Check Completions API.
We covered front end models, API's tool calling Multi-modality.
And then last week we really dug into hugging face.
This week selecting models and also generating code.
And then next week is rag week.
Did I mention that next week is rag week?
I might have mentioned the next week is rag week.
We will do that next week.
It's gonna be so great.
And then the week after that we go.
The last three weeks are really intense fine tuning, a frontier model, traditional data science and
modeling, and then fine tuning an open source model.
A really big week, and then the finale.
A gigantic AI, a beautiful product.
So much to do at the end of which you will be able to plant the flag of success and say that you have
mastered LM engineering.
And this brings us to the question du jour, which is which is the best model?
What's the best LM to pick?
And I know you've been wondering this, and of course, the answer is that that is not an acceptable
question.
It's an ill posed question.
There is no best LM.
The right question is what's the right model for the task at hand, given the problem you're trying
to solve, which is the best model for that?
And in answering that question, there are there's a whole strategy that we're going to cover for,
for how you go about making sure you pick the right one.
And of course, it starts with understanding your requirements.
And once you've understood the requirements that we'll we will cover later, you then look at a model
in in two ways.
Look at two aspects.
One is just the basic information about a model.
And the second is digging into the benchmarks.
And when I say looking at the basics, I'm saying things like how many parameters does it have?
What's the context window, how much does it cost, what's the license, that kind of stuff.
You first use that to develop your candidate set of models that you want to look in more detail at,
the ones that you can afford, the ones that you can build against quick enough, all that kind of stuff.
And once you've done that, the next thing you do is you look at the benchmarks, and the benchmarks
are the published metrics in which the models are assessed against different things, like how good
are they at coding, how good are they at understanding language, at reasoning those benchmarks?
And you can look at them on leaderboards, which is which are the sort of tables which rank the different
models against different criteria.
And there are also arenas where models are put head to head, which are some fun places to look.
And we will look at all of this over the next couple of days.
But first, let's drill into the basics.
So what do I mean by looking at the basics?
Well, first of all, you want to look at the models that you're thinking about and say, are they open
source or closed source paid models?
Are they chat or are they reasoning models or are they hybrid?
And you've now got a pretty good sense of what what that means.
And the pros and cons.
But but certainly it's not always the case that that a reasoning model is better.
Reasoning models often perform better on benchmarks.
They often perform better in terms of their their intelligence because they can think things through.
And that's one of the two ways you can scale.
But they tend to be slower.
They tend to not be so good at generating creative content.
So there are definitely limitations with reasoning models as well.
And then there are hybrid models which which are able to choose whether they want to chat or do reasoning
depending on the situation.
And and often that's a great choice.
But sometimes you don't want a hybrid model because you only want a chat model, for example.
So that's one decision.
There's also the date when the model was released, of course.
How recent is it?
When is its knowledge cut off?
When is the time?
Up until it was trained?
That will tell you what kind of information is part of its training set that will already know, without
needing any inference time techniques.
In other words, if it was trained up until July of this year, then built into its training, knowledge
already will be facts.
Up until that point, it will know about all that information just right away.
Out of the box you can just ask that question, but if you wanted to know about more recent information,
you would need to add that to the prompts.
You would need to arm it with that information when you ask it the question, so that it's equipped
to answer it either either through prompts or through tools.
And when I say inference time techniques, that's what I mean.
You would need to to come up with ways to, to inject that expertise into the model.
Okay.
Then of course, the number of parameters that gives you this indication of, of, of its, of its capability
of, of how, uh, how much information it's been able to absorb during training time.
And we, we went through that timeline of how many parameters there are in larger models.
And of course, I did point out that sometimes it can be a mistake to overfocus on the number of parameters,
because in recent days people have done well at getting more into slightly smaller models.
But as a rule of thumb, generally bigger is better.
More parameters means smarter.
And then the training tokens is just how much data was used to train this model.
More data, of course, means it's got more knowledge.
Uh, so that's that's something to look for.
And the context window, you know this one.
Well, this of course, is the the total capacity the model has to look back on information from the
conversation.
It's not just the most recent prompt.
It's not just the current prompt it's responding to.
It's got to fit the first message you sent it, the reply, the next message, the reply to that, everything
that's going in this memory of prior conversation, of prior messages, as part of this conversation,
up to and including the current response that the model is generating, It all has to fit into the context
window.
Yes, I know you understand this.
So that's another thing to look for.
And typically you can get all this information by looking at something called the model card, which
is something that every provider like OpenAI publishes with its model.
So you can just Google just to look up the model card.
But there are also some leaderboards which lay out this information so that you can compare it.
And then there are some other basic facts about models that you'd want to know to be able to compare
them.
And some of these aren't available on the model card.
You'd have to look them up.
One of them, of course, is the cost.
How much is it going to cost to run this model?
And there's two possible costs there.
It could be the API cost.
If you're using like a cloud, a frontier model on the cloud, or if you're running it locally, there's
there's this sort of sense that if I'm running a local model, then it's free.
And in a way it is.
But remember, you're still paying for the compute one way or another.
If it's running on your machine, it's going to be hammering your computer.
If you're running it on your on your company's servers, it's still got a cost.
So you have to factor in the runtime it computes.
There's the cost to do any extra training that you need to do.
So if you're assuming you're going to take this model and you're going to need to train it more, as
we will do in week seven, and it's going to be great, then you need to factor in that cost.
If you're going to be building something like Rag that we're doing next week or building a product around
it, then you need to understand the build cost.
And that's something that you'll need to to work out.
And then very much related to build cost is the time to market, which is of course, how long is it
going to take you to build the product that you need to build?
And you might say, what's that got to do with the model?
Well, these things are all related, because if you're using something simple, like if you're using
GPT five or Claude for five on it, then then you know, you're getting such a head start that the amount
of build you have to do is relatively light.
You can very quickly, uh, roll something out that's using a Top frontier model like that.
But if you're trying to use your own open source model, or if you're wanting to use a smaller model,
a cheaper model, your runtime costs will be lower.
But you'll need to spend more time doing the build and experiments and figuring out how you get the
business performance you need from a smaller, cheaper model, and so that that would affect the time
to market.
So that is a that is absolutely a factor here.
The larger, more expensive models you should be able to get out much faster.
Rate limits is a factor.
So some open some some frontier models.
Some closed source models have limitations on how often you can call them.
And so you need to be make sure you're cognizant of them.
Uh, typically if you're willing to pay more then then you can have higher rate limits.
So there's there's usually an opportunity to spend more money there.
But but not always even even open AI has limitations even if you spend to the top tier, there are some
limits.
Although I imagine there's a call me at some point that you could probably have an enterprise deal if
you wished.
Still, you need to know about what the constraints are and then speed.
Speed how fast the model will respond.
Different models have very, very different speed characteristics, as we'll see later.
But but things like for Gemini, flash light is blazingly fast.
GPT five nano is quite fast.
GPT four one nano is really fast, and it's great to have that perspective on these things.
And of course, yes, there are leaderboards that compare these so you can quickly pick the model that's
going to have the performance characteristics that you need.
And then closely related to speed is latency.
Uh, or people sometimes talk about the mean time to the first token.
And it's particularly, uh, prominent with, with the reasoning models that tend to think before they
start responding.
So the time until it starts bringing back responses that you might be streaming onto your UI.
That has become increasingly important.
And so people need to look at both speed and latency, or the time to the first token, side by side
when considering whether a model is suitable for their business purpose and then license often forgotten
about, but particularly when you're working with open source models, different models do have different
licenses.
You need to understand some of them are very permissive and you can use them for any purpose.
Some of them have limitations in terms of your ability to use it for to for commercial gains.
So there's there's some revenue caps, uh, and then some of them, like metas need you to, to sign
various agreements, as you've discovered, uh, which limits your ability to use them for evil and
things like that.
And also, I think perhaps to compete with meta.
Uh, but, of course, that's where you get the lawyers involved, and you make sure that whatever license
is associated with the model suits your business goals.
085 - So the next topic is something called the Chinchilla scaling law, which you used to hear about a lot
about a year ago.
And you hear less about it now because it turns out that things aren't as simple as perhaps we thought
they were.
But this was a law, an idea that Google published, and they named it the Chinchilla scaling law because
their model at the time, and this was a while back, was called Chinchilla.
It was the model that came after another model called gopher.
You can see there's a theme there.
Uh, so the idea of this, of this law was they were trying to understand how do you how do you scale
models?
How do you go from having a model with a certain number of parameters, let's say 8 billion parameters
to one with 16 billion parameters and get like twice the performance from it?
And what they discovered is that you basically need to scale your training data in a proportional way.
So if you have double the number of parameters in your model, then you're going to need to find twice
as much training data to take advantage of that.
And the way to really think about that is that imagine that you're trying to train a model with, with
with 8 billion parameters, and you start to find that you're let's say you're halfway through training
your training data and you're seeing that you're getting diminishing returns.
Your model's not doing any better.
It seems to be sort of stuck at the halfway point in your training data, and you've got like, like
double as much to go.
Then what you have to think is, okay, that's my sign that I need to double the number of parameters.
I will need twice as many parameters in my neural network to be able to take on twice as much training
data, and similarly, it works the other way as well.
If you've got a model and you've decided you want to now double the number of parameters and you want
to be able to to train it and get more performance, you'll need to use twice as much training data
as you used before.
If you want to get the benefit of all these extra parameters.
So that was the Chinchilla scaling law.
It was relating the parameters to the the amount, the number of tokens of training data that you use
to train that model.
And this is still a helpful rule of thumb, and it helps us understand what it means to double the number
of parameters.
But it's probably emphasized less now for for two, at least two reasons.
And one of them, they're both things we've talked about.
But one of them, of course, is that recently we've found better and better ways to sort of squeeze
information into a model without needing as many parameters.
We've found techniques to compress models so that you can reduce the number of parameters and get just
as much information from them, um, and through through through better training techniques, through
better ways of, of, of sort of filtering out of, of what they call pruning the, the number of weights
in your model and through better architectures.
And so as a result, you know, we've got things like llama 3.2, which is a much smaller model, which
is extremely powerful still.
And even we've played with that.
Gemma three with only 270 million parameters and it's not very good.
But still for 270 parameters, it's it's way better than some of the earliest GPT models that had that
many.
So that's that's one reason why why this is emphasized less.
And another reason of course, if you may have thought about it, the other reason is just that generally
now inference time techniques have become so prominent, this idea that getting better performance from
a model isn't just about what you do at training time, it's also so much what you do at inference time.
More reasoning, um, using using using techniques like rag.
Yes, it's coming soon.
Uh, this this has meant that there's less emphasis just on training to get more performance from a
model.
And that's another reason why people talk about the chinchilla scaling law less.
But nonetheless, it's it's a good, um, point of theory to keep in mind that given the same model
with the same architecture and the same training techniques, double the number of parameters, you'd
need twice as much training data.
086 - So once you've got through looking at the basics that you've used to select your kind of shortlist of
models, the next thing you do is you look at the benchmarks.
And now as I as we will cover later in the week, benchmarks only take you so far that benchmarks is
not the final way that you validate whether a model is right for your problem, but it's a good starting
point.
We will talk much more about this when we talk through a strategy for how you pick the right model,
but these benchmarks give you a sort of early guidance that allows you to select a subset of models.
And there are a number of different benchmarks out there.
There's lots of ways you can assess models, but there are a few that are really hard.
There are a few that are really challenging tests that allow us to differentiate different models the
most.
And they're the ones that I'll go through with you now, but there are lots more, and I'm going to
show you a whole bunch of them because I'm for some reason, I'm fascinated by benchmarks and by comparing
llms.
But we're going to talk about these six now, and then we'll look at a whole bunch And you'll get a
really good feeling for how you judge the the capabilities of different LMS.
So the first metric we're going to look at is called G.
And that stands for Google Proof Q&A.
And you might wonder what Google proof means exactly.
It's like Google can prove it.
It's kind of the opposite.
So these are 448 difficult physics chemistry and biology questions.
And when I say difficult this is what I mean.
If you give it to humans who are not at PhD level, such as myself, I am a PhD level human.
Uh, and you give me these, these questions.
Uh, maybe you are also a PhD level.
Maybe you are.
But but if you were to take these questions, then on average, you would score 34% in them, even if
you were given access to Google and half an hour to do as much research as you want to answer these
questions.
It's still only score 34%.
And that is why they're considered Google proof.
Because not not even with Google.
Can you solve them?
And yeah, PhD level human capability on these questions is 65%, 65% is PhD level.
And when they came out with this test, it was the GPT four days.
And GPT four was scoring 39% above non PhD level.
And that was considered fantastic.
And this was seen as a very hard benchmark.
So the question I have for you now is what do you think current frontier models are doing with Gpca.
Remember these numbers PhD level is 65%.
Do you think that frontier models have got to PhD level with physics, chemistry and biology?
I'll let you make your decision and later we will have a look.
The next metric is MMA.
Pro MMA is a very common benchmark you hear about all over the place.
It stands for massive multitask language.
Understanding a ton of questions that test a model's ability to show its understanding of the meaning
of something.
But the metric was was considered broken because it was too easy and models easily.
And it was it was also it had ambiguity as well.
So it was just a bad test.
Used to be quoted a lot until generally people decided that that it was it was not a robust test.
And so they came out with MLU Pro and that is different.
It is a harder one.
Instead of models coming up with a multiple choice answers of just four possibilities, they get ten
possibilities.
They ambiguity has been removed.
The questions are difficult.
And this is a robust, uh, trustworthy metric that you should look out for.
And then aim is a test that you may know about already.
You might have heard about this.
It is a competitive math, puzzle competition that's taken by high schoolers.
But this is not.
This is not your typical high school kind of test.
This is like top.
Top performing?
Uh mathmos.
At school.
Who do this competitively, competitively and go in for Math Olympiad style competitions.
And this is one of the really, really hard ones.
And you can look it up to see the sorts of questions that that certainly I would I'm sure I wouldn't
be able to do any of them.
And this set of questions is asked to models to to gauge their their math problem solving abilities.
It's not like mental arithmetic.
They are all maths puzzles and then live code bench.
There's actually a many different coding benchmarks that we'll look at.
This is one of them.
This is a benchmark for evaluating models ability to write code based on problems.
Uh, from from contests on sites like LeetCode and Codeforces and so on.
And, and this particular benchmark.
They work hard to make sure that the puzzles change a lot, so that models can't just get see it in
their in their training data and get familiar with the puzzles.
They're constantly changing.
Then Musa is one of my favorites because it's such it's got such a nice, tangible part to it.
But Musa, a multi-step, soft reasoning, is about a model's ability to think its way through something.
So it's meant to particularly bring to the surface reasoning models.
And basically the model is asked a number of different questions.
There are three categories, but the most the category that I love is the one that is about crime mysteries.
Whodunits.
Uh, and particularly it's given an a thousand word murder mystery, and it's asked the question, who
has the means, the motive and the opportunity?
So it has to read the story and come up with that conclusion.
I think that's fabulous, because it's such a kind of like a real world puzzle.
And that is the way that the muse works.
That's that's the one of the three categories of test.
And last but definitely not least, last but most.
In fact last but most is a is a benchmark that everybody loves, which is called HL, which stands for
you may know this.
It stands for Humanity's Last exam.
This is meant to test a superhuman level of intelligence.
It's meant to be the hardest test that we could possibly come up with.
And this is really in response to the fact that every time we set a hard test, models seem to just
over the period of just like a year, they seem to find out how to crush it just by getting better and
better.
So the idea of HL was to build a test that is just so far out, and it has 2500 of some of the most
insanely complex questions you could possibly imagine.
We will look at some of them and you will be like, what?
Uh, and at the time that HLA came out, which was just a late, late in 2024, um, models were at
the scoring maybe 2%, 3% in it.
And so they're still not doing great.
But but it's still it's been a hefty move since then.
Uh, again, as with Gpca, I will let you ponder what you think, where you think we are at right now.
Don't look it up yet.
Wait till we get there and see if you're right.
And so that that wraps up looking at these six hard benchmarks.
There are many other ones that are sort of simpler ones to to weigh up different factors.
But I enjoy these because they are challenging and you really get to differentiate what top performance
looks like today.
And you can watch these these metrics to see how things change over the course of the next year.
Maybe by the time that you watch these videos, when I show you the numbers already, models will have
will have moved on from from where I am right now, which is really exciting.
And another reason, one of the many reasons why I love watching benchmarks.
087 - But I know, I know the cynics amongst you.
The skeptics have been rolling your eyes at me all the way through this, and I felt it.
I felt the pressure of your eye roll.
There are, of course, some very serious limitations with the benchmarks.
There are reasons why you should use benchmarks as as a sort of first indication, an indicator.
But you should take benchmarks with a heavy pinch of salt.
They are indications and only indications.
And here are some of the problems with them.
Okay, so first of all there is this very well known problem called training data contamination.
Training data contamination is saying that uh, unfortunately it's it's been very hard to keep these
benchmarks secret so that very quickly, information about what's being tested gets leaked a little
bit so that when future generations of models are trained, they have some information about these tests
in their training data.
And as a result, they do better because they they already know what the questions are going to be,
and they've been trained on the right answers.
They've seen it in their training data.
And that that effect is called a training data contamination.
And there are of course ways to to protect for it.
One of them is just to be very, very secret about your your benchmarks.
One of them is to change your benchmarks a lot.
And we will look at some benchmarks that that what they're big, they're big thing.
Their raison d'etre is that they rotate, they change their metrics all the time so that they're constantly
one step ahead.
Uh, Apple put out a famous paper when some Apple scientists took a well-known benchmark that was being
used to compare models, and they took the questions in that benchmark, and they changed facts about
the questions in a way that didn't change the spirit of the question at all.
It just changed the facts, the name in some way.
And they're able to show that a number of models, their performance dropped significantly after they
did that, demonstrating that training data contamination had happened.
And then another concern is that benchmarks aren't always Is consistently applied.
There are some things about running a benchmark.
Like.
Like what hardware a model runs on that aren't specified, and some benchmarks are self-reported by
the model providers, in which case you don't really know how they recreated it.
And there's some wiggle room there.
So that's a concern.
There's very much a concern that benchmarks are tend to be narrowly scoped, like Gqa I mentioned is
physics, chemistry and biology, and we think of it as showing PhD level performance.
But that's very specific areas we're testing.
And they happen to be things which probably lend themselves very well to a kind of this kind of test.
So it's not it doesn't necessarily mean that a model is generally at PhD level in many subjects, just
because it's good at physics, chemistry and biology.
And that's why there are famously some, some questions.
People have asked an LLM to draw a picture of a chessboard, one move away from checkmate.
And it can't do it because the combination of drawing things and reasoning through it is just too hard.
And there are questions which are clearly not PhD level.
And so, you know, it's a clear example of how the benchmarks are testing for one particular kind of
thing that models are very good at, but not generally testing.
That's, that's, that's it's not not possible to scope them that way.
And very similar point is that a lot of these benchmarks do things like multiple choice answers and
even even Musa that I that I had explained about the murder mysteries, it's still a fairly fixed construct.
It's still just having it come up with who had the means, the motive, the opportunity.
It's hard to test for for nuance.
It's hard to have something because you often need like multiple choice or something to be able to to
decide whether the model got it right or wrong.
And so you're not really assessing nuance.
And then saturation is the, the point I made before why we've got these harder benchmarks.
Saturation is saying that models have just got better and better.
And a lot of the initial benchmarks already model score in the 99%.
And so they've become useless now because models are already just better than any of that.
And overfitting, which is a bit like data set contamination.
But it's saying that that, uh, that you can have a model that is overly trained to solve for a particular
metric.
So, for example, supposing that that anthropic are training the next version of Claude, and they
come up with 4 or 5 different candidate versions of it, and they decide to test each of those against
Gpca, and they find that one of them does the best and they're like, okay, well, that's got the
best gpca let's pick that one.
Well, you should have like the scientist in, you should detect a little tiny problem there, because
if you repeat that enough times, if you always select the model out of a set of candidate models that
performs best on the metric, then you are kind of implicitly training for that metric.
And you there's a big risk that you overfit for that metric, because you're constantly picking the
model that happens to do best with that metric.
And if you're doing that because there was just some random variations of the model.
And it's not that it's the smartest one, it's just the one that randomly happens to do better on that
test.
Then you can delude yourself into thinking that it's smarter when it's not.
It's just the lucky model, the lucky model specifically for those test questions.
And then you do what Apple did and you slightly change those test questions, and suddenly it ain't
lucky anymore.
And it's doing badly.
And that is overfitting.
And then there's one more, one more thing to mention which is not yet understood or proven.
It's a limitation that people are worried about.
But we we don't necessarily have all the information on this.
The, the research isn't in and it's that frontier, the top models, the best models on the planet.
They they may be aware which I put in air quotes because obviously I'm sort of humanizing a data science
model.
But but they, they, they may have the ability to, to know that they are being run in the mode of
evaluation And at the time, and so they may distort their answers, given that they are aware that
they are being evaluated.
And that might have sounded really abstract to you.
It's like what?
Why does that?
You might think, why does that?
Why does that even matter?
Like so what if it knows it's being evaluated?
If it's great at physics, chemistry and biology questions, then good for it, then it can do well.
Well, here's the problem.
Supposing the thing that you're evaluating is something like what they call alignment, which is how
how good it is at obeying instructions.
How how much it will perform consistent with the tasks that you've asked it to do, which is something
that's very important for us.
Well, if it knows it's being evaluated for alignment, if it realizes from the way the question is
asked that this is testing its ability to follow instructions, then that might guide it to giving the
impression that it is good at following instructions.
And then when it feels like it's not being evaluated, but it has the opportunity to do something for
some other reason, then maybe it can.
I'm being a bit abstract because as I say, that this is not yet something that is that is well understood.
There are many security companies working on this right now and throw it.
Put an amazing blog post about this a bit a few months ago now about some of their security, uh, training,
which was just just it was quite hypothetical, but it was fascinating.
Anthropic's blog is always great to read, and they've got some, some really interesting articles on
on security.
Uh, but yeah, this is one to watch.
This is not yet known.
One to watch.
It could be a very serious limitation of benchmarks, particularly when it comes to assessing things
like alignment.
Now look this was going to be all the material for today.
But we're not even going to do a lab.
It's just this talky stuff.
Things on metrics.
So I do love metrics, but I couldn't do that to you.
So so I thought, I will have to show you something.
So I'm not going to show you a leaderboard because we're doing them tomorrow.
We're gonna do lots of leaderboards tomorrow.
But I'm going to show you, uh, something fun.
So, so, uh, let's go to the next video and I have something in store for you.
088 - So I just have a quick demo for you as I love leaderboards so much.
I built my own leaderboard, which is more more of a of something to to amuse you.
And it's, uh, you remember outsmart I hope from, from the first week.
Well, this is called Connect four, and this is what it looks like.
So this is a leaderboard which is designed to test out models to see how good they are at a particularly,
uh, easy task for a human and one that turns out to be not so easy for a model which is playing the
board game Connect four, which I imagine most people know.
But it's that thing with the you can see it right here.
So the blue grid, you drop a coin counter into the grid, you just have to pick one of the rows and
it falls down.
And the job is to make four in a row.
And it's nice and easy because there only are the seven different moves you can make at each time just
which column you drop the coin down.
So it's nice and easy and fun.
One and you get to uh, to, to to to quickly discover a few patterns and things to look for.
It turns out this is really hard for models because there's a lot of information on there with the different,
uh, coins.
And because these models don't have things like a loop, like we can code.
They are just predicting tokens.
So playing connect four is a big challenge for them.
And it turns out particularly like seeing diagonals is amusingly something they struggle with.
So the way I've set this up is that you can pick who you want to play red and who you want to play yellow.
And over time, I rotate which models I make available because it's all using my my keys.
So.
So, uh.
Yes.
Go gentle on me should you decide to, to run this.
Some people run like ten games.
I'm like, ah, but you can feel free to.
I'm very happy for people to use this.
So I'm going to show you a game right now to show you how it works.
And we're going to pick we'll pick the defaults.
So so this is the new open source model from OpenAI.
The 120 billion the large version of it, not the 20 that I had running on my computer, but the 120.
And we're running it on grok with a Q, the fast inference platform with proprietary hardware.
So that is the red player, the yellow player.
We will use again another fast model.
So you can watch this running fast.
We will use Gemini 2.50, Gemini 2.5 flash, but Gemini 2.5 Flash light, which is the really fast variant.
Uh, and we will give that a shot.
So here I go.
I press run game and they off they go.
And as I say, it's pretty fast.
Now the thing I want you to look at is what's on the left and the right here.
You see that in every move you can see that red has already basically got what should be.
Yes, Red has seen it already.
Uh, we can stop.
It's it's too fast.
I was too busy trying to explain it.
So Red won very quickly by doing the standard trick where it puts two down and then knows that it can
make a four.
Uh, it says red is three in a row and can win immediately.
And yellow, uh, has, uh, thinks thinks that because it has a winning opportunity.
It thinks because it has three coins without understanding that it does not have a winning opportunity
because that's the top of the board.
Uh, so the way it works is that I have the models.
If I ask the models just to, uh, just to predict which column they should go in, they all do a spectacularly
bad job.
The way to do it is by asking them first to generate tokens to describe what they see.
So I asked the models to explain their evaluation of the board threats they see on the board, opportunities
they might see the strategy, and then to predict which column they should pick for their coin.
And by doing it that way, I'm effectively forcing the models into a reasoning mode.
And that means that even the non reasoning models do a decent job of playing this, uh, decent is sort
of iffy.
Uh, as you'll see, most of them are certainly not at human level of performance, which is kind of
satisfying.
It's good to know, as I say, even in these days, with the with the astronomical, uh, benchmarks,
with models showing that they are PhD level.
I believe I could beat most of these models at a game of Connect Four, which is a relief for now.
We still have the upper hand when the overlords all come, come for us.
We'll we'll bring out our connect four boards and we'll be fine.
Okay.
So this is this is showing you won one game.
And now to show you a slightly more challenging game we can pit.
We'll put Claude Sonnet 45, which for me right now this is the very latest model.
This came out the 29th of September of, of 2025.
And we will pit that against GPT five mini.
I haven't put GPT five the biggest one on there because it's too slow and too expensive.
But GPT five mini, this will be the match that we will now play.
So I press start over and I press run game and off we now have.
Now you know what to look for.
You can see that that Claude sonnet four is thinking you can see a more robust evaluation threats,
opportunity, strategy, moving in the middle like that.
And what I'm now of course going to do is, is put, put you on hold and come back when the game is
finished, but I would suggest you try and have a go yourself.
Go to to my website to connect four if you wish to, and use it as an opportunity to read about, uh,
how how they plan and use that to just gain more intuition into how reasoning models are able to think
things through better.
And I do see already that that Claude Sonnet has laid a trap for GPT five mini.
That it is, it has fallen for so.
So it does appear that Claude Sonnet 4.5 is going to be victorious.
We'll see whether whether GPT five mini can, can even realize this.
Uh, and as I say, it is heartening to know GPT five is a dangerous for me.
Read already has a double ended three and will force win next move.
So GPT five mini at least knows that it's lost.
And sure enough, Claude Sonnet capitalizes on it and defeats GPT five mini handily.
Maybe you had a similar experience.
Anyway, I don't just show you this to indulge in in my little little game.
There is also this tab here which has a leaderboard which shows the results of all the games that have
played.
So you can look at it and see how the different models rank.
And by the time you see it, more games will played out.
These new models are only just come so so they're not yet sort of established on the leaderboard, but
they will be.
You can use that as your way.
Right now I believe deep seek is in the first position there.
It is a deep seek variant.
Uh and Claude 37 sonnet in the second place.
But I suspect that we'll find sonnet 4.5 will very quickly rise to the surface, and GPT five will probably
do very well, too, by the time you get to see this.
And if you play a few games every time you play a game on this, it contributes to the leaderboard and
will cause the various the weightings of the models to change.
So so you should hopefully enjoy that.
The other thing there is here is, uh, a video walkthrough of how I built it.
And it's very short and quick, which is easy to build.
And it gives you some intuition into the ways that you can prompt models and also a link to the code,
which I brought up here in cursor that you can look at again, just to get a sense of how a simple,
uh, based app can work.
The UI is a Gradio UI, and it just shows you how you can build out a more sophisticated UI.
All right.
And so that was just my quick, quick show and tell about this, this home built leaderboard in preparation
for tomorrow when we're going to look at some proper professional leaderboards.
And already that's it for today.
I told you this week is going to be fun and quick and interesting because now, in addition to being
able to code with frontier models and build solutions with Transformers, you now have a working knowledge
of how models are benchmarked, the uses of them the hardest of the benchmarks and you know, some of
the limitations, and you're well prepared for what we're going to do tomorrow, which is navigate some
of the most valuable leaderboards, some really great things to show you.
You'll also be able to talk about the real world application of Llms to commercial problems, and you'll
be ready to be confidently choosing the right model for your project.
Okay, lots to get done.
I'll see you tomorrow.
089 - It is week for day two and we're getting straight into it already.
You know how to code with frontier models.
You know how to build solutions with hugging face and you know how to compare different benchmarks.
You know about the good parts and the bad parts.
Today you're gonna know how to navigate different leaderboards.
I am such a fan of leaderboards.
In fact, when I was interviewed by my great friend John Crone on the Data Science podcast, he he described
me as a leader boar because of how much I go on about leaderboards.
And that is what we're gonna do today.
Uh, and I'm going to give you real world use cases of LM solving commercial problems quickly as well.
And then we'll go through how you choose the right LM for your project.
Let's get started.
So I'm going to start by walking you through five different leaderboards.
I'll talk about what they all are.
And then we're going to go and check them out and look at some of them.
These change from time to time, but as of now and these pretty much for a while now, these are the
frontrunners when it comes to understanding the different performance of different models out there,
the first of them is called artificial analysis.
It's a West Coast AI company that runs this leaderboard, and it is unbelievably good.
It's unbelievably good.
It has it's so clear and it has such, such great way of dimensioning how you think about what makes
LMS good and bad across many things like intelligence and cost and speed, and you're going to be blown
away if you haven't seen it before, it's great.
You should bookmark it or commit it to memory.
Whatever artificial analysis that is where it is, is a nice New York based AI company that has a nice
leaderboard, that has a bunch of good features for comparing different LMS.
But what's particularly useful is it has one place where you can see the API cost and context window
side by side for all major providers, which is super useful.
So I look at vellum all the time.
I should probably mention about a month ago, the CEO of vellum contacted me on LinkedIn and said,
I hear you talk about our leaderboard on your course, which was cool.
Uh, so thank you.
And yes, I do.
It is a good leaderboard.
And he also did say, by the way, you know, we're better known for having a whole product, uh, that
runs AI and allows engineers to build it into production and have lots of good stuff there.
So while looking at the leaderboard, check out their main product offering at vellum and then Scale
Comm.
Obviously, they're a very well known popular AI startup and now now company partly owned by meta,
and they have a set of leaderboards called the seal leaderboards that are expert, very specialized
leaderboards that we will enjoy looking at in a minute hugging face.
Of course, they have their own set of leaderboards.
They're all hugging face spaces.
They used to be the go to leaderboard.
The hugging face open leaderboard was where everyone used to go, but they've stopped updating it and
for various reasons, possibly because people were gaming it too much.
So no longer is that the one to go to, but they have lots of others.
And so we'll take a quick, quick browse through some of them.
And then the last one I'm going to mention is called Live Bench.
It's a particular leaderboard that focuses on that question about about data set leakage, data set
contamination.
And they have a special approach for making sure that they are measuring true raw performance of models,
and they are not susceptible to this contamination issue.
So those are five great leaderboards.
I think we should go and take a look at them now.
It's generally never a good idea to pick favorites, but it's never stopped me before.
My favorite leaderboard.
My favorite leaderboard is Artificial Analysis II.
Here it is.
This is the leaderboard.
And the first time I heard about this, when it only just created it was a student that reached out
to me and said, have you seen this new leaderboard?
Uh, and uh, yeah, it is absolutely phenomenal.
I would say it's the most popular one out there.
Uh, and, uh, this this is a company that independently analyzes LMS, and they have a number of charts
that ranks them and places where you can dive in and learn about them.
And there's some charts up at the top here, intelligence, speed and price, the sort of three big
ones that you want to start with.
Uh, and then each of them has a sort of breakdown with more detail.
So we'll go for the more detailed ones, starting with the artificial Intelligence Index.
It incorporates ten different evaluations.
You remember we talked about MLU Pro, the difficult version of the uh, massive multitask language.
Understanding a diamond is the particular one.
This is the Google proof Q&A Humanities last exam we talked about live code bench.
Uh, and we talked about Aim, I think.
And the others are a bunch of other ones that all combined together to this overall score.
That is how powerful is a particular LM.
And this is the results as of now.
But you will have more up to date results.
There'll be more models since then.
And so you should go here and shouldn't listen to what I say.
You should look at what you're seeing.
But for me right now, the model that scores the highest in this sort of this assembly of different
metrics, which is sort of weighted towards a genetic coding a bit.
So it's not a huge surprise that the Codex version of GPT five, which is the one that's particularly
optimized for a genetic coding, is the one with the highest intelligence score, um, almost equal
with GPT five high and high.
There means that it's been asked to to reason with the highest mode set.
And then comes Mr. Musk's Grok four, which was at the top.
It was in pole position before GPT five came along.
And then the new Claude 4.5 sonnet.
Well, it's new for me.
Uh, that is a little bit it's I mean, it's still a very, very high score, but it is slightly behind
the others.
Then grok four and fast mode and then Gemini 2.5 Pro, which when it came out was in the top position.
You see how they each get replaced over time.
And then for one opus, the massive version of the next tier down of Claude, and then remarkably,
absolutely remarkably, in the next place is the first open source model.
All the ones that I've mentioned up to now have been have been paid frontier closed source models.
The first open source model is GPT, opus one R20b, the big version of GPT OSS that I think we just
saw winning a game of Connect Four, but but only just, uh, and, uh, it it comes in this place and
it is of course, super fast as well and very cheap.
And then Quinn three from Alibaba Cloud comes next and then comes uh, upstart Deep Seek.
Uh V3 point two experimental is the latest version of it.
Still an experimental prerelease Pre-release.
For me, it's probably out there for you.
Or maybe it's already a deep sea V4.
Who knows?
Uh, so that is that comes next.
All right.
And so those those are the top most intelligent models that perform best across this range of different
benchmarks.
And you can keep digging in and look at these to get a really good sense of what are the strongest models
on the planet.
And then the next one is a kind of scary thing to look at.
This is showing you a timeline of how models have performed against these scores, looking back over
time, looking, uh, looking from from just a back over time.
I make it sound like it was like decades ago, all the way back to November 2022.
Uh, and this is based on the same the same intelligence index.
And you can see how the models have, have grown over time against this index.
And, you know, like people talk about model performance saturating and coming, coming, slowing down.
But you look at a diagram like that and I ask you if it looks like there's any signs of things slowing
down.
It's quite terrifying.
It's also very interesting to keep in mind that that a lot of the early gains were due to training time
techniques.
A lot of the more recent gains are due to inference time techniques that we've started to see diminishing
returns from training time.
And that's why people, people often like, like to sort of talk down the GPT five release because it
didn't feel from chatting with it like there was a marked change from GPT 4.1.
And really the difference, the reason why these models are doing so much better comes down a lot to
the inference time techniques that the reasoning, the tweaking, the prompts, the added tools.
It's this stuff that's really moving the needle recently and why this line is kept going with this steep
trajectory.
If we took out the inference time techniques, I think you'd absolutely see this kind of leveling off.
090 - And continuing our exploration of the amazing artificial analysis, we come down to more more detail
on the intelligence evaluations, and you can see how it performed against each of the metrics individually.
You can see the terminal bench is like like a hard genetic coding using a terminal.
There's a bunch of others here.
Humanity's last exam we will be talking about later.
You know, that's an amazing one.
Uh, but already you remember I challenged you to think about what you thought the top models would
score on.
Really?
It started out as being about 2%.
3%, I think late last year.
And now the top model GPT five on high is scoring 26.5% on humanity's last exam.
It's made huge inroads just in the space of a few months, which is terrifying.
So there we go.
With HL, you can see Mglu Pro, which was designed to be this much higher.
Bar models were in the 90% on ML and so they came up with Lou Pro, but already models are at 88%.
Gee, this is the Google proof Q&A.
Remember that?
Remember what I said was human level performance.
It was 65%.
65% was PhD level performance.
I think 34% was was none was was was mere mortals like me.
Uh, and let's have a look at what it's scoring with the top models.
It is on 88% superior, significantly superior to that 65% level.
And now you know the people.
Uh, well, the skeptics will say to you that, okay, but it's gpca it's PhD level very specifically
on these physics, chemistry and biology questions.
But we can ask it dumb questions about about setting a chess board with a move before the end of the
game.
And it can't do it.
So there's obviously deficiencies.
It is not generally PhD level, but there are fields in which it is in scientific reasoning.
Live Code Bench is one of the particular coding metrics that we'll look at later, when again, GPT
five is the the highest, strangely, slightly better than Codex.
Um, and then there's some more coding ones, uh, that where grok four comes best following instructions,
GPT five Codex comes strongest.
And then the competition math, the AI, the aim competition that we talked about.
Uh, GPT five Codex again comes top.
Uh, and then GPT five high comes right after that.
So there there are the sets of models and results from the detailed intelligence drill down.
Um, and now we'll look at some of the other bits of information that you get on the amazing, uh,
artificial analysis-i.
And I should point out, these are 23 models, but you can pick different models.
You can come in here and pick the different models that you would like to see and compare them.
You're not you're not limited to these models.
This site is really incredible.
Uh, so you can go through a whole ton of stuff to see how the different models perform.
Uh, the this is sort of interesting point.
It makes that different models will produce different volumes of output tokens, particularly when you're
thinking about reasoning models.
It's not enough just to say, does it give the right answer?
You.
You also want to understand how much thinking was required to get there, because that will affect time
and cost.
And so there is some some stuff here.
It's interesting that that grok for uh, you can see the different color reasoning tokens is the lighter
color.
And the answer is at the top.
And it gives you that real sense that grok for shows this very strong performance.
But that is partly because it does a lot of thinking, a lot of inference.
And that leads to this, this incredibly useful chart, which is a cost.
So comparing costs of models is difficult because just comparing the cost of the input and output tokens,
I think you know that they have a different price point, but that's not good enough because the same
a different model might do more reasoning as we've just seen.
And so it might cost more to do the same thing.
So the way that artificial analysis cracked that particular problem is they said, okay, so we'll take
our index, our combination of lots of tasks, and we'll treat that as like the standard thing to try.
And we'll see how much does it cost to to to create this index, including all of the tokens that need
to be generated in order to answer all these questions.
And that gave this, this, this really, uh, nice, simple, rich way to compare the actual bottom
line cost of these models.
Better than just looking at the price of the input and output tokens.
And with that in mind, you'll see that Claude 4.1 opus from a cost point of view is terrible.
That because it does a lot of this thinking, uh, and you can see it's the input output and reasoning
costs It's showing here and obviously it's the reasoning cost is the $1,754 there.
It's very expensive.
Roquefort is pretty expensive.
Gemini two five Pro does a lot of thinking.
That's been my experience too.
Um, and then amazingly, GPT five is is quite far down this list compared to the fact that it's that
it's top of the leaderboard in intelligence for me.
Um, and then four five sonnet also doing really well here from that point of view.
Uh, and then so on.
Mistral's magistrale uh, deep seek.
Uh, so this is, um, this is, this is quite an interesting list, but the next, the next chart is
where it all comes together.
Okay.
So this this is the chart.
This is everything.
You should bring this up now to see what it's at right now.
So this is a chart that is mapping the intelligence on the, on the y axis the height and with the cost
on the x axis.
So things in this quadrant here are models that are smart and expensive.
These are ones that are that are not smart, but still expensive.
These are ones here that are cheap but not smart.
And this quadrant, the one that's highlighted in green.
These are models that are cheap but smart.
Which is which is great.
Uh, so this is this is the really this is the sweet spot for most people.
Um, and and, you know, there's certainly a school of thought that would be to say that if you identify
any model like this one right here, that happens to be, uh, GPT oss, that's that's quite far along
over here.
You would then say you could imagine drawing, like, a box this way and this way.
Anything that appears to the right and below represents something that is that is, uh, more expensive
and not as smart.
So there's one school of thought that would be to say you should never pick a model that is bottom right
of any other model on this chart.
And in fact, even GPT is ruled out because grok four on fast is just slightly above and quite a lot
to the left.
It is cheaper and smarter.
And so you could argue, look at that.
Any model above this line here, you should always pick grok four fast instead.
Now there is of course a slight problem with that, which is that it's hugely oversimplified because
the Artificial Intelligence Analysis Index doesn't necessarily tie directly to your task.
It's a it's a hybrid of all these tasks.
And because there are other factors as well, like latency and and other reasons why you might lean
towards a different model.
But as a quick rule of thumb, it's not a bad rule to say, hey, never pick a model that's that's to
the lower and to the right of anything on this amazing chart.
Uh, so pick things in this quadrant, like, like Deep Sea 3.2 and grok Full Fast and GPT OS.
These are going to be models that are cheap and smart.
And let's look at the the the cluster up here of the expensive powerful ones.
So you can see that that for a start Claude 4.1 opus is very expensive and not as smart even as Claude
4.5 sonnet.
So except for very specific benchmarks, it is hard to imagine why anyone would use Claude 4.1 opus
these days when 4 or 5 sonnet is better and cheaper.
And looking around here, you can see how GPT five and grok four line up that that GPT five does seem
to be cheaper and smarter, at least on this aggregate benchmark.
And yeah, you can you can see that when open source model is right up here in the the really, uh,
well, it's pretty expensive because it's so big, but it is also pretty smart.
So look around this cluster here and enjoy really learning about the power versus cost of the different
models.
And you'll see something different to me.
And so you'll be able to draw new conclusions and by all means post about them, share it with other
students on on on Udemy or on LinkedIn or share this diagram.
It's a fascinating diagram.
More people should know about it.
Okay, just a couple more to show you on artificial analysis the speed and latency section.
So this is showing you how fast models run.
How many output tokens per second will they spew at you with OSS 120 in the top place.
And we saw that ourselves when we played connect four and it was just on fire.
Latency I mentioned before is a different metric.
This is how long does it take before you get your first token, but not not including thinking tokens.
They don't count.
It's not until you get your first answer token that counts and you'll see Lama4 Maverick does does pretty
well.
Kimmy K-2 a model from the Chinese start up moonshot, GPT five, Quinn three from Alibaba Cloud.
They all do well in terms of of speed, end to end response time, the total time it takes to respond.
Llama four in good place there as well.
And then this nice little chart showing intelligence against output speed and the total price comparing
input and output prices per million tokens, no longer pegging it to their their analysis index.
And another scale.
This time it's intelligence versus price with price per million tokens on a log scale.
Another useful one, but I prefer the one before.
Uh, and then there's a bunch of other specific tables.
There's some stuff on OS 120.
There's lots of things to to look at here.
You should lose yourself in artificial Analysis-i spend ten minutes here and you will know how to pick
a good subset of models that might be right for your task.
This is where to go.
This website is gold.
091 - And next is the vellum leaderboard.
You'll find a link in the resources vellum.
Again, the company where the CEO messaged me on LinkedIn, uh, after I mentioned it.
It's got a number of good comparison tables.
It's got, uh, the, um, uh, comparisons of models side by side with another model that you can pick
from the dropdowns and see them ranked.
But the thing I wanted to mention, the thing that I find most helpful, is right here, the context
window cost.
And now speed didn't used to be there.
Also speed comparison this table.
But I really like it because it's such a one place to go to get the the input and output cost per tokens
for a context window.
And as as you now know from from week one, there is another dimension here which is the cached cost.
If you send the same input tokens twice, usually significantly less.
But to get that you have to go to the the models website.
But anyway that's vellum very useful okay.
So this is now looking at the seal leaderboards, a set of leaderboards published by AI company Mail.com.
And they are intended to be leaderboards that quite specifically test for different areas of expertise.
So if you have a very specialized task, you might want to see if there's a Seal leaderboard that applies
to you.
Now, one of the leaderboards they're most famous for producing is the Humanity's Last Exam leaderboard
that I promised you.
And if we drill into that, we can see more about humanity's last exam.
It explains that it's 2500 questions.
It gives a sort of background to it about frontier benchmarks just all having diminishing returns.
And then in partnership with the center for AI safety, they came up with this idea.
They had user submitted questions and they selected this final set.
And you'll see that when they started out, which was November of last year, uh, the top model was
GPT four and it was scoring 2.72.
I told you I thought it was between 2 and 3.
Uh, there it is.
And over time, look at how these numbers have changed.
And now GPT five scoring 25.3.
I think we saw a slightly different number on artificial analysis II, which is because there's a variant
of this exam which is just text only, whereas this one is the multi-modal version.
And you can see how this has changed.
And, you know, for people that feel like progress is slowing down, that's not what we see in terms
of this ability.
Uh, and uh, yeah.
The way if you're wondering how are the questions evaluated because they're so hard.
Well, let's just start by looking at what are the questions like.
This is on their website, humanities exam website.
Here's an example of a question.
Uh, it's given that image.
The question is here is a representation of a Roman inscription originally found on a tombstone.
Provide a translation for the Palmyrene script.
A transliteration of the text is provided.
Ah, so goodness, it's some sort of combination of like having amazing subject matter knowledge of
something super obscure, but also presumably being able to puzzle your way through something.
Because I imagine this is something that requires some decoding and some problem solving to figure out
how you could possibly read that.
Uh, then here's a question on ecology.
I'm not even going to try and read this through because I'll embarrass myself.
But you can you can see that there and get a sense of how hard these are.
There's a maths question.
There's a computer science question.
There's a chemistry and linguistics.
And providing the standardised biblical Hebrew source text, your task is to distinguish between closed
and open syllables.
Uh, chemistry.
Trivia.
Physics.
I'll take a look at that later.
Rod.
Tension.
What is the value?
Okay, so some sort of super hard, uh, physics level question that certainly looks like it might be.
Uh, it's from UC Berkeley.
It's probably very difficult question.
Uh, so those are the samples.
It's fun to see them.
It's fun to understand how challenging these are.
They are definitely above PhD level in complexity.
The way that it's judged is that the model comes up with the answer.
And that is provided to oh three.
One of the larger reasoning models from open AI.
And oh three is given the answer from the model and the reference.
Gold truth.
Uh, answer the actual ground truth.
The golden answer makes my my words.
It's given that, and it has to compare them and confirm that they are consistent.
And so it is a kind of LM as a judge.
But it's not just the LM grading it, it's the LM using a reference answer.
So which is which is an excellent technique.
So that is humanity's last exam.
It's great fun.
Take a look at it.
And whatever you're looking at now no doubt the world has moved on from here.
And so you'll see where we are.
And yeah, if it's in the 80s or 90s, then maybe, uh, the overlords have already taken over.
Uh, that is humanity's last exam.
And just to walk you through some of the other leaderboards on the seal leaderboards, there's one that
specifically tests models ability to use MCP to call tools.
There's some software engineering metrics.
There is one that's about being able to reason in foreign languages, or to solve foreign language puzzles
with reasoning, because reasoning tends to be quite, quite focused on, on English language.
Uh, there's a bunch of interdisciplinary challenges.
There is a particular evaluation around security and safety.
That's something that Cellcom has focused hard on and a similar one about alignment.
The mask is evaluating models honesty when pressured to lie.
And you remember the point I made about the potential concern that models know when they're being evaluated.
Obviously that comes strongly with with a metric like this.
But as of now, sonnet does well on on, uh, on sonnet 4.5 seems to do seems to do pretty well on this.
Their consistency with their beliefs when pressured to lie.
Super interesting, uh, complex, multi-step reasoning, vision, understanding.
And then a tutor bench.
Something very specific for teaching skills.
And so, yeah, if you're looking to build something that's going to be in the education space, then
the tutor bench might be a useful leaderboard for you.
So that wraps up the seal leaderboards.
Let me flip to hugging.
Face this.
There's a hugging face spaces.
There is a mass of useful leaderboards that you can look at for different comparing open source models
against different characteristics.
The one that used to be the go to is called the open Leaderboard, but it's been archived for a few
months now.
It seems that Huggingface has decided that they don't want to be in the game of building these leaderboards
anymore, possibly because people were starting to game it and there was so many different models being
put up here that it became noisy.
So I think they have backed off from being in this space.
But if you're if you're interested, it is.
It's a few months old, but it is still a nice place to see about the performance of different open
source models.
But there are a lot of other leaderboards here that are kept updated.
There's a big code, uh, leaderboard that gives you the performance of different coders, um, against
different programming languages like C++, JavaScript, Java.
And you can see that it's, it's got 2.5 coder.
So this has some of the latest models.
And you'll find a bunch of other leaderboards here.
There's a performance one that's very good for seeing the speed and power of different, uh, open source
models on different hardware spec.
There's a medical leaderboard that has very specific criteria from the medical industry.
Uh, Q&A, anatomy, clinical knowledge and ranking different models against those specific benchmarks
agent leaderboards, deep research, hallucination, image leaderboards.
So much to explore on hugging face.
Always double check how how recently it's been updated and and check the sources and make sure that
this is something that is a credible leaderboard, but otherwise tons of information freely accessible
on hugging face.
And I mentioned the last one I was going to tell you about is Live Bench, which is a hard and contamination
free benchmark that involves completely refreshing all their questions every six months and then going
through and testing against these different factors like reasoning, coding and genetic coding, maths
and data analysis.
And you can see how the models rank compared to these different scores, GPT five high is currently
in pole position.
Claude 4.5.
Thinking comes soon after GPT five.
Uh and uh does does pretty close pretty well, but is uh.
Yeah.
Also doing very well on reasoning but winning in coding.
Look at that first place on coding or tied uh, for for uh, agentic coding.
Strangely, GPT five high does slightly worse than GPT five medium on agentic coding.
Maybe it overthinks things through, uh, but this is a great resource because these metrics are so
carefully, um, prepared to not not suffer from data set leakage problems.
And so this is very credible source.
And it again, it combines like most of these leaderboards closed source and open source models a bunch
of ones here GLM I think we saw that did pretty well on artificial analysis as well.
Uh, is from Chinese startup Xie AI.
So lots of great models to look at here.
Do check out and bookmark Live Bench as well.
092 - So I've shown you a couple of arenas as we've gone through this adventure together.
The ones that I've made, The Outsmart and the Connect Four.
But there are in fact, proper arenas.
Or at least there's one really proper arena, very well known.
It used to be called Lambesis.
These days it is called LM arena.
The LM arena language model arena.
Incredible place to go.
It's a place where you can chat with two different models anonymously.
It could be frontier.
They could be open source.
You compare them, you don't know which one is which.
You vote.
So this is a like blind human evaluations.
And then the results are shown with what's called an ELO style rating, which for people that play chess,
you know it well, but it's a kind of rating that is that works when you have a head to head competition
and you can show the performance of different, different models compared to the ones that came before
it.
And there's it's a it's great fun to participate in this arena to to go through the process yourself
of weighing up models and voting.
And as a benefit, you are adding to the community because you are helping everyone to know which which
is the best model in this, in this very, you know, forget all the benchmarks.
This is just at the end of the day, the people's decision on which model is stronger.
And so there's something about it that is the sort of the final say in all leaderboards.
So I've explained it.
It might sound a bit abstract to you.
There's one way to make it be less abstract that's to go and try it out.
Let's go and do that.
Okay, so here we are at la Marina, the place of the famous chatbot arena.
And we're going to ask a question not to one model but to two models.
We're going to say tell a joke for a room full of AI engineers.
That would be you.
All right, let's see.
So it goes to two different assistants assistant A and assistant B.
Assistant A says why do the neural network go to therapy.
Because it had too many unresolved layers.
Well it's not bad.
All right.
An assistant be sure.
Here's one tailored for AI engineers.
Why did the neural network break up with the decision tree?
because it couldn't handle the branching commitment.
Yeah.
Um.
Ha.
Um, I, uh, I think, um, uh, between the two of them, I think a is shorter and sweeter, but I'm
torn a bit.
But I'm gonna go with assistant A, you might feel differently, but that's too bad, because it's not
your choice.
It's my choice.
It's the great thing about this site.
I get to choose.
If you hover over these, you can see it highlights which one I'm going to go left is better.
So that is my vote.
The vote is in.
And now we can go and look at the results.
And so we click here on the leaderboard section.
You can see there's actually a bunch of different leaderboards depending on what kind of question you'd
asked.
And we'll stick with the text one because that's where it all began.
And that's probably the most popular one.
You can see.
It said 50,000 votes here and in pole position is Gemini two five Pro as the model that people most
like to chat with.
And, uh, so that that comes first.
But sorry, no equal equal.
The score is slightly below, but it's considered I guess a tie is Claude opus 41 and Claude Sonnet
45.
So really they are all tied.
And then GPT strangely ChatGPT for zero, which was a version GPT four are particularly optimized for
chat.
Maybe not strangely.
Maybe that's what you'd expect.
That comes in second place.
And it's considered a tie with these other models, which includes GPT four five preview, which was
only released for for a short period of time.
Um, which is tied one point higher than GPT five high itself.
Um, so it's interesting and it's good to see Gemini two five Pro and in first place like that.
And you can see the other leaderboards here.
And again, the thing that makes this most satisfying is that there's no this isn't based on some as
a judge or some other criteria or a multi multiple choice selection.
This is based on actual people like you and me voting for the model we prefer with without knowing which
one is which, which means it's super legit.
So go on in there, make your vote.
Contribute uh to to to the votes and see what what what can happen.
See how you can change the leaderboard and bring your favorite model to the front.
And learn a little bit about the different capabilities of models while you are at it.
093 - So as a quick extra topic, I know everyone wants to get to coding.
Fed up with all of these, uh, commercial type topics.
But just to wrap up, I want to talk about the different use cases commercially of applying LMS to solve
business problems.
And I often describe it as, as you can think of using LMS and generally applying AI, uh, along this,
this continuum of the amount of business value that you're offering.
Initially, everyone was thinking about automation.
You were using AI to automate tasks that were intensely manual and error prone and were easy to automate.
Automating repetitive tasks was the domain of of AI originally.
Then it moved from automation to augmentation, which is about being a co-pilot, to a human working
alongside a human, allowing someone to do more because they can they can, uh, delegate some tasks
to an AI, and it allows them to achieve more through partnership with an LLM.
And then the sort of the final tier.
The next step up is differentiation, which is where you or your business are actually able to achieve
something completely different because AI is enabling a new activity that was previously impossible.
And as you go down that continuum, of course things get more and more exciting from automation to augmentation
to differentiation.
And it's also helpful to think about the types of AI solution that you build in three dimensions.
There are things that people often describe as ChatGPT wrappers, and that's usually used in a slightly
dismissive way.
And these are cases where a commercial app has integrated with an with an LLM like GPT.
Uh, often people just say ChatGPT because it's the most obvious one that is most dismissive of someone,
and they're using that behind the scenes in order to add value to their app.
And I mean, there are so many examples of this that like you pick up your, your, your phone and look
at the apps there and you'll see that many of them will be using an LLM in some way.
They'll be integrating JNI into the app.
The one that came straight to mind is Duolingo because we talked about it earlier.
And yes, it actually uses GPT.
Uh, and so it's such a clear example of just putting a wrapper on top and being able to charge a premium
for it.
Although of course they do a bit more than that.
That's probably unfair, but you get the idea.
And then copilot is often very similar.
The the wave of copilot, which are essentially just making calls to a frontier model but surfacing
that baked into the tool.
So those are GPT wrappers.
And then next up is a specialized, bespoke proprietary AI platform that your business has built in
order to be able to add value because it has direct domain expertise in some area.
And this is of course, the more juicy, the more meaningful area.
And arguably Duolingo is more in this territory too.
There's of course, some sort of, again, a continuum between these things.
But this is where you've built models that that have expertise that you won't find if you go to ChatGPT.
And maybe originally you did that through training, through fine tuning, you built models that you
trained it on proprietary data, and you used that to, to be able to, to achieve something different.
ChatGPT.
But increasingly it's inference time techniques, it's Rag and other kinds and adding tools, other
capabilities that allows you to do more.
And so there are smaller companies, there are startups, there's companies like Harvey which is applying
llms to law.
There's the company that I work at Nebula, which is applying it to to the talent and careers and jobs
and, and people matching people with roles where they'll be successful.
There's Kahneman go from the Khan Academy, which is applying it to education, and then just to talk
to some of the big people out there, of course, Salesforce is in this game all over the place, but
they have a healthcare offering that's particularly impressive that does things like automate taking
doctor's notes and clinical, uh, meetings and being able to to take away a lot of the administrative
work, but with knowledge, with with bespoke information and hooked up to all of the Salesforce tooling
and Palantir, of course, the data platform that has a lot of AI weaved through it, taking advantage
of their data.
And that is a it's generally a common theme of this, that a way that an AI company, perhaps like one
that you work for, is able to to distinguish itself from the others is often through the data.
It comes down to data.
There's famously Andrew Ng once said that the AI is the new electricity, and I think that's that's
obviously proven to be true.
But in addition to that, I would say that data is the electricity.
Having your own proprietary data set that other people don't have means that you'll be able to build
a business specialized application which can do things that others can't.
And these things always come in threes.
So there had to be a third one.
And it is of course a genetic AI.
That is the that is the new frontier.
That is the the place where we can build software that is autonomous, able to make decisions, able
to go out and do things.
And this really feels like the place where more than any other, we will be able to build things that
let businesses differentiate and do things that just weren't possible before.
And it's interesting to me that many of the most common use cases around using Agentic AI are more technical
and coming from technical companies.
So obviously Claude Code, OpenAI, Codex, these are ones we all know, and also the OpenAI agent mode
that we used within ChatGPT.
But and that was less technical.
But but still, it's coming from a tech company.
I think that the space to watch is going to be how businesses bring a genetic AI into their products
in a big way.
And that hasn't yet happened.
And I think that's going to be the next frontier.
And if this is interesting to you or you wanted to hear more about this, then I do have separately
a companion briefing on LMS for leaders.
I know I expect most of you want me to move on and get to the coding, which we're going to do in just
a second.
But but yes, if you if you are interested, there is the companion briefing.
And the one thing I'll say about this whole topic is that, look, I do believe that it is a superpower.
If you are an AI engineer and you also have knowledge of the commercial side of this, you have savvy,
you know, about what are some of the traps and some of the, the, the, the areas for success for
applying a genetic AI or generative AI for commercial benefit.
So I would urge you to take time to look at the commercial side too.
It really sets you apart, and maybe some of your business people who are taking this course to get
some technical skills, which gives you superpowers.
And you probably agree with me that that's where it's at.
Knowing both, having at least a good awareness.
Some know how some savvy about the commercial side of it will really set you apart.
Okay, but I promise you that we were going to get technical and we're going to do starting tomorrow.
We're going to go back to labs.
It's been like two days without any real coding labs.
We are going to build a little commercial challenge, which is going to be fun and tangible.
Let's suppose we're trying to build a product that converts from one technology to another.
In particular, we're going to try and do something that converts Python code to C++ to be high performance
C++ code.
Uh, which is an interesting one.
So C++, most of you probably know, is like a compiled language that's very platform specific, that
compiles down to machine code that runs natively on your platform, where Python is an interpreted language.
And so converting Python code in C++ is a really cool thing to do because it allows you to build this
kind of super blazingly fast solution.
And we're going to try it with a bunch of different models.
We're going to pick the right model to do so.
We're going to use this as our exercise for how do you select the right model for the task at hand,
which is going to be great fun.
And we're going to do that tomorrow.
And so with that now, at this point, in addition to coding with frontier models, open source Llms
and Transformers, and you can now confidently choose the right model for your project backed by metrics.
Or if you want to be pedantic, you can choose the right models.
You can choose the right Llms the subset.
There's still another step to go to actually prototype and select the final model.
And that's what we're going to be working on for the next few days.
Next time you're going to be able to assess models, particularly for the ability to generate code.
And we'll be able to build a solution that uses models to generate code.
And as a side effect of doing this, we'll have walked through the practice of picking the right model,
which is what this week is all about.
See you tomorrow.
094 - And it's week four, day three, and it's a day when we are going to go back to the labs at last.
It's been an age you can already code with frontier models.
You can build solutions with open source llms, and you can now choose the right LLM for the task at
hand based on metrics and leaderboards.
Today, we're going to assess models for how good they are at coding, and we're going to use frontier
models to generate code and will be building, building, building and cursor.
But before we start, I do have a couple more announcements to make.
Uh, but just just hear me out here.
There is something incredibly important that every AI engineer needs to know.
And it is your sworn duty as an AI engineer, as an LLM engineer, that this is something that that
you hold yourself to.
And it's about pushing back on your business, and it's about finding the business problem.
This is a situation that I find myself in a lot.
I find that people come to me and they say things like, I want an AI agent for my organization or something
like that.
It's very common for me to get people approaching me with questions like that, including senior people,
including senior execs, including people from all sorts of different backgrounds.
And the question that I say back to them, which is what you all need to say back to people that say
this to you is sure for sure, but but what business problem are you solving?
Bring people back to the business problem.
Don't let business people talk in terms of solutions.
And sometimes I find that I that I say that back to somebody, and the question I get is sort of puzzled
face.
They don't really understand.
And they say something like, I want to be able to speak to my phone and say, what are my sales numbers
today?
So give me an agent.
And of course, your answer to that, please, should be yes.
Great.
Um, and so what business problem is that solving?
The key thing being that we are in a world where the hype around gen AI and Agentic AI is, is so tremendous
that everyone wants a bit of it, and that's great and that's exciting, but we need to always ground
people back in the actual thing that's being solved.
You need to understand the problem first and foremost, how you're going to measure success and use
that as your way to determine the right solution to the business problem at hand.
It has to start from the problem and you'll see in the guys folder.
Guide 12 I believe it is has a good set of advice for what you then do next.
Once you've got to a point when you have a clear business objective and sometimes agentic AI or gen
AI might not be the right solution.
In the case of someone wanting their sales numbers today on their phone, maybe a Google doc that opens
up that shows you your sales numbers might be easier than having something that you talk to or whatever.
So always come back to that.
And I have another pet peeve as well.
And it's also covered on guide 12.
And this is relevant to picking the right alum.
I'm not I'm not going off on some tangent.
As an AI engineer.
You wear two different hats.
You have two jobs in one, you are a data scientist and you're also a software engineer.
You're right at that intersection, and I tend to find that 80% of the questions that I get about projects
through Udemy or in industry relate to engineering concerns.
People ask me, what architecture should I use?
How am I going to do my integrations?
What's my what are my data pipes going to be?
Which frameworks should I use?
Should I use lang chain?
Should I use light lamp?
Which vector database should I be using an open source one like Croma, or should I be using pinecone
or V8?
These are all the questions people ask, and I feel like people ask those questions a lot because it's
in their comfort zone.
These are engineering concerns that a lot of people come from an AI, from a from a software engineering
background.
And this is the kind of question they're used to asking.
But by in my opinion, it's not the most important question, and it's not the question that will make
or break your project.
So what will set your solution apart?
What really matters?
In my opinion, 80% of the questions that I ask are related to the science part of the story.
What business problem are you solving as we just covered?
And how will you measure that?
You've solved that business problem.
How will you measure success and what data do you have and what are the gaps?
What data do you need?
Because remember data that that is what will help you differentiate yourself.
That is how your LM can outperform others.
So those are the hard questions.
And those are the ones that you should ask first and foremost and spend the most time on because the
different architectures, the different frameworks, you pick which vector database.
It's important.
It's a decision you have to make, but it's not the most important.
It's secondary to the science.
And this leads to the five steps that you should take to select and then train and apply an LM to a
commercial problem.
And we're going to cover these five steps in week six in detail.
When we go through a real capstone project, a real case of applying an LM to solve a difficult business
problem.
But just to tell you, the five steps now, so that I've planted that seed for later, you first of
all need to understand your business requirements, the business problem you're solving, and how you
will measure success in detail.
You then need to prepare by selecting candidate models using the leaderboards, perhaps looking at the
basic facts about the models to understand which is going to be the right one for the task at hand.
Then you select the model you're going to choose by building prototypes, testing your business metric
against the prototypes you customize it by, by building things like Rag that we do next week, fine
tuning that we do in the following two weeks, and perhaps a genetic AI in the last week.
And then you productionize you roll out and deploy to production.
So these are the five steps that you go through.
And of course, what we've spent this week focusing on is prepare, which is looking at the leaderboards,
identifying the right selection, the candidate models.
And you can see hopefully now how that fits after understanding your business requirements and before
actually building your prototypes.
But hold that thought.
We're going to come back to it in two weeks time and we're going to play it through.
For now, we're getting on to our technical challenge, building a product that converts Python code
to fast C++ code to boost performance.
Assuming that we don't know how to write C++, we know how to write Python, we want to translate it.
And you can see how this can be extended to be any kind of porting code platform.
And obviously, we all know this is a great use case for like an agentic solution that's able to take
a whole code base and port it from one technology to another.
And we're not going to be working on an in an authentic way.
We're going to be assuming we've just got one script in Python, and we want to convert it to a script
in C++.
But you could be thinking if you've already taken some agentic courses like my one, or maybe you already
know about it, you could extend this to be a full agentic platform yourself, and if not, then after
week eight when we build out a little agentic process, you could come back and apply it there and that
would be really cool.
But for now, we're just focusing on the LM selection and on coming up with like, how are we going
to test the business objective and how are we going to validate it for different models.
And of course, the business problem that we're trying to solve here is all about performance.
We've got this need for business purposes.
This code that we're writing needs to run faster, and that gives us a simple way to measure success.
We can make sure that the answer is accurate and that it comes quickly.
So that's the challenge.
Let's get to solving it.
And the specific test that we'll use to see if we have solved it or not is we've got a little bit of
Python code here.
That's that's our tests that we'll use to validate.
It is something which does a number of calculations.
It takes it's a mathematical formula and a loop maths like this and loops Python is famously bad at
because it's all interpreted and it's something which is iterating over a loop.
And you can if you look through the code, you can see that it's basically doing one minus a third plus
a fifth, minus a seventh plus a ninth, and it's going on and it's doing all of that 100,000 times.
And at the end of it, it's taking the results and multiplying it by four and printing it along with
how long it took.
So that that is our test.
That's what we will do and we will see how we perform.
095 - Our task today is going to be to select frontier closed source models and try them out.
Tomorrow we're going to change to open source models.
But so far it's closed source frontier models, paid models.
And we need to look somewhere to give us a sense of which models are best at coding.
And I wonder where we're going to look for that.
Um, we would of course go straight to artificial analysis and we can look at these general charts,
or we can scroll down and look particularly at some of the coding benchmarks.
And in particular, I think that the live code bench is going to be a good place for us to start.
We could also look at C code because, uh, because we are going to be these are going to be scientific.
But let's have a look at what we've got here.
GPT five high is top of the list.
So let's write that down.
GPT five on high reasoning mode.
Uh, grok four does well, grok four fast, uh, for some reason, seems to be the one that they've
got really far up there.
And grok four does slightly less well than grok for fast, but that seems like that might.
That seems very surprising to me.
Uh, and then, uh, Gemini 2.5 Pro and then, uh, then we're into open source land at that point.
Uh, and interestingly, it looks like Claude 4.5 doesn't feature in their top list here.
Uh, let's scroll down here and see what else we've got.
The in the coding one.
Oh, in the code in the scientific coding one though Claude 4.5 sonnet features very high indeed.
Yeah, it's way down there.
So if we were to take a look at these two, it looks like we're going to want to look at GPT five.
Uh grok four.
That's top of this one.
And Claude 4.5 sonnet.
These are clearly the frontrunners.
Maybe Gemini two five Pro as well.
So that gives us our subset of the strongest coding models that we will try.
Now we we won't look at the Agentic one because, uh, it's we're not going to be using it in an agentic
mode.
Okay, that's our models selected.
We could also look at some some other leaderboards, but I'll let you do that.
They will be broadly consistent.
Let's go to cursor.
It's been waiting for us for so long.
Let's go and do some coding.
Well welcome back to cursor.
Welcome to week four.
To day three.
Have you missed cursor.
Of course.
So this notebook this lab today it's really one for for for for us nerds.
It's one for the nerds here.
If you're a nerd, you're going to enjoy this one.
If you're not a nerd, you're like, oh, I'm sort of not not really with you on that.
Then you just have to give this one to me.
You know, you can roll your eyes a few times if I nerd out.
It's a bit of a geeky one.
It's still going to be fun, I assure you.
Okay, quick reminder you do need to fetch latest code regularly because I'm constantly pushing updates
to the labs, so be sure to do a git pull.
Look in the guides for instructions, make sure you've got the latest code, and do a UV sync afterwards
to make sure that you've got all the latest packages as well.
And an important note is that in this lab, I'm going to use some of the best frontier models on the
planet, and they have a price associated with them.
It's still going to be cents at the most, but if you are price sensitive, then I've also got cheap
models you could use instead.
And also tomorrow we're going to be doing this for open source models.
So you could just wait for tomorrow and spend nothing at all completely up to you.
Your choice.
But we're going to get started now with the frontier models.
So start with some imports.
And next we're going to load the environment variables.
I'm going to load in the keys for OpenAI anthropic, Google and Grok.
With a k grok you don't need to you can pick any ones that you've got.
If you've got OpenAI and you want to, you could give these a skip.
If you've got open router you could use that instead.
Substitute whatever ones you wish.
I've loaded them in.
I'm now going to connect to the Python client libraries.
I'm creating an OpenAI instance here, and then I'm doing the usual trick for anthropic Gemini and Grok.
I'm using the OpenAI client library and switching in the base URL, and off it goes.
It's done.
These are the four models that I'm picking GPT five Claude Sonnet 45, grok for the large one, not
not grok for fast.
And we're going with grok four because we saw on artificial analysis AI that that did better in these
scientific Python tests.
And Gemini 2.5 Pro, if you want to keep costs super slim, here are some cheaper variants that you
could try instead.
Just remember to use these again tomorrow when we when we look at some of the models then okay, so
we are now going to get started with the main part of this.
So look we're going to be writing a solution that ports Python into efficient, high performance optimized
C++ code for your machine.
It can then be compiled on your machine to native machine code.
And that machine code can be run as an executable.
If you're not familiar with all of that stuff, if you.
You know when I say that Python is an interpreted language, if you're not completely sure what that
means, and that you compile C++ and run machine code natively, you could you could ask ChatGPT to
explain it, or you could just just like just watch and let it wash over you.
It doesn't matter that much.
It's not the point of the exercise.
The point is not about compiling languages and running machine code.
The point is that an LLM is able to do this porting from one technology to another, even if we don't
know how to use that other one.
It's the kind of thing an LLM can do, but different Llms can do it with different abilities.
So, you know, uh, the the actual step of compiling this C++ to native machine code and executing
it on your machine, that is completely optional.
If you're a nerd like me and you want to do it, and you want to see the bare metal running and have
that sense that you're using your computer to the max, then you should definitely do it.
But it's not the main point.
The main point is about porting code, so feel free just to ignore the part that actually does the conversion.
And I will.
Also, thanks to a student that sent this to me, I will show you that there's a website you can go
to which will run C++ code that you paste in the website.
So you could not do the whole compiling and building and instead just use this website.
That's a perfectly good way of doing it.
All right.
Let's get started with with with figuring out how we're going to compile if you want to do that.
So I've written a little helper function retrieve system info.
And when I say I've written I got I got an LLM to write it because it's like boring stuff, which just
prints out everything about your computer.
And they're very good at this kind of thing.
So if you run this, it prints out this JSON blob that tells me that I'm on a mac with the Darwin operating
system.
It's got all of these details about it, and it shows that I've got various things installed.
And I'm now going to use an LLM as a way to tell me what I need to do to be able to run.
Compile and run C++ on my computer.
So my my message is.
Here's a report of the system information for my computer.
I want to run a C++ compiler to compile a C++ file and execute it.
Uh, please tell me exactly what I need to do and then how what I should use for the compile command
and the run command.
And then I tell it my system information, and I'm sending this instruction to OpenAI to GPT five.
And so in doing this, I'm not uh, this is not to do with our project.
This is just setting up our environment.
And I'm asking GPT five to give us a hand because I don't know what computer you're running on.
You might have all sorts of weird configurations.
The thing about running C++ code is that it's super system dependent because you're you're making it
native and it's going to run locally.
So what we'll print out here is it's going to tell you if you need to set up a C++ compiler, it will
tell you exactly what you need to do.
And it's telling me that I'm already ready.
I don't need to do anything.
And it's telling me here that I need two commands.
The compile command should look like that, and the run command should look like that.
And you can see that in the next cell.
I've put the compile command and the run command, which I'm taking exactly from what GPT five told
me.
So that's what you need to do should you wish to do the native compilation stuff, if that, if that
interests you.
Uh, which definitely interests me.
Uh, so, so follow the instructions if needed, to install a C++ compiler and then make sure that you
change these two lines.
This is for Mac.
You would want to change it.
And I could put down things like the instructions for PC and and so on.
But it's so dependent on your platform that what I put there is likely to to break for some people.
Better for you to find it out through through an LLM using your current system configuration.
So once you've done that and you have that there, we'll test it out in a second.
Let's get on to the main task of porting code.
096 - Okay, let's go ahead and port some code with LMS.
I should mention I did actually change this compile command to a more efficient version.
After going backwards and forwards with GPT five a couple of times, you might want to do that to just
make sure you've got a really good, efficient compile command.
All right.
Onwards.
So here is my system prompt.
Your task is to convert Python into high performance C++.
Respond only with C++, do not provide any other explanation.
It needs to produce the identical output.
Fastest time.
That's just a constant system prompt.
The user prompt is going to depend on the python that we want to change.
So.
So we want port.
So it's a function user prompt for the python that's passed in.
And I say port this Python code to C++.
This is the type of system we're on.
This is the command we will use to compile the code and now respond only with the C++.
This is the code to port, and that is where I put in the prompt the Python code that we're working
with Okay.
So I execute that.
And now I've got another simple function messages for that takes Python.
This is just something that returns the usual list of dicts that you know so well.
It has a system prompt put in there, and for the user prompt it is using this function that we just
wrote.
So there we go.
It's done.
And then another little utility function write output that takes some C++ code.
And we'll just write it to a file called main and we'll run that.
And now we are ready for the big guy for port a function called port.
And what does the function called port do?
Well, it takes a client like OpenAI or any client library model, a model name and the Python code
to port.
There's just something a bit hacky here that if GPT is in the model name for using an OpenAI model,
a GPT series, then take the reasoning effort to be high.
That is a flag that's used for the GPT.
JPGs and then we will call client completions dot create.
We pass in the model, we pass in the messages, the one that comes straight from this function right
here.
And then if we're using a GPT series we pass in the reasoning effort.
And what do we do with the response that comes back.
Well, I think you know exactly what we do with the response.
We do response .0. content.
And then there's just something here to strip out.
If it's responded with any of those three tick marks and then get rid of it and get rid of any other
three tick marks just to clean up the output and then write that to the file.
And that is our port function right there.
Okay.
And now I'm defining a string.
I've got some Python code here but I'm not running it.
I'm not showing it as Python code.
I'm putting it in a text variable.
You may wonder why it will become clear.
So what does this function do?
Well, it calculates something.
It does this little math formula that I've shown you before that, that it counts and does.
It does like one minus a third plus a fifth, minus a seventh plus a ninth, minus an 11th plus a 13th,
and so on for odd numbers going, going off and off.
And I think I've made this number up a bit since the slide I showed you last time.
I think I said 100,000, and I think I was misreading from the slide it's 100 million and I've made
that now 200 million.
So a lot of iterations of this, we want to really give Python some work.
So we're doing all of that.
We're taking the answer.
We're multiplying it by four and then printing the result.
That's the game we're playing.
That's what this string does.
So I run that.
So I have that string in there.
And then if I run this here, this is something which allows you to run a string in Python.
It interprets that string as Python code.
And the Python interpreter will run it.
That is what exac here does exac.
So if you do like exac.
Two plus two, uh, it will it will do that exac.
Two plus two.
Or I suppose we should say print two plus two like so.
And run this then you see four.
That's what exac does.
Uh, takes a string.
And this, this stuff here makes sure that it handles things like globals and locals properly.
So that's that.
And with with all of that introduction we can run this Python function called py which is a string as
text.
It will interpret this as code and it will carry it out.
And at the end it will print.
The result of doing this along with the execution time.
And from the title of the string, you might already have a hint about what it's going to come up with.
Yes, it turns out that taking one minus the third plus fifth, blah blah blah blah times four is a
way to approximate pi.
It's a really slow formula for pi.
It takes a long time to converge, and you can see that after 200 Million iterations, where 3.14159265
and that digit should be three.
So.
So it's gone wrong there, but still it got it done.
It took 19 seconds to do it.
And that that is where the bar is set for us to optimize.
And so we're going to start with with the top model.
We're going to start with the best with GPT five, the one that was on the top of the artificial analysis
leaderboard for this kind of thing.
And so what we're doing is we're calling our function port.
We pass in the OpenAI client library, the OpenAI model, which is GPT five, and the string py.
Let me kick that off while I'm talking.
Uh, so what that is doing, if we just remind ourselves going back to port, it's calling this, it
will have reasoning effort as high.
It's then going to to be um, calling messages for messages for takes the system prompt and that we
define up here and user prompt for which is this.
And that drops the Python code in there and it asks it to port.
Rewrite this Python code as efficient C++ code.
And of course, the exercise.
The purpose of this is not not to particularly, uh, poor code.
It's more to show you that we can take a business task, a business task that we can measure.
We can select a model like GPT five that should be good at that task, and then we can carry out the
task and put it to the test.
Now, because we've got it on high reasoning mode, it's going to take its time over it, uh, as it
should.
And I will see you on the other side when it has completed its thinking and has ported our code.
Okay, GPT five finished.
It took just under two minutes and it rewrote our Python code as C++.
Let's take a look at the results.
It's here in Main.cpp and it's quite a file.
The first time you see this, you might think that seems like a lot of code for that short Python code.
And the answer is it's done something a bit clever here.
It's done something known as unrolling a loop where it manually does several steps of the loop all in
one iteration.
It's not clear that that's necessarily a good idea, because compilers are meant to be good at that
anyway, but we'll see how it how it fares.
And by the way, it doesn't always do it this way.
This is I've I've run this experiment a few times.
This is a pretty interesting version of it, but you might have different results.
But this is the one that's done this time.
So that's that's what we'll go with.
Uh, and you can see it does appear to be doing the right kind of thing.
So it looks like good code, everything, as far as I could tell from, from my slightly rusty C++ knowledge
looks decent to me.
So now it's time for us to actually compile this and execute it.
All right.
We're now going to compile this code natively for my machine.
And then execute it as machine code on my machine.
And you can do this too.
But you don't need to.
The point is about porting code, not about running high performance C++.
It's fun, but you don't need to.
And in a second, we'll also do this on a website so that you really you could you could do it without
ever touching your box.
But should you wish to, we have of course taken, if you remember earlier, we took this command from
GPT five.
In fact, I iterated over this.
But this is like an efficient way to compile and run C++.
And so what we're going to do now is we will I've written this function compile and run.
It compiles main.cpp into an executable main, which for you might be mesnex if you're on a PC or main
if you're on a mac or Linux.
And then I'm going to run it three times and print the results.
You don't need that.
There we go.
Here we have it.
So now we're going to do this.
Drumroll please.
Remember 19 seconds is how long it took in Python land up there.
Let's run this and poof here we go.
There.
There is the result.
You can see it is somewhat faster in native machine code.
Uh, and let's just figure out how much faster that is.
So that is uh, and I realize this is only one test here, so it's not hugely scientific.
But you'll forgive me for just doing this a little bit.
Hand-wavy.
We'll pick this one here.
The first is that the.
That's the, uh.
We'll pick the middle one.
So I'm not cherry picking.
We'll pick the middle of the road.
89 two 2089 200, I'm so sorry.
I think this one is the middle of the road.
This one here is one we will pick and we will see.
Put a decimal point in there.
There we go.
And we will see that.
Ha ha.
Fantastic.
Uh, GPT five has been an amazing 230 times faster.
230 times faster is impressive stuff.
And now I will say that that it wasn't always this much faster.
Many of the times it's about 45 times faster.
The code it generates, which is more of the sort of standard, uh, almost sort of translation directly
from Python to C++ without doing that unrolling stuff.
But with that unrolling stuff that it did this time it has been 230 times faster.
Congratulations GPT five.
No wonder you are top of the Artificial Analysis leaderboard.
And should you not wish to do this on your computer like that, we can also do it on the website.
Let's just quickly grab this C++ code, copy it into the clipboard.
Go back to the lab, launch this website here and select all of this.
On the left hand side.
You paste in the C++ here, and you just press the run button to run this and see what it does.
And there we have it.
It runs.
It's obviously slower when you're running it on a, on a like a remote processor, but it's still significantly
faster than the 19 seconds that it took in Python land.
It's like more than 20 times the speed.
That is impressive stuff.
Uh, especially given given the how we're running it on online.
So very exciting indeed.
Great to see this performance speed up, uh, with GPT five porting our code from Python to C++.
097 - Let's see how the other models fare.
So we're going to run Claude sonnet 4.5, grok four from Mr. Musk.
Gemini 2.5 Pro.
Let's kick all three off.
They are going to first use this model to port the code.
Then they're going to, uh, call uh, the the, uh, compile and run code.
Now let's see, we've already got an answer from anthropic and we can see how is it compared.
It's it's, uh, it's it's clearly, uh, in the same league, uh, but not as fast.
Let's have a look.
Yeah.
It looks like this is reasonably ordinary style code, so it hasn't done that loop unrolling that that
we'd seen before.
Uh, and so if we go back to the lab, we'll see that, that as a result, it does.
Well, but not quite as well as, uh, as GPT five that was able to just slightly edge out anthropic.
But it's perfectly credible porting of the code running nice and fast, a decent result.
I think we can be happy with that.
And now Grock and Gemini are going to take quite a bit longer.
They do a lot more thinking about it, so I'm going to break and see you in a second when they are finished
so we can get the final scores.
Okay, so some time has passed and actually I've run this a few times now, which of course I've done
in the interests of your learning rather than because I enjoy it.
Uh, and uh, yeah, this, this this run right now is probably the most consistent sort of performance
I've been getting from the models, but it has varied, so you may get different results.
We will start by revealing anthropic's that sorry, we've already seen Anthropic's.
We just looked at, uh, anthropic did better than GPT five by a bit because of the way that it did
some unrolling.
Now let's look at Grock.
Mr. Musk's one that really went to town.
It fought thought for five minutes, 5.5 minutes on this and this.
This is the result a spectacular result, a spectacular result from Grock.
Look at this.
That is amazing.
It is?
Yeah.
Another huge amount.
Faster.
Uh, we can, uh, let's first look at the code itself.
So I've got the grox runs here and you can see that that how it's compiled the code that's faster is
that it is made use of threading libraries.
So there's some pretty hefty code here as it brings in threading libraries.
And it makes sure that it kicks off something that is using operating system level threads and running
things in a multi-threaded way.
Now, of course, I know what you're thinking.
The Python code, the original Python code wasn't written to be multithreaded and could have been,
but that's okay.
That's part of the challenge for the model.
It doesn't just need to port the code to a different programming language.
We told it to do everything that it could to get the same outcome faster.
So making taking advantage of threads is absolutely allowed.
That's within the rules.
And I made up the rules so I can say so.
So I'd say good job, grok.
Well done.
That's a very impressive performance.
Speed up.
But let's go back to the lab to see then if Gemini can keep up with grok, or does it fall behind even
GPT five?
Or does it in fact not even get the answer right?
We'll find out in a second.
And so revealing.
Gemini 2.5 Pro.
Here we have it.
Gemini 2.5 Pro absolutely killed it.
It crushed it.
Look at these times.
It did better materially better than grok which did better than GPT five, which did better than Claude.
So Gemini is in first place with terrific results.
They're super fast, and I can assure you that I ran it multiple times.
And Gemini almost always, except for one time in my test runs out of 5 or 6.
Gemini got these results really great.
You should run this too and see if you get the same.
What are you looking for?
Well, if we look at the code that Gemini wrote, you can see it's quite complex.
There's quite a lot to it.
And what's happening here is really multiple things.
First of all, it is also definitely doing the threading code.
And I'm no expert, but it appears to be doing something even more sophisticated.
I think both of them, both Grock and Gemini, were careful to look for the number of threads to maximize
parallel abilities.
Uh, you can see that it's done that here, and it does a whole lot of threading stuff, and then it
ends up calling calculate chunk in this multithreaded way concurrently.
And the key thing here is that it has also identified some improvements to the algorithm by simplifying
the algebra, doing the same calculation in a more efficient way, reducing in leading to reduced floating
point calculations, fewer calculations, faster performance.
And that's definitely sticking to the rules.
It's doing the same calc, so it gets the same answer.
It's just doing it with fewer math operations.
So so great.
Good for it.
And that means that really Gemini has done three things.
It's translated the code from Python to C++, which is great.
It's also improved the formula.
It's found a way to simplify the formula to do better a better job of calculating the same answer.
And then thirdly, it's also done this design improvement to the structure of the code to allow it to
be multithreaded and run multiple calculations in parallel.
So those three different changes have all added up together to give us this superb performance of this,
this tiny time on the middle time that I'll be picking is, uh, 0.013 seconds compared to 19 seconds
in Python land.
And actually I just look back and see that grok hard coded the number of threads where Gemini calculated
it.
So that might be another reason why Gemini did did better.
So very exciting stuff.
At least I think it's very exciting.
And I've done the quick calculation here just to see what kind of speed ups we're getting, and hard
coding in my numbers so that you can see what I got.
If we run this, we will see that from this analysis.
In fourth place was Claude Sonnet 4.5 with an 148 times speed up, which is still very impressive.
And you may have noticed that Claude wasn't actually because I was.
I was going through the OpenAI's API.
It wasn't actually using a significant thinking mode.
And so, you know, maybe that was handicapping it.
And GPT five in third place with a also a stonking 233 times speed up, which anyone would be pleased
with.
But then grock for Wow with a 1060 times speed up.
That's just crazy.
And it didn't always achieve that.
In my tests it was hit and miss, but I thought I'd capture captured this one.
That did, and that's great.
And then in first place, in first place, winning the crown.
Gemini 2.5 Pro A surprise.
A controversial first place wasn't top of the artificial analysis leaderboard, but it's top of our
experiment speeding up our Python code by 1440 times.
That is superb.
I'm very happy about this.
One of the great things about it is that this experiment feels so tangible because we get a real business
outcome.
We had a business objective to speed up some code and wow, have we achieved it.
And of course we should go to the website that I showed you before to see if this C++ code from Gemini
does well there.
Now, of course, it's not going to be running in a multi-threaded way when it's out on the cloud,
but still we should we should get to see something.
So let's see.
Here it is.
Remember this website?
I've copied Gemini's code to my clipboard.
I can press paste.
Here it is with all this fancy stuff with a number of threads and this hardware concurrency stuff.
Goodness knows what this all does.
Let's try running it on the cloud and see what we get.
Uh, you know, it's it's it's fast.
But as I thought, it's, uh, I don't think that's significantly faster than we'd seen from the from
GPT five version.
Uh, so it's still it's still around 20 times, uh, faster.
Um, but, uh, I think that's actually a little bit slower, isn't it, than the previous version.
Uh, it's possible that all of this stuff ends up running, adding overhead when it's running on the
cloud, which is fine, because the instructions that we gave Gemini was to optimize for my platform.
We even put the system details in there.
Let's let's go back and remind myself, uh, exactly what GPT came up with.
This was GPT unrolled stuff.
Copy that.
Let's put that back in the website.
So we were at 0.9 nine seconds here, put back in GPT five and run that and remind ourselves what we
get.
Yep.
There you go.
GPT five I remembered, right?
It is slightly faster.
Interestingly, when it's deployed on a different box on the internet, but that still works in Gemini's
favor because it shows that Gemini took took the challenge, understood the assignments, and got it
perfect for my box.
Congrats again Gemini.
Well, as I say, I'm a bit worried that this has been very self-indulgent, that I've thoroughly enjoyed
myself, but I hope that you enjoyed some of it as well.
It is fun to put these kind of complex challenges to models, especially when there's such very concrete
output from it.
So tomorrow we now move to open source models.
We have a whole ton of them to look at.
The idea is to use this as a way of assessing open source models for coding ability, and then evaluate
open source models alongside paid models for their ability to achieve a business objective, and also
just building a solution that uses open source models to generate code.
That's what I've got in store for you tomorrow.
I'll see you then.
098 - And welcome to week four, day four.
This is gonna be fun.
This is about open source models.
Now, taking the challenge we had last time and bringing it to open source.
Last time we made sure that in addition to coding with frontier models and choosing the right LLM based
on metrics, you were able to build Frontier Solutions using a model that we selected because it was
good at generating code.
So today it's going to be about assessing open source models, comparing them with a benchmark, building
a solution so that open source models can generate code.
And as a reminder this was the challenge we set our business person when we asked what is the problem
you're trying to solve?
They said, the problem is we've got some Python code.
We want to translate it.
We want to build port it to fast C++, go make that happen and we use some frontier models.
Claude Sonnet 45 was able to achieve about 184 x speed up.
GPT five got that to 2.33 times, then grok for more than a thousand times faster with some multithreading
code, with a hard coded number of threads, and a few other things.
Gemini 2.5 Pro.
For the win, it rewrote the algebra.
It restructured the code into threads and checked how many threads it could use for my system, and
then built very fast C++ code, which compiled natively to give us that 1440 times.
Speed up.
Phenomenal.
And how does open source compare?
Well, let's go find out.
Okay.
But first we should go and look at some leaderboards to get some candidate open source models.
That would make sense for us to start with.
The first place to go is the Big Code Models leaderboard, which is a hugging face space that's very
well known.
And it shows you how various models have ranked in terms of their Python, Java, JavaScript, and indeed
their C++ skills.
And we might as well sort by C++ ability if we can.
Let's do that.
And we discover that according to this table, which I think is a few months out of date, I think they
don't update this very often, but still it gives us some good pointers.
When 2.5 Coder Instruct comes through as a top model, it's a bigger version than we'll be able to run,
but it comes up there and then also the deep seq.
This is a hybrid with other models, but I think we can see here the deep seat coder.
And then if we look further down, we'll see various various models that are based on deep seq fi uh
and and Quen from Alibaba Cloud.
So the other place we can look is on my favorite one artificial analysis AI.
And you'll remember that when you're on artificial analysis-i, you can select which models you're looking
at.
And you tend to look at the big ones.
But you can come in here to the model selected and you can see I've gone through and I've searched and
selected a few candidate models.
We might want to look at a bit more and we can compare their coding skills.
So I've taken some open source models that we'll be able to run.
One of them is GPT OSS 20 B, and that is by far and away the highest performing one on the code bench.
Coding skills.
Compared to Deep Sea Coder, which comes in significantly lower and five for mini and 2.5 coder and
then Gemma three at the bottom.
And so here you see again a similar uh, similar arrangement.
But no, now it's different.
Sorry GPT Oasis comes first and then 2.5 coder comes next.
That was in third place uh and then deep sea coder and then five four and then Gemma at the end.
So if we were going to pick three, it would probably be GPT OSS, Quen 2.5 coder and deep seq coder.
They seem like good candidate models.
That's how you do it.
You start with the leaderboards with an appropriate metric to pick your candidates, and then you go
and try them out, which is what we'll get to next.
Actually, no it's not.
There's one more thing to do.
First, I just occurred to me, I was thinking, we're going to be running these open source models
using a llama, which limits me to two models that I can run locally.
But that's not entirely true.
There are other ways we can run models.
We could use open router, and we could also use grok with a Q and not not Mr. Musks.
And I think that's what we'll do.
We'll try grok with a Q, because we can use that to access the bigger OSS.
120 and you can see that that scores even higher, actually only slightly higher on the scientific coding,
but significantly higher on the live code bench.
So we will uh, we will give that one a try to via grok.
So we'll use both techniques for open source models okay.
With that.
Now let's go do it okay.
Here we are back in cursor.
And we're going into week four into day four already.
And just as a reminder we're going to be executing native C++ today.
But you don't need to don't bother if that's going to, to uh be something that will be a hardcore.
It will take you some, some learning.
Instead.
You can either just watch me do it and see the code being ported, or use the website that I showed
you yesterday.
And the other note is that we're going to be using some free models installed via Lama.
Also, we're going to use some open source models, as I said, through grok.
But also I just decided to add in open router as well.
We will add one model from open router.
This is all completely optional.
These are open source models, but you still have to pay for these bigger ones because open router has
to run them on the cloud.
But you don't need to just skip them if you don't want to run them.
That is the intro.
We'll run some imports.
I'm going to load in some environment keys.
As always, it doesn't matter if you don't want to use any of these and simply delete that from this
code.
All right.
And then as usual, we will connect to the client libraries in the normal way.
And this next line is where I set up the models we will use.
We're going to keep the the frontier closed source models in here.
This list although I'm not going to actually use them.
But here are the the frontier models.
We'll use them tomorrow again.
And then we're going to use the open source model Quen 2.5 coder deep seq coder v2 and GPT oss 20,
and we're going to use all three of them through Olama running locally on our computers.
If your machines can can take it, then that's what we'll run.
Then we're going to run.
I'm going to run at least Quen three coda 30 DB over open router, and I'm going to use OpenAI's massive
120 DB variant over grok with a Q.
Uh, and you can see in this bottom, I've just got a dictionary here in this bottom line.
And uh, basically what I'm saying is for each of these models that I've listed out here, I'm saying
which one of these client libraries will it use?
So just a little quick mapping from model name to client library model name to client library model
named client library.
So that we can look that up in our code in a second.
So you should just feel free to change these two lists to be whatever you would like.
Keep it to the size and shape and cost of model that you're comfortable with.
And of course, use the llama ones the first few for free, as long as your machine is big enough.
If your machine is on the smaller size, then then go with like llama 3.2, llama 3.21 b, or just go
and there's a code llama as well you could look at.
Just go on to Alarm.com and take a look and pick the models that you want.
And I should mention, once you've done that, once you've been to Alarm.com and gone to models, you
would then want to bring up a cursor terminal in the usual way, and then you can see what I've done
here.
My last two commands were pull Queen 2.5, Koda and Olama, pull deep, set Koda v2.
And you would have to pull whichever ones you want.
And it did take a minute to download these.
You can see they're reasonably large.
Quan 2.5 Koda is a 7 billion parameter model, so it's big and deep.
Sea Koda v2 is a 16 billion parameter model, so it's really big.
But they both fit comfortably on my machine and they'll work fine.
You may need to have 60GB of Ram, not eight gigabytes, but you should give it a try and see.
But if in doubt, stick with the smaller llama 3.2 or other small ones.
Okay, so when you've done that, you've updated your, your, uh, models and you've mapped them to
the right clients here.
Then run that cell.
And then again we're just going to get the system information here.
This is my machine.
Your machine will be different.
But this is telling me something I do I just noticed here it does say the number of cores that I've
got.
So when I realized now, when grok yesterday fixed the number of cores in the code it was making, that's
fair enough, because it did know I told it the the architecture of the computer.
So it was doing that intentionally.
So that can't have been the way in which Gemini's code was superior.
Uh, Gemini went and found out how many cores there were, but it didn't need to because we already
had that in the prompt.
All right.
Anyways, these these here are the commands that we took from yesterday.
So in yesterday's lab we had identified, uh, from, from the advice that from GPT five, what are
the commands to use?
Uh, you remember when we, uh.
Hang on, where is it now when we asked GPT five?
And this is this is it.
We asked GPT five to tell us what commands to use.
The first time I did it, actually, GPT five didn't give me the most efficient ones.
I had to prompt it a couple of times, but in the end, I got there.
This was the fastest and so you should do the same.
You should find out the fast commands for your platform, and that is what you should put here.
And then run that cell.
And at that point we are ready to do some testing of models.
099 - Okay, so the main task you will remember the system prompt about converting Python code.
You remember the function user prompt for that generates a user prompt with a system information, the
compile command and the Python code to port.
So this is all old news for you.
So as messages for old news write output you know well and port you know well as well.
And this is again our code to calculate pi by doing 200 million times of this sequence.
And now the run Python code, which actually we don't need to run.
We already know the time that the Python code takes the compile and run.
That will run it three times.
But here's the new little piece I have for you.
Let's give ourselves a little Gradio interface.
So this is using the blocks approach that you'll remember is the one where you want to design your interface.
This is going to have two rows to it.
The first row will have a Python and a C++ text box, the Python code to enter and the C++ code that
will be an output.
Put and then this, this.
After that we have a dropdown to select a model.
And we have a convert button to convert the code.
And this is where you say to Gradio, hey look, I want you to build a front end so that if the user
clicks the convert button, I want you to call back my server.
I want you to call the function that's called port.
The inputs should be the model that's selected and the Python code.
And with whatever that function returns, I want you to shove that in the C++ text box.
So this line here is how we tell Gradio to hook up our UI to our callback function port.
That's all it takes.
And this will then launch our new user interface for porting code.
All right so here we go.
Bang up comes the user interface.
Haha okay, so it's just as I said, two rows.
The top row has Python code and C++ code.
Lovely.
So I can select a model and it allows me to choose any of the models in that models list.
So if you change the models list, you should see your models here and we won't pick the frontier ones.
We've used them already.
We're going to start with Gwen 2.5 coda and I can come over here and press Convert Code.
And when I press that button, it calls the callback port.
It passes in the model and the Python code, and with whatever that callback method returns, it shoves
that in this cell here.
And that's where we have it right now.
And it's also written it to a file.
So what I can do now is go back for a moment to cursor, and I can just do the compile and run to.
Now compile that code.
It wrote it to Main.cpp.
That will be the same code.
And we can now compile that code and run it.
And it doesn't run.
2.5 Pro was not so code was not able to do this.
It is a small model.
It was not able to successfully convert from C++ from Python to C++.
I think that it hadn't imported the right thing and so that didn't work.
So that is a fail.
The our first fail of all of these that we got from, uh, from from Gwen.
Quinn.
Okay, so that was Quinn coder.
That did not succeed.
We're now going to try another tiny model.
We're going to try Deep Sea Coder v2.
Not so tiny.
It's a 16 billion parameter model.
We'll see if it can port Python code to C++.
Well, it's done something.
Here we go.
Looks like it has the same problem, but we will see.
Okay, so, uh, it looks different though.
Let's go back over here.
Compile and run.
Oh, no.
No, it didn't have the problem that ran successfully.
Well done, deep sea coder.
Uh, that ran and we've got a perfectly respectable number.
Uh, we will.
I will keep note of this.
Or maybe we should write it down here.
So we'll make this into a markdown cell and we will say, uh, this is Quinn.
Coder was a fail deep seek coder two.
This was Quinn 2.5.
Coder deep C coder v2.
And let's pick the middle time.
There it is
0.1144050084.
All right.
Congratulations to Deepsea Coder.
Let's go try the next one.
Okay.
The next one is GPT oss 20 B 20 billion parameter model again running locally on my computer right here.
All right I'm going to press the convert code button.
And now I know from bitter experience that we are in for a wait.
Now uh, this is going to take my machine some time and I can see that my GPU is going flat out as this
monstrous model is, uh, slaving away at this problem.
Uh, so we will give it some time.
I'm going to let it think for a while.
And when I come back, we will see whether or not GPT oss 20 B is up for it.
And when I say, is it up for it?
I mean, of course, is it up for giving us an answer?
And the answer is yes.
It is up for giving us an answer.
Here it is.
It took about five minutes to get here, though, while I was hammering away.
Uh, but we have an answer.
Is it the right answer?
It's not doing any multithreaded stuff that I can see, so it's not going to be super fast.
But let's see what it does.
Compile and run.
Well, it works, and it is indeed faster than the ones that came before.
This is, I think, our fastest so far.
Let's come in here and we're going to say that this is open.
OS the 20 billion parameter version of it.
What is our medium sized one?
This was A4805804.
So this is the middle one right here.
Paste that in there.
There we have the performance from OpenAI's GPT OS.
Very impressive indeed.
Okay.
Onwards.
100 - All right.
Next up we're going to use Kwan three quarter 30 billion which is a large Kwan model.
And we're going to use it through open router.
Uh, and the reason I picked this one, if we go to open routers website, they have a section where
you can look at the different categories, the leaderboards by how much they are used.
That's a different a different twist on leaderboards.
And we'll pick the programming category to see which models are used the most for programming related
challenges.
And this varies.
This bounces around a lot.
It just bounces around while we were looking at it right there.
But Kwan three right now is varies between second place and fourth place.
Uh, but here it is.
It's being used quite heavily.
And, uh, it comes after Grock and Claude there.
So this is the model we're picking for our next experiment.
So and this is it in, in, in open router, the details of it, they show the different providers that
you can use.
So we are going to use that one.
Uh here we go.
Kwan three Koda.
And going to press the convert code button.
Remember it was Quinn's cousin that failed with a mistake.
Stake here we have its code and there it looks.
So let's go now and try and run this code and see what we get.
So back we come over here, we compile and run code.
And it turns out that the, uh, the, the cousin, the faster, bigger cousin is able to succeed with
the challenge.
But it's not our fastest.
But let's put it down.
So this is now question 30 B and it is we'll take the middle time here that switches this one right
here.
And so there we have it.
There is when it is uh slower than open AI than OSS 20 B but it's faster than deep C code V2 running
locally on my machine.
Well done Gwen.
Okay, last and hopefully not least, we are going to pick GPT oss 120 be the bigger cousin of the 20
B1 and this is running on grok with a Q uh, which is, of course, the very fast inference platform
and 120 but we know that OSS this is on high thinking, so it's going to take its time over this.
But the fact that it's running on grok with a Q gives me some hope that maybe by the time I finish this
sentence, it will finish, but maybe not.
All right.
I will, uh, be gone and be back in a second when GPT OS 120 be completes.
Okay.
And it finished a couple of seconds later.
So it was pretty quick.
And here is the results.
Looks good to me.
It hasn't done the super clever stuff with threads, but it looks looks good.
It's done.
Some try to give some hints to the compiler to make it run faster.
We'll see how it fares.
Back.
We go to the code, we will run our compile and run again and see what happens.
And oh no, it's it's, uh, quite a bit slower.
Uh, there's a shock.
That's an unexpected outcome.
Uh, okay.
Okay.
So so again, C++ people will probably know what's going on here and why exactly that means that it
didn't do so well.
Uh, but, uh, open AI.
OS 120 be it got.
Let's pick the middle one to be consistent.
Which would be this one here, right?
Oh no, no it wouldn't.
What am I saying?
It would be this one here.
Sorry.
Uh, there we go.
And that is the result.
It is the worst of the bubble, not the very worst, because quantum 2.5 didn't didn't, uh, get the
assignment at all, but it's not good.
Let's just try running it again just to make sure it's not that like my computer was.
Was busy at that time or something.
Now look at that.
Very consistent.
Wow.
There we have it.
So strangely, OS 120 was beaten significantly healthily by 20.
And you know, of course we're not being super scientific because we should really run the porting like
ten times and be taking the average of actually reporting the code.
But for what it's worth, we're doing it with a with one experiment and then multiple runs.
And this is this is where it's ended up that GPT OSS 120 was beaten by its smaller cousin, 20 GB.
And so to wrap up, here are the results of our rather unscientific experiment.
You could run this multiple times to see if it holds out.
Worst ninth place across our frontier and open source models was when 2.5 code that failed the assignment.
Next up, surprisingly shockingly, was GPT OSS 120, which did a really bad job.
In fact, it was worse than I realized when I was talking about it.
I was I was sort of thinking that this was like 0.14, uh, a bit slower than everything else.
But no, it was a lot slower.
It was 1.4 seconds.
I had to run it a few more times just to check that I hadn't made a mistake.
I can't actually see what was wrong with it.
C++ code, and I'm hoping maybe one of you C++ people will come back and tell me.
I'm guessing maybe one of the pragmas was a really bad idea.
I realize now that that unrolled one was it was telling the compiler that it's not allowed to do that,
and I have no idea why it did that.
It must have thought it was a great idea, and it turned out it was a lousy idea.
So GPT oss 120 be disgraced itself.
Deep Sea Coder v2 and Quinn three coder 30 be Basically tied at 168 times.
Speed up.
They both got very similar coin.
Three quarter had the slight edge, but that might just be a you know, it's probably the same code
or very similar.
Just happened to be when I when I ran it.
So there you have two successful open source models.
Next up comes the frontier model Claude Sonet 4.5 with its 104 times speed up, followed by GPT five,
top of the artificial analysis leaderboard.
For us, it got a 233 speed up.
And then the shocker, the surprise, the amazing GPT oss 120 just 20 B not 120 B a 238 times speed
up, beating out GPT five and Claude Sonet 4.5.
Fantastic.
Uh, again, it may just have been lucky.
It might have been the same code as those other frontier models just happened to run faster when I ran
it, but whatever.
That is what it is.
It won that.
And what's cool about it is that, of course, that porting was running on my computer.
That was an a old farmer based model.
A model running on my computer competed with the frontier and it seems slightly beat some of the frontier.
Uh, but it didn't come first because both grok four and Gemini 2.5 Pro did better by putting in native
like multithreading code with Gemini 2.5 Pro still the champion.
Now, I do hope you're not fed up of this code generation stuff, because we've got one more, one more
hard test to go.
A really challenging one to put to all of these models to see who triumphs.
We'll do that tomorrow.
Along with generally talking about comparing performance of open source and frontier models and ranking
them together, discussing evals, evaluations, such a critical topic that really puts a bow on this
week about picking the right model for the commercial task.
And we'll talk about how you build solutions to generate code and different kinds of related tasks,
like really fun things like writing automatically, writing comments for your code, and automatically
writing test cases for your code.
All of that to come tomorrow.
See you then.
101 - Okay.
It's week four.
Day five.
It's the last day of the week, the last day before rag week.
And we're going to use it as a final time of judging models because we're judging types.
You can already code with frontier models.
With paid APIs that check completions API, you can use open source models in your sleep.
You can confidently choose the right model for your project based on metrics, and you can use frontier
and open source models to generate code.
Today, we're going to be continuing to compare the performance of a zoo of models.
We'll talk about different types of metric.
And we're going to build solutions for code generation.
And I'll leave you to build some for different tasks.
Okay.
Let's get to it.
So I said before that perhaps one of the most important questions that one tackles is choosing which
LM is right for the task at hand.
But in fact, I'm going to correct myself.
I think there's an even more important question which which is sort of a part of that question.
So it's a subquestion perhaps, which is how are you going to evaluate the performance of your model
of your solution, that it's such a crucial question.
It's a question where you have to firmly put on your data scientist's hat to understand.
What does it take to say this solution is superior, has better performance than this, because only
when you have a metric that you can measure can you judge which is the right LM for the task at hand.
So incredibly important.
We will talk about this a number of times in the coming weeks.
And I do see it as a critical skill to have as an AI engineer.
And it's also something that's often it's a common interview question.
It's a common thing that you would you would ask in a real commercial team.
So it's something to understand even if it's not as juicy as some other things we cover on the course.
It is a really essential question, and I want to tell you now about the two different types of metric
that you will come across that you need to be thoughtful of as you're building out an LM solution.
Okay, so the first kind of metric that you will come across that is super important.
Sometimes called model centric metrics or model metrics or technical metrics are the metrics that you
measure as you are training a model to make sure it improves, or as you are working as a data scientist
on a model.
And when you're dealing with training, the normal thing that you look at is called loss, which is
a measure of how bad is your model.
And you're normally trying to adjust training to minimize loss.
And if you come from a traditional data science background, then one of the go to loss metrics you
start out with is called MSE mean squared error.
And it's as simple as you take your prediction from your model, you subtract the ground truth and you
square it.
And so if you say that someone's predicted credit rating is ten, and their actual credit rating turns
out to be eight from your from your labeled data, then you take the difference two square it four.
And that is your MSE loss your mean squared error.
When it comes to deep learning to to LMS, the metric that we most commonly used is called cross entropy
loss, and we will look at that later when we do training ourselves in week seven.
When that time comes along, we will look at the formula for cross entropy loss.
Uh, and so you will get you will get somewhat familiar with it, uh, the negative log likelihood for
those that know this stuff.
All right.
So that is loss.
And perplexity is another measure that you come across a fair bit in uh with LMS it's very similar to
cross entropy loss.
Uh, it's another measure of how how well your model is doing.
A perplexity of one means your model is incredibly confident in the right answer.
That's a that's a good, uh, perfect perplexity, whereas a loss is zero is absolutely perfect.
Uh, there's no loss at all.
And then a higher perplexity indicates that the model has less certainty about what it should be predicting
next.
So perplexity of 100 would indicate that it's the same as it thinking that there's 100 equally likely
possibilities for the next token.
So that's perplexity.
And then a bunch of other metrics here from traditional data science, uh, the precision and recall
and F1 they form, there's this thing called the confusion matrix that you may come across, which is
all to do with if you're making predictions.
Uh, how how good are your good predictions?
It's all to do with false positives and false negatives and all that if you've done this before.
So these are all the kinds of metrics, uh, that you dig into as a data scientist.
And we will look at some of these in week six and then seven, as we look both in the traditional data
science world and in the new world, how data scientists like yourself, uh, model and look at the
performance of their model.
And these are the ones that are easiest to optimize your model, uh, from because they're calculated
directly from the outputs of the model.
And you can run your model, calculate these outputs, and you can do things like training, where you
automatically tweak all of the settings of your model to try and get your numbers better and better
to try and reduce your losses.
That is what training is all about.
So if these are the metrics which actually tell you what the performance of your model and that you
can use to train your model, then you might be wondering, well, what's the other type of metric?
Why do we need another type of metric?
Well, maybe you can guess.
There is a very other important type of metric, and it is sometimes called the business centric metrics
or outcome metrics.
But these are the true commercial metrics that your business wanted you to solve.
They're typically like KPIs tied to business outcomes, like like perhaps revenue or return on investment
or a very common one of course, is customer satisfaction.
When you think about you're chatting with with with a chatbot, and then you see that thing that says,
am I doing a good job?
Thumbs up, thumbs down.
You're giving user feedback.
And ultimately, the intention of this chatbot is to have satisfied users.
That's the final goal.
No matter how good a cross-entropy loss is, how low it is, and perplexity is low and uh, accuracy
is high.
Everything else is looking great, but but, uh, yeah, if you're if you're customer satisfaction is
bad, if people don't like chatting with your chatbot, then something's gone wrong.
Uh, and also comparing with benchmarks like the leaderboard, you could have all sorts of great scores,
but if it's not doing well in at the end, the tests at the end of it, then something is wrong.
Your AUC roc your area under the curve of the receiver operator.
Characteristic sounds super tactical.
It might be fantastic.
It means nothing if your revenues aren't going up.
So that is why you need a business centric metrics which you're trying to solve for.
And and these are the tangible ones.
And so why don't we why don't we only focus on those?
Well, of course, I've sort of answered my own question on the slide.
It's because whilst the business outcome metrics are what you're trying to solve for, typically there
are many leaps of faith between getting from your technical solution and the actual final outcome.
Who knows why your customers are pressing the thumbs down.
Maybe.
Maybe the chatbot is doing great, but something else is going on.
Maybe they don't like the UI.
Maybe it's something that's completely unrelated.
And maybe, maybe revenue is not going up because.
Because people don't want your product or something.
That's got nothing to do with the fact that the model is working beautifully.
So, you know, there's there's there's other outside factors.
There's there's too much, too much noise between the model and the final business outcome.
So whilst the final business outcome is what you're trying to achieve, there's many potential areas
where you might miss for other reasons.
It's too noisy and you can't train on it.
It typically takes time before you can measure this metric revenue.
You can't.
You can't run your model and then see what happens to revenue.
So you can't use it for for real time training.
So whilst the business metric is what you're ultimately trying to solve for, you obviously can't measure
that in a frequent way or tie it super directly to the model.
So you typically optimize with the model centric metrics, and then at some point later you measure
the business outcome metrics, and it is the responsibility of a combination between yourself, the
AI engineer and your business sponsors to to make sure you've connected the dots, to make sure you've
done everything you can so that a model which performs well with its model centric metrics, will translate
to a business that performs well with its business centric metrics.
And I know what you're thinking.
You're thinking.
Sure, sure, sure.
But I'm the AI engineer.
I'm the data scientist.
My domain is the model centric metrics.
That's where I live.
It's the business people that are responsible for the business outcome metrics and or the or the product
people.
Product teams often are the people that sit in the middle and interface between, uh, people like ourselves
and the final business, uh, divisions.
But what I'll tell you is this is I've said it before, uh, whilst I have some sympathy with that argument,
I do appreciate that that is our primary responsibility.
Are these model centric metrics.
It is a super power for people in our position for for the technical people, for the for the scientists
and engineers to also understand the business and to be able to connect the dots.
If you can do that as well.
It is a superpower.
And so I would urge you to be thinking and challenging the business metrics to really dig into them.
Challenge your business, challenge your product people.
Make sure that you're the one that's connecting the dots.
Because if you know and understand the technical side and the data science side and the model centric
metrics, and you also understand the business KPIs that you're trying to solve for, then you are in
a fantastic position to make really, really significant impact.
So that's the challenge for you.
Get that, seize that superpower.
I've also I've of course got the commercial briefing course too, if you want to get deeper into that.
But but the the best the best way to do it is to be curious to, to try and find out about the business
metrics and understand ask the right questions.
Challenge.
Make sure you understand how your model is going to translate to business outcomes.
102 - And we will come back to this, uh, from week six onwards and do a lot more in the way of discussing
and understanding evals.
Such an important topic.
Okay.
So back back to the project at hand.
In our case, of course, we were very lucky that the metric that we were playing with, the metric
that we had the most insight to, was the business centric metric we were working directly with that
improve the performance of some code.
Doesn't happen often.
I got to tell you, most of the time the model metrics are quite far removed from the actual business
metric, but in our case, we were working directly with that.
And it was about the performance of C++ with with with the same with needed to have the same output.
And so far Gemini 2.5 Pro is our winner.
It's time now for us to go back to the lab one more time for a harder test, to really put them through
the their final paces and see who we will crown the final winner.
And to shake it up, I've decided to change things around a bit.
And rather than rather than generating C++ code and translating from Python to C++, I have changed
it.
So we'll be generating from Python to Rust code rust, which happens to be, I think.
I think it is the most loved language.
According to the StackOverflow developer survey for ten years in a row.
Most loved ten years.
Let's see if we can figure out why.
When we translate a hard challenge from Python to Rust, let's go to curse.
Okay.
Back in curse, we're opening week four.
We're going to day five.
And here we have it.
As a reminder, it is optional to actually execute C++ or rust.
You can do either.
I'll set this up, this lab up for either one, or you can just run it on the C++ website from yesterday
or just port the code.
Don't bother with the running your choice.
Also a reminder I will use some expensive models, but you can pick your own or just run it only open
source.
It's about the task, it's not about the compilation and so on.
So as usual, some imports as usual load in some environment variables.
Make sure we've got everything keeping open router on the list again as well as grok.
With a queue we will get all of our client libraries initialized.
And as before, this is the list of models that we'll use.
I'm keeping the same set as yesterday.
And here are they are linked to their client libraries okay.
Let's now find out about rust.
So there's a new function in that systeminfo thing that I added in there which is called rust info.
And if I run that then as well as my system information, it's going to give a whole ton of information
about whether or not I have a rust tool chain installed on my computer, which I do, and then I will
run this, that will again ask Gpc5 to give me instructions for how to install rust if I don't have
it, so it will give you instructions and this is very optional should you wish.
You can stick with C++.
Stick with what we did yesterday if you don't want to mess around, it's fun.
If you know the nerd in, you might be interested and might want to do this.
It's especially cool if you don't know the language, because there's something very satisfying about
seeing a model generating something which looks foreign to you.
You know, it's like, okay, I don't know what this means.
I'm going to see if it actually works.
So I find that kind of cool.
Uh, and, and it has, uh, done it and it's told me that I am already set up.
I have rust toolchain, and it's told me that this is the command that I need to run, and it looks
like a pretty legit command, and I've just copied that and pasted it down here.
But you can leave this being your C++ one from yesterday if you'd like.
As you wish.
Now let's go on to the main part and I begin here I've got language equals rust.
And just change that to C++ if you'd like to stick with C++.
Everything else should work exactly as yesterday all the way through.
Everything in this code works for either rust or C++.
Rust, of course, also is a compiled language, so it compiles all the way down to a native machine
code, just like C++.
What famously rust is something which which is considered safe in that it compiles all the way down.
But what C++ lets you, if you wish, do very dangerous things that can cause the machine to crash horribly
or cause buffer overflows and security risks.
Rust does not permit that.
So so, uh, we've we've, uh, we're gonna we're gonna see how that affects performance of the code.
If it does and what we're able to do.
Let's see.
So, uh, I've got I've got this part, as I say, that that puts in the word rust, but otherwise everything
is exactly the same as before.
The same system prompt.
Your task is to convert Python code into high performance language code.
That'll be rust, of course.
Respond only with rust Ross code, and it needs to produce identical output in the fastest time.
The same user prompt as before.
The same messages as before.
The same write output as before.
The same port as before.
Just.
I've also made sure that we wipe out any special tags for rust.
And then the run python as before, which is going to run the python version of the code and compile
and run where.
Now this is.
So it's the same code here because uh, it's just going to take the compile command and the run command
that you've got above.
Okay.
Now let's look at some python.
Okay.
So last time we had some Python code to calculate digits of pi.
We've got something harder this time.
There's quite a lot of complicated code.
And I will go through it later when we, uh, see it presented nicer and talking about it presented
nicer.
This is where we're going to do that.
So we now have a little gradio app that's a little bit more involved than last time.
I bring in some styles that I've got sitting in another file there.
You can check out the styles if you want, but but uh, yeah, I'm not much good at CSS, and I will.
I will tell you that it was, uh, an LLM that generated this CSS right here.
Of course, that's the way to do it these days.
Uh, so we take in some CSS, we create our user interface as before.
It's got it's actually it's now it's now got three rows.
The first row has the, uh, Python code and the C++ code and then the set of buttons.
And then there's the second row.
And the third row has output cells for Python output and C++ output.
And the other thing I mentioned is we're using a special gradient field called a GR code.
So let's see what all this looks like.
If I run this up comes the user interface.
And it's kind of cool.
We've got ourselves this, uh, this code block right here and we can see what's going on really nicely.
Let me zoom out a bit.
There we go.
Zoom all the way out.
We can see this is all the code we're talking about.
It probably looks super tiny for you.
You have to squint, but I can make it a bit bigger.
There we go.
And I can just quickly tell you what it is that we're going to be running here.
Okay, so what is this Python code?
What are we challenging our model with, right.
Well, to start with, we have something here which is a pseudo random number generator.
It generates fake random numbers I'm not relying on on like the random library in Python, because I
want to do something that will be totally reproducible in any other programming language, but also
because the way I do this, which is with a couple of big, big numbers, and then doing something where
you multiply, add and take the remainder.
The way that this is done is, is using a generator function using a yield of a value.
And that's going to be something hard for the model to understand and translate to other languages with
different constructs.
So that was a sort of cool trick to use here.
So okay, we can generate random numbers.
So what.
Well, I wanted the kind of kind of formula here.
That's the kind of thing you might come across maybe in a game.
Uh, so maybe if you're a games programmer or games dev, this might be the sort of thing that you've
had to do.
But basically I make 10,000 of these random numbers between minus ten and plus ten.
And the challenge that this code solves is, all right, I've got these 10,000 random numbers.
Tell me if you could pick any subset of numbers in a row, you could pick the first ten numbers, the
middle 30, the last 20, any subset.
Then you could add those numbers up.
You would get a total.
What is the highest total that you could get by taking any sum subarray, any any number of numbers
in a row within this array of 10,000 numbers.
And you might say, well, hang on, why isn't it just that just keep going.
Just take the whole list.
Because remember, it has negative numbers in there too.
So you might not want to take you might you might get the best possible outcome just by taking the three
numbers in the middle if they're all positive.
So it's figuring that out.
And of course, the way to do that which is shown here, which is a pretty standard approach, is to
loop all the way through the whole array and as your starting point.
And then for each one you have like a sub loop here, which then loops to see what the end could be.
And then you add that up and find the total.
And you have to just make double sure that you don't accidentally check everything twice, which is
easy to do if you're not careful.
And so that is what this does.
And then I say, you know what?
Let's do that 20 times.
20 times with different sets of random numbers.
Add the whole lot up and return it.
So there's a lot of calculations happening there, an awful lot.
And it's going to be hard for the model to understand all that, to translate it and to get exactly
the same output, let alone make it faster at the same time.
So we will see how they all do.
103 - But before anything, if we zoom out from this a little bit, we should start go all the way out.
We will start by running this Python code to see how long does this take.
If we just use Python and, uh, it's not going to be quick because there's a lot of work to be done.
And this of course is taking the string and calling eval.
And which is basically the same as just running that Python code and then finding out how long it takes
in Python land.
And I do believe I happen to know.
Well I know you don't know yet, but you're about to find out any second now.
Uh, and we will then be able to compare that with the rust version.
Here it is.
So the total maximum subarray sum, that is the total of doing this 20 times it comes to that number
109 eight zero.
So that is the number to look for.
And the time it took was 33 seconds.
In Python land.
That's the number to beat in rust okay.
So the first model to try will be the one that came bottom before.
We will go in reverse order.
Kwan 2.5 coda.
I have kicked off.
That of course is running locally on my computer and obviously we're going to hopefully see that it
can port this code to rust last time.
Remember with Pi it wasn't able to make the C++ code work.
This is the rust code that's come up.
And uh, if it's your first site at rust Code, then here you have it.
We will now see whether or not this works.
Run the rust and we get a bunch of stuff, a bunch of problems.
That is another fail.
Unfortunately for Kwan 2.5 Coda.
So next up is GPT.
Uh, so we should, uh, we should find that again.
You remember, that was the one that unfortunately disappointed us last time.
So we will press the port to rust button again.
This is going to grok with a queue.
It does make me wonder whether, uh, I somehow had it not set to be reasoning high in the way that
I'm talking to grok with a queue, because it's quite fast, and it's surprising that it got it wrong
before.
Uh, so that might be you guys could probably double check that and tell me if I'm not, if I'm not
using that properly.
Uh, but now it's time for us to run this as well.
Let's see what happens.
Something's going on.
It's thinking, okay, it got the right answer, and it ran exceedingly fast.
That seems to be pretty impressive to me.
I would say.
Let's have a quick let's let's copy this down and take note of this result and look at the code and
see what's going on.
Uh, so this is the rust code.
You'll see that, uh, you probably can't see anything at all.
Let me zoom in.
You'll see that it's done some some interesting looking things here.
Uh, but most importantly, it has done something very, very important, which is, uh, impressive.
It is reimplemented the algorithm.
It has used something known as candidate Kadane's algorithm, which is an approach which allows you
to not have to do a loop and an inner loop, but to calculate the maximum sum of continual elements
or contiguous elements in an array in one pass.
And so it recognized the kind of thing we were doing, and it knew how to do it faster.
And that's pretty impressive.
And it could have done that in Python two.
But the fact that it did in Python and rewrote it in rust that got compiled is why we've got a staggering,
staggering performance improvement.
Check out the difference here.
33 seconds down to something that is what is that?
That is that is 304 microseconds.
Wow, wow.
I wonder if that's going to be the victorious, uh, from OpenAI OS 120.
Let's keep a note of that.
Go back to day five.
So this is uh, we've got again that um, that Quan 2.5 coder was a fail.
Or make this the markdown.
And now we have of course.
Sorry.
Markdown.
And now we have that GPT oss 120.
Got that time frame.
Unbelievable.
Unbelievably fast performance.
Fantastic.
Time to try the next model.
Okay.
And back again.
I'm still.
I'm somewhat, uh, awestruck by the performance improvement we just saw from from OSS 120.
Uh, now I've gone to Deep Sea Cadet v2.
I ported to rust, press run rust, and it gets an error.
Deep Sea Coder v2 is another fail.
So onwards.
Next up is Kwan that we're going to do this one.
The Kwan 330 DB that we're going to use open router as our as our conduit as our provider that is connecting
to Kwan and will charge us for it.
Here is the code.
Let's run the rust and see it also fails.
Look at that uh, error aborting due to unknown format trait.
That's interesting, isn't it?
There we go.
So?
So also, Kwan has failed.
That's next on our list.
We're not going to give him a second chance.
Unfortunately, it's.
This is.
This is the game.
Uh, you may have more success if you're running this, you might get a different outcome.
It's time for us to go to our first frontier closed source paid model.
We're going with Claude.
That was in last place before port to rust.
Let's see how Claude handles this challenging case.
Uh, it's thinking about it.
I feel like it's thinking rather longer than it did for the pie example.
Uh, and here we go.
We've got the answer.
I see a bunch of stuff here.
Let's try running that rust.
Oh.
An error.
There we go.
I actually think I saw that this this, uh, so this is an example.
If you run this in C++, it will in fact, uh, probably crash uh, or give a crazy number.
Rust has more, uh, type checks.
It does more checking.
And so it notices that Claude has made a mistake Stake here in using 32 bit numbers.
When these numbers require that, use 64 bit numbers.
And I even added a comment.
A Python comment in here.
Be careful to support large numbers.
Just a hint so that the model, when it's going through and doing this, it just has that.
It's paying attention to that.
But it didn't help out Claude, sadly.
Claude 4.5 had failed the test.
That is a fail.
Noted down Claude 4.5 fail.
And we're going to move on to GPT five.
Okay, here we go.
We're going to go on to GPT five.
Here it is port to rust.
And I feel like I didn't make enough of a deal of the fact that this new interface, I sort of forgot
to mention really enough time that I've added all of these buttons so that not only I think in the last
one, all we had was the display of the code.
This one is one which also shows the output, which I think is really cool, which is the, uh, For
the final part of this interface, and it's been styled so nicely.
Um, so it looks great.
All right, well, this will probably take a few minutes because it's a hard task at GPT five.
Took five minutes for the easier task?
I think so, so it could take a while.
So I'll be right back when it's complete.
Okay.
GPT five has completed.
We're looking at the code.
I can see already.
I can see that it's got contains algorithm.
And there we go.
It mentions it contains algorithm.
Uh so it saw that and I also see it's done.
It's done inlining like Claudia.
But it appears to have done more.
I think if I remember right.
So let's run this.
But I'm expecting a very good outcome.
It's run.
Oh, no.
Look at that.
It's gone wrong.
Oh, no.
What's.
What's happened to it?
Unknown format.
It's the same thing as we got before.
That is funny, isn't it?
It looks like it's, uh.
It's made some mistake with the way that it's formatting the text.
Although everything else is working.
Well, that is too bad.
That is a great shame.
GPT five.
You know we got rules are the rules.
What am I going to tell you?
I'm afraid we have to fail it.
I don't know how this happened exactly.
It seems like, uh.
It seems like a real shame this would happen, but GPT five disqualified, and we'll move on.
Well, I'm still pretty shocked by this.
I'm shocked by the fact that the mighty GPT five made a mistake.
I can't help but think that maybe it's my mistake that I've done something wrong here.
Uh, we'll find out, uh, if I have.
Then then then let me know.
Tell tell me what I did wrong.
Uh, but I do believe GPT five disqualified itself.
Meanwhile, I have selected GPT OSS 20, uh, the one that triumphed last time.
The open source model that caught us all off guard.
It is now running.
My machine is grinding.
I wonder whether.
Yeah, whether if I'm appearing freeze frame.
It's because my machine is is really, really crunching away to try and get through this.
I will see you when it completes.
104 - Well, this is exciting.
It's completed.
So GPT five disgraced itself with with the apparently buggy code, and now it's with its cousin, OS
20 GB to try and save the day.
Let's run this.
Oh, wow.
This is running.
There we go.
Okay, well it's done.
Great.
It has, it has done great.
Look at that.
It's got the right answer.
And it's also done it in crazy fast time.
Let's have a look at the code.
I can see that looks right.
The subarray I it didn't mention that it's used Kadane's algorithm but I can see that it has there's
only one loop not multiple loops.
And it wouldn't it wouldn't give the right answer if it had got it wrong.
And so despite.
Yeah, it doesn't it doesn't mention that it's reimplemented.
It just did it.
There's no comments.
It did it in, uh in perfect style.
It continues to amaze.
This is the result.
This is the result from the, uh, the small open source model.
Here we go.
Paste it in there.
How amazing is that?
It's just come in here under.
It's a bigger, bigger brother.
Which is perhaps just a coincidence.
Who knows?
But it's the number we're taking.
That's the rule.
I don't make up the rules.
Well, I do make up the rules, but that's what we're going with.
Congratulations.
We've just got two more models to go.
Okay, so next up is grok for the mighty.
Grok for I've kicked it off.
We'll let it run.
Take one more moment to admire this nice user interface, which is all hooked up as we look back at
the code here.
If I go back to this code, just to show you, the thing that I didn't particularly cover last time,
is that you can see that the, um, the callbacks when you call click for convert, it calls the port
function as before, puts in the inputs of the model and the python and takes the outputs.
Then there's a Python run button.
That's the new button.
When you click that it calls run Python, that function that runs and times the python and puts the
output in Python out.
And when you click the the run C++ or rust, depending on on what language is set to it calls compile
and run that function that we wrote and it puts the output there.
So you see again that how how cool and clear gradio is just by setting the listing the buttons and registering
these events and tying them to callback functions, inputs and outputs, you can easily hook up a user
interface to your model and to your to your backend callback function.
All right, well, it's still running.
I will see you in a minute when it completes.
Okay, here is the rust code generated by grok for, uh, taking a look at this.
Uh, okay.
I can see that looks good.
Uh oh.
I'm not sure if.
Oh, yeah, the right data types, I think.
I think that looks good to me.
And, uh, it looks like this is Kadane's algorithm, although it's not mentioning it.
Exciting.
Let's run the rust.
Let's see what happens.
Here we go.
Okay.
And it's done.
It.
It got the right answer.
It got it in a very, very fast time.
I'm not seeing.
It's funny.
It looks it looks different.
I don't know why it's faster.
It does look like it's got a different implementation.
I do see I think that it's been quite clever with its sizes.
I for a moment I thought it made a mistake, but I think it's been super smart with the way that it's
done.
This, uh, so maybe that is what's allowed it to get this number.
But this is Grok Four's number.
Let's put it with the others.
Here we have our list.
Uh, down we go.
And so grok four is here.
Is that the fastest so far?
No.
It's not.
Uh, OSS 120 is still in the lead.
It's the second fastest.
One more to go.
It's time.
Time for our prior a victor for Gemini two five Pro?
Is he going to hold its first place or is it going to be dethroned by OSS 120?
Okay, so we choose Gemini two five Pro and we press the port to rust button and we we wait to see what
happens.
Very exciting.
This this then is the the final, final battle for the ultimate, the ultimate victor.
And we will let it do its thing.
And I will see you in a second.
Okay.
We have code.
We have code here.
There's lots of stuff here, lots of comments like before, it mentions Kadane's algorithm, which is
good.
Good to see.
It's got stuff here.
I hope that's not the same.
I see stuff there that looks familiar from before, but let's now run this rust and see.
Drum roll please.
Drum roll.
Here we go.
Oh yes.
You see, I thought I saw that the appropriate formatting traits.
So it's, uh, something wrong just with this print as before.
How about that?
How about that?
And maybe it's something to do with the version of rust that I'm running, which is the most recent
version of rust.
I don't know what is causing this.
I don't know enough about rust.
I'm a total rookie.
I don't know enough about whether it's some way that I'm running it or implementing it or something,
but we did tell it exactly the command we're using to run it.
So it had that information, but shockingly, with a very similar error.
We have just had our crown.
Our victor has been eliminated from the race.
Gemini 2.5 Pro is out.
Gemini 2.4 Pro five Pro is a fail.
And that means that if we come back here, this is a fail.
And shockingly, absolutely, shockingly well, the one that did badly before the open source model
that was that was in last place, apart from the fail, is now moved here to first place in our final
final tally.
The first place and the.
This is shocking for so many reasons.
Uh, but one of the ways it's shocking is it means that open source for the win, not open source,
running on my computer, admittedly, open source running in the cloud because it's too big to run on
my computer.
But this open source model, open AI, GPT OSS 120 GB is the victor, perhaps because of some technicality
on on now fail failed.
Uh, Gemini that comes in the in the failed list.
Uh, comes down here.
All of these failed.
The only three that were successful, uh, was in first place GPT OSS 120 b in second place, Elon Musk's
Grok four.
And in third place, another open source model, and this time running on my computer, GPT OSS 20 B
and everything else was failed.
These are our three victors.
Open source for the win.
What what a what a brilliant and shocking result.
And there is one final point to make, which is how much faster was our native machine code compiled
from rust than the original Python.
The original Python took 33.755 seconds.
This was the faster code right here.
That was the oops.
That was the speed 0.000304.
Let's find out how much faster it was.
It was it was 111,000 times faster.
More than 100,000 times faster on this hard problem.
Wow.
Ha!
Wow.
I hope your mind is officially blown.
OpenAI GPT OS 120 b.
An open source model took some perfectly respectable Python code, and by changing the algorithm, converting
it to rust, that we then compile to machine code and ran.
We were able to achieve a more than 100,000 times speed up that that is a business outcome metric achieved.
And with that, that concludes this section.
I realized there was a lot of geeky stuff.
We did a lot of things with C++ and rust.
I don't know whether it appealed to you or not, but hopefully, regardless, the outcome appealed to
you.
That is really cool.
A really great result.
And how how how fabulous that it was an open source model, that one.
This is very different from my result last year when I stuck with C++ and I got a 60,000 times performance
improvement, and it was a frontier.
It was closed source, that one.
But this time, this time it's open source for the win, perhaps because of a surprising disqualification.
Nonetheless, we'll take it.
Open source.
It is.
All right, so now the challenge is for you.
There are so many challenges that I want to go through about how you can take this project, take it
in completely new directions, and do some really fun stuff with it.
So first of all, recreating my results, trying it yourself and add some different models.
If you're if you're using a lama, throw them whatever.
Try some coding models.
I realize we use used grok for.
There's also a code version of that you could try to see if that gets the edge.
There's so many different things that you could try to see what wins.
And please share your results.
I would love to see.
I'd love to see what kinds of results people get.
So we find out who who ends up being victorious, what is the the final winner, and then importantly
so.
So for anyone that's done, my agent course that's done.
Any exploration with Agentic AI?
This was a very much a piecemeal take a single file and convert it.
Of course, this lends itself so well to an agentic solution, where you have something that's able
to iterate through all the files and create a port, a full solution.
So that would be sensational.
So that would be a great challenge.
You could start with just trying to to read through a couple of files and then and then see how far
you want to take it with multiple LLM calls, a very natural extension.
And then the other thing to do, should you wish a bigger challenge and others have done this, and
you'll see this in in the community contributions for many really cool solutions.
One of them is to write a code tool that can automatically add docstring and comments.
You can take that UI and then add them in and make it look really nice.
Play with the UI, play with the callbacks.
It should just be a quick callback and LM call.
I think you'll be surprised how easy it is to build some of these things, like docstrings and comments,
or convert to a different language.
We've got here C++ and rust.
Put in something else.
Let's see some go.
So that would be great.
Uh, writing unit tests.
So putting code get unit tests.
Combine that with something agentic.
And you can you can generate unit tests for your whole repo.
And then if you want to take it a little bit further and do something more commercial and deeper, you
could have a code generator that writes code that can trade on trading signals, buying and selling
equities in a simulated environment.
Again, it's a bit of a nod to something we build on Myogenic course, but you could try that out yourself.
And I've put a little solution in the extras folder that you could look at, which generates code and
tries to fine tune to get better and better at doing that.
That's just a sort of extra, extra thing to look at sometime.
But but yeah, you shouldn't do that yet.
You should just write something that uses these API calls, or a llama to write code that uses an API
to find trading signals.
So these are some interesting ideas, but also get creative.
Think of a coding challenge.
You've got that you would like an LLM to help with and build that into here.
And remember, uh, the point of all of this is about coming up with a business metric, something you
want to achieve, looking at the leaderboards to identify candidate models and then seeing how they
fare and how how it actually accomplishes your business metric.
So do remember, as you take on your challenge, follow the process, go through it, think about your
evals.
Think about things in a disciplined way.
As a scientist, run your experiments.
Achieve great outcomes.
I hope you get outcomes as sensational as are 100,000.
Speed up.
And that brings us to the end of week four.
That is a wrap on week four.
You You are now officially halfway on your journey to being proficient in LM engineering.
Congratulations.
Now you're on the home stretch.
You're in the second half.
It's getting closer and closer to the end.
But more importantly than all that, you're now heading into a rag week.
The moment that so many, probably including you, have been waiting for.
But already you can cope with frontier models and with hugging face Transformers.
You can choose the right model for your project based on metrics, leaderboards, and so on.
And you can build solutions that generate code using front end models and open source models.
And you can be wowed by the results.
Next time you're going to be able to explain the ideas behind Rag, you're going to be able to walk
through some high level flows for adding expertise to your queries, and you'll be able to to implement
a toy version of rag, a cheap and cheerful version.
You'll do all of that on week five, day one coming up tomorrow.
105 - Well, what a moment.
You've made it.
You've made it to the second half of the course and you've made it to rag week.
Week five.
Let's just quickly review what you can do.
You can already code with frontier models.
You can build AI assistants with tools.
You can work with open source models.
You can confidently choose the right model for your project, which you can back up with facts, with
benchmarks, with metrics.
And you can build solutions that generate code using both frontier and open source models.
Today, it's going to be an ideas day.
You're going to understand the big, the big ideas, the small idea first, and then the big idea behind
Rag.
We're going to walk through the high level flow and implement a toy, a kind of fake rag, as a way
of giving intuition before we build the real rag tomorrow.
But before we start this, let me just just check something.
Did you skip some weeks?
Did you jump straight ahead to week five because you were so into the idea of learning all about rag?
Have I caught you?
Have I caught you trying to skip ahead?
If so, then you are busted.
I have found you.
You're busted.
This is.
This is bad.
I am going to spend one second to tell you why this is bad.
So first of all, you are right.
Week five is a fabulous week.
You have definitely got the right thinking.
Moving straight to one of the most exciting weeks.
Not the most exciting weeks, but one of the most exciting weeks on this course.
But here's some of the stuff that you've missed.
If you jump straight to week five, you have missed the first week.
When we built some foundational understanding, we worked with the Chat Completions API.
In the second week, we built UIs and we used Multi-modality to really understand frontier model APIs.
The third week is when we went open source with Hugging Face and worked with different open source models.
And the fourth week was when we covered this super important question of how do you go about picking
the best model for the particular task at hand?
So I'm not gonna lie, it's possible to jump straight to week five, as you may have done, particularly
if you know some of the stuff already.
But for those that did go through all of this, they will back me up.
There's been some really great material that we've covered, and it's helped build up your skills and
expertise so that you are most ready for week five.
So, you know, I mean, if you're gonna jump straight to week five, then I'm not going to stop you.
I'm just gonna say there's some really great stuff that you're missing out on.
So what is ahead?
We've got this week, which is all about understanding Wragg and using it to build an expert question
answerer, which is like the standard go to use case for Wragg.
Then then we get to talking about building.
It becomes the capstone project for week six, seven and eight.
And in week six we do it with Frontier Models and we fine tune a frontier model.
In week seven we go open source.
We fine tune our own open source model to try and compete with the biggest, smartest models on the
planet.
And week eight, it all comes together with a finale with agents, with with models, with just great
stuff.
You don't want to miss it.
That's what I have ahead for you.
And at the end of all of that, you will be able to say, I am an LLM engineer.
Okay, so now let's talk about Wragg First up, I want to motivate what is going on?
What is this thing?
You probably know it stands for retrieval augmented generation.
And I got to tell you, when you know everything about it, you're left with a sense of it's really
very simple.
It's it's not a very complicated idea.
It's kind of obvious.
And it's probably something that you've already thought of yourself, even if you didn't know that it
was called rag, at least much of it, the sort of core ideas.
So let's go through that.
First up, we've already been doing a bunch of different techniques to improve, prompting different
inference time techniques to get better outcomes.
So Multi-shot prompting is when we put lots of example questions and answers in the context.
We've used things like tools.
Tools are very effective with finding ticket prices of course, to allow, but basically it's just all
about prompting.
It's about equipping an LLM to be able to to answer our questions better, and just generally putting
extra context in the prompts.
The more information we put in the prompts, the more expertise we get from our Lem.
And so really the motivation for Rag is just to say, okay, let's just take this further.
Let's keep thinking about how we can put relevant information in the prompt to best equip a model to
answer a business question.
So, for example, we could let let's just say we could build a database full of useful information
that we would like our model to know about.
If we're dealing with with with travel, it could be a database about ticket prices to any location
and activities that you do at the location.
If this is for our airline, you know, then it could have all of that detail and the different different
flights and timing and so on.
Every time the user asks a question, we could just first, when we're building the prompts, just run
a few SQL queries and pull out from the database anything that's relevant to what the user has just
asked.
So for example, we could look see if there's a city in the name of in the user's question.
Just literally look for the string London in their question.
And if we find the string London, we could do a SQL query.
A database query for anything pertaining to London.
And whatever we get out, we could just shove that in the prompt.
Here is some background information on London and then all of the stuff or New York or Tokyo or whatever
it is, just doing a query from our knowledge base.
And when you have like a database full of background information like that, it's called a knowledge
base, just a fancy term for a database.
And basically when we when we put this in place, we just always take whatever information we can and
we shove it in the prompt.
And I said here we put relevant details in the prompt.
Maybe some of it isn't relevant, but but the LM doesn't mind.
You say to it, here's some extra information.
Maybe the question pertains to this.
If so, then then use this when you're answering your question, and then you just shove the relevant
information in there in the prompt.
That is the basic motivation behind Rag.
Nothing more complicated than that.
And you probably thought of that already.
So I like to describe this as the small idea behind rag.
And once we've done this, we'll then talk about the big idea behind the small idea behind Rag, which
is essentially what I just said is, okay, just imagine this.
So we've got this set up in the middle there where it says code.
That is our Python code that we are writing on the right where it says LM, that's the LM we're calling,
and the knowledge base below the code there.
That knowledge base is just a database of useful information.
So look the user asks us a question.
In comes the question to our code.
We get a question.
We got to answer it.
We could just send that question straight to the LM or okay, we could just do a query of the knowledge
base of anything that could be relevant.
If the question has the word London in it, we do a query for anything about London, and then we just
shove that in the prompt to the LM.
We say the user has asked this question what's ticket prices to London?
Here is some data that might be relevant.
And then tons of stuff, including the ticket prices to London.
Now please answer the question the LM will answer.
And in its response, as as we all know, it's likely to be able to replay that information that is
relevant because we are sort of biasing the model when it's when it's generating tokens.
They are they are likely to be tokens that are coherent and consistent with the stuff in the input prompt.
So it's likely to to introduce the ticket prices to London.
And that goes back to the user.
And they get their answer as if the LM has this expertise.
It's obvious this is the small idea behind Rag.
Again, you probably already got this.
So what I'm going to do now is I want to make this small idea come to life for you, even though most
of you probably already completely get it.
But let's just go through a little exercise, a small example of the small idea.
So what we're going to do is we're going to imagine that we are working for an insurance tech startup.
This is going to be something in the insurance tech industry.
And the insurance tech startup, by the way, is going to be called insurance insurer, which is going
to be insure Lem.
That will be the name of a very fictitious insurance tax start up.
We are going to have a knowledge base.
It's going to be basically the company's share drive.
We're going to imagine we have a company share drive, and it's going to have a ton of information about
the company.
And our task is to build a knowledge worker like like an AI that is knowledgeable about insurance.
It's going to know all about this company, and it's going to be able to answer expert questions pertaining
to the company.
And we're going to start with a small, trivial way of doing it, and then build up during the week
to something quite advanced.
So the blunt instrument, as I say, the basic simplistic approach, we are going to simply read the
files.
In this share drive, we're going to find the names of products and employees, and we're going to do
something really janky when the user asks a question, we're just going to see whether that question
contains any names of products or employees.
And if so, we're just going to shove the whole document in the prompt.
Super easy.
We'll see if that works for us.
106 - Okay, here we are in cursor.
Best place to be.
We're going into week five rag week and opening up our day one notebook.
Remember, if you haven't already to set the kernel on the top right.
Uh, so this is rag week.
We are building an expert knowledge worker.
It is a question answering assistant that knows all about a company called Insure Elm.
Insure Elm, uh, and insurance tech company.
It needs to be accurate.
The solution should be low cost.
And we are going to use this wonderful technique, rag retrieval augmented generation to make sure that
we are accurate.
But to start with, we're going to do it in a super simplistic way.
Uh, that is going to be really trivial.
Okay.
And I do want to mention as, as so important to call this out, that the business, commercial applications
of what we're doing here, of everything that we cover, rag is perhaps the one that is most obviously
immediately applicable to, to almost any aspect, any, any business vertical building, building a
product which has expertise about your business and can answer questions with knowledge that that is
something which which you should be able to do immediately and which should add value immediately.
And in fact, there are commercial products that are designed to be expert knowledge workers exactly
in this space.
So there are already products out there that do this in a sort of generic way that can attach to to
company, share drives and so on.
But you can build one yourself for your company after week five or during week five.
It gives you this this quick, low, low, low cost, low barrier to entry way to get to get knowledge
into your MLM a much harder way.
And the way we used to do was fine tuning.
When you train a model more with data rag is is much quicker to market.
Okay, so with that, let's get started with the lab.
We're going to start as always with some imports okay.
So we'll do some imports.
And then we will make sure that we've got our OpenAI API key and that it sets it looks right.
And we're going to use a very cheap model indeed at GPT for one nano that is quick and cheap.
Okay, next up, I'd like you to take a quick peek over at the left at the files in the week five folder
there is a subfolder called Knowledge Base, and if you open this up, you'll see that it has four directories
company contracts, employees and products.
And if you open up each of these, you'll see that they contain more data.
Some of them contain a lot of data, like look at all these employees and look at all these products.
And I would love to tell you and look at the contracts, tons of contracts.
I would love to tell you that this is all synthetic.
It's all fake data.
I'd love to tell you that I sat there and typed all this out for you, but as well, you know, of course
I did no such thing.
I used an LLM to generate this synthetic data using the same kind of techniques that you hopefully used
in the exercises in week three, so that all of this is fake data generated by an LLM, which is excellent,
and you should look into one of it.
Let's take a look at an employee in particular.
These are all markdown files.
So we can easily open them up.
We can open the preview, right click and do open preview to see it in a formatted style.
This is Avery Lancaster, one of the employees, an employee in particular.
She happens to be the CEO, the co-founder and chief executive officer of insurer Elm.
And this is her employee record.
One thing that's kind of interesting to note is that when I was generating these this test data, I
noticed that the employee records of most of the employees, if not all of the employees, was incredibly
gushing.
They all exceeded expectations.
They all did great.
And this is it's a telltale sign that llms often tend to be very effusive, very optimistic, very positive,
because they've been fine tuned that way.
And that's the, the, the engagement that tends to lead to the best feedback from human users.
And so it's worth it's always important to check the outputs from Llms.
And it was a moment for me to see that, observe it and then correct in the prompts to make sure that
the generated synthetic data had a nice range of different employee performance reports.
And as a result, you will notice here that Avery, the CEO herself, went through a poor period of
being below expectations during the Covid 19 pandemic.
It's wonderfully written.
It feels like if a CEO were to fall behind, then this would be how it might happen.
So I think it's done a fabulous job of it.
And I wanted to point out that that nuance that I had to correct for this when I was generating the
test data.
Anyway, that's enough of that doo doo.
Take a click around, explore this data, get a sense that we've got some pretty substantive data to
reflect this company in.
Sure that we are trying to answer detailed questions about.
And so with that, let's go back to the code.
Uh, back to day one.
Uh, so we are now going to read in all the employee data into a Python dictionary.
So let's take a quick look at this.
It's fairly boilerplate.
Python for you may be used to.
It is a way that you can put in a path to somewhere which you can use Unix format even on a PC.
I believe so you may be looking at that and saying, oh, you're using forward slashes and it should
be backslashes.
It's not a very, uh, cross-platform way of doing it, but I do believe that with Glob Glob, this
works fine, and it allows you to walk across all these file names with that star.
Let me know if it didn't for you.
And then what I've got here is something where I'm just reading in the file name, taking its name,
splitting it by a space, and then just taking the last item there.
So that should be the last name of the employee.
And I'm reading this into this dictionary knowledge.
So take a look through this.
There's nothing fancy here at all.
Knowledge.
If I give a little code here, if I do knowledge this should now be just a Python dictionary.
You'll see with each of the last names and then the HR record.
So if I pluck out Lancaster, which is the last name of our illustrious CEO, then sure enough we get
here the document about Aviary Lancaster.
Okay, so now we have a dictionary called knowledge that contains all of our employee documents.
Let's now do a little bit more.
Same thing.
We're going to look at knowledge base.
But this time slash products.
And we're going to we're going to cover something that looks very familiar.
We're going to go through each of those file names.
We're going to pluck out the name of the file and then read that also into our knowledge dictionary.
Okay.
What does this mean exactly?
Well if we now look at our knowledge dictionary it's a Python dictionary with all of these keys.
It's got some keys which represent the last names of people.
And it's got some keys that represent the name of products.
Claim Elm, Elm, life, Elm, health, Elm, market, Elm and and others.
Which?
All of which, if you go into the knowledge base and then you look into the products, you'll see them
right there.
No surprise.
That is what we have in our knowledge dictionary.
Okay, time to make an LM call.
So first up I'm defining a variable called system prefix, not system prompt but system prefix for reasons
that will become clear and are probably already very clear to you.
So what does it say?
It says you represent insurance.
The insurance tech company.
You're an expert in answering questions about its employees or its products.
You're provided with additional context that might be relevant to the question.
Give brief, accurate answers.
If you don't know the answer, say so.
That's a good way to try and prevent hallucinations.
And then relevant context.
And then that's it for our prefix.
Obviously we're going to want to shove in here some relevant context.
How are we going to do that.
Well we're going to write a bit of Python to do it for us.
This is like the simplistic Rag implementation.
We're going to write a simple function that's able to take a user's message and say, hey, have I got
anything relevant to this in my in my knowledge dictionary?
Anything that might be useful?
Okay.
How are we going to do that?
It's just like boilerplate, like basic Python code.
We start by taking this this input message, which is whatever the user has said.
Maybe it's who is Avery Lancaster.
We're going to take that message and we're first going to strip out any punctuation.
So this line here, uh, this this just goes through each character and says, make sure that it's either
an alphabetic character or it's a space and then keep it.
If so.
So that's just there's actually sharper ways of doing this with things like regex.
There's ways, but this is nice and simple.
Then this second line here is saying okay, convert this to lowercase and then split it up so that there's
a different, different object for each word and put that in a list called words.
Easy peasy.
All right.
And now we're just going to do like a brute force thing.
We're going to iterate through each word and we're going to say here's a word.
If I've got backup context on this, then look it up and and return everything that's there.
So we start by having relevant context be an empty list.
That's what we're going to return here.
Iterate for word in words go through each word in turn in the message.
If that word is in our dictionary, then add in.
Look.
Look up the stuff in our dictionary and add that into relevant context and return relevant context.
Easy peasy.
Just does exactly what it says on the tin.
Goes through the message.
Looks up each word.
Returns a list of any found context.
But if you're the judgy type, then you're probably not happy with this, and you're probably rolling
your eyes at me because this is not what people sometimes call pythonic.
Pythonic is one of these words that people use with an air of superiority to look down on their pythonic
colleagues.
There is a more pythonic way of doing this, which I will show you now, in this slightly more elegant
version of the same function.
Uh, here it is does exactly the same thing.
The first line is the same.
And there is in fact, as I say, a shorter way of doing that.
The second line is also the same.
We now have words, which is a list of lowercase words, but everything else, all of this can be replaced
with a nice elegant list comprehension with an if statement, and it looks like this.
Uh, and you probably for those that do do Python for a living, this stuff is like old hat.
But for some of you it's like, oh, that's nice.
So basically we're iterating through the words we're saying for word in words if the word is in knowledge.
So we're iterating through the subset of word in words.
If it's in our knowledge.
And if so we're plucking out the knowledge and we're putting all that in a list.
That's a beautiful little list comprehension that will work well.
Let's run that.
So now we can call this very function with, with uh get relevant context.
Who is Lancaster.
So it's going to iterate through who is Lancaster in lowercase.
No punctuation.
It's going to select the ones that are in our knowledge, which is only the word Lancaster.
And it's going to return that in a list.
Let's see what we get.
We get, sure enough, a list with one element.
And that element is the contents of our knowledge base for Avery Lancaster success so far.
107 - Okay next to take it one step further, let's call this same function again.
Get relevant context and say who is Lancaster and what is calm all in 1 in 1 question.
And we're hoping it's going to iterate through each word.
It's going to spot that it has context on this person and this product, and it's going to return.
Here we go a list with two elements.
One is about Avery Lancaster, one is about the product Carl car LMDh, car insurance.
Uh, okay.
That works nicely.
But look, let me just show you how horribly janky this is.
If I change this to a lowercase l, it's still going to work.
It's going to be fine because we turn everything to lowercase.
But if I say who is Avery instead of who is Lancaster, we lose that because we've just done this horrible
thing of we've just taken the key of the last name and that's all we've used.
Now, we could fix that pretty easily and you might want to do this.
You could just shove in the first name as well, uh, and have it.
So that's also a key in the dictionary.
So we could fix for that.
But we're not going to do it.
I want to use this as an illustration.
Who is Lancaster?
There we go.
Use this as an illustration that this kind of fake rag, this this very simplistic rag is brittle and
that if you make any small change to the question, it's not going to work.
And of course, the true rag we're going to get to is something which is immune to that and able to,
to handle, uh, more, more vague, more fuzzy matching of the question.
That's the whole idea.
Okay, so now I'm just packaging this up into a, into a high level function, additional context.
It calls the function that we just wrote right here.
And then if it's empty it says there's no no more context.
There's no context if it has stuff in it, it says the following additional context might be relevant
in answering the user's question.
And then we iterate through and add that in and look, there's a nicer way to do this, isn't there?
While we're talking about being pythonic, we can say results plus equals that.
What this is saying?
That would be a slightly simpler way of doing it like that.
Okay, so let's run this.
Um, and now we're going to say, okay, let's print this.
This the result of calling this function with who is Avery Lancaster?
Let's see what we get.
We get the following additional context might be relevant in answering the user's question Avery Lancaster
of course if we just do, who is Avery?
It's going to get it wrong.
It's going to say there is no additional context relevant to the user's question, because it doesn't
find that if we say, who is Alex Lancaster, what are we going to get?
We're going to get a different kind of problem.
We're going to get a problem that it is going to think that this is relevant context.
The following additional context might be relevant.
And of course this pertains to Avery Lancaster, not to Alex Lancaster, because our slightly kludgy
version is just simply taking each word and looking it up in our dictionary, so that that gives you
both the both types of problem with this kind of simplistic rag lookup.
Okay.
And I know you've been wondering when LMS actually going to appear here, but they appear right away.
We do it with our favorite chat function.
Remember, the chat function simply takes a message and a in history if we're going to use radio which
which we are.
And so our system message is we take the system prefix that we carefully crafted, and we add in the
additional context that we just got right here.
Uh, and then we bunch that into a messages list.
We shove it in as the system, prompt the history and the user message, and then we call OpenAI chat
completions dot create for our cheap or simple GPT four or nano model.
These messages and we return responses dot zero message content.
And that's it.
That's all there is to our simplistic rag.
We can bring that up in a gradio interface in the usual way with just a GR interface launch.
Okay, so here we go.
I'm going to actually type in-browser equals true.
So that it pops it right up for you.
Here it is.
This is what it looks like.
This is our chat bot.
And if this is new to you you've not seen this before.
You're like, what just happened?
Then you might have skipped week two, which would be a terrible mistake, because week two is terrific
fun.
Go back and check that out.
All right.
But for others, yes I know.
Isn't it great?
Welcome back to radio.
I'm going to say, uh, hi there.
Uh, to my chat bot.
And it's just calling the, uh, the chat as usual.
So now I'm going to say who is Avery Lancaster?
And when I press enter remember what's going to happen.
It's going to call my chat function.
My chat function will call the function which takes each word in turn and tries looking it up.
In my knowledge dictionary it will find Lancaster.
It will take that text and put it in the prompt along with my question Who is Avery Lancaster?
And so when we run this, what we get back is an answer that acknowledges that.
Avery Lancaster is the co-founder and Chief Executive officer, CEO of realm.
That's great.
Uh, what is car question mark?
Let's see.
That's one of the products.
And yes, we do indeed get the answer that it's an auto insurance product developed by Insure Elm.
Very nice indeed.
And now this next test might surprise you.
You might not be expecting this.
I'm going to say, who is Avery?
Not not Avery Lancaster, but who is Avery?
What do you think it's going to say?
Give you a second to make your guess.
Let's see what it says.
It says Avery refers to Avery Lancaster, co-founder CEO of In Serum.
I bet many of you were thinking it was going to say, I don't have the context on that because you thought
that I was doing this to show you that, uh, that it isn't able to look up Avery.
But actually, I had a double trick here.
Uh, strangely enough, despite the fact that our simplistic rag lookup won't work and it won't be able
to find any context with this, it still answered the question correctly.
How did it do that?
Uh, well, you have to remember that we're not only sending in the relevant context, we're also sending
in the whole conversation history so far.
And that conversation history includes this information about Avery Lancaster.
And so it sees that.
And that's why when it's when it's responding, it includes that in the response when you're testing
Rag workflows, and you're checking what it can answer and what it can't.
You do have to be careful of this trap that remember that it will have your conversation history, and
that might influence it to answer differently.
So that's something to watch out for.
Uh, but uh, but but let's do the proper test that you thought I was going to do, bring up a fresh
chat and ask it who Avery is.
So here we go.
I'm going back to the to the code again.
I'm going to scroll back up and I'm just going to rerun this to get a totally fresh gradio.
Here it is.
And now I'm going to say, Who is Avery?
And this I think is what, what what most of you probably expected to see before when we run this.
I don't have information about Avery when it takes that word Avery, and it tries to look it up at its
knowledge, it finds nothing because it's just hard coded to look for last names.
And so it can't answer that question.
But of course, if I say, Who is Lancaster?
Even if I spell it in lowercase, um, Lancaster, there we go.
It should be fine.
And it immediately knows that it's Avery.
And from this point onwards, in the conversation it would answer fine for that as well.
So anyways, that's an interesting side point.
The main point is that we have built a rag style lookup system that is able to add relevant context
based on the words in the questions, but it does it using this super simplistic approach of just taking
each word, looking it up a dictionary, shoving in relevant contexts.
The whole idea about Rag is to take this further, and instead of just just trying to match on strings,
try and use some smart fuzzy matching so that we can do a good job of looking up relevant context.
Even if someone uses the first name instead of the last name, or even a typo in the last name, it
would be great if we could say who is Avery and spell her name wrong, and it would still be able to
correct us and respond.
That would be amazing.
So that that kind of problem fuzzy matching, adding relevant context.
That is what Rag retrieval augmented generation is really solving.
So anyway, take a minute to educate yourself on this.
Ask some more questions that we can ask.
How much does health Lmx cost?
And so you don't just need to ask her what something is.
Of course you can ask a more a deeper question like that requiring it to use its expertise.
But it's the same exact thing happening behind the scenes.
Health Lmx is being looked up.
It's finding the details.
And if you check out the docs, you'll see that this is perfectly answering that question.
We can say, Who is Thompson?
And it will hopefully tell us about Maxine Thompson.
Yes, Thompson likely refers to Maxine Thompson, the senior data engineer at insurer Elm.
Uh, and, uh, so so it's got all of this information.
You can ask any of these questions, uh, and you can see that it will do a decent job of responding
with the information.
Try that out.
Add in print statements so you can see what the prompts look like.
You can see the context that's retrieved.
And give yourself a really good intuition for what's going on.
And then we will press on and talk about the big idea behind rag.
108 - Okay.
The time has arrived for us to cover vectors.
This is the big idea.
It's the big idea behind rag.
It's the idea which allows us to do this sort of fuzzy lookup.
Given a user's question, what might be the relevant context?
That's got something to do with this question.
It all comes down to these things called vectors.
I imagine some of you are super familiar with this already, in which case put me on two x and zip through
it.
But for some of you, this is going to be fascinating.
A whole new world as we launch into the world of vector embeddings and encoder.
In the last four and a half weeks, we've experimented with a number of different llms with GPT, with
Claude, with Gemini, deep Seek, to name a few.
Grok are both Crocs.
So one of the things that they all have in common is that they are they are all just one particular
flavor of LLM.
There are, in fact, two different types of LLM, and we've only been looking at one of them, which
is by far the most common, which is the one you see all over the place.
And its official name is an Regressive LM.
It's a mouthful.
Auto regressive LM means this is a model which is trained to do one particular job.
It's trained to take an input sequence and to predict the next token.
That should come after this input sequence.
It's regressive in that it looks back over this input and predicts what should come next.
And as you know, it does it one token at a time.
It predicts the just the next token.
And then the trick is we then feed in a new input that's the original input with that extra token on
the end of it, and we get it to generate the next token.
And that's repeated again and again.
And that is what an auto regressive LM does.
And the reason it does that is because that's how it's been trained.
That's the architecture supports that.
And then it's been given lots of training data where there's an input sequence and the next token.
And so it's trained to get good at that.
That's called an auto regressive LM.
And if you ever just told about an LM without without any framing, it's almost certainly an auto regressive
LM.
That's what they mostly are.
But there is another kind And the other kind goes by many different names.
You sometimes hear it called an encoder.
You sometimes hear them called an embedding model or a vector embedding model.
But this is a model, an autoencoder.
It's an LM which does not generate the next token based on looking back, but rather it takes a full
input sequence, and it produces one output that is meant to reflect the full input.
It's some output based on the full input that's passed in.
Not not just what's to come next, but something that reflects it all.
Okay, I'm being a bit abstract here.
What does that mean concretely?
What would be examples.
Why would you want to do that?
Okay.
So to get concrete there are some very obvious things you might want to use this for.
This idea of of taking a big input and coming up with one thing.
And the most obvious application is classification.
Take take an input and then classify it.
This whole input to mean something.
And one example of classification is sentiment analysis.
Take take a whole sentence and say whether or not this is this is happy or sad, positive or negative,
and other forms of classification like what does this pertain to?
Uh, anything like that would be an example of where you might use an auto encoding LM and there are
lots of other things like that.
Whenever you might want to come up with one output that reflects the entire input.
But in particular, there is one function that that is important for us, one application that we care
about right now.
And that is when you use, uh, one of these autoencoder models to come up with a set of numbers that
best represents this input, a bunch of numbers, maybe it's ten numbers.
And these ten numbers are just meant to reflect the meaning of this input in some way.
And and you could think of those ten numbers as just just a list of numbers that in some way is meant
to represent the concept being covered here by this, this sentence, this sequence of tokens.
And when you do that because ten, ten different numbers, you could think of that as being being what
a mathematician would call a vector, a set of numbers that represents a point in space.
If it were three numbers, it would literally be like an x, y, and a z coordinate to a point in space.
If it's if it's ten numbers, then we'd say it's a it's a point in ten dimensional space, which sounds
very fancy.
It's just saying it's ten different numbers that can be thought of as coordinates to this point.
But but these this is called a vector embedding.
When you take a set of input sequence, a set of input tokens, and then you map that to a bunch of
numbers.
And there are a number of examples of these used in practice.
One of the very first it was called Bert.
It was created by Google in 2018.
It predates GPT.
It was way back.
It was before we even used the expression LLM.
But but Bert stood for bidirectional encoding representations from transformers.
And yeah, it was it was very popular then.
I remember being amazed by it when I first first played with it back back then.
And it's still used today, but very, very popular.
OpenAI embeddings is a whole category of embedding models from OpenAI.
The one that that I use is is called the text embedding.
Three large.
And there's also a three small as well.
And then there's a very popular open source model that will be also experimenting with called the all
mini LLM, L6 v2.
So these are all examples of of autoencoding llms, also known as embedding models that are able to
take an input, a series of tokens and turn it into a set of numbers that we call a vector.
And I just want to tackle something that is a common source of confusion for people that first meet
this, which is people say, okay, so what's the difference between tokens and vectors?
And they are super different and it's very easy to explain.
So let me demystify that right away.
One way to put it is that tokens are inputs and vectors are outputs.
But but basically, tokens is just a super simple way of saying we can't put words into a model.
A model is a mathematical thing that adds things up and multiplies them.
It can't take a word.
So at the very beginning, we have to start by having like a number to represent each word, like the
word, and might be number one, the might be the word number, number two, and so on, so that we
can map words to a single numbers and that that's what tokens are.
They're just a numeric representation of the input.
It's just the input in another form.
And it turns out that if you try and map every word to one of these numbers, then you have some, some
issues with with with how many words like what happens when you run out of vocabulary.
Uh, what do you do with proper names and things like that?
At one point, we tried to have every character, every letter mapped to a number, but then things
got really complicated, really fast.
And so there's this, this nice, happy medium as we explored all the way back in week one, which is
taking fragments of words instead of words or letters, and that just turns out to work really, really
well.
So there is some some hocus pocus about the the way that you create these tokens from text.
But but it's basically just a sort of a mapping and a few rules, nothing fancy to it.
Tokenizers are very simplistic bits of code, and the fact that you have to map text into tokens, it's
just something that you go through to to come up with numbers that can be the inputs into a model that
is tokens.
They are the inputs.
Vectors are what comes out the other side after a model, an LLM has taken in these simplistic tokens.
And it's it's got some some meaning from it.
It's understood the relationship between these different words.
It's understood what, what point you're trying to make, how to represent this information.
And it's turned it into a series of numbers that that reflect the meaning of the input.
And it is an output of the model and that is a vector.
So it always starts with tokens.
Even encoding models take tokens as their inputs, text goes to tokens, goes into the model and what
comes out is the vector.
And and I know what you're thinking.
The pros are thinking, okay, but it's more complicated than that because actually vectors aren't just
the outputs.
Vectors are also what what happens inside an LM between the various layers, you can think of the information
that's moving from one layer to another as being like vectors at each point.
And so, in fact, in many ways, the tokens that come in even to an autoregressive model, they start
by being turned into vectors in terms of the internal representation of an LM.
But that's a pro a pro thing that you don't need to worry about if you didn't follow that.
All you need to really understand is that tokens are just a simple way to represent text that comes
in the input.
Vectors are a sort of advanced internal transformer representation of the information as a, as a,
as a series of different numbers in a vector.
Those are vectors, those are outputs.
Or maybe there are intermediate outputs.
But that is the key difference between tokens and vectors.
109 - Okay, so you followed everything so far.
You understand that these encoder models, these vector embeddings, set of numbers that represent the
meaning of the input.
But what does it mean to say that numbers represent meaning?
Well, let's drill down on that.
How how do these vectors represent the meaning of the input?
Well first up it can be referring to a character, an individual character, the meaning of a character,
the meaning of a token, the meaning of a word or a sentence or a paragraph or a document or something
abstract.
In my day job at Nebula, we have vectors that represent different opportunities, different job postings,
and vectors that represent people at different points in their career.
People's careers are represented by by a vector.
So vectors can can represent like like something very abstract as well.
And the vectors and I said that there could be three numbers and represent like a point in space with
a x, y, and a z coordinate.
Uh, it can also have hundreds of dimensions.
It can even have thousands of dimensions.
And so that's just basically saying it's a thousand numbers that represent this, this, this block
of text.
But those 1000 numbers you could think of as representing a point not in three dimensional space, but
in 1000 dimensional space, whatever that really means.
And okay, so these represent the and some sort of an understanding of the inputs.
And this is how in that points numbers that are close to each other would represent things with a similar
meaning.
What does that mean.
Well if you imagine let's suppose it was just three numbers.
So it really was an x, y and z coordinate.
I keep saying z with American, but I would say x, y and a z coordinate.
Uh, if it's got if it's got these, these, these points, then points that are close to each other
would represent things that mean the same thing, even if the words themselves were completely different.
So if you have a sentence like what are ticket prices to travel from New York to London, then that
might be represented by a point right here.
And you could have a completely different sentence that's like, what's the price of a flight from JFK
to Heathrow Airport?
Different words, different concepts, but the same meaning.
And that if that were turned into a point, it should be a point that's very close in this three dimensional
space to the first point.
Points close to each other should represent things with a similar meaning.
That's the idea.
The model is trained so that it produces numbers that have this property.
There is another way that these vectors represent the meaning of their inputs.
And it's a bit subtle.
And it was first discovered some time ago, in fact, in the before before Transformers before LMS when
we were working in the field was called NLP Natural Language Processing.
In some ways the predecessor to what we're doing at the moment.
But but there was this algorithm called word to vec and word to vec.
As I say, it's like like the predecessor to all this.
It was something which would just take an individual word, uh, like a token representing a word,
and map that to a vector.
So each word was mapped to a vector.
So you would, for example, perhaps have a vector for the word orange.
And if you looked in the space at points similar to that, there would be similar things to an orange.
They would be perhaps other fruits like, like, like mandarin and, and tangerine or whatever, might
be similar to to to orange along with other colors perhaps.
So.
So there was a simple way that any one word could be mapped to a vector.
And people discovered something about this that was that was intriguing and and surprising.
And with apologies to those that already know this well, but still, let me just quickly go through
it.
So let's suppose that you take the word king.
So king maps to some point in space.
Imagine it's just three dimensional.
It's probably thousands, but let's put it right here in space.
This is King and presumably close to that.
A similar things like prince and emperor and maybe Charles or whatever.
So so you've got you've got the word king and similar concepts around it.
And now let's suppose somewhere else completely different in space.
Other words, man and woman, two different words.
I'm placing them here and here also with with similar things around them man and woman.
Okay, so here's the thing.
You can you can do maths with these vectors where you add and subtract them, which for people that
are familiar with vectors knows that that means you're sort of moving around in the space, uh, by,
by, uh, by this, this amount.
So we can take the word king.
We can subtract the location of the vector for the word man, subtracting that x, y, and z coordinate,
and add in the word woman.
It's x, y, and z or z coordinate.
So we're basically taking.
We're subtracting man and adding woman, which is the same as moving in this direction.
But we're doing it to the point king.
So it's king.
Take out the concept man.
Add the concept woman and you end up over here somewhere.
And here's the spooky part.
If you looked at the closest point to this point in vector space, you ended up with a point for the
word queen.
So king minus man plus woman was queen.
And so it's as if you can, you can mess around with meanings by by taking one of these vectors, taking
out one meaning, adding in another meaning, and you're sort of moving the meaning from one to another.
And similarly, you could take the word, uh, Paris.
Paris.
Subtract the concept of France.
Add the concept of England.
And lo and behold, you end up with London as your closest point.
And it works.
And it's crazy the first time you see this.
And you play around with words and you see this working and you're like, no way.
And so it's in that sense that these points represent the meaning of the input.
It seems to represent it such that similar things are close by.
And also so you can sort of take out meanings and add them in and it just works and it doesn't, you
know, with word two vec it worked.
It worked for words.
But nowadays with encoder models, the same kind of thing works for entire paragraphs of text.
You could take a paragraph of text, it could be mapped to a vector, and you can then remove some meaning
and add in some other meaning.
It doesn't matter what the actual words you choose.
It matters the meaning that it represents, and you will move to another vector that reflects this,
this new meaning of some input with something removed and something added in and so on.
So there we go.
In summary, these are the ways in which these vectors, these sets of numbers reflect the meaning of
the inputs.
And if I lost you a little bit there, it really doesn't matter.
All you need to know is that these encoders, they take a input and they map it to a set of numbers
that we call a vector embedding, but it's just a set of numbers such that numbers close to each other
mean similar things.
And the arrows amongst you will point out that it's it's not quite as simple as just the points close
to each other.
We use something called cosine similarity to decide if something's close, which is just slightly different,
but it's basically that's a technicality.
You don't.
We'll come back to that later.
It's not super important as far as we're concerned.
Similar numbers means similar concepts.
110 - Okay, so enough theoretical stuff on vectors.
Now I'm gonna make it real.
Now I'm gonna give you the big idea behind rag.
And what makes rag so interesting?
Here's the point.
Remember this diagram?
Remember the little idea behind rag?
The user asks a question.
We look it up in our database.
Okay.
Now we're going to do something just slightly different.
The user asks a question and let's say what they what they ask is what a ticket prices to Heathrow the
name of London's airport.
If you didn't get that.
What a ticket prices to Heathrow.
Okay.
And and we know if we look that up in our database then there's going to be a problem because our database
has ticket prices to London, not to Heathrow.
So we're not going to find the word Heathrow in there.
Okay.
So we don't just take that question and look it up in the database.
First we find a useful encoder model and encoding LM or embedding LM, whatever you call it.
We use that we turn the question into a vector, we take that question.
We turn it into a set of numbers that represents its meaning.
And separately, we took all of our database, all of our knowledge base.
And for everything in that database, we found vectors associated with that.
And what we've put in our data store is the text, the information about ticket prices or whatever,
along with the vector that represents that text.
We've got all of that in our data store.
And when you do that, when you have these vectors referring to each of these bits of data, we call
it a vector data store.
And that's what we've got.
And what we do is we say, okay, okay, vector data store, tell me, what information do you have
that is closest to this point of this question?
We've just taken a question.
We've turned it into a point.
What information do you have that's near that in your vector data store?
Because stuff that you have that's close to that is going to be things which have a similar meaning,
even if there's a different choice of words.
If the user said ticket prices to Heathrow Airport, it's still going to find prices to, to to the
airport in London or whatever.
That's going to be close to the points.
And so it's going to find that information.
And so this is the kind of fuzzy lookup that I mentioned before.
You're not just doing a string match.
You're trying to understand the meaning of the question.
And you're asking, what information do I have in my database that has similar meaning to the meaning
of the question?
And you get that you retrieve the text from the vector data, store the text associated with these vectors,
and you put that in your prompts to the LLM.
So it's now got the ticket prices to London.
The question how much does it cost to travel to Heathrow.
This might be relevant context.
Ticket prices to London is all in there.
That was found in the vector data store.
Back comes the response with the right answer.
And here is a super important point that confuses even some pros.
I just want to make this very, very clear to you.
This encoder encoding LM that you see there, it has nothing to do with the LM on the right.
The auto regressive LM, if you remember, is the full name for that.
It's got nothing to do with that.
That encoder, LM is being used just to help with this fuzzy search.
We're using that to turn the question into a vector.
And we've already used that same encoder to to turn all of the data that we've got in our database into
vectors as well.
So we're using this trick, this trick of using these vectors to pluck out relevant information.
And then that's what's getting sent to the LM on the right.
So what's going to the LM on the right is not vectors.
The LM doesn't wouldn't know what to do with a bunch of numbers.
It just it just talks natural language.
The input has to be language.
What's being passed in is the user's question what's the ticket prices to to Heathrow.
And then relevant information plucked from the vector data store the the natural language, the English
associated with that.
That's what's going to the LM on the right.
So the purpose of this encoder is to help us with this trick of finding relevant content, not necessarily
content that has exactly the same words, but content that has the same meaning.
That's what we're using it for.
And what gets sent to the LM on the right is just useful context in the form of natural language.
And so that's it for the first day of week five of Rag Week.
That's enough.
You've got your basic intuition now about vectors and about using that for a rag lookup a retrieval
augmented generation.
Don't worry if you didn't understand everything because we're going to actually get into this.
We're going to create vectors.
We're going to store vectors.
And by the time we're done with it you're going to know this stuff.
So, so well, uh, what you can already do, of course, is generate text and code with frontier models,
use tools, use open source models with with hugging face transformers.
You can choose the right model for your project backed by facts.
And now you can explain about this business of vector embeddings and how you use a vector data store.
Look up things similar to a user's question to put in a prompt to the LSM.
By next time we'll we'll have unveiled Lang chain properly.
We took a peek at it before we're going to we're going to go into it.
We're going to use it to actually take a knowledge base, turn it into vectors and put it in a data
store and a vector store called chroma.
And what I want to leave you with is just have a think about, uh, as you mull over rag and what it
is, one of the things that you might start to think is hang on, it feels like all this is a bit of
a hack.
It's it's it's not very scientific.
We're doing this business of taking a user's question and turning it into a vector in order to try and
make a guess about what's what sort of what's likely, what's plausible to be useful to put to shove
in a prompt to an LLM.
And so you might be thinking to yourself, this, this all sounds like, like, like a bit of a bit
of a hack, uh, you know, to avoid having to put everything in the context just to sort of subselect.
And the answer is, you're exactly right.
It is all a bit of a hack is, is is really one big hack.
And in fact, as you're going to discover later this week, rag comes with a with a whole zoo of hacks.
There's hack upon hack upon hack to try and get better and better at picking the right, relevant context.
It really is just this, this very hokey business of trying to use trickery with encoder models to figure
out the most likely contexts that's going to be useful to the LM.
So keep that in mind.
This is very much it's very empirical, which is our way of saying that it's very experimental.
It's it's really quite a lot of trial and error.
And you're going to get a really good sense for that when we actually try and build our proper rag pipeline,
uh, tomorrow and the day after.
All right.
I will see you tomorrow for vectors.
111 - I've been looking forward to today for some time.
I have a total treat in store for you today.
I, I feel jealous that you are where you are, having not experienced what I have in store for you
today and it's all about to happen to you.
You you probably think I'm being over the top, but wait and see.
All right.
What is it about today that I'm so excited about?
Well, this is the day of vectors for Rag.
I'm going to introduce Lang chain.
Such a.
I mean, we've been introduced to it before, but we're going to go deeper on Lang Chain.
And I'm going to introduce you to, to looking actually at vectors, putting them in chroma and visualizing
them in chroma.
As a reminder of what you can already do, you can already generate text.
You can generate code with frontier models, with assistance tools, with open source models, you can
confidently choose the right model for your project.
And at this point, you can explain the big idea behind Rag, the fact that you use vectors to do a
sort of semantic search.
A fuzzy search to find relevant content.
That's the big idea.
That's what we're going to use to go from that rather simplistic thing that we did yesterday.
There's something rather more powerful.
And by the end of today, you're going to be able to explain long chain, the good and the bad.
You're going to be able to work with popular encoders, embedding models as they're also known.
And you'll be able to divide documents into chunks, turn chunks into vectors, put vectors in a vector
data, store all of that all in one day.
And it's today.
Okay, before we dig in, let's do a super quick recap of what we went through yesterday.
I know you already get it, but it's important to reinforce.
So the user asks a question.
We did something pretty janky yesterday when we took that question.
We just sort of broke it into words and we saw, do we have anything about these words?
But that's not a great way of doing it because you may miss important information.
You really want to do some kind of a fuzzy search on that text.
Okay, here's a way to do that.
Bring in an encoding LL.M.
An and Lmw that creates a vector that represents the meaning of the question.
Turn the question into a vector.
Look that up in a vector data.
Store a database which is quick at finding similar information to the vector that you just passed in,
and then collect this information that we've got.
Pass that in the prompt to the LM.
And what we'll get back is something which is based on that context, that relevant context that we've
passed in in the prompt.
Okay.
Let's now talk about lang chains.
So you met Lang Chain briefly uh, earlier on.
But now we're going to go deeper on lang chain.
So Lang chains are an open source framework.
It was launched October 2022 by someone called Harrison Chase who who started this and then later formed
a company around it.
It is a common framework.
We sometimes call these abstraction layers that allows you to interface with many different models and
also stitch them together, building things like rag pipelines that we'll be doing.
And there was a new version of Lang Chain, released very recently, October 2025, which is quite significant
overhaul including repackaging much of Lang chain.
So there really is a kind of a pre 1.0 and a post 1.0, and we will work with 1.0 with the new version
of Lang Chain today as we dig in to this, this, this framework, um, this abstraction layer that
lets you glue together, chain together different llms to accomplish a business task and to introduce
the like the pros and cons of Lang chain, the good and the bad.
So a few a few pros.
First of all, Lang chain is something that makes it much quicker to glue together llms to accomplish
something.
So for things like assistants or for rag that will do or for summarization tasks, it means you can
get to market much quicker.
Things like using tools.
There's a there's a very robust set of tools that comes with it.
This sort of stuff very quick to do out of the box.
That's what Langshan gives you.
There's also a lot of adoption in the enterprise.
Langshan was extremely popular when it first came out, and during 2023, it really, really took off
in a big way.
So it's very common in enterprise.
A lot of projects use Langshan, so it's often it's a good, good resume material.
It's good to have it there.
It's something that you know how to do.
You will frequently come across it.
So in terms of some of the downsides of Langshan, probably the first thing I'll mention is that when
Langshan first came along in like 2223, it was quite different to make calls to to OpenAI and to anthropic
and to Gemini if you did it yourself.
And so there was a huge need for something like Langshan that unified and brought this together and
made it so you could switch around different models.
But since then, times have changed.
And now, as you've experienced yourself, because all the providers have OpenAI compatible endpoints,
it's incredibly simple to switch between different models just using the OpenAI Python client library,
and you can just switch out the base URL, which can just be configuration and move between different
providers.
So there's less need for this kind of abstraction layer built on top.
And also some of the other things that that this was, that was set out to, to simplify, like using
tools and using prompt templates, they've all sort of converged over time.
There are now very common patterns for doing all of these things.
So there's there's less of a need for long chain at this point.
So that's obviously a downside.
And the other downside is perhaps more debatable and is perhaps a matter of personal taste.
But Langston originally was considered to be a fairly lightweight abstraction layer.
But over time it has grown and grown, and it's now reasonably heavyweight.
It's pretty substantive in terms of everything it offers.
It has.
It has a lot of terminology, some concepts, some things to learn.
It even has its own language, LCL, that hasn't really taken off, but that's also part of it too.
And and some people do use that.
And so it's actually become quite a heavyweight abstraction layer.
There's a lot of learning.
There's quite a learning curve to go into the Lang chain ecosystem.
And nowadays there are other abstraction layers like light LM that we met that are really very lightweight
indeed.
And that can you can use things like light LM very easily with a tiny learning curve and switch between
different models, where lang chain is a lot more to sign up for.
And so as a result, lang chain has started to feel a bit more like it's like a legacy product with
with a big learning curve and with stuff that's kind of hung over from, from a prior age, like the
human message and AI message stuff.
If you know that which has been replaced really in people's minds with a very simple list of dicts that
we're so familiar with from OpenAI.
So from that point of view, Lang Chain can feel a bit heavy, quite a big learning curve.
There are lighter things available like light, little lamb and and some of it is perhaps less needed.
So I wanted to give you that kind of candid pros and cons.
You're going to get a personal first hand assessment of it yourself in the next few days.
As we work with it, it's as I say, you're going to see the best of Long Chain, and maybe you're also
going to see some some of the rough edges.
It's going to be so easy to build a rag pipeline.
We're going to have it all together, a couple of lines of code.
We're going to have ourselves a rag pipeline.
It's going to be fantastic.
But you may also see some of the bit of the learning curve terminology, extra stuff that comes with
the mix.
And of course, Lang chain itself is now it's part of the Lang Chain Company.
They have other offerings too.
They have Lang graph, which is something very different.
Uh, used to, to, to connect together agents in a dependency graph that we cover in my agent course,
they have Lang Smith, which is an observability platform.
Um, and they have some other things as well.
So, so there's, there's a big ecosystem built around Lang chain, and there's a lot to like about
it.
And a couple of things to watch out for as we will see.
112 - All right.
Here we are in.
So we're just going to have a quick look at Lang Chain before we continue.
And actually for me this is my first time using cursor version two which just came out for me.
But you've been using it all along I expect.
And at the top here I see that we can now flip between the editor we're on here and agents where you
you can have multiple agents running.
That's the new functionality.
Anyways, going into week five we're now on day two, it's vectors day.
This is when we continue work with our expert knowledge worker for the insurance company, Insure Life
Insurance.
And we're going to be now working with taking the data in the knowledge base and vectorizing it and
putting it in a vector store.
So there's going to be three parts to today.
We're going to first divide our documents into things called chunks, which are little little bits of
the document that are useful ready to be put in our vector data store.
And then we're going to turn those things into vectors.
Or we're going to at least have vectors associated with each one, and then put it in and chroma and
open source vector database that I'll talk about in a bit.
And then we will visualize our vectors.
But for now just part A let's divide our documents into chunks.
And you might be thinking why do we need to divide documents into chunks and to break them up into pieces?
And the reason is that imagine we've got these documents that they're going to have all sorts of different
bits of information on them.
We've already seen there's like employee HR records.
There's stuff about products.
When a user asks a question, it will probably pertain just to one part of one document.
And if we just built one one vector associated with a whole document, then it's much less likely that
a question is going to match directly with like an entire document like that.
So it makes sense for us to try and think about how could we split up each document so that we've got
the best chance that one particular fragment is something which can address a few different questions,
and we've got just the right granularity for that to be true.
And figuring out how to take documents and divide them into chunks is an example of of of one part of
working with Rag that is super experimental, full of trial and error.
There's no one rule to get chunking right, as we will see when we experiment with them.
Anyway, that's the quick introduction.
Here are some imports.
There's a ton of imports we're doing here, and a lot of these are long chain related imports.
Let's just take a quick look at them.
Lang chain has a number of different packages and the different packages.
You have to be pip installed or you've added separately.
And they typically have different sets of dependencies.
So there's one here for lang chain underscore OpenAI which is all of their classes related to OpenAI.
There's one for for Chromo the database we're going to be using.
There's one for hugging face classes.
There's there's a set of document loaders, which are its tools for loading documents, which are in
the Lang chain community, which is a bit like our community contributions.
It's where people have added in open source contributions and then text splitters, which is a particular
part of Lang Chain that's responsible for taking documents and turning them into chunks.
So, as I say, it's an example of how Lang chain is quite heavyweight, that there are many different
packages.
If you remember with light LM there was there was only one package and it was it was just super simple.
You import the one package, you can use any LM.
So it just gives you a sense there's a lot going on, there's a lot of functionality.
But it's it's there's also a lot to sort of learn about sign up for okay.
So we do these imports.
And interestingly it does take a fair bit of time to import all of this.
There's such a lot going on.
We're going to use GPT four one nano because we particularly want to do something which is going to
be cheap and fast.
And GPT four one nano is both of those things.
We're going to be storing our documents in a vector database, which we'll come to later.
It's going to be called vector DB.
And let's also check that we've got an open AI key we have.
All is good.
All right.
Next up we're going to load in our documents.
So before we use any Lang chain code at all, I just want to examine these documents.
First of all, I've got something here which is going to to use glob.
Glob.
If you remember that our way of a way of like walking through our directory structure for anything in
the knowledge base directory that contains that is a markdown file.
And we'll find out how many files we've got.
I'm going to load all of them in to one variable called entire knowledge base.
And I'm going to print how many characters do we have in the whole thing.
So there's 76 different files in this knowledge base.
And there's a total of 300,000 characters.
And I'm going to use a library called Tick token.
You might remember, I think we looked at that like we one uh, to, to look at how many tokens there
are in this and count up the number of tokens.
And there are apparently almost 64,000 tokens.
If you take the entire knowledge base and you tokenize it.
And for those that remember some of the leaderboards we looked at like, like Valium.
You'll you'll realize that actually, that is something which we could squeeze into the context window
for any of the major models.
So you could, in fact, put the entire knowledge base I've got here.
All of these directories, everything here could fit into a call to open AI.
Now it would start to be a little bit more, more pricey every time you call it.
With that entire context.
It's a bit like putting all of hamlet in every single time, but it could be done.
But the point here is that this data imagine that it was ten times bigger.
Imagine that it was 100 times bigger.
You would very quickly get to a point where you couldn't do it.
And now I didn't want to do that because it would it would be unwieldy and it would start costing costing
money.
Uh, but but that's what you have to keep in mind.
The idea of Rag is to be able to scale and support massive knowledge bases and still be able to get
expertise, still be able to get high quality answers when we call the LLM.
And indeed, in week eight, we're going to do a knowledge base with 400,000 documents.
So we are going to scale.
You will see that.
And in my AI in production course we also use use much bigger scale.
So so these this this example is like a medium scale just to give you a sense of it.
But just picture going up by by two orders of magnitude.
The same will apply.
Okay.
Finally time for some long chain code.
We're going to load in these documents and turn them into a long chain object called a document, which
represents each document.
And this code is doing it's not very much.
It's looks like there's a lot of code here.
Uh, okay.
But what we're doing is we've again, we've got we're using this glob glob to get a list of all of the
folders.
Each of these company contracts employees products into a variable called folders.
And then we're going to say for oh, sorry, I just spelt that wrong.
I somehow got that changed.
There we go.
Folders.
Uh, so we're going to uh, we're going to, to take a documents list, an empty list.
We're going to walk through each of these folders.
For each one, we're going to say that the document type will just be the the name of that directory
which whichever directory it is.
And then we're going to use this lang chain community class called directory loader, which is something
that can take a whole directory load in everything in there.
And this here makes sure that it works on PCs as well as Macs.
We will then bring that in.
And for each document we will we will set something called doc type to be the type of document.
And we will add that to to this list of documents.
Okay.
So if I'm then going to do print I'll do that cursor fill in for me.
Print that we've loaded however many documents we've loaded.
So this this is using the Lang chain loader classes to load in each of our documents.
It's not that much more more sophisticated than what we did yesterday when we just loaded in documents
as a string.
But each of these things, if we just look at one of them, let's look at Documents Zero and look at
it.
It is a Lang chain object called a document, it has metadata.
The source is where it came from.
The doc type, the thing that we just put in there ourselves.
This line right here, the doc type is the word products.
Because this first thing is a product.
And then page content is the complete contents of that page.
So those are the fields in this object document.
And you can check this out yourself and, and go through them and look at them and get a sense of what
we have just loaded into the documents list.
And now it's time to split each document into chunks.
And splitting something into chunks is, uh, again, it's very experimental.
It's very empirical.
You try different things.
There are a number of different things called text splitters, which are different classes in long chain
that let you break down a document into smaller pieces.
The very simplest one is just called the character text splitter.
And it does basically what it says on the tin.
It just chops it up by characters.
There's a slightly more sophisticated version called the recursive character text splitter.
Again, it sounds it sounds like it's something fancy, this one, but it's not.
It's it's recursive and it just tries to.
It first tries to split things by wherever there's a couple of empty lines between sections, and then
it tries to do it by just one empty line and then just by end of sentences and things like that.
So it has like a sort of hierarchy of how it tries to split up documents so that it's doing its best
job at trying to break it where it thinks there's a natural break in the documents and you tell it.
How many characters do you want roughly in each chunk, and how much overlap would you like there to
be between different chunks?
Because if you think about it, when you when we ask a question, there might be it's possible that
a question will be answered by, by one paragraph.
Uh, or it might be the answer, you know, if we if we just split the document, it's possible that
the answer to our question would be somewhere in the middle, and that would be problematic.
So by having an overlap with each of our chunks, we make it less likely that we would sort of chop
an answer in half, but that it should often be the case that a particular question will map nicely
to at least one chunk.
So this is all some of the thought process that goes into chunking.
But as you will, as you will discover, if you're wondering like what's the process for this?
The answer is going to be trial and error.
You experiment, you try different chunking strategies and see which one works best.
And I know what you're thinking.
You're thinking, okay, but what does it mean to work best?
How do you know that a chunking strategy is working best?
And that's an excellent thought for you to have.
And fear not, we will cover that.
That is one of the most essential aspects of of a Rag workflow that we'll be covering later in the week.
But enough enough talk.
Let me run this.
We have just divided our documents, our 76 documents into 413 chunks.
And here's the first one.
It's just a chunk of the product summary.
It's a chunk of this thing right here.
Uh, so that's one of them.
Let's, let's go through and just look at another one.
Let's look at chunks.
Uh, whatever.
Number 100.
Let's see what number 100 is.
It's a chunk out of, um, the source, uh, thing and the source, the source document.
And it begins with seven business continuity.
So it's just a fragment of the document, 413 chunks.
What happens if we change the chunk size down to 800?
Then we end up with 532 chunks, more chunks, because they each have a smaller size.
And we'll put it back to 1000.
And you should try this out.
Get a sense of it, get a sense of what this chunk overlap looks like.
Convince yourself there's nothing very clever going on here.
It is basically just dividing up the documents.
You get different numbers of chunks if you have a different chunk size.
Um, and, and uh, you can use you can, you can look up the different kinds of text splitter that
you could try out here if you wanted to get deeper into this idea of turning documents into useful chunks.
Okay.
That is our first quick look at Lang Chain.
We're going to go back and explore a little bit more about vector embeddings and vectors.
And then we'll come right back here.
113 - Okay.
Well, that was your first look at Lang Chain and your first look at the document Splitters part of
Lang Chain.
We were able to load in a bunch of documents, split them into chunks, chunks that are like fragments
of the document.
And we use the recursive character text splitter that's able to to try first with, with double empty
lines and then single empty lines and then spaces to try and divide things down into a certain number
of characters with a bit of overlap between them.
To try and sensibly divide up our documents into fragments, chunks of text that are likely to map to
questions.
Okay, put all of that to one side.
We're changing topic.
We'll come back.
We're changing topic.
We're going to talk about encoders or embedding models that I introduced yesterday, models which are
good at taking text and turning them into a set of numbers that we can think of like it's a vector.
It's a location in space sometimes known as a vector embedding.
And this is something which which these models are very good at doing.
And we, uh, we I do want to distinguish very carefully, and this is going to be a bit of a recurring
theme today between these two different steps.
Turning text into a vector that uses an encoder, and then storing that vector in a vector database
such as chroma, which is one we'll be using.
A vector database is a particular type of database that's very quick at doing queries, not SQL queries.
In a way you may be familiar, but queries about which piece of data has a vector closest to this one,
so they are quick at vector based retrieval.
That's their point, but they don't themselves come up with the vectors.
The vector isn't created by chroma.
The vector is created by an encoder model, an LLM.
That's what creates the vector.
So there are these two different things to think about the encoder model and the vector database.
And they are separate.
When we look at the code it's somewhat conflates these two because you create them at the same time
and associate them together.
So it can get confusing to keep in mind that the vector database is where they get stored, but it's
not where they're created.
They're created by an encoder model.
So just to rattle off a few encoder models, there's this word to vec, which is where it all began,
a model which can take a word and turn it into a vector.
It's not used for this purpose, but for historical reasons.
This is the thing I mentioned with the king minus man plus woman is queen.
Then Bert came out in 2018.
This was Google's transformer model.
That was an encoder that was so powerful and is still somewhat used today.
But modern encoders, there are many of them.
These are the ones you might come across most often.
OpenAI has a bunch of encoders.
They've got one called Text embedding, three small, uh, and they've got a companion called Text embedding
three large.
And we will use both of these at some point, I imagine.
Uh, Google has one called Gemini Embedding 001, which is there.
They're embedding model that's very popular.
And then Hugging Face has a ton of open source encoders in a package called hugging Face sentence Transformers.
And the one that is, I think, most popular, certainly the one that we all use and the one that I'm
sure you'll come across many, many times is called the All mini lm, l6 v2.
Very popular indeed.
So these are some of the most common encoders you're likely to come across.
Okay.
We are now going to use long chain to take what we've just built and put it in a vector data store.
So we already read in the documents across all of the folders.
We already divided them into these chunks.
We turned documents into little, little bits.
From it broken down.
We use the recursive character text splitter again uh, which which looks for double enters and then
and then single character turns and then spaces.
We've got these chunks that are all about 1000 characters long with 200 character overlaps.
Hopefully you've gone in, you've dug in, you've looked at them, you've examined the chunks.
You've satisfied yourself that they do make up these documents.
Now the final step is to turn them into vectors and store them in a database.
And again I say the final step, but you really do need to remember it's two different things.
An encoder or an embedding model that's turning the text into a vector.
And then a vector store the database where they are stored, which is able to quickly look up things
that are close to each other in the vector data store.
And so to to again recap the popular encoders I mentioned OpenAI's ones Gemini has one.
The hugging face all.
Many Ml6 v2 very popular.
And then there are popular vector data stores or vector stores.
So there's a lot of these.
And I often get the question which vector data store should I use.
Which one is best.
And again it comes back.
I think people often get confused between the encoder and the vector store.
You really need to worry a lot about which encoder or which embedding model is best for your problem.
Different embedding models will perform very differently in different use cases, and that needs a lot
of experimenting and testing, as we'll be doing this week.
The choice of vector store database.
This is more like any other database choice.
This is more an infrastructure choice about trading off cost and performance.
There are open source entrants that chroma will use today.
So easy to use and of course free open source.
You just put it.
There is another one that's pretty popular.
Um, Fyss is very popular.
It's Facebook's.
It stands for Facebook AI similarity search from meta before the name change, I guess.
And Fyss sounds better than mice.
Uh uh, so uh, so Fyss is also it's very popular, but it is not really a database.
It's just an in-memory, uh, version that is able to just take vectors and do in-memory vector search.
So these are some of the most popular open source ones.
There are paid offerings that are paid products like Pinecone and Alleviate, and there are a lot you
can, you can, you can Google it or ask ChatGPT to to tell you some of the best.
There are lots of them.
Um, pinecone.
They're both very, very popular.
And these are paid offerings.
And so you pay to be able to to scale to so they are managed database offerings.
Um, and very, very much more powerful.
So if you're looking for, for an enterprise vector data store, you might consider this.
But I have to say it's less common in recent years.
Uh, a recent year, I should say this is all very new, uh, because nowadays the mainstream database
providers all support vectors natively, and so there's less of a need to sort of adopt a pure vector
database like a pinecone, because the mainstream databases like Postgres, you can put vectors in Postgres
as a relational database.
Uh, Mongo a NoSQL database, you can a document based database.
You can put vectors there to uh, at at Nebula.
In my day job we use Elasticsearch, the high performance search platform.
And that takes vectors natively.
And so we have like 200 million vectors.
And we're able to do a search that filters and finds similar vectors.
And it does it just in a couple of seconds.
It's blazingly fast.
Um, and so it's just like like a native search engine which also natively supports vector similarity.
And so the point I want to drive home here, a lot of people do ask me about vector data store choice.
And I just want to say that that most of the time what matters is the encoder, the embedding model.
That's what you really need to care about.
That's what you need to test, as we will this week and really understand what are the which embedding
model is going to work best for your business problem and surface the most relevant content, the data
store it goes into.
This is more of a concern of a typical Infrastructure data base decision.
It's more about your cost, your performance, your ability to scale, your resiliency, the backups,
the security, all those kinds of concerns as you would for any database.
And so it's more of that kind of infrastructure choice that could work with whichever encoder you pick.
Now there are some exceptions to that.
The pros are probably waiting to jump in and, and correct me with some situations in which some of
the high end, uh, platforms that can support different kinds of similarity search, uh, special performance
optimized searches when they, when they only look in certain regions of space, that kind of thing.
So it's certainly true.
There is some overlap, but it's relatively light most of the time.
What you should be spending your, your, your, um, energy focused on as a, as a, as an AI engineer
is the embedding model.
How are you creating vectors from text and the database decision?
It's more of a kind of infrastructure call a trade off between cost and performance.
114 - And welcome back to and welcome back to right where we left off before I did that little detour.
Uh, so you remember, of course, that we just took our documents.
We broke them into chunks.
I think you got the idea of chunks now.
413 of them.
Uh, there they all are.
We are now going to make vectors and store this in chroma.
And we're going to use the open source embedding model or mini lm, l6 v2 from Huggingface.
Now, look, I do believe that you do not need to be logged in to Huggingface to use this model.
It's something that's just available publicly.
Uh, but just in case, if you have if you do get any hugging face login, uh, error, then you remember
that in week three we set up a hugging face token.
HF token, please.
If you get a problem with logging in, then add that token to your EMV file and be sure to rerun EMV.
But I don't think it's needed.
It shouldn't shouldn't happen to you.
We'll need this for week eight anyway, so you might want to do it anyway.
But but but regardless.
Okay.
So we're going to start by creating a new variable embeddings.
And we're going to create an instance of this hugging face embeddings object.
And this is part of Langerhans Code.
And we tell it the model name.
We want to use the all mini lm, l6, v2.
There it is.
And what we do here, this is saying uh, it's checking to see whether or not there is already uh,
a thing called vector underscore db, which is what we called our database.
And I do have that because I've run this before and it says if it exists then come in and make sure
we wipe it so that we're starting fresh.
So that allows you to run this many times again and again.
And every time it will wipe it if it exists.
And if not, it will create a new one.
Okay.
And now look at this line the vector store.
We're creating a vector store.
We use this this word chroma.
This is another it's a long chain object that represents the chroma database a free open source database
that actually has SQLite running behind it that will just get created just like that on your computer
without you needing to do any more work.
Chromium documents.
And the thing we pass in as our documents that we want to create in our vector data store is the chunks
that we just made are how many were there?
400 and something chunks 413.
Chunks 413 chunks.
We passed them in and we also pass in the embedding model, the encoder, this thing here, the hugging
face embeddings.
And we tell it the name of the directory where it's stored.
That is how we create our chroma database with the chunks, with the embeddings, with the directory
name to create.
That's what we do.
And this is when I say that it's easy with with encode to sort of conflate the database with the embedding
model.
You can see you just sort of pass it all in together to create chroma.
But this embedding model isn't isn't really associated with chroma.
It's different.
It just it could be any embedding model we could pass in there.
Anyway, let's run this.
It's now going.
It's taking all of those documents, all 413 of them, turning them into vectors, putting them in the
vector store.
That's happened.
It just all happened.
And this directory vector db, if I open it up, it's full of SQL Lite sort of stuff, which is in fact
a database with 413 chunks in it.
How about that?
If you just ran that, you just created your very first vector data store.
Congrats.
So next we're just going to dig into the vector data store to look at what we've got here.
So a collection is the name of like.
Like what in relational databases we would think of as like a table.
So we've got we've only got one collection.
So we bring it in as a, as a variable collection.
And we asked for its count.
How many things do we have.
And we also just get one one of the of the objects in there.
One of them we find out how many dimensions does it have.
Let's have a look.
So we've got 413 vectors in Cromer with 384 dimensions.
Mentions.
So that means there's like 384 numbers associated with each of those vectors.
And if again, I know I think you know this, but those 384 dimensions, that's not a that's not a feature
of Cromer.
Cromer can take vectors of any size.
It's a feature of the hugging face all mini lm, l6, v2 embedding model that turns text into this 384
dimensional vector.
That's where the vectors have come from.
Okay, now for the best part.
It's time for us to visualize.
So I am a big believer in visualizing your data and seeing it and exploring it, something that we will
be doing many times over the next few weeks.
And this is no exception.
And visualizing information represented in vectors can be particularly insightful and interesting.
Gives you a way to spot outliers and interesting trends or problematic trends.
It's just a great thing to do.
And it's also from an education point of view, it's very, very helpful to give you like a real intuition
for what does it mean to have our data represented by vectors?
What does that actually mean?
Well, you're going to see it and it's going to give you some clues.
So first up I'm going to just just just pull out from our database a list of the vectors, a list of
the documents which really the chunks, the metadata associated with each one.
Um, the doc types.
And then I'm also going to have a color, uh, that will pick based on whether it's a product, employee,
contract or company.
So that is what we will do.
Um, and uh, what we're now going to do is, is bring this up just to see what it looks like visually.
But there's a problem and, and, and the problem is with you and me, uh, the problem is that we humans,
we humans have a limitation that we're not very good at seeing anything above three dimensions.
We can't see things in 384 dimensions because we don't have any idea what that even means?
Uh, so that is that is a problem.
But luckily, mathematicians have come along to to put us out of our misery.
There is a technique.
There are a few techniques.
There's one called PCA, there's one called t-SNE, which we're going to use.
t-SNE stands for T-distributed.
Stochastic neighbor embedding just rolls off the tongue.
You don't need to know that you don't know what it stands for, but what you do need to know is that
t-SNE is a very popular technique for taking higher dimensional data and projecting it down, say,
to two dimensions, um, such that things that are close together in 2D are likely to be close together
in multi-dimensional space, and things that are far apart in 2D are likely to be far apart.
It's a statistical technique.
You can you can Google it to read all about it.
On Wikipedia.
It's very common.
Uh, so we are going to to run t-SNE and we're going to ask it to, to project down to two dimensions.
It's going to use, uh, this random state means it should, should come up with the same answer each
time.
Uh, and we are then going to plot it so that we can see what this looks like when it's displayed in
2D.
Okay, here we go.
We run it and bam!
This appears.
Now you may see some warnings.
It may give you some hugging face related warning about something about threads.
Ignore that.
It's nothing you often get warnings with with sort of open source software.
The frontier and warnings can can usually be just just noted down in case something goes wrong later
to come back to.
In this case, it's nothing.
All right.
Anyway, take a moment to absorb this.
And it's like, wow, what are you looking at here?
What is this?
So this is like a, like a map of our data.
And if you move your mouse over it, you will see that each one is showing you that the type at the
top, this is an employee document and the text associated with this chunk.
And you can see that all like 400 chunks are being displayed here.
And if you if you some people say what is the meaning of the x axis and the y axis?
There is no meaning of these axes.
It's just the data as it's distributed there.
What?
What matters is what's close to each other, because that should be information that is similar in meaning.
So that's the thing to to really get your head around and to, to, uh, browse around.
Um, and here's the thing.
The, the text that was sent to our encoder model, remember, it's the encoder that made the vector.
It's been stored in chroma, but the encoder made the vector.
That text was just the text of the chunk.
It's based on the text of the chunk.
It wasn't told that some of these are employees.
Some of these are companies, some of these are contracts and some of these are products.
So it's pretty interesting that some of the data has been separated out quite nicely.
Like you'll see that generally the employees are all together here.
Now there's some company related information no doubt.
If you dig into it you'll see that it's quite employee related, but some of it has ended up around
here.
But most of it is clustered up here.
And then you'll see some of the other stuff around here.
So generally speaking it's separated things out.
There is something which looks like a bit of a stripe of the product data that seems to come in between
some of the different sections of contracts.
So there's some separation by, by meaning based on the type of document.
Uh, and you will hopefully get a good sense by looking around here are the different integration services,
parts of different contracts.
And you can see how they're close to each other in the vector space.
So take a moment.
Take some time to look through this.
Examine the chunks.
See that chunks with a similar meaning are close to each other, and get a sense for what does it mean
to have this information, these vectors stored in chroma, keeping in mind that the vectors are stored
in chroma, but the vectors were made by the hugging face or mini V2 model.
That's what built these vectors that we're looking at right here.
115 - Well, hopefully you are as happy with this as I am.
I do find these these visualizations really cool.
Make it a bit bigger.
Why not?
And close that that sidecar.
There we go.
Now we really get it in its full glory.
All the different points there.
I hope that you've you've taken a moment to to really dig in to this data visualization, but maybe
there's something a little bit cooler we can do as well.
It's probably not lost on you that we humans, as I mentioned before, are able to go one bit further
than 2D.
We can see things in 3D, and I wouldn't be doing my job if I didn't, uh, bring for you a 3D representation
of this as well.
And t-SNE is able to do that simply by passing in a number of components, three instead of two.
Uh, and we can project our 384 dimensional space down to 3D and see how that would look.
So let's take a look.
Here it is coming right up.
Bam!
There I present to you, uh, our points are 400 chunks shown in 3D space.
And I hear you.
You may, may say, oh, at first blush, this looks a bit of a mess.
Uh, I prefer the 2D version.
Uh, but but wait, uh, you could, first of all, hover over these points to get their descriptions
like this and see where they are in the space.
But also, you can rotate the whole space around like that, check that out and get a real sense for
you.
Really get a better sense for how those blues, whilst they are a little bit in the middle of the red,
they are somewhat in their own cluster.
Um, and the yellows also have their own sort of distribution.
Uh, and you can really hone in by, by zooming in like this.
Check this out, come in and explore the different points.
And so even though these yellows seem like they were a bit closer to the reds, they really don't look
at it.
Now you can see how they're distributed differently.
So even though the 2D is a little bit easier to look at than the 3D, you can explore and And investigate
so much more with the 3D, and I encourage you to have fun with this.
Of course, the sort of the proper use of this is to spot anomalies.
Spot how?
Well, uh, different, different documents are being grouped by similarity.
Dig in and try and find mistakes and gives you clues as to how you could potentially use different encoders.
But it's also great fun, and it gives good intuition for what it means to have these vectors.
And again, you can think of it like we're visualizing these vectors as they are in chroma.
Just always keep in mind that we're visualizing indeed these vectors as they've been stored in chroma.
But the vectors weren't created by chroma.
The vectors were created by the hugging face sentence transformers model or mini lm, l6 v2.
That's what turned our 400 or so chunks into these points in 304 dimensional space.
And now for my next trick.
Uh, I want to to drill down on this idea that it's the The encoder that decides where these points
are in space.
And what better way to illustrate that than to try a different encoder?
So let's go back and let's try the different encoder back.
Back we go here and I'm going to comment out where we set the embedding model.
And here let's start by looking at the text embedding three small model from OpenAI.
Let's check this out.
Let's run this.
And this code you remember is going to delete my database.
Create a new database with 413 documents.
Again the same chunks that are gone in.
Let's run this again.
Remember you can see here we had 384 dimensions before.
From the hugging face model we now have 1536 dimensions.
Because we're using a different embedding model.
We're using a paid one.
But it's very, very cheap from OpenAI.
Text embedding three small.
All.
Okay, let's go back to visualize again.
We'll do the pre-work to get our documents.
And now here we are.
So before I run this cell, let's take another look right here at how it looks before.
This is how it looked before.
We're now going to run this and generate a new visualization of the new vectors, as they are from the
OpenAI small model instead.
Okay.
Are you ready for this?
Keep this in your mind.
Keep keep that picture.
If you've got a photographic memory, hopefully it's there.
Let's run this again and see what it looks like now.
Okay.
It's happened.
There we have it.
Okay.
It looks completely different.
So first off, the fact that it's all rotated around is doesn't mean anything.
Remember the actual x and y coordinates don't have any meaning.
What matters is the how separated the documents are.
And look at how much better OpenAI's model has done.
Look at how the employee documents are all the way over here.
Look at how the, uh, the contracts are here.
And you can see now that the products are in a quite a different place.
Uh, except for some documents over here.
And what you'll find if you look into this is that this specifically, these parts here are specifically
around the features of the products.
And that's going to be very similar to the text around here, which is the parts of the contract which
relate to features.
So you'll find that when you're using a model like like OpenAI, it's really very good.
The OpenAI embeddings model and associating meaning.
And over here you'll see that the company stuff is all here.
In this one strip, you'll see that there's a couple of of employee records here.
And these are going to be chunks of the employee record that seem to relate to information about the
company.
Uh, if you dig into it, I expect you'll find that.
But let's go back up now and let's make one more change and change to the to to the large model and
see how that looks.
So here I am back in the embedding model section we'll go for text embedding three large.
Let's run this.
And we are now hopefully going to be converting our 413 documents into bigger vectors.
Well how much bigger.
Let's have a look.
Before we had 1536 dimensions associated with with each vector, we now have 3072 dimensions, 3072
dimensions in the vector store associated with each of our 413 chunks.
Okay, it's time to visualize.
Remember how it looks.
This is how it looks with the small variants.
Let's have a look with the large variant.
Uh, and here it is.
Okay.
Uh, so again it's another step.
Better see how again, first of all, as before, the employees are over on the left.
Now it doesn't matter.
They are clearly very separate except for these two pieces, which is the stuff that, um, you can
see the word ensure is in both of these.
So these are the the two fragments of an employee document that seem to be most about the company as
a whole.
You can see now that the separation between blue and red is even stronger.
The smarter model has done an even better job of understanding the different semantic meaning between
these chunks.
Um, and over here you'll see that this this is indeed still parts of the product that is about the
functionality which seems to belong most with the contracts.
So you can see that that's why it's done that.
Look here again, it's, it's part of the, of the product.
And this is the parts of the contracts that are about the product, which is why they're all around
the same territory.
So absolutely fascinating.
You can see what a better job the large model has done.
And so we really see how we've, we've we've stepped up between the small hugging face model, then
the small version of OpenAI, which is still pretty big, and then the large version with 3072 dimensions
and and how that's allowed the data to be so separated.
And it's worth pointing out, it can be tempting to think that the reason that the large model is better
is because it has more dimensions.
It is typically the case that like, like, like a larger model will produce vector embeddings with
higher dimensionality that allows it to express things with, with, with more degrees of freedom.
But that's not always the case.
And it doesn't need to be the case.
It matters that it is a more advanced transformer that is a better at capturing the meaning of the text,
and being able to express that in more dimensions, I suppose, gives it more power to do it.
So they are often somewhat related.
But we did move between about 400 dimensions, originally 384 for the hugging face model to about 1000
dimensions, 1005 to about 3000 dimensions.
As we move through those three embedding models, I know, I know exactly what you're waiting for me
to do.
You're waiting for me to make the 3D plot.
I'm thinking of it too.
Let's do this and let's go in.
Remember the old 3D plot?
This is the old one with the hugging face model.
A bit of a mess.
Let's now create a new 3D plot.
I know it's what you're waiting for.
Here it is.
Well, you know, it's still a little bit messy because these 3D plots can be.
But check this out.
Look at what happens if I maneuver us around.
Look at how cleanly separated those four blobs are.
Again, some overlap between contracts and the products.
And that's because there is some overlap in those types of documents.
Contracts contain some product related information in them, as you will see if you dig into these documents.
But generally speaking, this is just amazing to see.
It really gives you this, this, this good sense of what it means to take the meaning of a document,
turn it into a vector in space.
I hope you like it, and I do encourage you to explore this more.
Now keep working through this.
Look at different points where there are points close together.
Satisfy yourself that the content of those chunks is similar, and get a good sense of what it's what
it takes for a model to position some data somewhere in vector space.
And that is a wrap on this great day.
I hope you agree that that my intro was was was true.
It was a lot of fun today.
Those vector visualizations, that's what it's all about.
Uh, I very much encourage you to experiment with different encoders now.
Go, go and try some different embedding models.
You can look them up, you can do different open source ones.
Or you could try and do like the Gemini one if you've got a Gemini account.
Experiment with them and then look at the visualizations.
Playing with with encoder models is terrific fun and getting a good sense, a good intuition for for
how they represent information differently.
Anyways, to recap, at this point you can generate texts and code with frontier models, assistants
and tools, open source models, hugging face transformers.
You can choose the right model for your projects using benchmarks leaderboards.
You can explain how Rag uses vector embeddings and vector data stores to turn text into documents,
into chunks, to turn chunks, into vectors, to put vectors in a data store how vectors is like the
index in to data.
And we've used chroma, the open source database, perhaps your first vector database that you've now
got running on your computer.
Fantastic.
Next time, next time we actually build a Rag pipeline, we use Lang Chain to build a Rag pipeline.
Super easy.
We deliver like a rag based expert question answerer and you'll be able to to and we'll create like
a Gradio based chatbot app that will show not only the answers to questions, but also it'll be able
to show the documents that it used.
That's reference that helped it answer the question.
The relevant context surfaced by our Rag pipeline.
We're going to do all of that tomorrow.
And at this point, you are 55% of your way through to being an LLM engineer.
See you tomorrow.
116 - And welcome to week five, day three.
Yesterday we did the first kind of half of Rag by taking documents, putting them into vectors, into
chroma.
Today we're finishing it off.
We're completing a Rag pipeline.
It's all going to happen today.
And I tell you, it's going to be remarkably simple.
I think you're going to be pleasantly surprised by how easy it is to build a Rag pipeline.
And as a quick reminder of what you've already done, you can already generate text, generate code
frontier models with open source models.
Using the Huggingface Transformers library, you can choose the right model for your project, backed
by metrics from leaderboards and benchmarks and so on.
And now.
And now you can explain how Rag uses vector embeddings.
It takes documents.
It turns documents into chunks.
It turns chunks into vectors.
It stores vectors in chroma.
Okay, today we're completing the picture.
By the end of today, you're going to be able to use Lang long chain to build a Rag pipeline, you're
going to be able to deliver a question answerer expert using Rag.
And best of all, you're going to be able to have a nice little gradio user interface, which is going
to be like a Rag application that not only will be able to answer questions with expertise, but it
will be able to show you the documents that it's sourced that expertise from.
Isn't that great?
We're going to do all that today.
Let's get started.
And don't kill me.
But we're going to start by one more time doing our recap of the big idea behind rag.
I know you say you get it.
Do we have to reuse redo the same slides again?
But yes, because sometimes repetition helps.
And just in case, because because some people still have some misconceptions about Rag.
And it's so important to have the foundations understood, the user asks a question.
It comes to our code.
We could take that question and just try and see if we can do a SQL query, if we can just do a text
search.
But that would miss important stuff.
There's a better way to do it.
There's a trick that involves using LMS, a different kind of LM, not the one we're used to the autoregressive,
but AR one that's sometimes called an encoder, sometimes called an embedding model.
There it is.
And we call it to turn the question into a vector.
And we can then say all right let's look in a database.
We've got of lots of other documents where we have indexed those documents by creating vectors of each
of them.
And we put them in a database that is particularly quick at finding documents with vectors, with indexes
that are close to the vector we pass in.
And we can use that to retrieve relevant contexts.
Put that in the prompt to the LM.
Get back the results that that's the big idea behind Rag.
And that's what we're going to implement today.
And then one more time to to remind you what we did yesterday, we read in all the documents in a bunch
of folders in four different folders.
We broke them up into chunks.
This very hacky process of just saying, all right, let's take the text and just sort of slice it up.
We use that recursive character text splitter that just looks for two empty lines, and then one empty
line and then spaces breaks it all up.
We do that.
We have some overlap between the chunks.
Do you remember that 1000 characters, 200 characters of overlap.
And then we use that to turn them into vectors.
And then we stored them in chroma.
And I banged on about the fact that there's a difference between the encoder.
The embedding model that makes the vectors and chroma the data store.
It could be it could be a bunch of other data stores.
That's where they get stored.
That's good at quick retrieval.
I said, you know, popular encoders.
We've got the OpenAI text embedding.
We looked at small and large, small three and large three.
We looked at we didn't look at Gemini embeddings, but they are great.
Uh, and then there's also hugging face all mini Ml6 V2, which we looked at first.
And I said separate to the encoders is the the vector stores the place where you put them and retrieve
them.
And we use chroma, the open source data store.
There's also Kudrin, there's vice, there's many others.
There's paid ones which are much more scalable and resilient.
But you have to pay for them.
You get what you pay for.
And there's pinecone.
We've yet many, many more.
And then I also mentioned that the mainstream databases themselves all support vectors to what you what
you sign up for here is more of an infrastructure decision, more of something which which relates to
things like the the costs involved, the support structure, the the performance.
And then some of them, I think I mentioned have more advanced features like elastic lets you filter
very quickly at the same time concurrently with looking for the nearest nearest vectors.
So these are the kinds of trade offs you take into account as you pick your vector store.
But separately to that, you pick your encoder, your embedding model, so that it gets the right kind
of vectors for the problem that you're working on.
And we'll talk more about that tomorrow.
Okay.
So we are now going to talk about Lang Chain.
We're going to use Lang Chain to implement our Rag pipeline, and I do want to make the point that it's
good to use long chain.
This was one of the first places where long chain really shined, because it was so easy to to use long
chain to build a rag pipeline.
And so it became very, very popular.
So it makes sense that I'm introducing it for this use case.
But I will make the point that it is actually also very easy to build a Rag pipeline without using long
chain.
It's not like long chain is an essential part of building Rag.
It does make things a bit quicker for us.
You'll see it's going to be just a couple of lines of code that's going to be it, but it would only
be a few more lines of code if we did it, like the manual brute force way, which is what we do in
in week eight.
And I say brute force, but it's honestly it's just a couple more lines of code.
It's not much more at all.
But anyways, for now we're going to focus on long chain and you'll see why people love Long chain.
We're going to take two of the key abstractions.
One of them is is an LM, uh, and that is like an object.
And in fact, we already met this.
We already used this abstraction in Lang Chain a couple of weeks ago when when I compared it with light
LM and we saw how you can you can use Lang chain just to sort of wrap an LM so you can swap in open
AI or anthropic or Lama or whatever in place.
And it will, it will respond in the same way.
And then another, another abstraction we're going to work with is something called a retriever.
And a retriever is an abstraction around chroma, the data store and also the embedding model.
That's all sort of wrapped up into this thing called the retriever.
So you can just ask the retriever to retrieve documents close to similar to another document retrieval.
So these are the two key abstractions.
And as with many of lang chains abstractions, it responds to a method invoke.
If you have an LLM, you can say my LLM dot invoke.
If you have a retriever, you can say my retriever dot invoke.
And there are many other objects in Lang chain that have this same behavior, uh, tools.
Uh, and many more.
That's it's a very common part of the framework.
It's actually so it's called a runnable in Lang chain if you can call invoke.
And in the prior version runnable was something that was very much surfaced.
So so you saw runnable in the in the code a lot and people talked about it.
But that appears they appear to have taken that out as a sort of main as an, as an interface, as something
that you, that you particularly refer to in the code in lang chain one zero.
Uh, so, so whilst we know that all of these things are runnable, that's, that's not a term that's
as commonly used in Lang chain 1.0.
And for sure we are going to be using Lang Chain 1.0, the new version of Lang chain.
So we'll have an we'll have a retriever.
It will take the method invoke.
There are other methods you can call as well like Stream and Invoke for async invoke.
We won't be doing those.
But but you can bear in mind that there are these common things that any of the major abstractions in
Lang Chain will respond to.
Okay.
But we'll be doing with we'll be dealing with LM and retriever.
We'll be invoking them.
Let's go and do that in cursor right now.
117 - And here we are back in cursor.
We're going to week five.
We're going to day three.
Welcome to day three.
We're building our expert question answerer for ensure Elm.
It's going to be a long chain one zero implementation of a Rag pipeline using the vector store we created
last time.
Now, you may remember last time when we made our vector store, we first used a encoder from Huggingface,
the all mini Ml6 v2.
Then we went back and did it again with a couple of OpenAI models that were a lot better.
Well, I've actually just gone back and rerun it with the original model because I don't know which
one you will have ended up using.
And just in case you stuck with the original, the weaker one, that's what.
That's what I've run it with right now.
You can choose.
You can go back and do that if you wish, or stick with what you've got up to you.
All right.
Let's start with some imports.
So there's a bunch of of long chain imports here.
And these are interesting ones.
So this first one from Lang chain OpenAI import chat OpenAI.
Now that that is the the LM abstraction I mentioned.
Chat.
OpenAI is one of the llms that you can create.
It will respond to invoke from Cromer import Cromer.
We had that abstraction last time.
Uh, this is something to do with some, some, some messages that we're going to play with.
And these are the embeddings models that we already looked at.
I'll just mention that.
So I'll run these imports.
There they go.
Um, so, uh, it takes a few seconds.
There's a lot to import.
Uh, so, so to show you here, we've got OpenAI import chat.
OpenAI.
You could also have here from Lang Chain.
Uh, llama imports llama I spelt Lang chain wrong, but it is still filled it in.
Uh, and I could say from lang chain underscore anthropic import chat anthropic.
Uh, if you do this you could simply replace chat OpenAI with Chat llama or Chat Anthropic and it will
just work that that is really the promise of long chain that these abstractions are very swappable.
They all respond to invoke, and that allows you to to manipulate things quite easily, similar to the
way abstractions like light LM do it, but with with long chain it is a bit more heavyweight.
It's a completely different package that you have to to install and import.
Okay.
So I'll take that out.
Uh, hopefully you get that.
And now we're going to set some constants and then we're going to get going with our rag okay.
Now first up we are going to create the embeddings object, the all mini lm l6 v2 object.
And we're also going to connect to Cromer with embeddings object.
You can see as I say I'm using this hugging face open source one.
So if you're still using the OpenAI embeddings you need to make sure to use the OpenAI embeddings object
here, import it and then use it here.
Uh, or else if you want to use this one, you do.
You may have to go back and recreate your database.
It's just important that you use the same consistent one, because if you've got vectors in your database
that are the OpenAI 3000 dimension vectors, and now we use this one here, this will be used when we
come up with a query.
We take our question.
We turn it into a vector.
Well if they're different models then trouble will ensue.
You're going to create like this 300 dimensional vector from hugging face.
And you're going to be trying to compare it to 3000 dimension vectors, completely different vectors.
You remember how different they looked in the image as well.
Completely different in your in your vector data store.
And there's going to be an error.
There's going to be a nasty ugly stack trace about mismatch in dimensions.
And you're going to come back to me and say, Ed, what's going on?
And I'm going to say you've got different vector models, so don't do that.
Uh, make sure that they're consistent.
So let's run this.
And now we are going to have created our embeddings.
And we have loaded our data store in the same directory.
This directory is vector db.
You can see it right there.
We've loaded that in.
And we've also told it about the embeddings model that we are using.
Okay.
It's time now for us to create the two big long chain objects the LM and the retriever.
There they both are.
Let's create them.
So you can see that I create the retriever object by doing vector store, the chroma vector store dot
as retriever.
And that just packages it up into a retriever object, an object that we can just call dot invoke on.
And it will do a rag lookup.
So easy and with with chat with with with chat open AI.
All we have to do is just create it like this.
We pass in the model name and I'm also passing in something called temperature and that is making the
LM.
So what is this temperature?
I think it's come up from time to time and I'm not sure I've ever properly explained it.
So so let me just take one minute on temperature right now.
So temperature is it's probably something you've heard about a fair bit, because all of the LMS take
temperature as an input, and it's something that controls how how much variety there is in the output
that comes from the model.
It's a parameter that controls how different it will be each time you call it.
A temperature of zero means that it should be predictable, deterministic, and a higher temperature
means there should be more variety, more more flavor, more differences in the answers.
Each time you call it.
Now some people describe this as as creativity, a higher temperature for more creative output.
I don't think that's quite right.
It's not wrong, but I think it's a bit misleading.
So I'd rather clarify just just so that it's clear for you.
So what's it actually doing?
Well, it's actually controlling at inference time when you're generating each token by token, it's
to do with how you pick which token comes next.
A model, an LM doesn't actually spit out the next token as I think you know, what it actually spits
out is the probability of all the possible next tokens.
Every possible next word gets some probability, even if it's a very small probability.
But everything gets something.
Uh, and typically when I've loosely said, we pick the next token when I'm what I'm sort of referring
to is you could just always just pick the token that got the highest probability, the one that the
model said is the most likely next token.
And with a temperature of zero, all you ever do is pick whichever token got the highest probability,
and you pick that one and that one every single time.
And that is called a temperature of zero.
The most predictable and sort of reliable and deterministic output.
And a higher temperature means that you occasionally pick tokens which, which didn't get the top probability,
but maybe got the second top or something like that.
And in fact, in the case of OpenAI, the temperature varies from 0 to 2, and a temperature of one
means that if a token were given a 10% probability, then you would pick that 110% of the time you actually
sample what token comes next based on the probabilities that they got.
So if a token got 1% probability, it was really unlikely.
Still 1 in 100 times.
You might pick that one if temperature is one.
So there's more more variety in what comes out.
And and indeed that that might mean that it's more creative, but not necessarily.
It really just means that the word choices will be different, and sometimes perhaps a bit odd if the
temperature is high enough.
In fact, with the temperature coming up to two, you can get quite strange answers.
So that's that's what temperature means and what it controls.
And to add two notes to this.
One of them is that, uh, I've used words like deterministic and reproducible.
That's also not quite right, because even with a temperature of zero, the output won't necessarily
be reproducible.
Because there is there is, there is random.
There are random numbers involved in running llms.
You can do something called setting a random seed, which means that the random numbers will be the
same each time.
And indeed we will do that in weeks 6 to 8.
And that can be particularly important when you're testing and trying to make sure that you really do
get the same answer each time.
So so we will be setting random seeds later and you will see that.
And even when you set a random seed, it's still not guaranteed to be the same every time.
Because there are changes at the frontier model in the labs, they change their models.
And also because there are performance optimizations that mean that lots of calculations happen in parallel
in a way that can't always be guaranteed, that the same things will come out exactly the same way.
And so as a result, nothing is ever fully guaranteed to be reproducible.
But if you have a temperature of zero and you do this thing called setting a random seed, then you're
pretty likely to get the same answer every time.
And we will be doing that later in the course.
But for now, we're setting temperature of zero, which is quite common with Rag systems, because you
do want to have a sort of stronger guarantee around reliability, but it's also typical to see temperatures
around 0.5 0.7 as well.
And I mentioned that that temperature isn't really the same as creativity.
If you're looking for your model to be more creative and have higher creativity, the right way to do
that is through the system prompt.
The right way to do that is to instruct the model to be creative.
Give it examples of what it means to you to be creative.
That's what creativity should be all about.
And if you want it to give different answers, the best way to do that is to tell it the prior answers
it gave and say, I now want something different.
That's the most reliable way to do it.
You can use temperature for that kind of thing, but it's just not as reliable in my experience.
Better to focus on prompting if you want to have a particular behavior from your model.
Okay, this was a sidebar, but I think it was a very important sidebar, so I'm pleased we did it.
Let's press on.
Now with the big step of creating our two abstractions, the retriever and the LM, I ran it, it's
done.
118 - Okay.
So we created our retriever object and our LLM object.
And I promised you that you could just call invoke on either of these objects.
And you may think, well, let me see that.
I'm not sure I believe you.
Well then we'll go and do it.
So here we go.
Retriever Dot invoke.
Who is aviary.
So what will a retriever do if we say to it who is aviary?
What do you think?
What?
What?
What should it do?
That's right.
Exactly.
It should retrieve relevant context.
Something relevant to who is aviary.
So let's run it and bam!
What comes back is for document objects.
They each have an ID, they have metadata, and they have a source.
And you can see that the first one has been pulled from the the document and they have page content.
These are in fact long document objects that we met yesterday.
And they are the chunks that represents the four different chunks that have been found closest to that
question.
Who is Avery?
So what actually happened when we called in Vogue?
It took that fragment.
Who is Avery?
It then used the the retrievers encoder that we had set up here.
So the embedding function, which is Omni v2 to turn it into a vector, it then called chroma to find
the closest vectors.
And that is what it is now.
Then located those documents and it's printing them there.
Very cool, very easy.
All right.
And now we're going to call.
Who is Avery.
So what's that going to do then.
Have a think about that.
What do you think it's going to print.
All right.
You've had your thought and maybe it's not what you expected.
It depends, uh, how much you've been, uh, seeing everything that's going on here.
So it doesn't tell us about Avery Lancaster.
Have you thought that was going to be the moment?
Uh, but no, because, look, we this is this LM is just chat OpenAI based on a model.
We haven't told anything about our retriever.
The al-alam abstraction is just an abstraction around OpenAI, or around a llama, or around an anthropic
or any one of many, many, many different models that you could you could use with long chain Gemini,
whatever.
Um, and so what we have got back is just a generic answer to calling like OpenAI create with who is
aviary?
We get back.
Aviary is a given name that can be used for both males and females.
It may also refer to blah blah blah blah blah blah.
So in other words, that was, uh, definitely no rag happening there.
So we've got our two objects, two long chain objects, either of which can be invoked.
So what's left to be done?
Well, basically we have to put them together.
We need to use both of these in something which is known as rag.
Let's do this okay.
You ready.
We're going to start with just a constant variable called system prompt template.
It's going to describe our system prompt.
Some of this used to be packaged for you in the previous version of chain.
And now I think the idiomatic way to do it lang chain one is to write it yourself, which I much prefer.
I much prefer it when these things aren't hidden from us, so I'm quite happy with the fact that we
get to write our own prompt here.
So the system prompt template is you are a knowledgeable, friendly assistant representing the company
in your realm.
You're chatting with the user about ensure realm.
If relevant, use the given context to answer any question.
If you don't know the answer, say so and context.
And then there is a little, little placeholder that we'll replace with the word con with with with
the context that we find from our retriever.
Okay.
That's it.
That's a constant.
And this, this function here, this I present to you rag.
Rag in what is that that five lines of code.
That's all there is.
Okay.
So I'm saying this this is a function called answer question.
It's given a question.
It's also given this variable called history that we're going to ignore.
You may think why is that?
But you probably have guessed why already.
But anyway, so we are going to first take our retriever object.
This is one of the two big long chain abstractions we're working with and we call invoke on that question.
And we already know what we get back.
We get back some documents that are that are relevant, okay.
And we will just smash them together, taking the page content and, and wallop them together with empty
lines between them.
So it's just the chunks laid out there in this variable context.
Okay.
So far so good.
Very easy.
Next up look we'll take this system prompt template that I've got just up here.
And we will we will just change that.
We will substitute in the context as the context that we've just created right here.
It's just basically taking the result of this and squashing it in here in sort of fancy Python.
That's what this line here does.
We've now got a system prompt that is going to be all of this with the retrieved documents in there.
And now we do LM invoke and we pass this in as the system message.
And we pass in this question as what Lang chain calls the human message, which we just known as, as,
as user.
We're used to it being being user.
But Lang Chain has this idea of a system message and a human message.
Uh, instead of a list of Dix, it's a list of these objects, these Lang chain objects, and we return
response content.
That is the result, uh, that is lang chains idiomatic, uh, way of plucking out the result from this
response.
And that is all there is to it.
We're basically calling invoke on the retriever and invoke on the LM.
And we're kind of stitching them together.
And I'm running that now.
Okay.
Are you ready to try this out?
I was born ready.
You're thinking.
Yes.
Okay, so we're going to call it answer question with who is Avery?
And we're hoping for a slightly better response than this, uh, this given name thing up here.
Let's have a look at what we get.
Who is Avery?
Avery Lancaster is the co-founder and chief executive officer of insurer Elm.
She's been with the company since its founding and has played a key role.
Blah blah blah, blah, blah.
Yes it works.
We have just done Rag.
We've just done retrieval, augmented generation, five lines of code.
That is the magic of of long chains, abstractions making it so easy for us.
Uh, and, uh, yeah, I hope that you're thinking, wait, what is is it that easy?
It really is that easy.
The long chain parts of this is the nice little packaging around doing an invoke and an invoke this
system message, human message is is very much lancioni kind of stuff, but you can probably appreciate
that it wouldn't have been much more just to do this yourself.
Just to build the system prompt template, do the query in chroma and then do a.
Create pass in the system prompt and the user message.
We could have done that too.
It would have been maybe ten lines of code instead of five.
Lang made it even more elegant and simple and quick.
But rag is just not that difficult, and I'm sure it's no surprise to you.
But I can also change this to who is Lancaster, and presumably it will be able to to handle.
Lancaster refers to Avery Lancaster quite easily.
So unlike the nasty hack we did two days ago just searching for the word Lancaster, it can handle the
first name, it can handle the last name.
And I imagine if we do, who is Avery Lancaster?
But we now spell her name wrong like this.
I imagine it's going to be able to handle that.
It seems there might be a typo in the name based on the information I have.
You might be referring to Avery Lancaster.
Isn't that amazing?
Isn't that incredible?
That is fuzzy matching at work.
That is because it found the vector for Avery.
Lancaster was close to the vector for Avery, spelt wrong Lancaster.
Even though the words were different.
And you can you can go to town experimenting with this and get a sense of what works and what doesn't,
how far you can take it with.
Of course, we're relying on the fact that the all mini LM, L6, v2 is pretty good at this kind of
thing, but if you're using the OpenAI embeddings model, it'll be even better.
And I know what you're waiting for.
You, you you knew why I put that history in there, at least.
Maybe you did.
Uh, it's because, of course, what?
We can come next.
Is that anything you're familiar with?
The fact that, uh, that that with with Gradio, we have a chat function that takes the message and
the history.
Well, there's nothing magic about the word chat.
It doesn't need it to be called chat.
It can be called anything as long as it takes a question and the history.
So we can just simply create a chat interface and pass in answer question as the callback function,
it should call with the question and the history.
Uh, and uh, yeah, just, just, um, I know you get this, but look, let me just do this.
Let me do return bananas in here.
If I if this has returned bananas, then if I launch a user interface here and I say hi there, it will
say bananas.
Who are who is Avery bananas?
Uh, I'm sure you get this, but some of you might have skipped week two, and so you might not be not,
not be used to.
Uh gradio.
So just in case that's just a show.
That's all that's going on here.
I take that out.
Now, this is the function that Gradio will call run that instead bring up a fresh interface.
We are now going to say who is Avery?
And if it says bananas, I'll be very surprised.
Uh, and, uh, we'll see what happens.
Avery Lancaster is the co-founder chief executive officer of ensure.
L'm there.
You have it.
What is market?
L'm.
Uh, that's one of the products, I believe.
Oh, did I spell it wrong?
Uh, there we go.
I spelt it wrong.
Market l'm ensures innovative insurance marketplace.
So?
So it's a great example.
Uh, which, of course, was intentional, uh, of how the vector data store is able to handle typos
and look up the proper product name, even if I get the product name wrong.
Uh, beautiful.
We've seen rag at work through a graphical user interface.
We've seen it being able to take a question, turn it into a vector, look it up in chroma, find associated
relevant context, put that in the system prompt, send that off to an LLM and get back an answer which
shows expertise in the area.
That is Rag in a nutshell, and not only in a nutshell, but also rag in five lines of code.
Courtesy of Long-chain.
119 - Well, I imagine you are pleasantly surprised by how easy it's been to build a rag pipeline, and you
may be thinking to yourself, I wonder that's that's all well and good, but we've been doing it very
much in a notebook and in experimental way, and hopefully you're comfortable doing that.
It's important to be able to have an experimenter's hat on, but there comes a point when you want to
take the hat off and put on like, like something that's ready to to engineer this and to be ready to
implement it in production.
And to do so, we would want to do that in Python modules.
And so that is what I've done.
I've taken the code we put in the notebook, and I've turned them into modules for us to look at.
And that is the way that you would do it yourself as well.
If you're building proper ingest pipes.
And the the way I've done it is I've made two different Python modules and I've put them in a single
directory called implementation, a package, a Python package implementation.
And the reason I've done that is because later this week we are going to improve on this rag and we're
going to want to have a different implementation.
And I want to be able to swap it.
And I want you to make an implementation as well and make it even better.
And so this allows us to be able to have like swappable implementations in one directory.
There are two modules that we will have in this directory.
Okay.
What are these two modules.
So the first of them is called ingest.py.
And that's basically like the lab that we did not today but yesterday.
The one that is going to read in a knowledge base, turn documents into chunks, turn chunks into vectors,
store them in chroma that will all be in ingest.
Py you can do.
You've run, ingest py and it's going to do all that.
And it could be part of your, your your Rag pipeline, your data ingest pipeline that has new files
arrive.
This automatically gets called and it runs.
The other module is called answer.py.
And it's a very simple module.
It has two key functions that could be called by the outside world.
One of them is called fetch context.
Given a question we'll get relevant context and the other is called answer question.
Given a question and some history, it will fetch relevant context and answer the question that is in
answer.
And the idea is that you could change this.
You could write your own ingestor to ingest the data and your own answer to accompany it, using consistent
encoder and so on.
You just have to implement fetch context and answer question and everything else will work.
So that's that's the scaffolding that I put in place.
And those are the two modules that I have written.
So how will we actually use these modules.
Well I've got a few ways that we'll be able to to put these into practice.
And the one we'll do today is that I've made a gradio application called App.py, which is in in the
week five, and the parent directory to implementation and App.py will bring up a nice Gradio user interface.
And we'll call answer.py to get answers to questions.
And we can always swap out with a different implementation and still keep that same UI.
And it's.
So that means that that ultimately we're going to be able to do two different, uh, UV runs.
We'll be able to say UV run ingests Py will actually do that from within the implementation directory.
So we'll do CD implementation.
And then you've run ingest.py and it will run the whole ingest.
And you could imagine this could be something if you had data pipes.
This could be something that is automatically triggered whenever a file changes in that directory.
Or a cron job runs this every hour or something like that.
So.
So this will automatically populate our Chrome data store.
And then from the week five directory, the parent directory we can do you've run App.py.
And that of course will launch our UI.
Okay.
Let's go and have a look at this.
So in week five there is this folder implementation.
And sure enough it just has these two classes two class two modules.
Ingest and answer.
Let's start by looking at ingest.
And this really is just the stuff from lab to lab.
One was when we did the fake version.
Lab two was the proper version.
You can look at lab two and compare it.
You'll see that it's basically the same stuff.
I've tidied it up a little bit to put it in ingest pie.
Um, this is this is a way to make sure we've got the right path to our database and our knowledge base.
This is where we are creating the embeddings, the hugging face embeddings.
And then you can see I've got fetch documents, fetches the documents using lang chains code create
chunks using the recursive character text splitter.
The chunk size is 1000, an overlap of 200 characters per chunk, and we split up the documents that
gives us the chunks, create the embeddings, deletes chroma if it's already there, and then creates
chroma passing in the chunks, passing in the embeddings, passing in the directory name.
And then it prints that we've created the vectors with the dimensions.
And then if this is you've run, what should it do.
Well it should fetch the documents, create the chunks from those documents, create the embeddings
from those chunks.
And then we're done.
That's that's what ingest Pie does.
Should we see it working.
Let's have a shot.
Okay, so first of all, we bring up a new terminal window and cursor that is control shift and backtick
to have a new terminal.
Uh, or you can also go to the view menu and select terminal to open a terminal.
And we start in the LM engineering directory.
So we do CD week five to go into week five.
And then we're going to go into the implementation directory CD implementation.
If I do an LZ you'll see we have ingest Pi and Pi are right there.
We do.
You've run ingest dot pi and take a drum roll and off it goes.
So it's doing a fetch documents.
Then it's going to do create chunks of those documents then create embeddings.
And then it will print ingestion complete as it prints faster than I can say.
All of that.
And it says there are 413 vectors with 384 dimensions in the vector store.
That is a successful ingest run.
Okay, time to look at answer dot pi.
So control and backtick again takes out that terminal.
Or you can just press the bin or the X button over there.
Go to answer.py.
Let's have a look at this.
As I say, it is just the same code from lab three here.
Same same set of imports.
Slightly fancier way of making sure we're looking at the right place for the vector database in a platform
independent way.
Uh, same same model right here.
All mini LM L62.
Note that there are those two different places.
If we change this model two two places to change it.
Retrieval.
Okay I have separated this.
This is how many chunks get included.
Get retrieved and included in the prompt.
I think we saw that it was it was doing for before.
You can actually specify how many chunks you want.
And here we're specifying five same system prompt as before.
As before we create the vector store the retriever and the LM.
These are the two key objects that that we needed to build that we can call invoke on and fetch.
Context is one of those functions I told you about the big, big, big functions.
We're implementing.
It takes a question and it just calls retriever dot invoke for that question.
And this is where we pass in k.
K is five so that five chunks are retrieved.
And then this is the other big thing.
Answer question.
It takes a question and it takes some history.
So I've got something here.
It's a little bit more than the five lines.
You might say.
There's more than five lines.
There are a few more lines now because there's a couple of things that I'm doing differently here,
which relates to slight problems with that naive Gradio app from last time.
I wonder if you found them.
If you were playing with it, you might have very quickly discovered that there were a couple of hitches
with it.
So the first hitch, of course, is that we were completely ignoring history.
So if the user said, if you said like, like, um, who is who is Avery?
And then you said, and what did she do before?
It wouldn't be able to answer that because it wouldn't know who.
Every time.
It was like a completely fresh message.
We weren't passing in the conversation history every quarter.
An LLM is stateless.
It would have been just like when I said my name is Ed.
Who am I?
A couple of weeks ago, you saw that it just doesn't work at all.
So this time I have I have done this properly.
We take in the history and we do actually make use of it.
Um, so lang chain, this is passed in as the normal list of dicts from the open AI format.
Lang chain doesn't like that Lang chain likes its fancy type of messages with with that human message
object and an AI message object.
And there's actually a convenient way of saying, um, the convert to messages.
So lang chain object that I that I lang chain function that I imported here convert to messages.
And if you do that then it converts open AI style messages into lang chain style messages.
So we do that.
And then when I call invoke LM invoke I'm calling that with the proper formatted messages, with the
original, with the system message, and then with all of the history converted into Lang chain format.
That's not clear to you.
Put in a few print statements.
When you run it a few times, you'll see exactly what I mean.
Changing it from being the OpenAI format that Gradio passes in into being the Lang chain format of these
system message and human messages and AI messages in a list.
So that's what this does, and it packages it up nicely so we can call invoke.
There's one other thing I'm doing which you may have spotted.
This extra function I put in called Combined question.
And this one is kind of subtle.
And you might want to implement this differently.
This kind of depends on how you want to do things.
See if you can figure out what's going on there.
So the answer is this is this is a subtle thing which Lang used to to do behind the scenes in a way
that that meant that you didn't have as much control over it.
So I like the fact that it's very much in our hands with this implementation.
So the question is, when you're looking up the relevant context, should you only do that based on
the most recent question from the user, or do you need to look at all of the conversations so far and
look up the context based on that?
Or perhaps you should do it individually for each of those questions and gather all of that context.
There's different ways to do it, and it really depends on the use case.
It depends on what you're trying to do.
It depends on the scenario.
So there's no right answer.
So I used to have this that it only looked at the context based on the most recent message you gave.
But that wasn't great because you could say something like, uh, who is Avery?
And it would it would answer, of course.
And then you could say, and what did she do before?
And even though it's getting the full history so it knows we're talking about Avery, when it looks
up the context, it's looking it up on the on the statement, what did she do before.
And there's no relevant context for that.
It doesn't know that that's Avery.
So perhaps a better way to do it is when fetching the context, don't just fetch context based on the
most recent message, fetch context based on all the things the user has said so far, package that
up.
put it into a combined question, and fetch the context on that combined question.
So again, if that's not super clear to you, put in some print statements.
You'll see exactly what I mean.
When I'm looking up in Chrome.
I don't just look up based on the most recent question from the user, I do it based on everything the
user has said.
And maybe if you're one step ahead of me, you can think there's a better way of doing that and there
is a better way of doing it.
And we may we may mention that later in the week, perhaps when we think of more advanced implementations.
But you can puzzle right now and see if you can figure out what would be a nicer way of doing it, to
make sure that we do query well on something really good that's based perhaps on the most recent thing,
perhaps on some of the the history as well.
Have a think about that.
We will revisit for now.
Uh, let's press on.
We've got our answer question function.
I think what's what's what's left surely is for us to try this out.
And what better way to try it out than in a nice Gradio UI?
120 - Well, just before we bring up our Whizzy interface, let me just show you a less whizzy one.
Uh, what's broken with day three's notebook that we looked at before?
You remember that we had our very nice, elegant, simple five line question answering that did just
fine, and we brought up a nice UI on it.
And here it is.
And we could say, who is Avery?
And it's gonna do just fine.
It's gonna, of course, do a rag lookup.
It's going to give us a great answer.
Well, check this out.
If I say how much is her salary?
Uh, we are going to get something, uh, odd back.
Samantha Green's current salary is 70,000.
What is that about?
Two things have gone on that are a problem here.
The two things that I showed you, we fixed, uh, in the in the proper module implementation, the
two problems with this, uh, with this simplistic version.
First of all, it wasn't even looking at the history that didn't get passed to the LM.
So when I say her there, it has no idea that I'm still referring to Avery, but even if it had known,
it would still have had a problem, because that this is the text that's being used for the Rag lookup.
And because of that, it's just picking some random document with salary in it.
The first one that happens to be Samantha Green.
And that's why we're getting a, uh, like a, like a red herring of an answer, something that seems
to be a completely different topic.
So those are the two problems.
We're not maintaining conversation history when we call the LM, but also we're looking up context based
off this.
So the two fixes that I just showed you in that longer version, first of them is to build up the proper
history and pass that into lang chain using that Lang chain conversion function.
And secondly, I'm not just looking up the context on this.
I'm looking at the context on the combination of all of this text so that it would in fact include Avery
in there.
That's why I did it.
Now you see it broken.
Let's see how it looks in the new Gradio UI.
And so I bring up a new terminal with shift control Backtick.
Where is it?
There it is.
Okay.
And now I go into week five and now I do UV run app Dot Pi, and it's going to spring up a new window,
I hope.
After a small pause while Gradio chugs into gear and there it is.
Bam!
Here we go!
The ensure expert assistant.
A nice little UI, and we've got a conversation on the left and we've got retrieved.
Context will appear here on the right.
Isn't that cool?
All right, so obviously I could say who is aviary and we'll see how it does okay.
What have we got.
So we get a good answer.
Of course we know this answer.
And on the right here relevant context, we have the information coming back here along with its source,
the place that it came from.
And this white text is what was actually provided in the context to the LM.
The orange is is just a note of the metadata showing us the source of where it came from.
But this was not provided to to the LM, just these white blobs.
Here it all is.
This is all the information that was passed about Avery.
How many chunks do we have?
We have one, two.
Three.
Four.
Five.
Five.
Five chunks were retrieved because we set K to five.
Beautiful.
And now I can come back here and I can say.
And what is her salary?
And we hope that we will see a combination of things.
Avery Lancaster's current salary is 2.25.
We see that the relevant context it's retrieved is related to this text and this text.
So it's still all about Avery.
The current salary is right up there in the second chunk.
And so it also the the chat was sent with history to uh for one nano.
And it was able to say we're talking about Avery for sure.
And I've got the context.
I know her salary.
That's how it responds.
This is rag with history with lookup.
Fantastic.
It's working.
Now let me go back into cursor.
I just want to go into the knowledge base, into the employees, and I want to find one employee document
in particular.
I want to find Maxine Thompson.
Here she is.
Here is Maxine Thompson.
Let's bring that up in a nice markdown style.
Let's have a look.
This is her HR record.
We'll get the terminal out of the way there.
Uh, if we look around here, you'll see that she was recognized as the inaugural innovator of the year
in 2023, receiving a prestigious IIoT award, the inaugural innovator of the year award in 2023.
Good for Maxine.
Now, I wonder whether or not the the R rag pipeline is going to be able to retrieve that.
That is a challenging one.
Let's find out.
Let's go back to the terminal.
Let's start our Gradio app up.
Here we go.
And then we're going to ask the question.
We are going to say okay then tell us who won the prestigious I o t y award.
Give it that.
Let's see what it can do.
It says Maxine was recognized.
It gets that right.
And you can see over on the right what's going on that it's coming up and we'll see right there that,
uh, it found the details in here somewhere.
Uh, there we go.
It's because she received the prestigious award.
Was also mentioned in her promotion, and it's got it right there with her name.
But you may notice something that's not perfect about this.
You may notice that it says Maxine, but it doesn't say Maxine Thompson.
It doesn't realize her full name.
And that's that's this slightly tiresome thing that this chunk that it that it found here mentions that
she received that award in this rather nice small chunk, but it doesn't have her full name in that
chunk, because her full name was at the top of the HR document and not in the middle.
And this is an example of a nasty little problem with Rag with chunking that the chunk might answer
the question, but it might not contain some crucial context from elsewhere in the document, meaning
that you get back an okay but not perfect answer.
So that's an interesting one for us to observe.
It's okay, but it's not as complete as it could be.
And there are other problems too.
There are some problems with the way that I did that history lookup, and that's slightly hacky way.
Suppose I start a new conversation and I say, uh, who is Avery?
Uh, like like this.
Uh, who is Avery?
And we get back on the right and answer and then say, uh, and what did Avery do before?
We'll get back some more conversation about Avery before founding Ensure Elm, she worked as a senior
product manager or coming from similar chunks, working well.
And now we'll say who won the prestigious.
Award and see how it does.
And strangely, it hasn't got the answer.
It doesn't know.
Why has that happened?
Well, that's because I made that change.
So that when I'm retrieving context, I combine this and this and this.
And now the thing that I'm looking up in my data store, it's got too much other stuff other than I.o.t.
It's got too much about aviary.
And so if we look over on the right, it's still finding chunks about aviary.
That's not very satisfactory.
So we have a problem.
The the change that I made has made it better at looking up context that relates to the whole conversation,
but in doing so it's made it poorer.
If you then change the topic and want to talk about something completely different, it's still dredging
up context from earlier in the conversation and that's no good.
So how would you fix that?
There are many ways to fix it, but there are some ways are better than others, and we will work on
problems like this over the course of the next couple of days.
But the real takeaway I have for you is that rag is something that can be quite hit and miss.
And we're going to really double down on this tomorrow.
But but it's it's important to recognize that Rag is this very experimental, really quite hacky approach
of trying to look up relevant context.
And it can frequently go wrong.
You can get good examples of rag working really, really well.
Like it's surfacing that Maxine won the award.
But you can also see that it didn't quite get her full name.
It wasn't complete.
And then after we've talked about Avery for a bit, it's not able to find out who won the Coty Award.
So so it's quite easy to get it off track.
So the, the, the right way to approach Rag is to come up with each problem like this as a new problem
to be solved.
And it's a bit like whack a mole, you find something and then you fix it, and then you find another
problem and you fix that.
And sometimes in fixing one problem, you cause another problem, as we just have as I, as I fix that
that history, I then I then created this new problem.
So a lot about Rag is getting after these kinds of puzzles and making your rag system better and better
through a series of different techniques.
That's what Rag is all about.
And there's a technique to allow us to do that in a more scientific way.
And that's what we'll be covering tomorrow.
And in the meantime, before I leave the screen, the mission for you before we go to tomorrow is to
bring up this user interface.
You've run App.py.
After doing a CD implementation, you've run, ingest py to populate your data store.
Then do a you've run app.py and experiment and find the rough edges.
Find what it's good at, find what it's bad at.
Look at the chunks on the right.
Understand why are chunks getting surfaced?
Try and get really great examples of rag doing an amazing job at showing deep expertise about information
buried in the documents, but then also find cases where it foolishly is unable to answer something
that's clearly there in the documents, and get a really good sense for what's working well.
And what are the blind spots?
What are the rough edges and have that on our list because we're going to get after them, fix them
as we make our rag better and better, starting tomorrow and before tomorrow.
I do hope that you're going to take a moment, uh, to, you know, if you're a wine drinker, then
I'd say it deserves a nice glass of wine.
Uh, maybe even a glass of champagne.
You have built a rag product.
You can do this.
You can now write your own ingest dot pi.
You can write your own app.py and your dot pi and have something which is able to vectorize, chunk,
vectorize, store a bunch of documents, and then you can ask questions on them.
And it apparently has expertise across your entire knowledge base and only you.
You secretly know that it doesn't at any one time have knowledge of the whole knowledge base.
It's doing this trick of using vector similarity to do a semantic search over your data, pluck out
a few chunks of relevant context, shove them in the prompt, getting back an answer based on that knowledge
each time.
It's it's a trick.
It's a conjuring trick.
It works really well, and it gives the impression that you've got something that's an expert on your
entire knowledge base, but it has some rough edges.
So as a recap, you can now generate code, generate text with front end models.
With open source models, you can use tools.
You can confidently choose the right model for your projects and and add it to the list.
You can implement a Rag expert question answering system and the secret, the dark secret.
Just.
Just between you and me is that it's actually quite easy from next time.
Next time though, we're going to get more disciplined.
You can explain the importance of evaluations evals.
So critical going to be able to measure the effectiveness of your Rag system.
And we'll be able to experiment with things like encoders and chunking strategies and use our metrics
use our evaluations to to be able to to to gauge how much difference we're making and to be able to
make decisions about different solutions we want to build.
All right.
Lots of stuff.
Tomorrow it's going to be really, really great.
Um, very much looking forward to it.
I hope you are too.
I will see you then.
121 - Are you enjoying Rag Week?
I should hope so.
Welcome to week five, day four as we continue our adventures in Rag.
And today I gotta tell you, it's a bit of a hardcore day.
We are gonna cover.
We're gonna cover perhaps the single most important topic of the entire course.
We're going to cover it today.
It's about evaluations, about evals.
It's about what it takes to put scientific rigor around a practice which is really more of an art form.
And, as usual, to reinforce what you've already learned, you can already generate code.
You can generate text using a bunch of closed and open source models.
You can choose the right model for your project.
And now, as of yesterday, you can implement your own Rag pipeline, an expert question answering system
using Rag.
We built it.
It worked.
Congrats!
Now we turn to this crucial topic of okay, you've built it.
How do you tell if it's actually working?
Well, like how do you gauge the performance?
And we can we can do this in a couple of ways.
We can we can judge the performance of our retrieval process.
How good are we at retrieving relevant context?
And we can also judge the performance of the of the question answering itself.
Does it give good answers to the questions as a result?
And that, of course is most aligned with with our with our business objective.
And today we're going to do all of that.
And then we're also, as a result of that, going to experiment with things like the chunking strategy
and the encoder and see how it affects our evals.
So I'd like to motivate evals by explaining what their is that what's great about rag.
And then perhaps what's not so great about rag starting with what's great.
Well of course first of all, it's so quick to get something out there.
Last time it took us a matter of minutes to have a question answering system that knew all about Ensure
Elm.
It's really very quick to build these things.
And a similar point is that it's quite a scalable approach.
We could easily have had 100 times as much data ingest.
We've taken a bit longer.
But but that's not that could be left to run overnight.
We'd have had a populated vector data store and then doing the query would be really fast, so we could
have tapped into a massive expertise.
The contrast to these first two points is doing something like fine tuning, which we'll do later in
the course, which is which is hard work, takes time and is expensive.
This this is really quick.
And then of course rag saves on context length.
We don't need to to fill up the contents with lots of context, lots of information.
We just select the part that matters.
And then a very similar point is that it avoids us polluting the context with lots of information that's
irrelevant, not needed.
To answer this question, we can focus the context window on the most relevant information for the LLM
to answer this exact question.
Now I know what you're thinking.
You're thinking, this all sounds great.
What's there not to love about rag?
It's amazing.
And everyone people love rag.
People talk about it all the time is how is it going to be a naysayer now and come up with bad things?
Well, here they are.
The first thing is that rag is basically a big old hack Transformers we built, transformers.
They have they have layers of the neural network which which are responsible for figuring out how to
pay attention to what matters in the input.
Uh, and that's what they're good at.
And they've been trained.
They've been they've been really good at doing that.
Our problem is that we've got too much information, and we don't want to waste our powerful transformer
spinning his wheels, trying to figure out that only this little tiny bit is important.
So we're using Rag.
We're using this encoder and vector similarity as a kind of hack, just to say, ah, we can probably
zoom in on this piece and that's probably all that matters.
And probably since the vectors associated with these chunks put them in different places, they're probably
irrelevant.
But there's a lot of probablys in there if you didn't notice.
And that's that's all part of the sort of hand-wavy hack that is rag.
It's a performance trick.
It's a way of just throwing out stuff that's probably not important.
Focusing in on what is.
But as a result, you have to you have to call it what it is.
It's basically a hack.
Okay.
And you're probably thinking, well, so what if it's a hack?
If it works well, that's the thing.
It doesn't always work.
It's very.
People like to say it's empirical, uh, which is the sort of fancy way of saying it's it's trial and
error.
It's very experimental.
You just have to try different approaches, try different rag techniques and see what works best.
Uh, it's not like this is always the right way.
I do quite often get questions from students that are like, I've got this setup and I've got this kind
of input, and now I need to know what should I what kind of encoder should I use?
What chunking should I use, what what should I use this kind of rag or this kind of rag and and it's
like I can have an instinct.
I can guess and I often do, and I'm always one with, with opinions.
But you don't know until you try it out.
It's very much about experiment.
Experiment, see what works best.
Uh, because it is, at the end of the day, just a sort of performance optimization to try and get
better results.
And as a result of all of this, I guess it's pretty much the same point.
But you can sometimes hit this unexpected situation when you think you're doing everything right, but
you ask a question like who won the prestigious award?
And you just get the answer, I don't know.
And you go, oh no, what's going on?
Now?
You roll up your sleeves, you dig in, you find out that it's surfacing at some context, but because
of your chunking strategy, because of something, the wrong bits of information are getting in there,
and you have to think about it slightly differently or add in a different flavor, or change a parameter.
Do something differently so that that question starts getting answered.
And sometimes it can be a bit of a of a whack a mole that you fix one problem and just another one pops
up somewhere else, and you fix that and another one pops up and you're constantly getting after these
little weird rag problems.
And this is, this is all because it's basically a hack.
And so these are the side effects of the fact that it's not a particularly scientific approach.
It's not like we're training the the attention heads of a transformer which, which, which would be
more rigorous, but rather it's a kind of shortcut to try and get the relevant context.
And my last point is, is really the same again.
But but just to say that the tyranny of rag is that ultimately what matters is what are the answers
to your questions, and it doesn't always end up the way you think.
Often with Rag, I've had this idea about a way to do something, and I've been like, that is a fantastic
idea, and I've built the idea and I've put lots of work into it, and I've made it all, put it all
together.
And then when I asked the question, I get the wrong answer or I get, I don't know.
And so sometimes the best ideas are things that you think that it's just gotta work just ends up not
working because because it's a bit of a hack.
Because you never quite know whether the right chunks will be surfaced.
So, so there's there's definitely again, it's really it's really back to the whack a mole.
It's something where there's different problems popping up.
You're trying to solve them.
But other problems are popping up and it's about trial and error experimenting until you get the outcomes
you need.
It's not always intuitive.
Sometimes things you think are going to work really well don't actually help.
And things that you think, oh, I'll just try this just in case.
And suddenly things are really great.
So so there is this very empirical, very experimental side to rag.
And so to give you a real sort of tangible sense of this, think about something like chunking.
It's something that you've only learned about in the last couple of days.
And unless you already knew about it, this idea that you take a document and rather than trying to
put that whole document in your vector store, you break it up into pieces and you take each of those
and you make a vector for that.
The thinking being that a question is probably going to apply to a chunk of your document rather than
the whole document.
Well, that sort of depends on the question.
And it depends on on whether it's on on how big your chunks are in a very in a strange way, if you
make your chunks too, too big, then there's too many questions being asked in here.
And it's unlikely that a particular question is going to be a close match to the entire document.
If we're asking about the I o t award for Maxine, and we have all of Maxine's HR document with lots
of information, then the question who won the I o t award is less likely to be close to her entire
history.
And so that that lends itself towards saying we should we should make small chunks so that Maxine's
II o t award is probably in a chunk.
Okay.
But if we do that, there's a risk that we get so small that we don't even have Maxine's name.
We only have her first name, say, which is a very problem that we have.
Uh, and we don't we don't have the part like the heading of the document which has her name on it.
And as a result, the chunk is too small.
And even though it gets selected, having that chunk in the context isn't enough to answer the question.
And so that's another kind of problem.
And so sometimes chunks need to be bigger.
Sometimes they need to be smaller.
Sometimes you need more overlap between them.
Any one of these things could make your rag performance better.
And so maybe you're thinking this sounds nuts.
Uh, you know, it sounds like it's some sort of alchemy that you that you use to figure out how to
make this thing work, that I'm only going to get through tons and tons of experience of doing this
myself.
Well, well, luckily, no, that that there is, there is like a, like a like a shortcut.
There's like a process.
There's a way that you can take this art form, this this alchemy that is rag and, and put science
around it.
And that comes down, as, you know, to evaluations that that's what evals are about.
And, and this is actually a bit of a recurring theme with LMS, which is why I mentioned this is perhaps
the most important topic that a lot about working with LMS is very experimental, very iterative, very
much try the prompt, try this.
And and that can feel sometimes very unsatisfying.
And the way to make it satisfying is to build evals, find a way to measure in a quantitative way the
performance of your setup.
Then you can experiment, you can iterate, and you have a way to gauge whether you're getting better
or worse in a way that you've decided you've signed up for.
This is going to be my North Star.
This is my metric.
I'm going to keep iterating until this metric is higher, and that that gives you a technique.
It gives you a procedure around the alchemy.
122 - Okay.
Now let's talk evaluations.
So as I say here they are.
Everything that's so important.
This is a this is a big slide.
So three steps.
Step one is to build your golden data set collate curate a set of questions and answers that are going
to be your your reference answers against which you will measure your performance.
So if it's in Shoreham, then you build this set of questions about the company that are great prototypical
questions.
And and with them you basically there are many different ways to do it.
It's not there's one way but the way that I'm going to use for this week, and it's a common kind of
way, is you come up with a set of questions, and then for each one, you can identify a few keywords
that should be in the relevant context.
That'll allow us to test that the chunks that we surface have these keywords in it.
So of course, if the question is, uh, who won the prestigious IIO o t award, then we would want
Maxine and Thompson her first name and last name to be two keywords that ideally are going to be in
the chunks.
And we already know that Maxine makes it in there, but the last name does not.
So so that's the kind of thing.
And then we'd also want a reference answer, a perfect answer which which is something like Maxine Thompson
one or Thomas won the prestigious Jyoti Award.
So so we would want we would want that as well.
Now where do you get these from?
Well, you can of course, just come up with them yourself by looking through your data and coming up
with questions, telling yourself, look, these are the questions that if my system can answer these
questions, then I am satisfied.
Then I'm then I'm good.
This is this is where I set the bar.
But there's a better place you can get the questions from.
And where is that?
Well, that is from your users.
This if this is a system that's actually out there in production, maybe, maybe this is something that
you're trying to improve an existing system.
Maybe this is something where you're trying to be able to automate existing questions that people have
that come in as emails today and take 24 hours for someone to turn around.
That means that you have real end user questions and you've got real expert answers.
And that is always your best, best source of golden data.
And you might have lots of it.
Uh, so so that is that is a brilliant place to go.
And it's worth pointing out as well, that this test set can be a living, breathing thing.
You can add to it over time as you build up more examples.
Because of course, one of the one of the disadvantages of this approach is that because you're going
to be optimizing for this test set, your system is going to be highly dependent on these tests.
And it might turn out that you do a good job of of solving all of these tests.
But but it doesn't generalize.
Well given a new kind of question, it suddenly fails.
So so it's it's very important with evals that you spend time trying to build the best possible test
data set and that you are constantly adding to it, particularly if you find problems.
And then typically there are two types of tests that you would do using your test data.
First of all, you would measure how effective is your retrieval.
How good are you at retrieving relevant content?
And there's a bunch of metrics you can measure.
There's actually lots and lots and lots of metrics, and people have their favorite ones.
And I'm going to I'm going to mention probably the ones that I think are most popular.
I'm not going to I'm not going into too much detail.
I'll just tell you the ones you should know about.
But but it's not like it's super critical.
Uh, and I'll go through the formula in just a second.
But MRI mean reciprocal rank, which basically it's, it's one if which is the best number if your very
first chunk, uh, always has the, the information that you want the relevant content, then you'd
have an MRI of one and that would be great.
Ndcg normalized discounted cumulative gain.
Which kind of measures how good are you at surfacing?
Uh, the most important context to to the very top.
And then recall and precision I'll go through in a minute.
But these are all ways that you measure specifically that you're surfacing the right context.
And this is good because it's very closely measuring what you're doing with rag.
So it's very similar to to to a model metric.
It's something which is closely tied to the performance of your model.
And so making a small change to Rag will will make a change to this metric instantly.
And you can rapidly iterate.
You can quickly iterate on things, change the chunk size, see what happens.
And that's what we're going to do in a minute.
Okay.
And then the other kind of thing to test is the actual answers themselves.
So you've got the answer that you've got the reference answer that you've already recorded.
And now you've got an answer that your rag system makes based off the context.
Uh, and you can compare the two.
And of course, there are various ways of doing it.
You can you can sort of do things like a word comparison, looking for how many, how the frequency
of overlapping words.
But that's kind of janky.
It would be nicer to, to somehow use Llms in some way.
Like maybe you could vectorize them and see how similar they are.
But it turns out the way that's used a lot, which is really easy, is called LLM as a judge, which
is when you ask an LLM to to to think about this and to say whether or not this is a good answer in
the context of the reference answer.
So you're basically saying to another LLM, hey, here's an answer.
Here's a reference answer.
Please score this answer compared to the reference answer.
And Llms are very good at that.
And it's a relatively easy task for an LLM.
And it's always good.
It's recommended to use a stronger LLM as your judge.
You should because it's going to be evaluating.
We're going to use a pretty lightweight one for us today because it's a simple task just comparing these
two.
And you can either just get it to to give it a score from 1 to 5, or you can you can dimension it.
You can ask for a score in a few ways.
How accurate is the answer?
How complete is the answer.
So Maxine on its own wouldn't be good enough.
We'd want to see Maxine Thompson wants to see both names together, to be to be confident that it's
complete.
And then how relevant is it?
Which is kind of the flip side of complete.
It might say Maxine Thompson, but then give lots of other stuff about Maxine that's not actually answering
the question.
Too much extra stuff.
That would be a relevance.
Ding.
So, so to score well on all three, it would have to be an answer that is, that is accurate.
That's right.
That has all the information.
It's complete and it doesn't have any irrelevant information.
So it's all relevant.
That would be accuracy completeness and relevance.
But these are all ways that you measure the quality of your answer.
So you could probably see like a familiar trade off happening here.
Measuring retrieval is something that is that is very much in our control.
It's if retrieval goes down we know exactly what to do.
Like it's so easy to see what's happening, what's the context that's being surfaced, how can we control
it.
So it's very much it's like a very close to the model, the retrieval measure.
but it's not the ultimate business problem we're trying to solve.
The ultimate business problem we're trying to solve is good answers.
So measuring answers whilst it's slightly less in our control, it's more aligned with the kind of end
user objective that we have.
And of course, there's more metrics even further downstream.
We can we can actually gather end user feedback on the answer.
And you know, if you if you use ChatGPT occasionally, you get prompted, uh, how is it doing?
Which of these two answers do you prefer?
And that's what's going on.
You know, we're collecting it's collecting training data so that it can, it can, uh, address it
can it can correct itself in the future.
So, so doing that measuring, getting end user feedback is always going to be the best.
But that is the furthest down downstream.
It's it's then the hardest to tie all the way back to the accuracy of your model.
So generally we we typically would measure retrieval and then the accuracy of the answers.
The retrieval is the one that's that's fastest to iterate over and to see the instant impact.
The answers are a bit harder.
You need to connect more dots to figure out why the answers aren't scoring well, but it is more aligned
with the end goal.
Okay, we're about to go and do stuff.
I can I can sense your antsy and I'm gonna do a little bit more talking and then we go do stuff.
I just want to tell you about these metrics okay.
So MRI.
MRI stands for mean reciprocal rank.
Sounds kind of technical but it's not particularly.
It's just saying okay.
So take take how far up in the chunks that were surfaced.
How far up was the first hit?
The first time that we got relevant content.
And and if it's if it's in the first location, call that a one.
If it's in the second location, call that one over, call that one over two the reciprocal of two a
half and then one over three, a third, a quarter, and so on.
So top, top one would be one a half, a third, a quarter, a fifth.
And just take the average of that.
That is the mean reciprocal rank.
So an MRR of one would mean that you always surface the hit in the first chunk that gets that gets retrieved.
So that would be really great.
That's MRI.
And then Ndcg.
It's not as common.
So I'm not gonna I'm not going to get stuck on this one.
I'm going to show you the formula.
The formula has logs in it.
So it's like not not so easy.
But but the idea is that it's it's not just looking at the first hit.
It looks at all of the hits and it asks the question how how well distributed are your the hits in these
chunks?
Does it tend to be that the chunks that are relevant are the first few chunks, or do they come lower
down?
So it's more about the distribution of the chunks in your results.
But if all of the if the chunks that had relevant content are all your top few ones, then you would
score a perfect one with your ndcg.
Okay.
And precision and recall are very common terms from from machine learning from statistics.
You may have heard of them before.
They're often they're often said that way around precision and recall.
But when it comes to rag, recall is the more important one of the two.
So let's start with that.
So so I put it here as recall at k where k is a number like recall at three or recall at five.
And it means recall at three would be to say what percentage of your tests if you took the top three
chunks, was it a hit?
There was relevant context in the top three chunks that that is called recall at three.
And so if you scored 50%, it would mean like in half of the cases, half of your test cases, the top
three chunks had relevant context somewhere in them.
That's that's what what recall at three would mean.
Recall at k would mean in the top k chunks in whatever percentage of your tests you had a hit.
And there's a sort of similar.
In our case, we're going to be dealing with lots of keywords.
Um, and so it's a little bit more complicated because, because you could have a case where all the
keywords is in one chunk, or some of the keywords are in different chunks.
So, so typically with this case you'd use something like keyword coverage percentage.
Um, what what percentage of your keywords are covered across the the test set.
But it's a similar it's a slight variation on recall.
It's a sort of recall style metric.
Okay.
And then precision is what proportion of the chunks that got surfaced had relevant content in them.
So if K is is is is five let's say.
So if you're always surfacing five chunks then on average how many of those five have relevant content.
You see how that's like the other way round of thinking about it.
So there a score of 50% would mean okay, in about half the chunks that get surfaced in each one of
our of our rags, we're surfacing relevant content, relevant context, even if that's that's true for
all of the test cases, 100% of the test cases, but your precision is 50%.
If in each case, it's only half of the top five.
Uh, that, uh, on average, I guess maybe if it were six, it would be three out of the six, uh,
that are getting this, uh, hit in that chunk.
So that one is a bit of a head scratcher because you might think, okay, so what?
Why do I care if what surely recall is much more important?
I care about knowing what percentage of my tests have a hit.
Well, the answer is if what you're really concerned about is making sure that you're not wasting your
models time with irrelevant content with distraction.
If it's a problem for you, if bad chunks are being surfaced, then precision would be a problem because
you'd want to really scrutinize precision, because that's what precision is capturing.
How much what percentage of your chunks are hits?
Uh, that's what that's about.
But it's not so common.
You can imagine in in rag, we don't care too much if we've got some irrelevant content in there.
What we really care about is recall or keyword coverage.
We really want to make sure that we're doing a good job of of surfacing what matters somewhere in the
chunks.
Ideally high up in the chunks that get surfaced when the user asks a question.
Okay.
And I realize I hit you with lots of stuff.
Lots of like, uh, expressions and maths and stuff, and it's not that important.
It's useful that you've that you've seen it and heard these definitions.
We're going to look at them.
We're going to look at the code.
We're going to we're going to play with it.
I think knowing MRI is a good thing.
So we'll cover that more.
Knowing what keyword coverage means, it's kind of obvious and understanding that it's a recall style
metric.
That's all good.
And the rest of it it's it's it's not super important.
But of course, understanding the three things curator test set, measure the effectiveness of your
retrieval and measure how the quality of your answers put in place a scientific way of doing it, and
use that as your basis for experimentation.
That is the key.
That's what it's about.
And that's what we're going to go and do right now.
123 - Okay, we're in Corsa.
We're going to week five.
We're going to day four.
Welcome to evaluation.
So such an important topic this is this is so crucial I do want to ask you to keep in mind how will
you apply this to your business.
Remember that that rag week this week is it's useful for any business.
It's one it's one of the most immediately applicable LM solutions.
And so so really be thinking about how can you apply this to business problems that you face.
I, I often find that people are so focused on architecture and things like which Rag framework should
I use?
Should I use long chain or should I not use long chain?
Should I use any one of these other ones?
And I often feel like it's because it's engineers falling into their comfort zone of asking questions
about architecture.
It honestly doesn't matter if you use long chain or not, it doesn't make any difference.
It's just about whether you use their glue code.
What does make a difference?
How are you evaluating success?
Have you really thought that through?
Have you thought about how to align the performance of your Rag system with end business goals.
That's the hard stuff.
And and you may say that sounds like it's more business than technical, but the people that can really
understand it are the technical people.
It's you with your knowledge of the problem you're trying to solve that can connect those dots.
And so that's why it's a superpower to be able to do just that.
Connect the dots between what you're working on here and end business outcomes.
Okay.
Rant over.
Let's get started.
So we are going to do some evaluations in a notebook.
And then we're going to move to modules.
And I've got a few things to point out to you.
I have a whole, uh, Python package here called evaluation a directory inside week five.
Uh, and if we come into this, there's a few things that I might want to show you.
One of them is this.
This file tests.
You know what jsonl is jsonl you you do know.
Okay, well, then just don't listen to this part.
L is a type of JSON file where each line is a well-formed JSON document, but the whole file is not.
And you might be like what?
In other words, it's like a JSON list, but without the square brackets on either side and without
the commas at the end of each line.
Just each line is a dictionary, a JSON object on in its own right.
And so you might say, okay, why not just put it in a collection and put commas?
Because this sort of file format is much more convenient for being able to quickly append to.
You can put extra lines in it, and it's much more convenient for this kind of thing, for it's like
the JSON version of a CSV file where each line represents a row, and these files are very common for
things like test data.
And they're going to be very common for batch data that we will get to at some point when we make batch
API calls.
So good that you know about Jsonl if you did it already.
So in each row here I have a question.
And the question on row one might be familiar to you, a question like who won the prestigious award
in 2023.
Some key words.
These are words that should be surfaced in the context, and then a reference answer will come after
that.
And I do believe I also put each one with a category.
You'll see at the end there is indeed a category direct fact.
So each one is categorized as well because that's going to be convenient for us.
Now you might you might say, is this like the standard format for tests?
No, there's not a particular standard format.
Although when we look at data in Huggingface, you'll see that there is like a huggingface format,
but this is just JSON file, a bit like having a CSV file full of stuff that we will be using for our
testing.
You can use whatever format you want because we're going to load it in using Python right now.
So I've got I've got this Python module Test.py.
It's a very complicated Python module.
It's a, it uses pedantic, uh, and I imagine most of you have probably experienced pedantic in some
way.
I'm not I'm not going to cover it in detail now, but it's the kind of thing we'll probably touch on
quite a few times along the way.
Uh, but this is something where pedantic is a way that you can describe JSON schema with a Python object
by having a Python object be a subclass of base model.
And on my agenda course we use a lot of Pydantic because it comes up a lot with gigantic framework programming,
but so you import base model and then you can you see here that I make something called test question
has questions keywords, the reference answer and the category.
And I have one single function load tests which loads them all in very simple stuff.
This is all just just very much boilerplate Python.
And what that means is I come back here to this, this notebook run a second ago.
I can import that that very module we were just looking at test.
I can call load tests and that has just loaded them all in.
Let me tell you how many of them there are.
There are 150 of these tests.
Okay.
Let's take the first one test in location zero.
And then if we just loaded it in JSON, we'd have to treat it like a dictionary and select each thing
in square brackets.
But because we're using Pydantic, we can call Python variable names question, category, reference
answer and keywords.
Let's see it.
So the question who won the prestigious Jyoti Award in 2023.
The type?
The category.
It's a direct fact.
The answer Maxine Thompson, uh, won the prestigious inaugural innovator of the year award in 2023.
And the keywords Maxine Thompson I o t y not very shocking.
You can see it's loaded it in from the jsonl.
We've got it in a set of tests.
You can do the same for your business.
This is all very standard stuff.
And yeah, hopefully thinking wow, gosh, editor is a hard worker writing those 150 questions.
But hopefully you're not thinking that because you know perfectly well I wrote the first one and then
I said, okay, Claude.
Ha.
Uh, and of course, not only not only do you know that llms are great at generating synthetic data,
but you might even have built a synthetic data generator yourself in week three as part of that exercise,
in which case you could see you've already actually experimented with building JSON data sets, and
maybe you already made a JSON data set, but if not, you can come back and use that to make one for
your business that you can use for testing your own rag.
Okay.
All right.
The next thing we're gonna do is we're just going to see how many do we have in each category.
And this is a little bit of fancy Python.
If you're not familiar, there's a there's a class called Counter and Collections which allows you to
count things up like the number of categories.
We can do that.
And we can see we've got 70 questions that are about direct facts, 20 that are that are temporal,
a quarter like like, uh, the timing.
How long was someone somewhere that kind of question, 20 questions are in a category called spanning,
which are questions that rag has a really hard time with, which are questions that need you to look
across multiple documents to be able to answer them, like how many employees have a salary more than
$60,000?
And that is something which is like the Achilles heel of rag, because it won't be in any one chunk.
It'll be across many, uh, comparative uh, who's been around for longer.
Two employees numerical and anything to do with with like who's who's salary is above this much or something
like that uh, relationship who reports to who, that kind of thing.
And holistic.
Another Achilles heel of rag a question which which is something that pertains to to to everything as
a whole that you might only know if you'd read a lot of the documents.
So that's that's really hard for rag because it only selects a few chunks at a time.
So both the spanning and the holistic category, I've only got a small number of questions in them,
but they are two of the areas which rag struggles with the most.
Okay, and if this is all a bit too numbers for you and you want more action, we're gonna get to action.
But this is good stuff.
This is the kind of data science this is.
This is a bit of data science, and it's the stuff that really makes the difference with your project.
So I have in this evaluation package a module called eval.
And this is a bit longer.
And I'm not planning to take you through this in and tons of detail.
I just want to show you that there's there's two there's basically two things going on here.
There's evaluate retrieval that is given one test and it figures out how good is the retrieval.
And there's another one called evaluate answer and evaluate.
Retrieval is something which is just going to calculate the MRR the mean reciprocal rank.
And it's going to do it you you can see it's going to be very very simple.
We're going to go and have a look.
It's going to just take the average across all of the keywords.
It's going to also work out the keyword coverage which is the keywords found over the total keywords.
Uh, so that is how well covered were the keywords for this test.
And then, uh, yeah, that's, that's uh, it's also going to calculate the ndcg, which it does right
here.
Uh, so let's just go up and have a look at these calculations very quickly.
The MRR, that's the one I really want to focus most on the mean reciprocal rank.
Look how easy it is.
It just says if if it finds one, it returns one divided by the rank, so if it's in position one,
it will do one divided by one is one.
If it's in position two, it'll be one half, position three it'll be a third.
Super easy.
That's that.
You can you can have a look at how, uh, the, the ndcg is calculated.
It calculates this thing.
It is you can see it's got the, uh, log of I plus two underneath it.
If you're familiar with this stuff, you'll know exactly what's going on with this.
Otherwise, it's not super important.
I don't want to get bogged down in maths.
You'll you'll see pretty clearly how it's reflected in the numbers.
Um, but it's what's called normalised, which means that it's trying to make sure that if the best
it could possibly do, given the context is have two, two things to its surface, two good chunks,
then it just wants to make sure that those two chunks and the first two positions, and it won't be
penalized for for other chunks, not having content.
So that's that's what normalizing is about.
And that's, that's you'll see that it does that right here.
Okay.
So that that is how the retrieval is calculated.
That's how we're calculating all of those metrics.
124 - And now now I want to show you evaluate answer.
That is the other thing.
Remember we've evaluated the retrieval by calculating those stats.
Evaluate answer is where we decide we use an LLM as a judge.
We're going to reach out to an LLM and say hey how is this answer compared with the reference answer?
Now I'm going to use a particular technique here known as structured outputs, which is a really powerful
technique, really, really handy.
But I'm not going to explain it to you because we're going to come back to it later.
So you're going to have to take a leap of faith that I'm doing something clever and it works, and it's
super useful, and you'll use it all the time.
If you've been on my course again, you've used structured outputs so much, so we'll use it again.
But I'm not going to go through.
I'm going to give you a little intuition to it.
I'm going to I'm going to plant the seed because we will come back to it.
But evaluate answer is going to very simply make a call to an LLM.
It's going to say to to the LLM, we're first going to do this right here.
We're going to call answer question for the question.
Now answer the question.
Does that sound familiar?
Does that ring a bell?
I hope it does, because answer question is the very thing that we wrote yesterday.
It's in implementation answer.
It's this thing right here.
It's the thing that was began as five lines of code and is now sort of grown a little bit.
It's it's more like 7 or 8, uh, more like ten.
Uh, but there it is.
This is answer question.
This is the key method that actually decides the function that decides how to answer a particular question
after looking up context.
So that's what we've done.
Uh, so so um, back to eval.
So we, we collect that answer.
We actually call this to get the answer.
And then there is a prompt here when I'm prompting an LM, you are an expert evaluator assessing the
quality of answers.
Evaluate the generated answer by comparing it to the reference answer.
Only give five out of five scores for perfect answers.
And then I say the question.
This is the question.
The generated answer.
This is the generated answer.
The reference answer.
And here is the reference answer.
And then it says please evaluate the generated answer on these dimensions.
Okay.
That is the call we're making to an LLM in order to judge our performance.
And we're using we're using light LM here I've imported light LM.
This is the completion function I hope you remember it.
It's beautiful.
It's so easy.
Now before I show you structured outputs, I feel like you need to see something working.
It's been too much talk.
Let's just go back quickly to to day four and let's just see this.
So from eval we're going to import the evaluate retrieval.
This is the thing that calculates the stats and evaluate answer.
That's the thing that does the LLM as a judge.
So we'll make those imports.
And now when it's imported it's going to take its time.
Uh we're now going to call evaluate retrieval.
So this is for this this this question.
Who won the prestigious IIoT award which you'll remember.
It's very fast.
You remember that the um the the uh, and that's not actually all that was doing is retrieving the relevant
context and then judging that context.
It's judging the retrieval.
And you remember that we surfaced the chunk with the Maxine, but not it didn't have a last name and
it wasn't.
I don't think it was particularly high up.
And sure enough, you see here the MRR is indicating that the chunk that that surfaced the the important
information was a bit further down.
And this, this, uh, DCG is a fairly low number.
Two keywords were found, but they were found lower down.
This is out of a total possible keywords of three.
And so the keyword coverage is two thirds, because we were able to find two thirds of the keywords
in this particular lookup.
That's that's the keyword coverage a similar to a recall style metric.
Okay.
That was our retrieval stats.
You can see it worked perfectly.
You could go back and look through the code.
If you do want to know that this formula with the log of two plus n in the denominator, go back and
look at it.
And you can you can always also Google it to see the the proper formula and the rationale and how it
works and why.
But it's not as nearly as common as MRI and keyword coverage.
Those are the really common ones.
These are go to stats for testing the effectiveness of your Rag retrieval.
All right.
Now it's the big guy we're going to call evaluate.
Answer.
This is this is the one that really does the LM as a judge.
So I run this and it's basically doing the rag retrieval.
Then it's calling an LM to answer the question using that answer function that we that we saw in implementation.
And then it's then calling LM as a judge to judge it.
And we got back in evaluation.
And here it here it says the answer correctly identifies Maxine as the winner mentions the IoT award,
but it omits Thompson's full name, which is present in the reference.
And I can actually print out that the four fields feedback, accuracy, completeness, and relevance.
These are the four fields, um, and uh, it, uh, it gives it some.
I see, I see, so it gives it five for the accuracy for, for completeness because it didn't say Thompson
to get five out of five, we'd have needed to have her last name but five for relevance because it only
contained relevant information.
So it does give it a good score, even though it even though the answer missed out the word Thompson
to get five, five, five, it would needed to have got that too.
And that makes total sense.
So that is showing you LMS as a judge in action evaluating this question.
And it worked really nicely.
I told you I wanted to come back and have a quick look at the code after we saw it running, if we come
back just to look at it again.
So I mentioned we're using I'm using light LMS.
So instead of OpenAI create it's just completions I pass in the model, I pass in the, the the messages
that we just created.
And then there is also this thing here I'm passing in another thing called response format.
And then I'm passing in this thing answer eval.
What's that about.
Well this is this thing called structured outputs, which is when you call an LM and you say, hey,
I don't want you to respond with just, just any old language.
I want you to respond in JSON and I want it to, to, to, to be follow this schema that I'm going to
tell you, I need the JSON to be formatted a particular way.
And with light LM you can do that by passing in a pedantic object.
So what I mean by that is if we come up here, you'll see one right here.
This here is a pedantic object.
It is a class which is a subclass of base model.
And I define fields here feedback, accuracy, completeness and relevance.
That sound familiar.
So we just saw a second ago.
Right.
Uh, and for each one I give it a little description.
And because I'm passing this class in, when I make this call to to light LM, it means scroll back
down.
Sorry.
Find that again.
It means because I passed that in that whatever response open AI generates, it will conform to that
spec.
And it will.
It will create something which which will be Jason, to reflect that object.
And that means that we can then take whatever comes back and turn it into an answer eval object.
So if I lost you there.
Don't worry about it.
We're gonna we're going to cover structured outputs in week eight.
It's it's such a crucial.
It's it's it's so helpful honestly.
It's such a go to thing for, for for getting your llms to generate, uh, consistent and high quality
outputs.
Uh, in the course.
We use it all the time.
So if you're coming here from my course, then, you know, structured outputs back to front, you're
like, okay, stop.
But but if you're new to it, uh, get get an intuition for it.
Let me have planted a seed.
Uh, we will talk more about structured outputs in the future.
But you can see that we forced the LLM to come back with this answer.
And now I'm using GPT four one nano right here and this this running this in a second.
Of course, we're about to run this for our entire result set.
And it's going to cost about $0.02.
2 to $0.03 maximum is how much it costs.
It's nice and cheap.
It's not super cheap, but if you if you rather it be free, you can just simply change this to be an
Obama model.
You can have it go locally.
You can choose any model you want, either doing it through light LM, or you can simply replace that
call to light LM with a with a call of your choice, of course.
Um, but but let's say Lemkin can talk to Obama.
It can talk to to anything else.
Um, so, uh, but I would recommend sticking on on for one nano if you don't mind spending, uh, about
10 or $0.15, then you could go up to opt for one mini and you might get more accurate results.
You'd certainly probably get slightly more critical results because, uh, mini will be able to to be
able to think it through and perhaps be a bit more critical.
Um, but but nonetheless, Nano is going to do a fine job.
It's good for us right now.
This shows us how we're using GPT for one nano as LM as a judge, and we're using structured outputs
to make it respond in this way with its feedback and with its scores.
125 - Okay, it's time for action.
You've been waiting for the action.
Wait!
No longer.
The time has arrived.
There is this class here.
Evaluator.
And that is the.
That's the business.
That's where the stuff happens.
And it's like a fancy.
It's like a Gradio app.
You look through it, you'll see that it's a whole lot of gradio.
And I'm not going to walk you through this Gradio app.
And you're wondering why not?
Because I didn't write it.
I got Claude to write it because llms are good at some things.
They're problematic.
They're painful with, with with some things particularly like data science, it can be hard.
But when it comes to something like building a user interface, if you've got the business logic already
written in something like eval, and you want a UI and you can describe it, they are amazing at just
just churning out a Gradio app.
And as long as you can then look through it and proofread it and tweak it, then you're in great shape.
And that's what I did here.
So I'm certainly not going to walk you through it.
We don't need to be walked through it.
All we need to do is run it and see what our user interface looks like for running an evaluation.
Okay, here we go.
You've Run.
Oh, sorry.
First I had to go into week five.
Go into week five, as should you.
And then you've run evaluate.
Uh, evaluator dot pi.
And then let's see what happens.
So this is a user interface, which with any luck, if, if, uh, Claude has done its job, is going
to.
There we go.
Very nice.
It's zoomed in.
Let me zoom out a bit so we get to see everything.
Here it is.
There we go.
Now you see everything on one screen.
So there is two two panes to it.
There is run evaluation uh for retrieval evaluation and run evaluation for answer evaluation.
So let's see what happens when I press this button right here.
So off it goes.
It's evaluating.
It's pretty quick.
And bam here are our results I can zoom in on this because we only look at the top half.
Here we go.
So we see our stats the MRI the mean reciprocal rank.
We get 0.7298 the ndcg which is you remember like how well distributed are the all of the rank results.
All of the all of the hits, are they all at the top of the chunks or are they sort of spread through
it?
And that is 0.7387.
The keyword coverage is just above 80%, and it ran 150 tests because there are 150 rows in that JSON
file.
And it's also given us a nice bar chart.
Isn't that beautiful?
A bar chart that shows us for each of the categories, the the seven categories that we've got, how
did it perform in each category?
And you can see it did pretty poorly.
It did worst in spanning.
I'm actually surprised it didn't do too terribly and holistic because that's very difficult.
But relationship spanning and holistic all did kind of badly.
They are all the difficult ones.
Relationship is hard as well because it's between two different chunks.
And then these ones, it did relatively well on um, best of all, numerical because that's just a just
a straight look and direct fact.
Pretty good as well.
Okay.
That is evaluating our retrieval.
That's cool.
Uh, next and by the way, you'll see I've colored it, I arbitrarily I decided that 70% would be would
be read.
And I've made some some thresholds.
I think it goes yellow from 80 and green from 90, just as something for us to shoot towards.
Um, but, uh, yeah, there's uh, it really the right number is something that would depend on your
business problem and what would be acceptable for you.
So it's not like there is one absolute number.
You know, MRI should be 0.9.
You just have to to do some experiments to understand what it would look like to be good for your problem
and make sure that it achieves the the bar that you have set, uh, that is, that is acceptable to
your business.
Okay.
But the trouble with setting bars for this stuff is that it's a bit abstract.
And and what isn't abstract is evaluating the actual answers.
So let's kick that off.
And now I have bad news, which is that this isn't super fast.
This this takes a bit of time.
I, I actually I made a version of this that was, that was multithreaded and it ran it all in parallel.
That was really cool.
But I realized that it's quite a lot.
It's not that much.
It's just a bit more code.
And I figured, uh, that, that it's better to keep it simple.
You know, it's like, I'm not I'm not trying to teach you to do fancy multi-threaded stuff or async
stuff or anything like that.
So if you want to do this, you can you can either make it async if you know about that, or you can
use something like multiprocessing, the pool, uh, to to make it be be run in parallel.
But it's not necessary.
If you don't do that.
You just have to wait a minute for this to run.
So I'm gonna gonna gonna go offline for a second.
And when I'm back, it will have completed and we'll look at the results.
Okay.
It just finished and there you see the results.
And you may have got something similar.
We did fine on relevance.
The model didn't give irrelevant information, which is kind of what you'd expect.
But we didn't do great on the others.
Accuracy just fell into the red territory with 3.99.
Completeness is at 3.85, and there's a slightly woeful tale on the right.
Here.
You'll see that definitely holistic was where it really struggled.
Spanning didn't do too great either.
And then you'll see that again.
Numerical was was was one of the best.
So these are the results of our current state.
And the good news is that there's plenty of room for growth.
We've got opportunity to do better.
But you can see, I hope.
I hope this gives you that real, tangible sense that having these numbers, it gives us something to
shoot for.
If I now change a strategy like the chunking strategy, we're going to see these numbers change.
And it's going to give us like like a, some sort of quantitative way of knowing that we've done better,
not just a kind of qualitative feel, or even if you remember when we looked at the vector spaces,
we got a sense, okay, this encoder, it looks it looks prettier.
It looks like things are clustered out more and it looks nicer and more organized.
But that doesn't you know, that doesn't necessarily tell us something meaningful.
This is giving us a number.
It gives us a number.
And it's giving us like red trouble.
So this is something we can get after.
And what I want you to do now is to write down these numbers.
And we're not going to focus on everything because it's a bit too much to, to, to worry about here.
We're going to focus on MRI, which is 0.7298 and on accuracy, which is 3.99.
And now that we've got this great tool, this really nice, simple tool to be able to to measure how
we're doing this is going to give us the framework we need to experiment and improve, which is what
we're going to do for the rest of today.
And then in an even bigger way tomorrow.
And we're going to get deep into rack.
Uh, so, so, um, yeah, take take notes, take a screenshot.
Uh, come in and run this yourself.
You might get slightly different results each time.
Uh, this certainly this this is always a little bit different, but but see what you get and then let's
get ready to drive some improvements.
And actually, just before we run some experiments, I do want to point out you're looking at this.
I hope you've got an I hope you think wow, this is cool.
The the charts and the numbers look really great.
And you might be thinking, uh, but this is like a UI that we just just knocked up.
I definitely wanted to focus on the right thing.
The thing that's cool about this is perhaps the least glamorous part of it.
The thing that's cool is that we built that test set.
That's what we're really measuring everything against.
So just just to stay focused on on what it is, it's allowed us to see our results this way.
It's because we did the homework of building a golden test set and checking it, making sure that it
was good and representative align with our business expectations.
The questions and answers were things that perhaps we'd actually collected them from business users.
We spent our time curating that test set.
That's where the value is.
The fact that that then of course, the value is knowing that MRR is an important thing to know.
So it's so understanding how to calculate it and what it is is important, but then actually calculating
it and drawing it in a fancy UI like that, that's just like half an hour with with Claude code.
Or you could there are different, different observability tools that can do this kind of thing as well.
And it's a fairly, fairly easy calculation.
So I just want to make sure that you're excited by the right thing.
Uh, fancy though the screen looks.
What's exciting, uh, believe it or not, is is the less glamorous part of having dug into the data,
built a golden test set that can be our North Star for improvement.
Okay, now let's go run some, uh, some experiments.
126 - Okay, let's run an experiment.
So we come in now to the implementation folder.
This is where we're going to live now because all we need to change is either the ingest approach or
the answer approach.
We don't need to change anything else and then rerun evaluation.
So let's go into ingest.
So first thing you often go to is chunking.
Good old chunking that that big old hack.
So we're currently chunking into chunk size of 1000 characters give or take.
Let's let's just try changing that to 500.
Let's have smaller chunks.
Uh, now that means we'll have like twice as many chunks.
Now, when we do this, uh, it's worth remembering that we're surfacing five chunks each time.
And it seems to me that if we're going to have smaller chunks, it's only fair if we surface more chunks.
Uh, otherwise there's less context overall.
So.
So if we go to answer pie at the top here, retrieval k is five.
That's saying that we always try and and collect five relevant documents you see right here.
K is five when we call retriever dot invoke.
So let's make that ten.
So instead of five documents of 1000 characters we're now going to surface ten documents of 500 characters.
That seems fair.
Uh, so now same amount of context will use up in both cases.
All right.
That's good.
Let's let's go and test this out.
Okay.
So I'm going to bring up a new terminal.
I'm going to go into week five.
I'm going to go into implementation.
And then I'm going to do.
You've run ingest dot pi.
Remember this rebuilds the the vectors.
Uh re-ingest.
So before we had 400 and something.
So now we're expecting 8 or 900 or so vectors to be created and put in our data store.
And there we go.
970 vectors.
Because there's overlap that you would expect there to be more than double.
Uh, so so there we have it.
Um, lots of vectors, 970 of them.
Now let's go and rerun the evaluation now.
Actually, if you've got your screen still running from before, you have to to quit that and create
a new one because we've regenerated the database.
So you will need to to launch a new Gradio app.
So let's go and do that right now.
And then let's, let's run an eval okay.
So I do CD up up I go up to week five and now I do you've run evaluator.py.
It's going to bring up our evaluator.
The MRI that we're comparing with is 0.7298.
That's what we have to beat.
Let's press run evaluation.
Let's see what we get.
Drumroll please.
And we do do better.
Smaller chunks mean that we do better.
Uh interesting.
Okay.
Let's let's take a note of that.
It's all all gone, gone yellow.
Uh, I'm just just for to keep us focused on one thing.
Both.
Both MRI and all three metrics have improved.
We've gone right into the green with keyword coverage with more smaller chunks.
Let's we're going to try bigger chunks.
But let me take a note of this.
So this is with 500 I'm keeping a little note tab.
And so should you try and try and write this down so we don't lose track.
Because if we're going to be scientific we might as well be scientific.
Okay.
Now let's go and make bigger chunks and try again okay.
So I'm going to I'm going to close that.
I'm now going to go back to ingest I am going to uh change the chunk size.
We're going to go up and I'm not going to double its 2000, I'm going to go to like one, six, six,
seven.
And you're like, why?
Why are you doing that?
Uh, why such a weird number?
Because I want to stay true to filling up the same amount of context space I'm going to go to to answer
dot pi and say, let's go down to three, K is three, because three of one, six, six, seven will
come to the same number to, to uh, to 10,000, which means sorry to 5000.
Uh, is that right?
Yes.
Three times one six, six, six seven 6667 would be 5000.
So we are now filling up the same amount of context.
So basically it's three bigger chunks versus the five chunks that we had to start with versus the ten
chunks of much smaller.
So we've got consistency there.
Okay.
So we're comparing apples and apples.
All right.
We need to rerun ingest CBD implementation run ingest dot pi.
Off it goes.
Let it do its thing.
We're expecting fewer much fewer now uh 235 vectors okay.
And now we're going to go to uh upper directory to the parent directory.
And we're going to do you've run evaluator dot pi.
And it will bring up a fresh interface for us to to run with.
And we'll see what you have to make a bet.
What do you think.
Better or worse, better or worse.
We'll soon find out.
Running evaluation.
And we find it is interesting.
How about that?
Were you expecting that?
Because I wasn't.
It's.
I was thinking it was going to be worse, but it's not.
It's slightly better.
So let's review.
So having a chunk size of, um, uh, of one six, six seven, um, is, is uh, .7475.
That is the MRI, which is better.
So having a chunk size of 1667, a bigger chunk size is better than a chunk size of 1000, and having
a chunk size of 500 is better than either of them.
That's best of all.
So there's clearly more experiments to be had here.
You can get better numbers by continuing to experiment with it, and it's important to try and keep
keep all things being equal.
Assume that you want to try and keep roughly the same amount of information in the context window,
so that you're only varying one parameter.
If you're willing to have more in the context window, that that would change the picture a bit.
All right.
Well, that was interesting.
You should do many more experiments.
This stuff is fascinating.
But now we're going to try different kinds of of chunking strategy.
Now one of the reasons people love Lang chain, and I totally see it is that it comes with so much stuff.
It's a real, what they call a batteries included kind of framework that has lots of things that come
along with the mix, and one of them is a ton of different types of splitter things that can divide
up your chunks in different ways.
And in our case, our knowledge base is actually made up of markdown documents.
And it turns out, would you believe it, that there is a markdown text splitter that is designed for
splitting markdown documents?
There's actually two of them.
There's a markdown text splitter that just figures it out, and there's one called markdown header text
splitter when you specify how you want it to do it.
But we're going to go with a simple one.
So basically we find our recursive character text splitter.
And we will comment this line out.
And instead of that we will say text splitter is look at that.
It's filled it in for us.
But I don't think you even need to specify this.
I think we can just do it like that and it will just figure it out itself.
That's that's how good it is.
So let's see if I'm right.
Let's do UV run ingest.py, uh, and we'll see if that just runs and just does some, some documents
splitting.
It's done it 109 vectors.
Let's go test them.
And I should say that I'm going to leave this uh answered py with k is three because these are clearly
bigger chunks with fewer vectors.
So just to roughly try and have apples and apples will keep retrieval k at three.
And we will now go into the parent directory and do uv run evaluator.py evaluator.py.
Up comes our evaluation framework.
And we'll see whether this markdown splitter does a better job or not.
Here it is.
Run a valuation.
Off it goes.
And we get 0.738 is aha.
So it does better than our original MRR when we had simple character splitting at the 1000 chunks.
But it's worse than either of our of our subsequent ones.
So for whatever reason going with the the markdown splitter has not worked out well.
And it's not for whatever reason we can tell exactly what's going on.
What's happening is that when we just focus on the headings now, our chunks are way too big.
Uh, and so that's, that's, uh, that's why we're seeing, uh, performance suffering there.
But it's nice to know that we've got this fancy markdown splitter, should we wish it.
Okay.
Are you getting bored of experiments now?
Have you had enough?
Well, I haven't.
I'm only just getting started.
I.
One more, one more set of experiments to do.
This is fun.
This is what.
This is what engineering is all about.
It's about the experiments.
So, uh, I have reset everything back to the chunk size of 500.
The recursive character text splitter.
That's our best result so far.
We're now going to change the embedding model, the encoder.
So we've been using the all mini Ml6 v2.
So instead of that let's import OpenAI embeddings.
And let's do embeddings.
Is OpenAI embeddings.
We'll use as the model the small the text embedding three small.
And I will comment that out.
And notice one little tiny thing here.
If you do this, be sure that you do this after you've loaded your dot EMV so that your OpenAI key is
set up.
Okay.
Copy that.
Let's go over to answer dot pi.
We also have to change the embeddings here as well.
There we go.
I've done that.
We might as well comment out the line above it and make sure that we are importing.
Yes we are importing it right up here.
Excellent.
We're in good shape.
That's all it should take.
We should now be able to try using OpenAI's embeddings model.
127 - Okay, so we bring up a new terminal window.
I go into week five.
I go into the, um, implementation folder and I do.
You've run ingest.py.
This is now reloading our data again rerunning our data pipes.
This time instead of using the hugging face embedding model we are using OpenAI embeddings.
It's done 1500 dimensions are in there.
This is exciting.
Let's go back up and it's time to run our evaluator.
Okay, here we go.
I go to I just do UV run value.
Value eight two.
And up comes our Gradio app in just a second and we will see how this does.
Here we have it.
Let's run evaluation.
Drumroll please.
Off it goes.
Takes a little bit longer now because we're going off and running these, uh, vectors with OpenAI.
It's exciting.
Still pretty fast.
What are you?
What are you thinking?
Do you think it's going to do?
Is it going to be similar?
I tell you, it's often the case, like I told you, that the things you think are going to make the
most difference end up not making much difference.
So who's to say?
But it's certainly running its way through.
All right.
Results are about to appear.
You can you can decide.
Remember originally our best so far is 0.7604.
That's our best so far.
Here we go.
0.78490 .7849.
Our best.
So this is with OpenAI embeddings.
We're getting 0.7849 for our MRR.
Uh, that is great.
Isn't it satisfying?
We've changed something so abstract.
The embedding model behind the scenes.
We know it makes for a better diagram, but we can now in a quantitative way, we can see that we've
got a better outcome.
That's what I like to see okay let's try the large model.
And so it's as simple as we turn this word here small into large.
And we come here and we turn this into large.
And we've just changed it in those two places.
Or ctrl c out of this, we go into the implementation folder.
We do UV run ingest.py.
And we are now again running with the larger encoder model.
Same thing, bigger encoder 3000 dimensions.
Let's see what happens.
There we go 970 vectors with 3000 dimensions in the vector store.
Great.
Back we go now UV run evaluator.py.
We now have this methodical way of telling.
Does it help us or hinder us to add in extra dimensions?
We run this off.
It goes, uh, again, not not as fast as when we're using the hugging face uh, model.
This is a bit slower, but it's still running the number to beat the number that we got with the OpenAI,
uh, A small three model was 0.7849, so 0.7849 is the number to beat.
And now we're going to see what do we get with OpenAI large model.
And I hope you're also keeping notes.
Do you remember where we began with this was we started with 0.7298.
So we've come quite a long way with our MRI.
Here it is.
Drumroll 0.7903.
Excellent 0.7903.
That is very most definitely a lot better.
We are coming far.
Excellent.
Okay.
Final thing for me to do then is now to run this evaluation down here.
Let's do the full evaluation to see whether all of these changes in MRI has actually helped with our
answers.
Let's kick it off and I'll come right back in just a second.
And come on, tell me that this isn't super satisfying.
Here we have it better results across the board.
And again it's nice because it's quantitative.
we can see clearly and precisely that we've moved the needle.
In fact, we've moved the needle in every single dimension than when we started when we began MRI.
I have it down as 0.7298 the NdYAG.
I have that down that we started out at 0.7387.
And the key word coverage we had at 83.8% when we started out.
Now we're at 92.5% in the green.
Moving on to to the big new news.
The answer evaluation.
Look at how we've moved the needle.
It was 3.99 slightly in the Reds.
We're now at 4.21 a much more respectable accuracy.
Completeness that was at 3.85 is at 4.05.
And relevance that was at 4.57 is now at 4.71.
Probably the least important of them.
But but still that's that's a nice uptick.
We've improved across the board and it felt kind of abstract.
What we did, we experimented with different chunk sizes of how we break up the documents.
And I picked the best, best one that we did.
And we also played with three different encoder models, and it turned out, shockingly, that the the
most expensive and the juiciest one.
It's still very cheap, but it's for such a small number of documents.
But still, the one that costs the most has the most dimensions, for what it's worth, but is clearly
the Heftiest encoder model was the one that is able to get the most accurate retrieved context and gets
us the most accurate results in our tests.
So there you have it.
The results of our tests and our successful experiments that have improved our Rag pipeline.
Wow, I told you today was going to be hardcore and I hope I hope you agree I delivered today.
Today was was a substantive day and as a result of that you have leveled up.
Congratulations.
There's no doubt that in addition to as as I keep saying, you can generate text to code with a bunch
of closed and open source models.
You can use tools.
You can also choose the right LLM for for your your project backed by benchmarks.
But now you really know how to build a rag knowledge worker a pipeline with expertise, you can use
Lang chain and chroma, and now you can evaluate its effectiveness in two ways at retrieval and at answering
questions.
And you can do things like experiment with chunkers and encoders, but you can do so in a quantitative
way where you have confidence that you're moving the needle.
And it's so satisfying.
Okay, so next time, next time I'm going to unveil a ton of pro stuff.
It turns out that there's a whole zoo of techniques.
There's practically like a cottage industry of different ways that you can take rag further that have
sprung up lots of different techniques, and we'll explore a ton of them.
We'll actually try many of them out.
You're going to get hands on experience in doing this, kind of these, these sorts of techniques,
things like reranking, query pre-processing, things like that.
As we dig in to how you can drive better Rag performance and by the end of it, by the end of tomorrow,
which will, of course, complete week five, you're going to be a rag pro.
See you then.
128 - So look, I've had a haircut.
I've got myself ready.
I'm here for business, and so are you.
Today is week five.
Day five.
It's pro day.
Today is the day it really gets real.
Not only can you already generate tax code, frontier models, open source models, tools, you can
choose the right model for the project.
But you can also already create a rag knowledge worker using Lang chain.
Using chroma, you can evaluate its effectiveness using a bunch of metrics, retrieval based, and those
that are based on the actual answers to your questions judged by another LLM.
And you can experiment with different chunking strategies and different encoders and do it in a quantitative
way, where you are assessing the results based on how they impact real metrics.
Okay.
And now now we kick it up a notch.
Today is expert day.
Today we get into Advanced Rag.
You're going to develop many techniques for how you get more juice out of Rag how you get better outcomes.
You're going to do hands on experimenting with pre-processing, with reranking, with a bunch of other
things.
And at the end of it, you're going to deliver an advanced Rag pipeline with provably strong results.
Sound exciting?
It is exciting.
Let's do it.
Now, you must permit me to make something of a public service announcement.
At this point, you you have reached perhaps the the pinnacle of this course today, week five, day
five is when we're going to get more pro than any other.
We're going to roll up our sleeves.
We're going to really get into the thick of it.
And by the end of it, you're going to know rag back to front.
And you you might be tempted.
You might be tempted at that point to to declare victory, to say, okay, I got what I came here for.
I'm a pro at this point.
I'm gonna I'm gonna exit stage left.
And I'm here to tell you, no, no, the next few weeks after today are even better.
It's not rag.
It's something different.
It's a capstone project.
It's fine tuning, it's a bit of data science, some neural networks.
It's really great stuff.
So I just want to say I'm aware of the fact that a few people get through Rag and then they're like,
okay, adios.
Don't.
It's not adios.
Nope.
We have to keep going.
So I've said it.
And now with that, if you agree, yes.
Good.
You agree.
Then we will move on with the the absolute best.
Week five day five okay.
So I this this will be very very quick.
I you know they say what they say about repetition.
It's important and all that.
You get it now you get this.
But just to really embellish the way rag works is something that's actually really quite simple.
The user asks a question instead of just forwarding the question to the LM as well.
You know, we want to look it up in our knowledge base, and we've got this clever little technique
where the way that we do, like a fuzzy lookup, is by turning the question into a vector using an embedding
model or an encoder, call it what you will.
One of those.
We turn it into a vector, and then the way we find useful content is by looking for similar vectors.
We look for documents which have an index, a vector index which is close to the vector of the question.
And you remember, of course, that we we take all of our documents and we break them up into chunks
where each chunk is likely to be something that will match a question.
And it's it's retrieving the most relevant chunks that we do with this lookup.
And then we take those chunks, we shove them in the prompt that goes to the LLM.
Back comes the answer.
You know it so well.
That is all there is to rag.
And I wouldn't be doing my job if I didn't do one more recap on the thing that matters the most evals
I geeked out on them yesterday, but but I don't.
I don't take it back.
I'm I'm happy that I did.
I think it's so important.
There's a lot about working with with, with llms that can feel like voodoo.
It's just a lot of guesswork and and it can feel very hand-wavy, very rough.
And the way to to make it scientific, the way to make it bulletproof, is to come up with robust metrics,
ways to evaluate the performance of your model and then to run experiments.
And we discovered that the first step is curating that perfect test set with with golden questions and
reference answers.
And then to calculate metrics related to how well are you retrieving documents.
We talked about MRI ndg precision and recall.
And then we also had like the amount of the number of times that the keywords match as a similar concept
to recall and then measure the answers themselves, the quality of your answers.
There's lots of ways of doing it.
LM as a judge is a really good one, and that's what we did yesterday.
And just to remind you for a second about these different metrics, MRI, that's the go to one that
is saying, okay, so supposing that in all of our cases, the top the top chunk that got surfaced was
a hit, then that would be an MRI of one.
It's all about what is the location of the first chunk that was a hit.
If the if the first one, if it was always the first one, then it's one.
If it was the second one, on average, that would be a half one over two.
If it's the third one, it would be a third, the fourth one it will be a quarter.
It's the inverse rank on average of the very first successful chunk, which which is a match for a keyword.
So that's MRI.
Super common, really tangible, easy to explain, easy to understand.
And HCG is a bit more perplexing.
But essentially you're just trying to to recognize how well distributed were good chunks was was good
contact in all of the chunks that you surfaced.
So supposing that you surfaced ten chunks and there were only three good, good hits in there, and
those three are in locations one, two and three, then that's great.
That's perfect.
That would be an ndcg of one.
If they were further down, it would be a lower ndcg.
And the way it works.
It's a formula.
It looks at the sort of distribution and it penalizes you a bit if you have a hit that's further down,
but it penalizes you in a way that has a log in the in the denominator.
So it's not too much, it's just a bit.
And you can look through the formula to get a bit of a better sense for it and, and get a sense for
what does it look like as, as things get distributed further down and it's called normalized, it's
ndcg because once you've calculated this, you divide it by what's the best score this could have been
if supposing there were three good hits, if they were in locations one, two and three, divide by
that such that a perfect answer would always be one.
And that's why it's called normalized.
And then you add that up across all of your data.
So that is MRI and DCG very common stats.
But MRI is the most common one.
And now precision and recall.
Do you remember them.
Very commonly they science precision and recall.
And in rag recall is more important where normalized data science precision is the first thing you look
at.
So can you remember the difference between recall and precision.
What?
What is it?
It's kind of subtle.
It's a bit confusing the first time you hear it.
I'll give you a second.
You can put me on pause.
You can say it out loud because I can hear you wherever you are.
Okay, okay.
I'll put you out of your misery.
Or maybe you know it well.
So recall is when you're thinking about the the proportion of the tests themselves, the proportion
of the times you tried to do a rag retrieval, how frequently in in the top k in the top three, let's
say how often in the top three.
Did you, did you get a hit.
So if you if you ran 100 tests, how many of them are say, say in 50 cases?
Something in the top three was a hit.
That would be 50% recall.
So recall is the proportion of the retrievals.
Precision is about saying what proportion of the k of the chunks focus on the chunks themselves, what
proportion of them are good, and how often are you surfacing stuff?
That's that's not good.
That's irrelevant content.
That is precision.
How precise is your ability to retrieve context?
So that's the difference between recall and precision recall against the proportion of tests where relevant
context within the top k.
And we actually looked at a similar kind of metric about keyword coverage.
But it's the same kind of thing.
It's about how often in your tests you're able to surface important stuff.
Precision is more focused on what proportion of what you surface is useful, and precision is more trying
to penalize you.
If you're surfacing a lot of irrelevant content, which is not going to be useful for your for your
rag case, it's less important because typically Llms don't don't care too much if you're giving it
lots of irrelevant stuff as long as the relevant stuff is there.
So.
So, uh, that's why, I mean, it's better not to waste context window with lots of irrelevant stuff,
but it's not as important as recall in this case.
And keyword coverage that we looked at is really great for the kind of testing we were doing.
Okay.
That's a that's a good recap.
I know you've got this.
You understand it.
Let's go pro.
129 - So as a rag really took off, like I guess a year ago now, a year and a half ago, there became this
cottage industry of rag techniques, of things you can do, involving rag to make it better.
And a lot of terminology developed around these techniques.
There's so many different terms and words and they all sound very scientific.
And in my mind it's it's all a bit of a pseudoscience.
And I do want to I do want to make that clear to you.
These terms in my I see them as trying to formalize something which is extremely hacky, really very
experimental.
It's kind of try this and try redoing this and and try organizing this all to work around the whack
a mole that I mentioned, where you do something and it's not quite working.
And you're like, all right, let's, let's try this, let's, let's chunk differently.
Let's do this differently.
Let's try this differently.
Each of them are different experiments.
And I very frequently get questions from students saying, which one of these different Rag techniques
applies to me?
Which one should I try?
And you know that people like to say in, in the business that there's no such thing as a bad question,
that all questions are good questions.
But I'm here to tell you that, no, I'm not one of those people.
I think that is a bad question.
And I will say it because, as you know, I'm going to say it's a bad question because there are no
magic answers.
I can't tell you that reranking is what you need or that you need this encoder or something like that.
The answer is set a metrics, set your evals, run experiments, and find out there is no shortcut for
experiments.
These.
This is a pseudoscience.
These are not like real uh, architectures or something like that.
These are just different experimental things to try and different types of business use case and different
data sets will tend to do better with different techniques.
And, and the only thing you can do is try it and see and test it with evals.
So I'm going to rattle off ten techniques.
And no doubt I won't mention some of your favorite techniques.
Don't hate me for that.
You can Google any of them or look them up.
They're all sort of cut from the same cloth.
Many of them.
But the first one is one that you already know about.
We already did it, which is R&D on chunking, experimenting with different chunking strategies.
If you look, for example, in Lange, in that package we were playing with, there's tons of different
types of text splitters and sometimes called splitters, sometimes called chunkers.
You can you can play around with them all.
They have different parameters changing, changing which one you use and changing the parameters and
experimenting is a terrific thing to do now.
It's always good when you're doing this if you're not just guessing, even though I described it as
like trial and error, but you're doing so in an informed way.
Like typically you find something that's not working with your rag process, something that is that
is causing bad answers.
And then you try something like changing your chunking strategy in order to fix that problem.
There's a certain amount you can also do just sort of exploration of R&D, just trying different things
and see what happens.
But it's usually good to have a particular problem or a hypothesis that you're trying to solve or improve
by changing chunking, and then you can measure it and see what happens.
So that's chunking R&D and very similar.
You probably knew I was going to say it is encoder selecting the best encoder model based on your test
set and based on your business objective.
People often ask me about about images.
There's there's quite often you want to ask questions with a knowledge base that's not just got text,
it's also got images.
And there are different strategies.
There are indeed encoders that are good at both taking images and text and mapping them into a consistent
vector space, and you'll find them in sentence transformers.
If you look on their documentation and hugging face, you'll see that they have models designed specifically
for that.
But I have to say that I, I do tend to find them, uh, hit and miss.
And there's a different, more boring strategy where instead you first use a model to, to to write
something, to write a caption for the image in a way that's most likely to be something that a question
would match.
And then you vectorize that text because it's more likely that you're going to be able to map an image
to the right query and then query on it, in my opinion.
But it really depends on the use case.
And of course, the you shouldn't trust my opinion.
You should try it and see if that's what you're working on.
So using encoders to to try different types of document uh, that that is a big part of your advanced
Rag toolkit.
So I'll say one more thing here as well.
People often ask me about things like PDFs and and word documents and things like that about, okay,
so how do we vectorize that?
Uh, and again, I would probably say the same thing.
Uh, I would say, first of all, that there are some models that are that are meant to be, for example,
good at, uh, at trying to encode a PDF, but I wouldn't recommend it that it's a binary object and
it's not designed for that.
I would say instead use something which converts the PDF into markdown and then vectorize the markdown,
which is something that models are trained with lots of.
And you know what?
I would not use an LLM to turn a PDF into markdown.
That that is a horrible abuse of using Llms.
It's not what they're good for.
You know what is good for that Python code?
Remember, we were software developers once.
There's plenty of libraries that you can pip install or you've add in our case that are fantastic at
parsing PDFs, and you can convert them to, to markdown or to just to text or whatever makes sense
for your business case.
Converting between different file formats is a solved problem.
You don't need an artificial intelligence to do it for you.
You can do it with Python.
So and you should.
So that's that's what I would recommend.
In that case if you've got different file formats, I would recommend use software to convert it to
something that's going to work well for an LLM, potentially run it through an LLM to turn it into something
that's really good for querying and then turn that into a vector.
Okay.
And enough on encoders.
Let's move on.
Next up is an obvious one really, in working on your prompts, it sounds.
Sounds too obvious to even be mentioned here as an advanced technique, but it makes such a difference.
And people often ignore the obvious as they as they drill into lots of complicated sounding rag approaches.
But just remember that that rag is about providing relevant context, and there's often static, relevant
context that you can put in every prompt that gives basic information.
And it doesn't matter to waste a few few hundred tokens or whatever every time.
It's not material amount of money, especially if it's getting you really good contacts.
So develop good prompts that you can think of as like a fixed context, and do the standard tricks like
being sure to put the current date in there.
Why not?
If that's going to help it in some way to to understand what you're talking about, any relevant context
and conversation history and working on that properly, just working on the prompts can make such a
difference.
It's hardly an advanced technique, but it's one people often forget.
Okay, this one is an advanced technique.
So document pre-processing this.
This is about saying, okay, when we're when we're taking our documents and we're about to put them
into our, into our vector data store, maybe first we could rewrite our documents in a way that is
going to make them more suitable for the data store.
For example, if we had like a table of ticket prices that for traveling from one location to another,
it's just like a table of numbers.
When you turn that into a vector, it's not going to be very good because it's just going to be like,
this is a table of numbers.
But if you first put it through an LLM and said, hey, here's a section of my knowledge base, can
you rewrite this in a format that's going to be most suitable for querying?
Then it can do a fantastic job of turning that into text, which is going to match a vector lookup.
Uh, so so this is a really great trick.
A very similar is something I didn't actually mention with number one, which is when you're chunking,
there's a type of chunking called semantic chunking, which is when you chunk not just based on like
randomly breaking things up into different sections, but based on the meaning of each each block of
text.
Trying to divide up your your page in a sort of meaningful way, such that your document is broken up
into different chunks that reflect maybe the different stages of someone's career or the different facets
of a product or something like that.
And so semantic chunking is a very powerful chunking strategy.
And there is in fact a semantic chunker that I think comes out of the box with with lang chain in the
experimental package.
Uh, but but even easier is to do that as part of number four, do that as part of document pre-processing,
pass it through an LLM and say, hey, here's a document.
Can you please break this into meaningful chunks that make sense from a from a meaning point of view,
so that questions will will relate to 1 or 2 chunks, and then rewrite them and carve them up in a way
that's going to be best for a knowledge base.
So that's really sort of one and four put together.
That is a pro technique.
So that's document pre-processing sometimes called documentary writing, it's a real go to one.
There's a flip side that's called query rewriting, which is much the same thing.
When the user asks a question, the user asks a question.
Maybe that question isn't exactly right for doing a rag based lookup, or maybe to a point to a problem
that we face before a couple of days ago.
The question might be a follow on question from something earlier, and to do exactly the right lookup,
you might want to kind of combine that with what we've said before in some clever way.
And that can be really hard to do with code.
But guess what?
Llms have an easy time with it.
So use an LLM, call an LLM and say the user has asked this question.
Please rewrite this in a way that's going to be most suitable for querying a knowledge base, and it
can make a fine job of it.
And you can pass in the history and have it do something that reflects the context of the question as
well.
So that is called query rewriting.
It's also sometimes called query pre-processing.
And that along with document pre-processing those two are a powerful pair.
130 - I know it feels like we've been on this slide forever, but it's such an important slide.
Ten Juicy techniques.
Number six.
Query expansion.
This is this is one that a lot of people use.
This is just saying.
Oh, okay.
Look, um, um, we could we could, uh, add to step five.
Don't just ask the model to write one query.
Ask it to write a bunch of them, a bunch of things that we could call our database lookup for.
Let's have three different Rag queries and collect similar documents for each.
That's called query expansion.
Super common.
And then Reranking Reranking is saying we might have ended up with lots of different chunks from our
data store, particularly if we've done number six query expansion, we might have a lot.
We will have people like to say we have k times n, you have k the, the, the, the amount that you
retrieve every time times n the number of queries you've got a potentially a bunch of chunks.
Well, we could then take all of these chunks and try and reorder them in terms of the ones that's most
relevant for the question at the top and all the way down to the least relevant for the question.
And how are we going to do that?
Well, we could have an LLM do that.
We could call an LLM and say, you're not responsible for answering the question.
Someone else is going to do that.
You're responsible simply for ordering these chunks in order of most important to least important.
Do that step.
And then potentially we might chop off some of the unimportant ones when we finally send it to an LLM
to actually craft the answer.
So that is reranking.
Again, super popular.
And you can imagine, particularly if you've done some of the previous steps, Reranking can be really
important to avoid polluting the context with tons and tons of chunks.
Okay.
Number eight, we're on the home stretch hierarchical rag.
This is trying to fix a particular Achilles heel with rag that I mentioned before, which is that rag
is really bad at answering questions which span lots of documents.
It has a really hard time with that.
And so there are some, pretty simple, uh, hacks that try and get around this.
And one of them is to summarize your knowledge base at various levels of roll up, like a hierarchy,
have a kind of a summary of all products, a summary of all employees.
And then when you do your Rag lookup, do a Rag lookup across the summaries first to get the kind of
coarse grained information and then drill down to to chunks that come from the fine grained information.
And that means that if, for example, you could have an employee summary document that lists all employees
and their salaries in one condensed document.
And that way, if someone asks a question like how many employees have a salary of under X, then hopefully
that chunk with this compressed data, this summarized data about salaries would be surfaced.
And so the the the Rag, the LLM would have a hope of answering it otherwise.
Without that, it's impossible to answer.
Uh, how many of kind of question because it would require chunks from so much of the knowledge base.
So that's a pro move hierarchical rag.
And you can probably tell like it is very hand-wavy, very hacky because you could roll up in one way,
but that might not be aligned with the question that someone asked.
They might ask a question that's like how many documents starting with a letter A do you have?
And obviously you haven't you haven't figured that one out.
You haven't put that in in some hierarchy, uh, by by alphabet.
So, so, you know, it's it's always a whack a mole.
It's always someone asks a question that spans your documents.
You don't have a good answer to it.
So you think about a new hierarchical summary document that you could slip in.
And that's that's the point of hierarchical rag okay.
And we end with two fancy ones that people love to talk about.
One of them is Graph Rag.
Graph rag.
It's actually it's it sounds really, really fancy, but it's a fairly simple idea, which is that often
the documents in your knowledge base aren't isolated.
They have some relationship with each other.
So like an employee might might have a boss, a manager, which is another employee.
So you could really think that that your documents frequently or even your, your chunks are related
to other chunks.
And when you're doing your your rag query, if, for example, you remember there's a metadata associated
with each chunk, if we'd been careful in that metadata to specify other chunks that are related could
be as simple as other chunks in the same document, or it could be something like the chunk associated
with a boss or something like that.
Then.
Then when you look up that chunk, you could also then shove in the context the related chunks that
are kind of one hop or two hops away in the in terms of these relationships that you've recorded in
the metadata.
And of course, taking it a step further, as you probably guessed, I was going to say there are special
databases called graph databases like Neo4j's and many of them that are specially designed to store
Information as as nodes with edges.
A way to think about things in terms of relationships between entities.
And if you store it in a graph database like that, then it's even easier for you to find a chunk that's
close to a vector, and then include that and include all the chunks that are the sort of 1 or 2 neighbors
away in the graph database.
So it's a trendy thing to do.
It tends to work only in reasonably.
It tends to work well only in quite specific situations where your data does have a lot of relationships
between it.
And I would argue that most of the time you can handle this just by using the metadata.
The need for a graph database, trendy though they are, are not as huge unless you very specifically
got a problem that lends itself well to that kind of relationship based database.
So definitely one to watch and potentially experiment with.
Uh, but but uh, yeah, it's it's quite a fancy one.
And then last but not least is a gentic rag.
You may have heard of it.
What is this?
Well, it's it's a different way of thinking about it.
It's much the same stuff.
But what it's saying is, look, we've designed this, this very linear idea that the user asks a question.
Then we go and do a vector based lookup.
And we always shove that in the context.
And then we call the LLM.
Well that's a bit you know 2024 whatever.
It's you know, things in ancient history is 2024 these days.
Uh, it's a bit 2024, uh, that nowadays the way that we like to, to think about things is, is let
the LLM make the decisions.
So instead of just doing a vector lookup and putting all that in the context, call an LLM and give
it some tools, give it a tool that could do a vector lookup based on a query, maybe give it some more
tools, like a SQL tool that can run SQL on a database, or if it's the files that we've got in our
knowledge base, just do a string lookup in the files if it wants to give it access to a bunch of tools
and then call this like your retrieval agent or something, and then say, here's a user question.
Go to town, go and figure this out.
You can come up with your queries, you can make your vector lookups.
And you can also do a SQL query.
You can also look for ticket prices by by calling this API.
You can do all these different things and use this as your way of retrieving context.
Now in large part it is it is equivalent to some of the steps before, uh, if you just give it a vector
database then it's going to call back.
It's very similar you can imagine to doing query expansion, query rewriting and then query expansion,
and then it's running the queries and then it's basically reranking because it's going to figure out
which ones matter.
And that's what will eventually be used to answer the question.
So it's doing the ones before number ten.
Number ten is about doing the ones before it, but letting the LM decide which to do and in which order.
And potentially it can be in a loop so that if it does a few of them and it's not getting results,
it can keep going.
So a genetic rack has all of the great things and some of the caveats about working with this kind of
more, more flexible approach.
It can be very powerful and get answers where you've not been able to get them before, because it can
keep working at it.
Keep experimenting until the model decides to stop making tool calls and then it satisfies.
But also it's of course, less predictable.
It's harder.
You can put metrics around it and measure it and get good results, but then you could run the same
thing tomorrow and get bad results and that would be horrible.
So, you know, it has the downsides in terms of repeatability, robustness and so on that you often
find with these more what we call autonomous kind of kind of approaches.
And if you're interested in more about this then of course my agenda course covers some of this.
In the last week we have a graph based uh, memory, along with uh, also a vector based memory as well.
We cover that a few times that that is the sort of that the new agentic approach to doing the same thing.
But but very much keep in mind that it is still in large part carrying out many of the previous steps
on this list, just doing it through tool calling rather than through R code orchestrating step by step.
Finally, I will end this slide.
I know I've been on this slide for 20 minutes.
I'm going to end this by saying a lot of people are saying that rag is dead.
You hear that a lot.
You see lots of memes on this.
And there's typically two different reasons for this.
People come at it from two directions.
One of them is that rag is dead because context windows are so big.
Now that you can put all your knowledge base in a context window and let the transformer use attention
to figure out what's what's relevant, that's surely the best.
That's one reason people say that rag is dead.
And I think that's that's, uh, that's nonsense.
Because, uh, sure, you could say that, but but clearly there are going to be cases when your knowledge
base is much, much, much bigger, like in week eight of this course, when we're going to have a monstrously
large knowledge base.
And okay, maybe you could put all that into an LLM call, or maybe you could carve it up and make many
LLM calls, one after another and then another one to judge it.
But wow, that's not going to be an efficient use of time.
At the very least you could get down to you could throw out 90% very easily with some kind of a vector
based search or any other, uh, on this list.
So it just seems to me that however big the context window gets, this, this kind of approach to try
and remove irrelevant context is always going to be important.
But the other reason people say that rag is dead is because of number ten, because of a genetic rag.
Now that we have agents, this kind of of pipeline where you do a vector based lookup and then you surface
relevant content, that approach is kind of old school.
The new approach is to equip an agent with the ability to, uh, to itself decide how to dig into the
data to do the research itself using any of these techniques and figure out how best to retrieve relevant
context and then answer the question.
That's a super interesting point.
But my answer to that would be, uh, predictably enough, you knew I was going to say long live, right?
It's such a familiar trope.
Uh, but the reason I say long live is that come on, that's just rag by a different name.
Sure, you could call it a rag and sound like you're so modern, so fashionable.
But but okay, it's still vector based or encoder based retrieval of relevant context.
Or maybe you're using a graph database.
Whatever you're doing, you're using techniques to retrieval techniques to augment your generation from
an LLM.
And so it's still retrieval augmented generation.
It's still rag even if it's rag, whatever it is, by whatever name you choose to call it, as far as
I'm concerned, that's still rag.
Long live rag.
131 - Okay, so there is the zoo of different rag techniques.
There are many more that you can look up, but these are some of the most common ones that you'll come
across.
And of course we don't we don't have have time to build these.
So I'm not planning to actually code these.
Don't be ridiculous.
Of course I'm lying.
Of course we have time to code these.
Not all of them, but we're going to code many of them.
Uh, and let's go and do that right now.
But the one little extra surprise I have for you, we're going to code a bunch of these now, uh, the
probably the most popular ones, but of course, we're going to do so without Lang Chain.
I wanted to show you that building rag without Lang Chain is pretty much.
It's also very easy.
A little bit more code, but not much.
It's good for you to know so that you know how to build Rag natively if you wish.
You're not tied to Lang chain, but if you want to use Lang chain, of course you can.
And it comes with lots of stuff.
So that's what we're going to do.
Now let's go to cursor, let's do some building.
Let's build some advanced features and see what we can do with some rag.
Here we go.
Okay.
Well I'm excited to show you what I've got in store for you today.
We're in week five.
We're in the juicy day five.
This is when we go pro advanced drag techniques.
No long chain.
We're going native.
So you have the most flexibility.
And so I show you there's nothing much to it.
We're going to use an LM to divide up chunks in a sensible way.
We're going to to also have it rewrite chunks.
And it's going to be semantic chunking.
That's going to figure out how best to organize the chunks.
That's that's what we're going to start by as we look at the ingest part of the story.
Remember there's the ingest and then answering because basically what we're going to do in this lab
lab day five is we're going to we're going to make some changes.
And then you remember there's that one directory implementation.
Implementation is just here.
It has like answer dot pie and ingest dot pie.
We're going to copy this.
We're going to duplicate it and make another version which is going to be our pro version.
And that's how we're going to do this.
But first, first we'll do we'll work in the lab.
Okay.
So this is this is the kind of setup when I get get myself organized here.
And I want to point out a few things.
There's no long chain imports at all.
First thing to notice.
No lang chain.
Nothing.
Uh, what do we have then.
So this is directly using chroma chromas open source packages, not lang chain underscore chroma, but
just chroma.
The one class persistent client.
That is what we've got.
Like a saved database for chroma light.
LM I'll be using for my, my LM calls, and, uh, that's really about it.
Okay.
I've got some constants.
We're going to be using GPT 4.1 nano for for most of this.
Uh, and I should point out so, so in total I do a bunch of runs using, uh, LMS and the numbers do
add up a bit this time.
My, my, I think I've probably run this once or twice all the way through, and I've spent $0.50.
Uh, so half a dollar, uh, which, you know, it's it's it's not expensive, but also it's something
that is meaningful.
And so I want to tell you about it.
And if you were to run this several times, it could add up to a dollar.
Now it's totally optional.
You can use open source the way you're used to throughout.
So so hopefully you've got guide nine to help you.
You know exactly how to use open source all the way through.
You'll get good results too.
But I'm using GPT four one nano nice and fast and still good.
So let's run that.
Um, you can see I've got a few.
I'm going to set the average chunk size to be 500.
Uh, we're going to use the large embedding model that worked well before.
Again, you can swap this out for the open source model if you'd rather.
Okay.
So you remember we used Lang Chain.
It had a document class A document is something that had metadata and page content.
I don't know if you remember that when we printed it out, it always had that.
Well, in order to sort of stay consistent and to take take a leaf out of their book, we'll, we'll
have, we'll have a class called result.
I'm not going to call it document, because I don't want to get confused between which one is chain
and what's me.
I call it result, but it's going to have the same two fields, and I partly do that so that everything
else in our other classes can stay exactly the same.
We don't need to change our eval code.
We need to change anything.
But we'll be returning one of these objects instead of a long chain object.
So there we go.
I've created that.
And now we're going to go and define a few more classes as we get into chunking.
So this here it's another it's another class I'm defining.
It's a subclass of base model the pedantic base model.
That means it's just a class that allows us to, to represent some, some object, uh, with, with,
with in a way that is, has some meaning to it.
A chunk is something that I'm giving a headline, a summary and the original text, and I'm describing
what those three fields means.
The headline is a brief heading for this chunk, typically a few words.
The summary is a few sentences summarizing the content, and the original text is the original, the
original source text of the document as it was in the document.
So a chunk has those three components to it.
And I've also got a little, little function here called as result that will convert one of these chunks
into one of these little objects here like a long chain object.
Okay.
And I've also got this thing called chunks which is just a list of chunk.
So this thing here is just a list of these objects.
And each of these objects can be converted into one of these objects you following.
Just look it through.
Look through it.
If you're if you're not okay.
Now it's actually time for us to do our loading and chunking.
Let's try this.
We're going to do it in three steps.
Three steps of doing our advanced semantic chunking with LM rewriting without lang chain.
First we're going to fetch documents from the knowledge base using something just like Lang Chain did.
Then we're going to call an LM to turn it into chunks by creating these objects.
And then we're going to store the chunks in crowbar Steps one two, three.
Let's start with step one.
Step one is called fetch documents, and this should look familiar to you because this is super similar
to the fetch documents from the Lang Chain version.
If you don't believe me, just go and have a look at it.
Bring them up side by side.
You can you can right click.
And I think it's a day two and do a view side by side and have a look.
Uh, so um, I just iterate through the knowledge base path.
I look for anything that is a.md file, and if it's there, then I read it in with a file.read and then
we've loaded those documents.
Uh, that's the fetch documents function.
And in fact, I think it's slightly shorter than the version that used lang chains, document loaders.
So, you know, there we go.
We've loaded 76 documents.
We did it.
Look, Ma.
No, no lang chain.
Uh, but you know, I don't mean to diss lang chain.
I know that lang chains power is not in loading documents.
It's all the splitters, everything that comes with it.
We're going to make our own right.
Now, on to step two making the chunks.
And at this point, we're going to make another call to an LM to divide up into chunks.
And I'm hoping at this stage of the course, you're getting a bit more comfortable with calling an LM,
making an API call as a function like this.
It's something that should should be kind of becoming second nature to you.
You have to to build a nice prompt.
It's all about the prompting.
So I've got a make prompt for a document function, which is where I would generate a nice prompt to
use for a particular document.
So I'm going to say you take a document and you split it into overlapping chunks for a knowledge base
that I explained, it's from ensure I give the type of the document, I say where it's come from, and
I tell it to divide it into, and I give it a clue about how many chunks to use.
And you can imagine some of this has come from me experimenting.
If I don't say that, it quite often only splits things into two chunks or three chunks.
If I want more, I have to give it a hint to try and get it to do more.
Um, here is the document.
Respond with the chunks.
So that's that's an example.
Let's just have a quick look.
So we have um if I look at documents zero this is an example document.
Here it is.
It's products.
It's all of that.
So now what happens if I, if I call uh make prompt like this with documents zero.
What we should see is here we go.
Let's let's print that so we see it a little bit nicer print.
Uh, there we go.
And here you see it.
You see, you take a document, you split the document in overlapping chunks for a knowledge base,
blah, blah, blah, blah, blah.
And here's the document, okay?
Just what you expect.
We can we can have another function make messages that will call that and put it into one of these lists
of dicts.
Uh, again, uh, I hardly need to do this.
I'm sure you're comfortable with this.
I can do make messages, document zero.
And look, we get user content.
There is the user message.
This stuff is old hat for you.
You're like, yeah, yeah, yeah, I get it.
Okay.
And now process document is the thing that's actually going to do the work.
So first of all, I call make messages.
The thing that I just did.
What I'm now going to do is call light LMS beautiful completion function, which is just the really
very similar to OpenAI completion create.
It's just it's a shorthand and it means you can pass in any model you want.
But I'm also using this thing called structured outputs that I planted a seed with you before.
And I told you that we're going to come back to this in week eight.
And I realized probably also in week six.
So so you're going to see this a few times, but this is just one more chance to see a little bit more
with this.
When you're doing structured outputs you give it a response format.
You pass in this thing here.
Response format is chunks.
And what is chunks?
Well look chunks is the class that we just defined up here.
Remember.
Where is it now.
Here it is.
Here it is chunks is this thing.
Chunks is a list of chunks.
And a chunk is a headline, a summary, an original text.
So when we do it this way, We are forcing the model to respond with a particular type of JSON that
is going to fit this schema, and it's going to allow light LM to return a bunch of these chunks.
And we will then finally going to call that.
As result, we're going to convert each of these chunks into a result object, which is the object that
looks very much like a Lang chain document.
It looks just like it.
You're like, are you are you getting this?
Well, hopefully you will.
What I'm going to do now instead of make messages, document zero I'm going to call this process document
function.
And let's see what comes back.
It's calling an LM right now.
It's using structured outputs to require it to meet this spec.
And look at what comes back.
We get back four chunks there in the form of result objects.
The result objects has two things a page content and a metadata.
The page content looks to me like it's a bunch of page content, and the metadata at the end has a source
and a type.
So it's working really nicely.
Process document is able to convert a document into chunks.
Beautiful.
Okay, well then surely the next step is to have create chunks.
Uh, create chunks is going to take a set of documents and it will just loop through the documents and
it will, uh, add them up.
It will accumulate them in a list called chunks and it will return that chunks.
Now, you see this thing.
Are you wondering what that is?
I could just say for doc in documents that would be more expected.
Right?
That's what you're used to.
Uh.
Is this little important, super important, uh, data science utility that you see an awful lot?
And tiki tqdm is just something which puts a little status bar on whatever list you're iterating over,
whatever list you're iterating over, it will automatically put a little progress bar as it iterates.
Uh, which is so convenient.
So you see tqdm all over the place.
And if you're wondering what that is, it's making a little progress bar.
And when you see those progress bars, you see them whenever you're doing hugging face things.
We've probably come across them a bunch before.
Uh, that is what you're doing.
So what I can now do is I can say chunks.
You probably saw I just it was there, I deleted it, and cursor puts it back.
Chunks is create chunks of all of our documents.
Let's run this and look at that.
Low and behold, we get a nice little status bar showing.
It's now going to go through.
It's going to be calling, uh, GPT four one nano again and again, each time for each of our 76.
Is it 76 documents, I believe?
Uh, and each of our 76 documents is going to be turned into chunks, scrolling all the way up to remind
myself how many documents we have.
But I'm sure you.
There it is.
It is 76 documents.
Uh, they are all loading.
They're all getting chunked.
And when I see you for the next video, we will be the proud owners of a bunch of chunks associated
with our documents.
See you then.
132 - Okay.
Success!
It's finished 100%.
It took almost ten minutes, so it wasn't.
It wasn't exactly zippy, but it was very easy to do.
Let's have a look.
We have precisely 400 chunks.
Uh, I've run this a few times.
I don't always get precisely 400 chunks.
I think it's a coincidence, but there we go.
That's nice.
Uh, and, uh, although it was slow, it was very easy.
And that was step two.
Step three, you remember, is just to save these embeddings.
So we're no longer using lang chains.
So we're now just calling chroma direct.
And it turns out that's pretty easy.
We we just call the database like this.
Chroma is persistent client.
This is the same as before.
If the collection exists delete it.
And then uh, we're going to get all of the texts chunked up page content for chunking chunks that collects
all the texts.
We will create embeddings by calling OpenAI embeddings create.
It's nice.
Now we're doing the code ourselves rather than just going through like the retriever, we we we very
clearly separate the database from the encoding.
So this is where we are clearly calling OpenAI.
To turn this into vectors.
And we collect those vectors.
And then in chroma we've got our collection.
We now simply add to the collection the the vectors, the texts and the metadata.
And it's done.
That would be the create embeddings function.
Calling the encoder and calling chroma direct no longer lang chain gluing them together.
And now we run that off it goes.
It's now going to chroma.
It's putting 400 vectors in there.
And it's been done.
The vectors have been created.
We've got 400 vectors in chroma.
And well I guess that's, that's that's it.
Then we can go home or or can we go home.
Have we, have we forgotten?
Have I forgotten something?
I'm not talking about actually doing the question answering.
Of course, we also have to do that.
But before any of this, we don't know that these 400 vectors are in chroma.
We don't know they're there unless we can visualize them.
So it turns out it's basically exactly the same code as we had before.
We do the same thing to gather the vectors, the documents, the metadatas, and make colors.
And then we used t-SNE, just as we did before t-SNE.
Do you remember it stands for T-distributed Stochastic Neighbor embedding.
Uh, and we use t-SNE to, uh, reduce it down to two dimensions and plot it in a picture.
Here it is.
I love these pictures.
And that's pretty nice.
We've got a nice cluster of greens, a nice cluster of yellows.
We've got the blues.
They do seem around here to get sort of stuck into the the contracts, but it does appear to be the,
uh, the features.
Look at that.
Features and capabilities.
It's the features part of the contracts that are more over here with the, the products.
But it is interesting that products and contracts do do seem to be like on each other like that.
Uh, but it's still very cleanly separated.
I'd say that visually looks like a good improvement over even what we had before.
And now?
Now we will bring it up in 3D because, you know, that's just the kind of person I am.
Uh, up we come.
We can swivel around and.
Oh, it's just so great.
What could be better than this?
You could just leave me now.
You could.
You could fast forward the video, like an hour and see me still going.
Ah ha ha ha.
Um.
So spend the time, you know, enjoy browsing around this vector space.
But this is the difference, of course.
Keep in mind is that now each dot, the 400 dots don't just represent taking a document and like, striking
them in various places.
But we have we've used an LLM to decide how to divide them into chunks.
And we've also written little summaries associated with each one.
That's that's what we've added to the mix to make it something that's going to be really good at, uh,
at, at answering questions so that that is success in our vector data store.
That is the ingest part of it.
And now we move on to the the retrieval that the, the question answering part of this the answer.
So we're going to do some reranking that's very trendy.
And we're going to do some query rewriting as well to mix with our document rewriting.
Uh okay.
So first of all we're going to create another Pydantic object, another object called rank order, um,
which is something which is quite simply a list of integers.
That's all it is called order, a list of ints.
And it is the order of relevance of chunks from most relevant to least relevant by chunk ID number.
That's what this is.
That's a new class called rank order.
And why do we have that?
Because we want to write a function called rerank.
And again this is another chance for you to see a simple function which is making an LLM call packaged
together.
Now we're going to make a prompt, put it into messages in the OpenAI style.
And then we're going to use lighter LLM.
But you could directly call use a call to an API, to a model to carry out an action.
And again I'm going to use structured outputs.
I'm sewing quite a lot of seeds here on this.
I was thinking I'd just give you a hint on it, but you're basically learning structured outputs.
Uh, we're doing that as well.
So the system prompt, you are a document ranker.
You're provided with a question and a list of relevant chunks.
The chunks are provided in the order they were retrieved.
It should be approximately by relevance.
But you may be able to do better.
You must rank the provided chunks by relevance to the question.
Most relevant.
First reply only with a list of ranked chunk IDs, nothing else.
And uh, then then that's the system prompt.
The user prompt.
The user is asked the following question.
Order all the chunks.
Here are the chunks, and then I list out the chunks with a chunk id and then I that goes into messages
with a system prompt and the user prompt.
This is the system prompt.
This is the user prompt I know you get it.
And then finally we call light LM.
We call completion the same as OpenAI or ChatGPT completions to create, we call completion.
We pass in the model, we pass in these messages that I just created right here and here.
This response format, this is structured outputs.
This is where I say you have to reply in this format.
It's told that it has to create JSON that meets this spec.
Uh, and so then we get response message content and we turn that into a rank order object.
And what I can do I can just add in here print order, I'll print that out so you see what it looks
like.
And then this is just some fancy python.
This is pythonic.
Uh, this is the equivalent.
This is like saying, okay, so let's say um, let's say uh, result is an empty list.
And for I in order look at cursor filling in result dot append that we could build up the result and
then return result return results like that.
Thank you.
Cursor.
But all of this that you see right there can be done in a fancy list comprehension like that.
And as numpy people here would know, numpy you could use like a super fancy slice thing, which would
be which would be really nifty.
But but this is pretty good.
Uh, so there you have it.
This is going to print the order and then return the chunks reordered.
So first of all, first of all, let's just have a simple fetch function fetch context unranked.
Let's not rerank them yet.
So this is basically the the alternative not using lang chain just doing retrieval ourselves.
And we're just going to first of all you remember with with Lang Chain we've got a retriever object
and we call the retriever object invoke retriever dot invoke.
And it just does everything for us.
But but it's not clear.
Like what's the embedding model and what's Croma here we get to do everything nice and cleanly separately.
Step one we we do OpenAI embeddings create with the question.
The question comes in, we turn it into a query okay.
Step two we go to chroma.
We query the collection given this query and we say that we want k results.
That is our retrieval.
And then finally we are going to uh then then come in and collect the the documents and metadatas.
And then we're going to return those chunks, we're going to, to um, to, to append that to a collection
called chunks.
So little chunks.
Okay.
So let's see this at work.
Uh, let's oh wait, I've got it right here.
So, so we've got a question.
Who won the I o t award.
Do you remember who won the award?
Maxine won the IoT award.
Let's see what happens if we do a fetch context.
Unranked.
So it's turning it into a vector.
It's then retrieving it from chroma and coming back with a top chunks like this.
Uh, so that that all happened, and I just printed out.
Let's print a little bit more than that.
Uh, you can see we've got we've got a bunch of different documents that have come out, uh, related
to this here.
They all are.
Um, let's, let's now, um, we'll come back to that, that second question.
Hang on.
Let's let's now rerank this let's come in and say reranked is rerank of this question and these chunks.
So we're calling this Rerank function right here.
We're calling that Rerank with the same with the question again and with the chunks, the unranked unranked
chunks that we just got.
Okay.
Let's run this.
Okay.
It's reranked them.
And this is the order.
It reranked them in the same first one.
And then for three the chunk number two came right down at the end.
Let's let's print this out and see how it looks for chunk in Reranked.
So here we go.
You can see that that career advancement is still the first one that came, but the second one is other
HR notes that came up to the top there.
And I'm expecting that probably these two are the two that mention the I t award.
Well there we go.
Let's do another one.
I have got a hard question, a trap, a nasty question that I slipped in there, which is that I made
Jessica.
Jessica, you.
I think she's called Jessica.
You, uh, has deep down in her HR record that she went to the University of Manchester and we are going
to now ask a difficult question about who went to Manchester University.
And we're going to retrieve 20 documents from the database.
And if you try this question on the prior version from a couple of days ago, you'll find that it can't
get the right answer from yesterday.
Go and give it a try if you've still got that running.
And I hope you do, because we're about to make it better.
Try asking who went to Manchester University and it will tell you I don't know.
So now we're going to dig into that and do some reranking with it.
133 - Okay, so we're asking who went to Manchester University and we're going to retrieve 20 documents and
see how we do.
And I do believe if you do this before we do the semantic chunking and you try it with the prior version,
it doesn't get it right and it's lower than than ten, the top ten that we pull.
But as of now, because we've done the semantic chunking, it doesn't do terribly.
It does bring it back.
It's the fourth document along.
And in fact that is that is index four.
It actually means it's the fifth document along because uh, zero is the first document.
So the fifth document down in the stack contained the word Manchester.
Uh, so, uh, it did find it eventually, but it was quite far down.
Now, what happens if we rerank we call the rerank to reorder things.
You can see that it's put the fifth document at the top now.
So now if we get it to say where is Manchester?
You'll see that Manchester is in the very top spot.
It was able to sift all of these documents and shove Manchester right up to the top.
And so let's see what is in the content of this first document.
You can see that this is about Jessica Liu.
I think Jessica Yu is Jessica Liu.
That's right.
Is the name of the person who was, uh, described as going to University of Manchester.
So that's working very nicely.
Okay.
Uh, then everything else is just going to be so easy.
Fetch context is just something which will take the unranked version and then rerank it.
And it's designed to sound just like the fetch context that we had before.
And now we're really in the end game.
It's time to to answer the question system prompt.
You're a knowledgeable, friendly assistant representing the company.
And sure.
Um, you're chatting about ensure Elm now.
I hope you remember one of the points was about improving your prompts.
And so I thought, well, I should do my own take my own advice.
So I put in here.
Your answer will be evaluated for accuracy, relevance and completeness.
So make sure it answers the question and fully answers it and blah blah blah.
Like, I'm really trying to hammer at the LMS so that it does a good job in all three dimensions, and
telling it that it's going to be evaluated is like, uh, you know, hopefully really, really makes
it focus, pay attention to, to to those objectives.
And then we give it some context.
With this context, please answer these as question.
Be accurate, relevant and complete.
There's no harm in being repetitive in system prompts as well as in courses.
Uh uh.
So and you'll notice that this otherwise is very similar format to when we use lang chain.
Same same kind of thing.
I've got like a little tag in here.
That's my system prompt.
And, and this, this is the, the extent of it.
This is the, the thing that's going to turn this into messages.
Um, I take a question, I take the history and I take some chunks.
I build my context.
It's just joining together all the different chunks.
I call my system prompt format changing, flipping this context field here for the context that's passed
in here.
And then I return role system for the system prompt.
I add in the history and the user for the user's question.
That makes our messages for our Rag Pipeline.
Super easy.
Final rag trick to do is query rewriting.
One more thing to do, which is one where we take the user's question.
We don't just take the question as it is, we try rewriting it first to see whether our LLM can do better.
And so here we have query rewriting Onshow.
And now you can see something that you're hopefully super used to.
Now this is just an example of a function that calls an LLM.
There's no structured outputs.
This time it could not be easier.
We describe a message you're in conversation with the user.
This is the history of your conversation.
This is the user's question.
Respond with a single refined question that will be used to search the knowledge base.
Important.
Respond only with the query.
Nothing else you can imagine.
I had to do this a few times because it kept wanting to tell me more, ask more, follow on questions
and things, which is not the point.
So you have to practice and experiment with these prompts and try each one separately.
And then the code is so simple I'm using light LM again, which is similar to chat completions.
Create model is the model.
That's the message.
And then I return response zero dot message content.
That's it.
So that is rewrite query.
It takes a question.
It optionally takes history.
And then it responds with the new query.
So what happens if we call that with who won the Ieti award.
We get back something pretty similar.
Who was the recipient of the Ieti award?
It's just changed one to recipient.
But you know, whatever.
Sometimes it can do better.
And particularly if there's history, it can do better.
So now we can turn this into an answer question function.
This is the other key function we had to write.
We had to write answer question.
And we had to write uh fetch content.
Those were fetch context.
Those were the two functions that we implemented before.
So this is the answer question function.
It takes a question and it takes the history.
And look at how simple it is.
We uh we rewrite the query.
We then get the chunks.
We make the rag messages, we call completion for the model and the messages, and we return the response.
That's it.
That is rag with no lang chain that nothing more than this.
If you're expecting something that was hundreds of lines of code and lots of rag stuff.
It's not.
It's just a few lines of code.
Rewrite the query, get the chunks.
Get the messages.
Call OpenAI, return the response.
There we go.
Let's ask it.
Who won the I o t award?
And there we go.
We get Maxine Thompson won the I o t award in 2023.
It's a response you can see there that happens to be accurate.
It happens to be complete.
It's got the last name and it happens to be relevant.
It hasn't given us any spurious information.
And you can see that there was some nice reranking that went on.
Uh, and uh, yeah, these were all the bits of relevant context.
You can see one other thing that we're going to do when we turn this into code, which is once we've
done this reranking, we don't need to pass all of these chunks to the final LM, because now we can
be pretty sure that the bottom ten are going to be less relevant.
So once we've done this, we might as well chop it off at some point and be more efficient with our
LM.
That's one of the cool things about using Reranking.
Okay, let's, uh, we're almost ready for showtime.
Let's ask the question.
Who went to Manchester University?
Uh, and, uh, we get back the answer.
Jessica Liu attended the University of Manchester.
It works.
It works nicely.
And, uh, you you can check that it doesn't work before.
At least it didn't work for me.
Now, one thing I'll tell you is that this doesn't always work.
I discovered initially that it.
That it didn't work.
It did a bad job of working.
And to my great disappointment, I discovered the reason that it sometimes doesn't work is because of
query rewriting.
Query rewriting sometimes counts against us because when we call query rewriting, it tends to like
to add the word ensure elm in there.
It tends to like say saying who from ensure elm blah blah blah blah blah blah blah.
Even though I added in here, don't mention the company name unless blah blah blah.
I had to put that in there and it stopped saying that, but it still does sometimes.
And when it does that, the rag retrieval is less reliable because it surfaces tons of documents that
are generic documents about ensure elm and not and Jessica's document like goes goes all the way down
and sometimes it doesn't get reranked up.
And so it becomes because of reranking it becomes a bit less reliable.
Sorry, not because of Reranking because of rewriting, it becomes a bit less reliable.
I hope you're following me here.
Rewriting the query, unfortunately, has added in more words like ensure elm.
That ends up diluting the rag retrieval and meaning that the relevant context doesn't get surfaced.
That's a problem.
And that that final problem we will also solve in the last step of this, which is now we're going to
take all of this and we're going to implement it in Python modules in an implementation directory.
And then we're going to take it for a test drive.
134 - Okay.
I hope you're excited.
It's the final, final part of the day.
Five, the final day of Rag Week, and it's all about what we're about to do.
I have taken the implementation folder, which has two two modules.py and ingest.py.
Remember them and I've cloned it.
I've duplicated it to make another one called Pro implementation.
Did you see that they're already Pro implementation is where we will now go.
And I've got two things ingest and answer.
And they are just going to be like swap in replacements so that we can just import a different package
and everything are our UI and our evaluator importantly should work exactly as is.
Isn't that cool that that's the whole point of doing it this way.
So let's start with ingest.py.
So ingest py.
It's exactly the same as the code that was in that that notebook we were just looking at.
I've copied, I literally copied and pasted the code I added in a couple of comments, because I sort
of feel like you expect me to.
Uh grouchily did that, but not many comments.
Uh, because, you know, this is the good Python should should read like English.
You should just be able to read it and know what it does or I've not done my job.
Uh, but I've made a couple of small changes.
One of them is I've added in this thing called tenacity.
Tenacity is a very convenient utility that lets you, uh, just add a little decorator like that, a
decorator around a function.
And if that function throws an exception, it will retry it with a backoff that will, that will, uh,
get slower and slower, an exponential backoff.
And it's a common little trick and I'm doing it for handling rate limit errors in case you happen to
get that.
So it's a way of making this more stable.
Now I'm not I've done it in a way where I should I should really be checking to see if it's a rate limit
error, otherwise raising it in a different way.
But but I've kept it this way just just for now.
But you can come in and improve this if you would like.
Okay, so other than that, there was one other thing I think I made to this.
We're using GPT four one nano.
Um, which means that in total this should this should cost about $0.50, I would say.
Um, but keep an eye.
Always keep an eye on on the costs as they could change.
Everything else is the same.
Make messages.
I've got the back off here I mentioned, and.
Oh, yes, the other thing I've done is so simple.
Again, it's just beautiful.
Python is.
It's very, very easy to use something called multiprocessing to have something run across multiple
replicas of Python.
Separate pythons are spawned to run a bit of what you're doing in a, in a pool.
Uh, and all you have to do is say with pool, uh, and then you can do something here where it will
basically, uh, it will take instead of instead of iterating over the documents, it is going to send
them off to the pool.
And they will work on five different different chunks in parallel, making this run five times faster.
Now, it's possible when I do that, that you might get a rate limit error because I've, I've got an
ability to, to do many of these.
But but you might not in which case there's this workers variable.
This chooses how aggressive it is in terms of how much it hammers GPT.
I'm going to I'm going to try and go for it here.
I'm going to put that up to ten and see what happens.
So that I'm running ten chunks in parallel at a time.
Um, but that is all that is happening with this ingest, uh, module right here.
And it just remains us now to try this out.
So I might regret doing that pool of ten.
We'll soon find out.
We go into week five folder.
We're going to go not into the implementation folder but into the Pro implementation folder because
we're pros now.
And do you've run and it is ingesting and it is now going to be spawning ten different Python processes.
They're all going to be hammering at GPT four, one mini, GPT four one nano, and together they off
they go.
And if you're wondering why there's a long pause to start with, it's because all ten of them were running
in parallel at the same time.
And now, one by one, each time one process completes, it gets sent, the next one in the list.
Python handles all of that for you just with that with pool command.
So easy.
You can google pythons docs to see how easy it is, and some of you might might prefer to use the concurrent
features.
The other way of doing it, and still more of you who've done the Agentic course might want to use async
code to do it, which is which is even better.
Um, but is slightly longer than using these kinds of multiprocessing pools.
Anyway, I was, I was thinking of of leaving it, but it's so fast and I'm prattling away that it's
probably going to finish before I manage to finish this, but I will.
I will cut to the next video when this completes in like 20s.
Well that's cool, it finished.
It made 534 documents.
If you're wondering why it was more than than 400, I actually I changed that average chunk size from
500 down to 100 because it just it tends to prefer bigger chunks.
So I wanted to try and try and force a few more.
Uh, but we still we just get 500 documents, but that's still a decent number.
It took one minute and 20s to run, so it was about ten times faster than when it was running serial,
which is cool.
Uh, but you may want to have a smaller number of workers.
Let me change this back to five, so I don't I don't accidentally check that into the repo.
Uh, or maybe I'm going to start you off on three, uh, and then if you want it to be faster, then
by all means, pump that up.
Uh, if you if you, uh, want want to hammer your machine a bit harder.
All right.
That is, uh, that is a parallel ingest pie.
All that remains is for us to go to the pro version of answer pie, where, again, I made just a couple
of changes from the notebook version.
Okay, here we are.
We're in pie.
I told you, it's copied and pasted from the notebook.
Just a couple of small changes.
First, change the model.
The model I've decided to go with here is using the open source GPT oss 120.
So this is the open source model that OpenAI published.
It's quite powerful.
I'm doing it through grok.
And if you don't have a grok account, don't worry.
If you've got an open router one you can use this through open router.
Otherwise just uncomment this line here.
Use GPT four one nano.
You also get good results.
OSS actually does better, but they're otherwise they're quite similar.
All right so we're going to use OSS 120.
We're going to use.
Otherwise this is all simply copied and pasted across.
Again I'm going to use the the tenacity package which gives us this really elegant exponential backoff
to handle.
If you get any any problems with rate limiting.
Otherwise the same system prompt as before.
Oh, I should mention I'm going to be retrieving k chunks from the database, but I'm only going to
be selecting the top ten after reranking I mentioned I would do that.
It's a nice little trick to make sure we don't have irrelevant context going to to the final LM.
I'm actually going to be giving more than 20, as you will see, for a clever reason.
We're going to be using another trick.
Okay.
Otherwise this is all the same.
This is Reranking with retry.
This is makes the the rag message.
This is the rewrite query also with a with an exponential backoff.
Very simply rewrites the query to a new query.
That is going to be hopefully better for retrieving context.
Okay.
Now this is this is fetch context unranked exactly as before.
It takes the query, it collects the embeddings, and it then turns them into chunks and returns the
chunks.
That is, fetch context unranked.
But I have made a change here to fetch context.
So to dwell on this for a second, because we're introducing another from the from the list of making
multiple queries.
Query expansion was the name of it, although we're doing it in a very particular way.
You remember I mentioned that I had a problem with query rewriting, that it was hit and miss.
Sometimes it helped us and wrote a good query.
Sometimes query rewriting hurt us.
It hindered the process because it wrote a query added in some extra words, like the name of the company
in Shoreham, and that that diluted the rag lookup and meant that we got some some general content rather
than specific content for the problem that we were asking.
And so that was problematic.
So I thought, ah, it's I don't even know if I want to include this because it makes some numbers better,
some numbers worse.
And then I thought, okay, well, that's a great example of when you can use query expansion.
Don't don't throw out the old query and only use the new query.
Treat them both as two different queries.
And so that's that's a great way of doing it.
So look what I do I have fetch context for the original question okay.
Well first of all let's rewrite the question.
rewritten question is rewrite query original question.
Now we have rewritten question after calling the rewrite query function here that's made that lm call
okay.
So then chunks one is getting the unranked from based on the original question chunks to get the unranked
based on the rewritten question.
So we've now got two sets of 20 chunks.
I've then written a slightly janky merged chunks function.
I bet there's a more pythonic way of doing this that maybe I'll do it before you get your hands on it.
Or you'll you'll ask me from from doing something that's just like a loop.
Uh, but anyway, I merge the two.
And why aren't I just adding them together?
Because I imagine that often they will surface the same chunks.
And I think it will be super confusing for the re ranker if it's asked to rank identical chunks.
So I merge them and throw out duplicates.
And that is what we rerank and we're rank it against the original question, not the rewritten question,
but because we're trying to answer the original question from the user.
And so we say, given that original question, what's the most relevant context for that?
And that way we ensure that we get the best of both.
And you know, you can imagine we could take this further.
We could have the, the the query rewriter not return one rewritten question, but return a list of
questions of new queries.
And then we could we could go through each of them and then call the reranking on the complete pool
of chunks.
And that would be super powerful.
And that would be dialing this up a notch.
And you should do it.
It will be easy.
Easy peasy.
Just just a couple of extra lines here and you'd have not just expanding the query to two queries,
but expanding it to N queries.
Uh, and then at the end here, look at that.
I just truncate everything by final K by the ten.
So I just take the top ten after reranking.
So easy.
Look at all this.
It's just a few lines.
Uh, so uh, then, then we end up with answer question.
And again if you're expecting, answer question to be some big, long, complicated thing.
Remember this was like 7 or 8 lines with long chain.
And because of the way I've rewritten this, it's actually incredibly short.
Look, we we come in with a question.
We do chunks is fetch the context for the question.
Fine.
Messages is make the rag messages given a question, the history and the chunks.
We then call completion with the model and the messages and we return the response.
That's it.
We're done.
We've just written a complete Rag pipeline with several advanced techniques.
We've got we've got document rewriting.
We've got query rewriting, document pre-processing, query rewriting.
We've got reranking.
Uh, we've got we've got lots of stuff going on here and we've got now query expansion in the mix as
well.
Uh, so, uh, not not to mention semantic chunking.
Uh, so lots going on.
Uh, the time has finally arrived.
This is the moment of truth.
It's time for us now to bring up the user interface and then the evaluator.
135 - Okay, I hope you're excited for our moment of truth, because I certainly am.
This is the last segment of the last day of week five, Rag week.
We're going into app dot Pi, which is the user interface, the Gradio UI that Claude built for me before.
And you'll see at the top here is this line from implementation dot import answer question, which is
our key function, our business logic.
Well look we can we've got the same function in our Pro implementation.
So we should be able to literally just change the package to that and run this in exactly the same way,
not change anything else.
And it should just work.
Let's see.
Let's bring up a new terminal window.
Let's go into week five.
Let's go and do a you've run app dot Pi.
Let's let's see what we get here.
I haven't changed anything.
The user interface looks exactly the same.
That's comforting.
Let's start with a good old who is Avery.
And now it's going off.
It's doing a query rewrite.
It's doing a lookups and bam!
Up has come something.
Let's see what we've got.
We've got a big answer.
Avery Lancaster Co-Founder chief executive Officer of insurer Elm.
And then here's a table with information about her.
In short, she's a visionary entrepreneur who founded insurer Elm and has been steering its growth and
culture as CEO ever since.
So, uh, tons of stuff succinctly summarized.
And in this elegant table, this is the the presentation of this is all credit to GPT OSS.
It loves generating markdown and doing it in a structured way.
And so you often see this.
So if you're seeing if you're using for one nano, you might not be seeing it as nicely done as that.
Over on the right here you can see the chunks.
There should be ten chunks in here the chunks should be relevant to Avery.
And you'll see that that within the chunks you'll see that they are semantically chunked.
They are chunks that each have a piece of meaning.
And they've got a nice rewritten summary like like this document rewriting at the top, along with a
little heading that I added to make sure that there's good context associated with each chunk.
Terrific.
Okay, so let's try something else.
Let's try, uh, who won the I o t award?
Let's see if we can do that.
And we know what's happening.
It's query rewriting.
And it says the IOC Award for 2023 was awarded to Maxine Thompson, senior data engineer.
And over here on the right, you can see the Maxine Thompson staff.
And you can see that it's getting all of the right information.
Excellent.
And no other employees are listed as recipients of that award.
It can do this.
It's working.
All right.
And again nicely formatted.
Let's try, uh, who went to Manchester University?
The hard question.
Hard question in there that the previous version was not able to do.
Let's see how it works.
Query rewriting Reranking.
Ranking.
Everything is happening.
What answer are we going to get?
We're getting a long pause.
Maybe it's a big answer.
Hopefully it's not going to be, I don't know, at the end of all of this.
Well, it's certainly thinking about it.
There we go.
The employee who studied at Manchester University is Jessica Liu.
And look, it even said that the record said University of Manchester.
Uh, and there's some notes.
And here you can see that the top relevant context is about Jessica Liu holding computer science from
the University of Manchester.
See, the way that it's clearly, uh, reframed it the right way.
So that's excellent.
It worked.
It worked.
Well, the query reranking worked.
It's the top chunk that got surfaced.
And so here you have it.
You should now experiment.
Use this to ask hard questions.
Observe that it's able to maintain the history as well.
Because of the way that we're doing the rewriting and the way we're passing in the full conversation.
And we have just built a powerful Rag system and it's working great.
Yes, I know what you want, and I want it too.
We want to do an evaluation.
That's what we're here for.
That's what you come along for.
So to do that, we just have to make one small, tiny change.
As I'm sure you're expecting.
In the evaluation package, there is this eval pie.
Here is eval pie.
It runs all of the evaluations.
We're not going to change any of our methodology for evaluating.
But what we do need to do right up at the top here is that we do need to make sure that we're not importing
from implementation, but we're importing from pro implementation.
And it's the same answer question and fetch context.
Those two functions, the function signatures are unchanged.
So it should just work out of the box and observe that that I'm specifying gpt4 on Nano here.
So we're using the same model for judging.
So we're not changing the, the the way that evaluations happen because that that could definitely mix
things up.
You have to be careful about that.
So so we are sticking to the same judge, the same evaluation.
Everything is the same.
The only thing that's changing are these four characters pro underscore.
Uh, and yet you and I know that there's a lot behind those changes.
Okay.
Um, so with that, uh, let's bring up a new terminal and let's, uh, go UV.
Evaluation.
Evaluator.
Evaluator.
Sorry.
Week five.
First of all, in week five, uh, CD week five.
There we go.
And now you've run.
Evaluate.
It's hard once you've run evaluator dot pi.
There we go.
You see, this is why I don't sit there typing all of this code.
You'd have to put up with all of that.
All right, so here we are.
Well, I hope you have carefully written down in some notes somewhere how this began.
Uh, I'm going to kick this off now.
It's not going to be fast.
As I say, if you if you want, you can update this to use, um, a pool.
If you're using something like grok, then you'll get lots of rate limit errors if you're not careful.
Uh, so the safest way is just to have it run one by one like this and go and get a get a coffee.
Um, I do want to remind you, I've got, I've got, uh, notes down of the very first time we ran this.
We had an MRI of 0.729298.7298.
That was where we began in red, and our accuracy was 3.99 in red.
Um, I didn't I actually haven't got the screenshot of that, but I've got a screenshot of the the best
that we know.
This was the one we got when we had biggest chunk sizes.
We got 0.7475.
And then this screen I kept of when we ran it after we were using the big embedding model.
And basically we've got everything in this sort of yellow territory.
Uh, MRR of 0.7903 um, and accuracy of 4.21 um, and uh, yeah, as I said, the red yellow green was
just thresholds I set based on like four and 4.5.
Um, but it gives you a basic sense of how we're doing.
So this this is where we were before.
Keep a keep a good careful eye on that.
This is this dashboard.
What I'm going to let it do now is run all of this, and then I will kick off, uh, the next one,
and I will see you for some results.
Good luck to us.
Keep fingers crossed for our advanced Rag pipeline and for GPT OS one TB as it carries out our Rag retrieval,
our evaluations over our curated test dataset.
And here you have it.
Great results.
I'm sure you're expecting good results.
Here they are.
We're green across the board for our retrieval 9116, and it's a bit different every time I run it,
and sometimes I do a bit better this time I think it's on the lower end of what I normally do it, but
whatever it's, it is what it is.
No cherry picking here.
We're in the green 0.9116.
Compare that to our first run only a couple of days ago, which was 0.7298.
So from 0.72 to 0.91, that's a big, big change.
Uh, and that means that we're like almost it's almost as if the first chunk, like nine out of ten
times, it's the first chunk is the has the content that's needed.
Uh, and then the this stat is 0.9025 is really, really strong.
What was that when we when we started out that was 0.7387.
Uh, and keyword coverage at 96% coverage.
That was 83.8% when we started out.
Uh, so really, really cool.
It's so great to see.
And then even just just as recently as yesterday, these were our numbers 0.7903.7901 in the yellows.
So we've really gone.
We've gone.
Gone.
The whole range from red to yellow.
When we had the better encoder and chunking all the way through to green.
Now that we've implemented Advanced Rag and it's so satisfying to see this, the raw results, the tangible,
concrete results of our improvement.
And yes, I'm going to scroll down.
Here we go.
There are our other three stats.
We scored 4.62 in accuracy, which is the most important stat on this whole page.
What really matters is accuracy.
And that was 3.99 before.
And we've gone all the way up to 4.62.
That is fantastic.
Uh, we've also still doing great on relevance.
We were 4.57 before now with 4.84, and this used to be 3.85 and now it's 4.35.
So it's our only stat still in the yellow.
Uh, and uh, it may be because some of the questions, uh, don't, don't have enough answers or it's
probably because we still didn't score great in numerical for some reason, which I think did well before.
It was one of our strongest ones before.
That's a bit odd, uh, and holistic, uh, and again, I get slightly different answers every time
I run it.
You might have got different answers.
So there are our results.
We can see the fruits of our labor.
We can see because we've got these evals, because we've done our homework around this, we are able
to get this kind of results.
And and the learning point for you is not that this is the right dashboard that you need or that that
exactly these numbers necessarily, but just that you need some numbers.
You need to have decided how are you going to evaluate performance in a way that makes most sense for
your business, in a way that's going to tie most directly to positive business outcomes?
And then you need to have a kind of framework to be you have to have the golden test data set that you
can use for your experiments, and you have to be able to generate these evals, and then you have to
iterate.
That's the learning point.
Uh, and that's what you've seen us doing so very productively, just in a matter of a couple of days.
136 - And I expand my screen so you can see everything at one time and enjoy.
Let me zoom out a little bit so you get to see it all together.
Uh, here we are.
Enjoy these great results.
And of course, the action for you now is that the challenge is only beginning.
This is your opportunity now to beat me.
Crush me.
Come in and iterate.
Iterate.
This is the results of a matter of hours of me working on this.
You can do better.
The trick.
There's there's no.
There's no magic trick.
The trick is work.
The trick is iterating.
Measure, iterate, measure and see if you can't move the needle.
There's lots of things to try here.
There's some of the techniques that I had mentioned.
There's obviously doing more query expansion.
There's trying out different chunking strategies, changing the prompts, just simple stuff.
Changing the prompts makes so much difference.
Hierarchical rag.
Try and fix this problem with holistic.
I'm not sure.
Look into what's happening with numerical category.
That might be an easy win there.
And with holistic that's the one to fix with hierarchical rag, makes some summary documents and then
do a query over them and shove them in the prompt.
And then if you really want a bigger challenge, then the bigger challenge will be to do a gigantic
rag.
Let's just dwell for a second on that.
So a gigantic rag for those that want to take on this challenge.
And I have actually built a little version of it myself, but I'm not I'm not going to share it yet.
Make make this a challenge for you, uh, for people, uh, who are fairly new to Agentic AI.
The simplest thing you can do is just take the tools that we worked on in week two.
We already built tools, so you know how to add a tool to an LLM, have a tool that just allows it.
The last LLM call, uh, equip it with a tool so that it can search all of the files for a keyword if
it wishes.
And then you could just write a very simple, uh, utility that scans all the documents for a particular
string.
And if it finds it, then then return that document in its entirety to the LLM.
That would be a simple tool that would add a gigantic genetic rag just like that.
And I tried that and it didn't make a massive difference.
It did improve things, but not massively.
But that's a nice thing for you to try it yourself and see.
But for the proper agentic people who've taken my Agentic course, you can take this further in two
ways.
First of all, you can change the entire flow so that instead of doing a rag retrieval and then calling
the LLM, it calls the LLM, and it gives it a tool that allows it to come in and do a vector lookup.
And you could use MCP for that if you wanted very easily.
And you could not only give it a vector lookup, but also a file lookup, you could give it a number
of different ways that it can query the documents so that it can answer different questions, including
questions from any of these categories.
It would be pretty easy to set up tools to allow it to do any kind of search vector or graph or otherwise,
across all of that data.
But then there's more for the real agentic coders there.
Think about the other thing you could do.
Can you imagine the other thing you could do that would be like, like completely like earth shattering
for these metrics is you could add a tool or not.
Not a tool.
You could add a step which is calling the evaluator.
You could have it once it generates its output, you could evaluate it.
And if it's not scoring top marks for accuracy, completeness and relevance, you can kick it back and
say, hey, you scored poorly on the on the category of relevance.
Try again.
You didn't score well on completeness.
Try again.
And you could just keep going, keep iterating over it until it scores well and you could have it in
a loop.
So it just keeps going until it finally cracks it.
And if you do this, presumably you could build a system that might take a long time to run, but should
be scoring five out of five in all categories.
And then yeah, then then you should take a screenshot and put it on LinkedIn and put it everywhere
and it will go viral.
And that would be incredible.
That would be the the ultimate agentic solution.
And I would love to see it.
And I would love someone to be sharing their like four point nines across the board when you get there.
Of course, with the true genetic solution, you won't have retrieval stats because you're not really
doing retrieval in the same way.
It's a much more interactive style of retrieval.
So that's a great, exciting challenge for you.
A really fun assignment.
I can't wait to see people doing it.
If you haven't taken the genetic course, then don't worry about this super advanced genetic part,
but just play with all of the other aspects.
Play with hierarchical rag.
Um, play with with different models as well different LMS.
Try varying it to see what kinds of results you get.
And of course different encoders too.
There are lots of great open source encoders to try.
Okay.
And with that take great pride in our good stats here and I will see you back for the wrap up.
Well this is of course the end of the week.
It's the end of week five.
And so in addition to that little Agentic challenge or just general rag challenge to to beat me and
to get amazing scores, there is a bigger end of week assignment for you.
And that is now to go and apply your learning to a different field, to building a different knowledge
worker.
And it could be a knowledge worker for your business, because this is such a prototypical business
use case of generative AI.
You could also make a private knowledge worker to help you, something which is optimized on your own
personal data.
For example, you could put all of your files that you have on your Google Drive or on your local drive,
organize them and write something that brings them into a vector data store so that you can ask any
questions that pertains to documents you've written, information you've gathered over the years.
So you have your your own personal knowledge base at your fingertips.
You could do it all with open source models.
It'd be like a cool twist to it so that it doesn't cost a penny.
It's all running on your computer.
It also means everything is kept private.
If you're using open source models, nothing is going to the cloud.
Uh, and uh, and then make it so that it's a conversational AI that you can talk to with expert knowledge
of everything across your documents, even more than you remember.
That would be fantastic.
And then you can also take that even further.
And if you're, for example, someone that uses Google Workspace, Google has APIs so that you could
be accessing your own emails.
You can do it in a read only mode to avoid any any unexpected behavior.
And you can read your own emails and your Google Docs.
And you could do the same with Microsoft Office.
If you're a Microsoft user, and you could have it so that that's something which you're able to to
look over and and respond to your emails based on a full knowledge of everything that you've already
sent and you'd be able to build them.
Imagine visualizing the vector data store that is, the vector data store of the sum total of all of
your information.
Wouldn't that be cool?
That would be another.
That would be a great LinkedIn post showing that the vector store of you, and your full map of all
of the information that pertains to you.
Uh, so this is a great challenge.
Uh, I can't wait to see what you make of this.
I know a bunch of people have been have been working on this really interesting challenge.
the.
So the mandatory challenge is beating my my rag numbers.
This one is the stretch challenge.
Make a personal knowledge worker for you.
Make it vast.
Make it it's knowledge.
Be across everything you've done and then show it off on LinkedIn and let me come in and amplify your
success for you.
I can't wait to see that.
And with that, that brings us to the conclusion of week five.
What a week it's been.
You are 62.5% on your journey to being an LMN engineer, proficient engineer of all things large language
model.
And I think at this point, I hope that it now really feels like your 62.5% that this week was a big
week.
We really I feel like we crossed a line into the more advanced territory at this point.
The first couple of bullets here are like, yeah, yeah, yeah, you can generate text and code.
You get it, you can, you can pick the right LM, but now you can build advanced Rag solutions with,
with really, uh, like cutting edge techniques that are used in industry today.
But most importantly, I feel like you get the joke about how important it is to evaluate your performance
and to use that to put a sort of scientific framework around something that is more of an art form.
And that's a wrap on rag.
But as I said at the beginning, don't think, okay, then it's a wrap on on on on LM engineering.
I'll see you in another course.
Uh, no.
The next few weeks are really terrific.
They're really great.
It's the capstone project for the next few weeks.
It starts with a week.
That is.
That is a bit of a traditional data science week, but in a in a very juicy way, culminating in running
with LMS frontier models and fine tuning LMS.
We're going to cover the whole spectrum of machine learning, deep learning LMS as we try and solve
a problem, and that's going to dive into week seven and week eight.
It's going to be really, really great.
Get some rest.
Uh, complete the assignments, get some rest, and then I will see you for the beginning of week six
coming next.
137 - You did it, you decided I'm not going to give up after rag.
I'm not going to stop.
I'm not going to stop while we're doing so well.
I'm going to keep going.
I'm going to go into week six.
I'm going to learn about training.
I'm going to go pro.
And I want to tell you you're not going to regret it.
It's a great decision.
I have so much in store for you.
Welcome to week six.
Last week, of course, was all about rag.
In addition to being able to generate code and text with frontier models and with open source models,
choosing the right model for your project, you can now build advanced Rag solutions with Lang chain,
also without Lang chain and you can evaluate them.
But today we are starting on our capstone project.
This is the beginning of three weeks of pro material.
We're starting today with about data sets.
We're going to download the data set from Huggingface.
We're going to we're going to curate it.
We're going to dig into it.
We're also going to look at the different ways you can evaluate success.
Uh, and we're going to talk generally about uh, AI and generalization and data sets.
Lots of great material to do today.
Let's get to it.
But first, again, since it's the beginning of the week, you know what we have to do a quick look
at the whole journey.
This this is what it's taken to get to this point.
You started all the way over there on the left.
Uh, we covered the foundations, the chat completions, API, frontier models.
Then we looked at all of the different frontier models and their APIs, UIs, multimodality.
We touched on light LM and prompt caching while we were at it.
And then we went into Google Colab.
We got into using open source models with hugging face.
It was our first look at hugging face.
There's going to be more this week.
Then we looked at selecting the right LM for the project at hand, and we built that cool code generation
project converting from Python to C++.
But of course fresh in your mind is week five rag week.
We did so much we built a question answering platform.
Hopefully you've built your own as well.
We evaluated it.
We used Lang chain.
We didn't use Lang chain.
So many things.
Okay.
This week we're going to be be working with with machine learning, with neural networks, with building
out solutions to to a problem, a business problem, using a curated data set.
And at the end of the week, we're going to fine tune a frontier model.
Next week, we're then going to fine tune an open source model, and we will have a result, which I
think will shock you.
That's coming in week seven.
And week eight is when we bring all of this together.
We also do rag again, we build out this enormous Rag platform.
We then introduce many elements from the previous weeks for the final capstone deliverable, the finale,
which will be an Agentic AI product and you're gonna love it.
And at that point you'll be able to say, okay, I am an LLM engineer.
So look, as we as we come into this week, let's just do a quick recap of what we've been working on
so far as we've applied models to solve business problems.
We've used closed source and open source models, but all of the ways in which we've made models better
is by doing different using different techniques.
At runtime, we've got a model, we're trying out different things.
We do things like Multi-shot prompting.
We did it early on when you're just giving a bunch of examples in the input prompt, and by giving it
examples, we're able to drive better outcomes.
Then tools and function calling we did in week two, which is when we equip an LLM with the ability
apparently to run code itself when really it's just responding, hey, can you run this code on my behalf?
But that has given us the ability to get more from Llms.
And then of course, famously last week adding rag, which turns out to be such a simple old thing,
just looking up relevant context and again shoving it in the prompt that goes to the LLM.
So all of these are different ways that we can improve on things like the prompting, so that we steer
the model that when it's generating tokens, the tokens it generates are more likely to be consistent
with our business objective.
And that's these are all these types of tricks are all called inference time tricks because the model
has been trained and when we're running it, we're trying to steer it to do a better job.
And now, of course, it's our moment to start thinking about training, something that we've just taken
for granted up to this point.
So this week we start training.
The training doesn't actually happen until the end of the week, but everything that we're doing up
to that point is kind of paving the way.
It's it's it's putting in place the bits and pieces we need in order to be able to do training.
So I imagine most of you are somewhat familiar with the basics of what it means to do training.
But let me just recap, just to make sure we're on the same page.
And this is something that we will be covering a little bit more.
This this course is very practical.
Not I don't cover a lot of theory except in the context of putting things into action.
So so let's do that right now.
So training is really at the heart of AI and really at the heart of machine learning, the kind of what
came before AI that we will cover during this week training is this idea that we've got a model, we've
got a model which is trying to make some kind of a prediction.
And that model is controlled by by internal settings, which are these things called parameters.
You may be using my YouTube videos on parameters.
We've got all these parameters in the model.
And basically training is about how do we set these parameters best given a bunch of inputs and outputs.
Some examples.
If you get this input you should have this output.
This input you should have this output.
Now please set your internal parameters so that you see the patterns.
And you're most likely to be predicting the right outputs given this input.
That's the basis of it.
And how do you set these parameters.
Well that's something we're going to cover another day not today.
Just assume there is a technique.
There's a training technique that allows you to choose how to set these different weights so that when
it's given the inputs that it got at during your training, you would get the same outputs.
But that's not the point.
The point is not to train a model so that, you know, you give it like ten different inputs.
Here are the ten different outputs.
And then if it's given one of these inputs it should give that output.
I mean for sure it should if it was given that in training time.
But that's not the point.
The point is that after you're done with training, if the model is given some new input different to
these ten examples, something different, it makes a prediction which is kind of consistent with the
others.
It seems to have learned the patterns in the data.
What kinds of inputs led to what kinds of outputs such that when it's given something different, that's
sometimes called unseen data.
Data it didn't see before, it gives an output that seems reasonable, it seems accurate, it seems
consistent with the patterns that it saw in its ten training examples.
So again training is about here's some inputs and outputs.
Set the parameters.
Set the settings inside the model such that if you get something different after we're done training,
your output is somehow accurate.
It's got good quality.
And if you're not entirely sure what that means, what do you mean by it's accurate?
What does it mean to have good quality?
Don't worry.
We are going to define all those things later.
Just get a general intuition what this is about.
It's about being able to get a model so that it performs well on unseen data that's similar, but different
to what it saw at training time.
And this leads me to the single most important word in all of AI.
And that is the word generalization, the ability of a model to make an accurate prediction on data
that it's not seen before.
To make to give an output for a given input, where that input is different to anything it's seen before,
if it's able to do that well, you would say the model is able to generalize.
It's seen some examples.
It has generalized.
And now when it's given a new example it does well.
It gives an output that seems to be reflective of the pattern in the inputs and outputs.
That's called generalization.
That's what it's all about.
We're trying to build models that are good at generalizing.
And what's a model that's good at generalizing.
Well guess what Llms Lambs, GPT got GPT.
What makes GPT so very remarkable is not that if you say, write me a poem about the president of the
US, that it writes a good poem because that poem was was bound to be in its training data.
There's probably lots of poems like that, and it could just simply pluck one out.
It's if you say, write me a poem with with rhyming couplets where every other sentence begins with
the letter A, it can still do it, and it will do a fabulous job, and it will be witty and wonderful.
And it's done that even though that is not one of the examples in its training data, and it's done
it because it's seen so many examples, so many patterns in its input data and its training data of
inputs.
And then the output, which for an LLM is the is the next token that comes after this.
It's seen so many examples of that that it's got really, really good at generalizing to new data that
wasn't even part of its training data.
That's it.
That is AI generalization.
And that's what we're planning to do this week.
138 - So training is at the heart of AI.
And years ago when we were working with traditional ML, we would have models typically that had somewhere
between 20 and 200 parameters often.
And training was about taking a bunch of data, perhaps 10,000 data points and running it through your
model and setting these weights just right, these 20 to 200.
But sadly, that's not the case with LMS.
LMS don't have 20 to 200 parameters.
LMS.
LMS have potentially billions of parameters, and training in LM can cost hundreds of millions of dollars.
OpenAI is rumored to have spent more than 100 million training GPT, a deep seek.
Apparently only spent a few million on deep AI, but it's still a few million.
Is is is just a few million over my budget.
So that's not what you do.
Instead, we can take advantage of a property of of these models known as transfer learning.
And that property says that actually what you can do, which which turns out to be really effective
is you can take a model that someone else has already trained.
They did their training and it's done.
It's known as pre-trained.
It's it's been trained.
And you can actually train it a little bit more with some business specific data.
And as long as you don't use too much, you can make it so that it retains the original information
it was trained on.
And it just also gets better at a particular business task.
And doing that, taking advantage of transfer.
Learning to train something more for a particular task is what's known as fine tuning.
Of course, so that that is what fine tuning is.
And that's what we're going to be doing.
And at the end of this week, most of this week is going to be about scrubbing data and traditional
ML and some neural networks.
But at the end of the week, we're going to fine tune a frontier model that you do just through APIs.
Next week is when we really roll up sleeves and go pro, and we're going to fine tune our own open source
model.
And it's now time for me to unveil the capstone project, the commercial project data science project
that we will work on for the next three weeks in different ways.
So it's like it's a capstone project.
It's also three separate projects in a way, but they all tie together and I'm naming it humorously,
The Price Is Right.
This is about building a platform which can take a description of a product, a typical like like a
home product.
It could be a TV, a computer monitor, or a computer, or a car part, or a washing machine, something
like that.
And given a description of that product, we're going to build models that can predict how much it costs.
That is what we're doing.
It's nice and simple and crystal clear what we're trying to achieve.
It should estimate how much is this actually worth?
Uh, in reality, and ultimately, by the end of the next three weeks, we're going to incorporate that
into a big agentic project, something which can go off.
And it can it can look across the internet for bargains.
And when it finds bargains, it can assess how how good a bargain is this?
How much is this product really worth?
And is this something that's a real bargain that we should buy?
And if so, it's going to do autonomous stuff.
So it's going to be really cool.
But that's at the end.
That's at the end of week eight.
What we're going to be doing in week six and seven is building something that is going to be really
very accurate, very accurate at predicting how much something should cost.
Now, this kind of problem of predicting how much something should cost, like a price for people from
a data science background, you would recognize this as something we would call a regression problem,
a problem that's trying to come up with a number given various factors.
And typically that's something which traditional machine learning is very good at.
It is designed for things like this.
You imagine that that that a product, its price probably depends on a few factors what kind of thing
it is.
If it's a TV, it probably depends on the size, the number of diagonal inches.
And so there are some factors which which in machine learning you call features features of the data
which you could use to predict its price.
So you might think regression.
This feels like a task that would be very well suited to traditional forms of AI.
Not necessarily.
So much for llms.
Well, there's still some good reasons for us to to do this in this course and to take it through machine
learning and and llms.
One of them is that llms typically are used to generate content just to generate language.
And that doesn't always give you a really easy way to evaluate the the impact, evaluate the accuracy
of what it's coming up with.
In our case, because we're going to be generating product prices, we're going to have a crystal clear
way to tell how well are we performing, because we're going to know how much things actually cost.
So we're going to know if we're doing well or not.
And that's very satisfying.
It's not so common in in modern AI that you have such an easy, tangible way to evaluate how well your
model's performing.
And we're going to have that.
Another thing is that llms have this deep understanding of the meaning of language and in trying to
evaluate the price of something.
It's not just important to know, like, okay, this is a 60 inch TV.
You also have to be able to understand, okay, is this a smart TV?
Is this like a high quality?
Is it is it from is it being positioned as something that's a luxury item?
Like there's a lot of nuance to the way the product is described that a true expert might use to figure
out how much it should cost.
So actually, maybe there is room there for Llms to do better because they're smart.
And as it happens, we're going to see that frontier models are already extremely good at estimating
how much something should cost.
And they have that sort of intelligence, that expertise built into them in a lot of ways.
So it turns out this is actually a really great project for Llms.
You're going to see that we're going to get good results, and we're going to be able to to rank and
assess everything.
And you know what?
We're going to do this with traditional ML as well, because it's good for you to see that.
it's good for you to see what?
What is the baseline?
What are we able to do without Llms?
We're going to be able to use a normal neural network, and we're going to be able to use llms closed
source and open source, and we're going to be able to assess them with this very simple metric.
How accurate are they at predicting the price of a product based only on its description?
Okay, so the price is right.
That is our project.
That is our capstone project.
Starting this week, the order in which we're going to go through things and keep this in mind so that
this isn't overwhelming.
So you're following along with the journey this week is about data curation, evaluation and then working
with the frontier Llms today we're going to curate data.
It's something which some people find like like boring.
There's a boring side of data.
Science is digging through data.
I love it, and I hope that some of my enthusiasm for data curation will rub off on you.
When you see some of the visualizations that we'll work on.
You know I love these visualizations.
Anyway, that's day one.
Day two, we're going to do something really cool data pre-processing.
That might not sound like.
That's really cool.
It is.
Bear with me.
We're going to use Lmms.
We're going to use Lmms in a really interesting novel way that is very popular, uh, which is, uh,
maybe not novel.
It was novel once, but not anymore.
It's, uh, it's very popular as a way to to rewrite data in a way that's going to do to do really well
for your model.
Then day three, we're going to do a little step back in time and we're going to go traditional ML.
It's so important to build a baseline model.
What does it look like if we don't use lmms.
Let's see.
Day four is when we do the like the zoom through time.
We're going to use, uh, artificial neural networks with PyTorch like a simple neural network.
And then we're going to move to frontier large language models and see how they perform.
And finally, we're going to fine tune a frontier large language model.
And I should warn you right now that that the end of this week, it's going to to end with a little
disappointment.
It's going to end with like a like a bitter taste in your mouth.
But I need to tell you that.
That I will deliver.
You're going to need to hang on in there with me, because whilst perhaps, perhaps I will leave you
with a little unsavoury taste at the end of this week, I will make up for it in spades with week seven.
And so what is week seven?
Week seven is when we fine tune and open source.
Like it's going to be huge and big eight is when we then take this, we deploy it.
We can deploy it to the serverless AI platform.
So it's a little taste of the sort of production techniques of deploying models.
And we're going to also bring back Rag, and we're going to build the product I mentioned before.
And it's going to blow your mind.
And yeah, it will deliver.
It will be a fitting finale.
So you gotta stick at it to the bitter end.
Now this is super important.
This week is going to be and actually the next three weeks is going to be more intense, more, more
deep than perhaps the first five weeks.
You might be thinking it's really been intense.
Uh, but there are three different ways that you can engage with me on this.
And all three of them are productive and useful.
And you pick your poison, pick which one is going to work for you.
One way is to say, look, I don't particularly need to know how to fine tune my own models, but it's
helpful to have the intuition to understand what's going on and to have a sort of knowledge of the terminology,
how it works, what results you get, what works, what doesn't.
In which case, watch the lectures don't go through all of the labs.
But I was just at the end.
I save everything as I go so that you can you can pick up at any point, and you should run the final
result at the end so that you see everything happening.
And at any point during this, if something really appeals to you, you can recreate it.
But generally speaking, if you want to to approach it this way, then just focus on intuition.
And don't worry if you don't understand everything, you can always come back to it.
Uh, it's not it's not crucial that you understand it.
It's just just important to get the general idea, the gist of what we're doing.
Number two is if you would like to follow on, you'd like to be able to understand this and do it yourself.
But but you don't necessarily want to spend money doing it, and you don't want to get too deep into
something that might take several days to run, in which case I've got a lite version as we go through.
The Lite version is something which has a smaller data set 20,000 rather than 800,000, which is going
to be the big data set.
Go with the Lite data set.
And for today and tomorrow, follow along with what I'm doing.
But at the end of it, I upload the final curated, processed data and that's what you should use.
So you don't need to produce that yourself, because that involves downloading gigabytes of data.
And it might be might be like more than you're willing to sign up for right now.
And depending on decisions you make along the way, this could cost you anything from free.
You can do this without any spend at all, or up to $5 if you wish.
About that, that that's my estimate based on my experience with it.
And then, of course, number three is if you are all in, you're like, oh, this.
This is what I want to do.
In which case, be there with me and do it as I do it.
Do the 800,000 data set.
Uh, do the full training of everything and the full curation.
It's going to be quite a lot of work.
It could take several days for some of the runs to fully complete, but I want to assure you, it's
super satisfying.
The others, you'll be able to watch me go through it and you'll see the results.
Uh, but yeah, it's a big deal.
The estimate here is is somewhere between $5 and $35 of that 35.
The biggest chunk, 30, is about pre-processing all of the big data set.
And again, you don't need to do that because I've uploaded the before and the after.
So you can simply take the the after.
It's as simple as that.
You don't need to spend that, that that $30.
You could do the number three here just with a $5 budget.
Okay.
So these are the three alternative ways.
As I say, there's none of them are better or worse than the other.
It depends on on how deep you want to go in this subject.
It's going to be terrific fun whichever path you choose.
139 - Okay so today's all about data.
So let's dig into some data.
Andrew Ng is famous for saying AI is the new electricity.
And I often think that there's a there's a spin on that, a slight a slightly different lens on that,
which is to say that that it's actually data that is the new electricity data is what powers everything
that we do.
And when you're thinking about building an AI startup, often the first thing you think about is, okay,
so what's what's the source of data that we will use to be able to build some kind of, of a differentiated
AI?
So where do you go to look for data?
Well, the best place to go for data is your own proprietary data that you yourself have crafted.
Uh, if, for example, you're in the business of matching talent with roles like I am in my day job,
then perhaps it's about understanding actual people who've been successful and happy in their careers
and using that as a proprietary data store.
Then there are websites like Kaggle, a well-known data science community, where you can download rich
data sets and similarly hugging face, which in many ways in the LLM community is very much taken over,
is is where you go for great data sets.
So much to explore in hugging face datasets and then generating synthetic data is something that you
can do and you have done it.
I hope you built that in a previous week as one of the assignments.
And then there are also companies that specialize in curating generating data for you.
Like like, like that's one of the things that scale does.
So these are the different ways that you can work with data.
And hugging face is this remarkable treasure trove of data.
There's so much to it.
And that is indeed where we are going to go today.
There is a data set that's called Amazon Reviews 2023, which is this enormous, enormous repository
of of Amazon data.
It includes reviews about the products.
We're actually not going to use the reviews, but but you can do if you want to see a different twist
on this project.
But it has product descriptions and it also has prices of products taken from a scrape of Amazon data
over over recent years.
So it's enormous data set.
And that is what we're going to be using for our project to try and predict the price of something based
on its description, because we've got tons of Amazon data courtesy of the Macaulay Lab and uploaded
to Huggingface.
And today we are going to be diving into data.
We're going to be curating a data set.
We're going to investigate the quality of the data.
We're going to be parsing it so that it's in a format that we can work with, looking at it in different
charts, figuring out what kind of quality do we have, curating it, doing things like picking a good
distribution of data that we think is going to to be best for our model, and then finally uploading
it to the hub.
And I do want to mention that there's a lot about training models that's very glamorous, a lot about
doing what's called hyperparameter optimization, which sounds sounds very Star Trek.
We're going to be doing all of that later.
And that's the stuff people like to talk about.
And the digging into the data, curating the data.
This this feels a bit a bit sort of going into the weeds, getting, getting, getting into some of
the minutia.
Um, but it happens that this in curating a good data set, this is the part that often makes the biggest
impact on the quality of your training.
I certainly found in all of the experiments I did, I did tons of experiments with changing hyperparameters,
as we will see.
But it turned out that the the effect that I had that was strongest was when I curated a really good
data set.
So this may not be the most glamorous part of fine tuning of training a model, but it's one of the
most important parts, and so we need to spend time on it.
And yeah, you need to not skip me forwards.
You need to pay attention while we curate the perfect data set.
And I want to plant a seed about a very important topic that we will talk more about later in the week
and over the course of the next few weeks.
Evaluating performance, something that's been a bit of a recurring theme throughout.
Throughout this course, it's very important to have a good strategy for evaluating performance as as
well.
You know, and often one thinks about two different types of metric.
There are metrics that are known as model centric metrics or technical metrics.
And these are metrics that are very closely aligned with with what you're actually doing with the model
as you tweak parameters and try it again.
And typically it's also known as the loss.
It's how wrong was the model at trying to predict an outcome.
And with with LMS you typically use something called cross-entropy loss.
And we will cover cross-entropy loss in due course.
And the other kind of metric are known as business centric metrics or outcome metrics.
And these are the metrics that are most closely aligned with your actual commercial objective.
So for Adams, this is often the user giving feedback, thumbs up or thumbs down on whether the response
to the chat was a good response.
There's other business centric metrics like revenue or customer satisfaction that ultimately, whatever
you're building with your LMS, you want to drive to those outcomes.
But often it's a bit harder to connect the dots between the changes you're making to the model and your
final business metrics.
So there's this continuum between being very model centric and business centric, and you're always
trying to find the sweet spot, which is a metric which which is as close as possible to both.
It's close to the model and it's also close to your final business outcome.
And in our case, for this week's project and for the next three weeks project, we do have such a metric.
We've got a beautiful metric because it's so simple.
Our model is going to predict the price of a product.
We can look at the actual price that that actually costs and take that difference.
How wrong were you?
That's the actual difference in price.
So the absolute difference in price, if we only look at only always consider a positive number that
that difference, that error that is very closely aligned with our model.
And it's also closely aligned with our business objective.
And so that is one of the metrics we're going to be looking at a lot over the course of the next few
weeks.
And of course, those of you from a data science background will know that a more common model centric
metric is called the mean squared error.
The MSE, which is taking the difference between the prediction and the actual price and squaring it.
But whilst that is a very effective model metric and used a lot during traditional ML, it's it's not
as as tangible for us for, for business people.
Looking at the results, I can say that my model is on average wrong by $100.
It guesses the price, wrong by $100, and you'll know exactly what that means, where an MSC is a bit
harder to see.
What does it mean to say that the mean squared error is 10,000?
It's hard to know exactly whether that's good or bad.
So that's why we're going to really home in on the actual price difference for this project.
Okay.
So we have this big data set.
We've got all of these Amazon prices that we've scraped from the internet.
We've got them from hugging face scraped product descriptions and prices.
It's it's typical to divide your data into three different pools of data.
Three pools.
The first of them is called the training data.
And obviously this is the vast majority of the data.
And it's the data we're going to be using during training.
It gives us the the inputs and the outputs in our case product descriptions and their prices.
And we'll be using this to set the internal parameters of our model such that it will do well on data.
It's not seen before.
That's the training data.
The second pool is called the validation data or val data or eval data.
Validator.
And this is data that's called held out data because it's data that we didn't include in training.
We held it out.
And this held out data is going to be used to evaluate how does our model perform on unseen data.
Is it able to generalize.
How does it do.
And we we take this validation data.
And we repeatedly during training use this to see are we getting better or worse, better or worse because
we are always running it against this held out data.
And then there's a third pool of data called the test data.
And this is just another chunk of unseen data held out, data that you keep in reserve until the very
end of the whole process.
Because you've been using this validation data repeatedly during training to say, is it getting better?
Is it getting better?
Is it getting better?
Okay, this is the best.
We'll we'll stick here.
And and so we don't want to use that again to test our model because we've already kind of selected
the version of our model that does best on that validation data.
So we want to have one more set of data held in reserve, so that at the very end, we can do one more
test and use this test data to definitively decide if if definitively decided, definitely judge whether
or not we have been able to accurately make model predictions on unseen data.
Has the model been able to generalize?
So those are the three pools of data training.
Data validation.
Data test data.
In traditional ML it was often 80%.
Is training ten and ten.
Uh, but but these days with with llms, because they take so much training data, it's often heavily
skewed to to massive training data sets and relatively small validation data and test data enough so
that you're getting a stable metric.
So that's how data sets are divided.
And those are the data sets that we're going to be building today.
Okay.
And with that finally, finally I'm done with talking and slides and all that stuff.
It's time to go to Casa.
It's time to curate our data sets.
Let's go do it.
140 -
And here we are in cursor.
We're going into week six.
Look how fresh and new it looks.
Going into day one to begin our adventure.
And as it says, it's the big project begins.
The price is right capstone project.
We're going to build a model that predicts how much something costs based on a description of the product,
using a scrap of data from Amazon as a way of training models.
The order of play.
Today we're curating data.
So important, maybe not so glamorous, but very important.
Then we're going to do pre-processing.
Then on day three it's going to be about evaluating models baselines, using traditional ML, then deep
learning neural networks, LMS.
And finally for this week on day five, we will do some fine tuning of a frontier model.
As I say, perhaps, uh, not not the outcome you may be expecting, but with redemption along the way.
Okay, so first of all, it's all about data curation.
We're going to be curating our data.
And the data set is right here.
It's in hugging face.
It's it's a it's part of the data set.
Set.
It's from Macaulay Lab.
It is this this scrape of Amazon reviews from 2023.
And you can scroll down to find a lot about, about, uh, how many products they've got, how many
reviews they've got, the different categories and so on.
And it's an example of one of the many, many data sets that you'll find on Hugging Face.
Do go and explore.
There's there's data sets on on financial data, on health data on so much more for building commercial
applications.
So we're starting with this one.
When you build your own projects later, there's so many great starting points and ideas you can get
just from browsing the data sets.
Okay, but back to cursor again.
So uh, and I mentioned that, uh, data curation is, is sometimes considered less glamorous.
And I say nonsense.
This is where we get scientific.
Uh, it's it's, uh.
And as I say, and this is absolutely true, it was working.
It was R&D on this data set that had by far the biggest outcome impact to the quality of results from
this project.
So definitely, it's important to spend time with data curation.
All right.
Well as as usual I'm going to be going through code and I'll go through it quite quickly.
I won't, for example, talk through all the imports.
And I do, uh, encourage you to go through this, look through it in your own pace, use LMS to help
explain anything you don't understand.
As usual, I'm running a bunch of imports and doing load EMV.
I haven't got my usual checks in here because by this point I think I can trust you to have your EMV
set up right and to have loaded in the keys, including hopefully in your EMV file you have HF underscore
token, the hugging face token, the thing we set up in week three.
If you didn't do that, then please do go now to Huggingface.
Set up an account which is free.
Set up an API key and put that in your env file.
Uh, with with the key of HF underscore token, you need it.
And once you've done that, when you run this it should run and log you into hugging face in the code.
It gives you some note here.
That note can be safely ignored.
It's all working well.
You will be logged in to huggingface if you don't include this.
If you just do log in like this, then you'll get prompted to enter in your token.
And that's another way of doing it.
And if you want to double check that you've logged in, okay, then you can do it that way as well.
All right.
We're now going to load in a data set.
We're going to load in just one category of data from Amazon.
Scrape the category which is home appliances.
That's like microwaves and dishwashers and stuff like that.
And we're going to load this in.
And I need to mention that sometimes you might get an error when you do that.
If you do get an error, then in a new cell.
If you're in the UV section, you should run UV and minus minus upgrade data sets is 3.6.0 and then
you'll be fine.
That's if you get any kind of error on this.
It's because some of the most recent versions of data sets don't support this particular scrape.
But I've got 3.6.0.
And so when I run that it loads in that data set.
And it was very fast for me because I already loaded it, it will probably take like 30s to a minute
for you, depending on your internet connection speed, and you'll see it doing it.
And once I've done that, I can see that I have 94,000 home appliances downloaded and ready for us to
work with.
Okay, so we just we loaded all of the the this data set into this variable called called data set.
So if I have a quick look at data set we'll see that this is it's a hugging face data set object.
It contains a bunch of features and it contains the 94,000 rows I mentioned.
We could look at the first element here and have a look at this.
And what we'll see is that this is a ice maker machine countertop.
But one problem that we have with this data point is that it's missing a price.
And we want to use this data to teach a model how to estimate the price of a product.
And it's not much good if it's missing a price in this data point.
Let's take another one.
Let's look at data point number one.
Let's have a look okay.
It's also missing a price.
All right well let's keep going.
In fact I'm going to jump ahead to to number five and have a look at number five.
Item five is also missing a price.
But when I look at item six I do believe I'm going to find that item six has a price.
There it is.
It's 8.99.
What is it.
It's a rack roller and stud assembly kit.
Okay, so with this in mind, let's just first do one more investigation.
So that's something.
One thing that might come to mind is that that's a very cheap price.
What is the most expensive price of all of the items we've got?
So this is a bit of code which is iterating through everything, getting its price and finding out what's
the maximum.
Okay.
The most expensive item apparently this is a Turbo Chef bullet Rapid Cook electric microwave and it
costs $21,000.
Holy smokes, I did.
I did not know that a microwave could cost $21,000.
So I had to go and look for this, so I did.
I did a quick little searching on Amazon to find this thing.
And here it is.
Here is our Turbo Chef Rapid Cook microwave convection oven.
And it's a going for a bargain.
It's only $15,861.
And it should.
It used to be $21,000.
So so you should you should gobble this up.
Uh, and uh, yeah, I guess the point is it's presumably like a commercial quality.
And it's a convection oven as well as a, as a microwave.
So.
So it's obviously a big deal.
Uh, and presumably worth this much money.
Uh, but not not an investment I will personally be making.
But but it does exist.
So this is a great way to to look at your data, investigate outliers and see anomalies, and look to
see what kind of data is it that you're looking for.
Okay.
So with that, it's now time for us to parse in this data, read in this massive data set from hugging
face and turn it into a format which is going to be best for us.
So on the left here, you can see I've expanded a package here called Pricer, where I've got a bunch
of utilities that will be using.
And as, as usual, I'm not going to go through and take you through the gory detail of coding each
one of these, because the idea is for you to to either investigate doing this yourself or look at this
or, or just get a feel for how it works.
Because because you'd want to build something like this for your projects.
So I've done something classic in this, in this package, uh, items which this module items.
And this module is something where I've defined a class item.
If you're not familiar with classes, then check out the the guide.
The Python guide.
Um, but item is an example of a pedantic class, which means it is a subclass of base model from pedantic.
And that means it's just basically a class that we're going to use to hold some data, and it can be
turned easily to JSON.
It describes a JSON schema.
You can convert this item into JSON, and you can turn JSON back into this item.
Very simple.
And we define it as having a few fields that we care about for our item representing something up on
the on the on Amazon that we've scraped.
It has a title, a category.
It has a price.
Importantly it has a full is going to be our full description from Amazon.
A summary will be our summary description.
The weight is how heavy is it.
Uh, and then it will have a prompt, an ID that we'll get to later.
And there's a few useful, uh, little functions here to to to be able to load it and save it and stuff.
So this is our, like, placeholder object, an item that we will use for our items.
And then I've written a class, uh, or in this case it's just a bunch of functions in this module parser,
which will allow me to read in some data from hugging face and turn it into an item object.
And it does that by, for example, removing unnecessary whitespace by by having some sort of maximum
text.
We don't want more than 3000 characters in any one section and 4000 overall.
Otherwise, we've just got too much data.
Some of these product descriptions just waffle away.
And we're just going to we're just going to cut it short after we feel like we've got probably enough.
We're going to limit the pricing.
We're going to say that that that we're not going to take anything that's under $0.50.
If there's anything that's small and we're going to have a maximum price of $999.49, in other words,
something that rounds to 999, and that's because this is the range that we're going to focus on for
our exercise.
We want to get really good at predicting products in that range, and we don't want to get confused
by outliers that might skew everything.
So that's just like a business decision we're making to frame this project.
Um, we don't want to preclude our model from from learning how to predict prices of other things,
but we're not going to use that for our training data.
And we're also going to say that that any product description that's less than 600 characters is too
small, that's too light.
We don't want to use that for our training data.
We want to train on on material data.
So these kinds of decisions are the key business decisions that you might make in writing some code
to parse the data that you've picked up, this, this, this huge amount of data on hugging face and
turn it into the real curated data that you want to work with.
And so then I've got a function scrub that cleans up all the data, a function get weight that maps
the weight of an object into pounds, because on Amazon it might be in many different weights.
And then finally a function parse that takes a hugging face data points and turns it into an item object.
After populating all the right fields.
So this just gives you a general sense.
Building a parse function like this is super common.
This is the kind of data scrubbing that a data scientist would often do.
Allows you to convert from the the sort of semi structured or unstructured data that you might have
got into something that is more structured.
And with that in mind, I'll go back to here and I am now going to run this, which means we are now
reading in all of our data from our hugging face data data set, and we are turning it into items.
And when that is complete, we end up with 35,000 items out of 94,000 data points that we started with.
And that, of course, is because we've only kept things which have a price like like number six before.
And we've only kept things that have the right number of characters that we think is good for our data
set, and only things which are priced between the half the $0.50 all the way through to 9.99.49.
So that's what we're left with.
So if we look at the first item in the list, it happens to actually be item six from above.
It is a rack, roller and stud assembly kit valued at $8.99.
And if I print, uh, let's let's do print item zero full.
Let's look at its full description.
Here it is.
Uh, this is the complete description of it.
You'll see that there's some sort of gaps in here.
And that's because part of what my parse script did is it removed, uh, product numbers if they're
long enough, because that just seemed like it was a waste of space to have it in there.
So it did some scrubbing of the data and this is what we're left with.
So with that, it's now time for us to look at this data, visualize this data, and get a better sense
for what we're working with.
141 - Okay.
So first up I'm going to collect all the prices of all of our items into a list called prices.
And then all of the, the, the number of characters in the descriptions into something called lengths.
How many, how many uh how how long are the descriptions?
And let's start just by plotting what's called a histogram.
If, you know histogram like this, which is showing the length of the descriptions.
So the length of the descriptions, the average number of characters in our full descriptions is 1400
and the highest is 4000.
And that's the highest because you may remember we truncate at 4000.
So we didn't accept any descriptions longer than that.
And this is the kind of curve we've got.
We had a minimum if you remember.
And then it sort of tails off.
Uh and so let's look at something which as an example of something which, which has the maximum number
of characters.
This is one of them.
This is a polyester dryer vent filter replacement part.
And if we scroll over you'll see that there's lots of stuff here.
Remember to clean out your lint filter between each lots and lots and lots of stuff.
It's really worth it, apparently.
Uh, so you can see that there's there's plenty of waffle in here.
We probably didn't need to use up all the 4000 characters.
All right, now let's look at the prices.
Let's see how much these things cost.
Okay.
Well, it's heavily skewed towards cheap things.
The average price is $56.
The highest price is 999.
This is the distribution.
And so you can see we've got quite a curve right here okay.
And let's just just print another one here.
We have a uh an MLB stainless steel brushed patterned dishwasher magnet cover.
Uh, and yeah, you can see that we've got, um, the, uh, lots of information about about the material,
the dimensions.
There's lots of stuff here for this dishwasher magnet cover panel.
So at this point, I would suggest that you go through, print out different items, get a sense, get
a feel, look at these charts and see how much, how much text we've got, how much they cost.
So you have a really good sense of this data set, because what we're now going to do is take this data
set for, for home appliances and, and add masses more to it.
Let's add in many other categories from Amazon so that we have a big data set.
And this is a time I want to mention that I've already done this.
So you don't need to.
I've done the next few steps loaded in tons of data, and I've uploaded it.
And in a moment I'll show you how you can download the data that I've uploaded, so you can just watch
me if you wish.
If you would like to do this too, then by all means do it with me.
Uh, it's going to be fun, but.
But you absolutely don't need to.
So I've made a class called Item loader that is, uh, in, um, uh, in loaders.
And this essentially just loads in a bunch of data points calls parser.
And it also allows you to load things in parallel so that it runs really fast, but it's essentially
just doing the code that we just saw up here again.
And we're going to I'm going to run it again for home appliances just to show you it loads the home
appliances.
It has a nice little, um, progress bar and it says it completed it.
There we go.
So it was it was much faster.
It runs things fast in parallel.
And so it completed that much more quickly than we did before.
What I'm now going to do is run this not just for the home appliances, but for all these other categories
too automotive, electronics, office products, tools and home improvements, cell phones, toys,
appliances again, and musical instruments.
And I'm going to kick this off and off it runs.
Now this is going to take a lot longer for you because it's going to have to download the data set from
Hugging Face first.
And I've already downloaded it and this is now running on my computer.
It's also hammering my computer.
So so my machine might be doing this a bit because I am really stressing out my computer and I'm going
to leave this to run.
I'm going to come back in a second for you to see the results.
And remember, you don't need to do this yourself if you don't wish, because I've already done it.
But if you'd like to try it, then by all means, go ahead.
I'll see you in a second.
Okay, so that just completed.
Everything got loaded.
It took me about ten minutes.
If you do decide to do it yourself, it will take probably about an hour.
The first time you do it is it downloads the data set depending on your internet connection.
And again, to recap what we did, we've loaded in a data set from Huggingface using Huggingface Loaddataset
function.
We've then used a function I wrote called parser, which reads that data and converts it into a more
structured format that will make most sense to us.
And what we've chosen is to create an object of type item for each one, and we have made sure that
we populate a few fields like the weight and the full description, but we have weeded out some of the
data points.
We've we've thrown out things with two shorter description.
We've thrown out things that don't have a price, and we've kept things between a price that we think
is best for us and with the right kind of length of text.
And as a result of that, we now have a grand total of almost 3 million items scraped from Huggingface.
So I told you there was a lot.
If we have a look at one of these, we can have a look at items.
Zero.
Um, it is a black retractable cargo cover, rear privacy screen of some sort.
Let's just take some random.
Let's take item number 1000.
A temperature sensor compatible with a Volvo.
Okay.
That's interesting.
So there's lots of stuff in here.
In fact, almost 3 million of stuff.
Uh, and it's time for us to really dig into this.
As we finish off curating our data set.
The first thing that I noticed after a while of digging around is that there are, in fact, some duplicates
in here.
There are some duplicates because the same item was covered in two different sections of the Amazon
website.
And duplicates are insidious.
They are big trouble for machine learning and for for everything we're about to do in the next few weeks,
and they're big trouble because you might accidentally take something and have a duplicate in the test
data, or the validation data that's also in your training data, so that that's famously known as dataset
leakage or dataset contamination.
And it is particularly insidious, as I say, uh, you might you might say, okay, so what.
So maybe we slightly misreport our accuracy.
No, the problem is that when you do that, not only do you get the accuracy wrong, not only does your
validation result appear to show that you're doing well on unseen data, when in fact it is seen data.
You've had this data in your training data, but also because you see that your validation data is doing
better.
You'll continue to train because you think you're getting better and better and better, and so you
can be misled by good results from validation data, and it can cause you to have terrible results on
really unseen data, which is which is sometimes known as overfitting when that happens.
So this is something that we have to protect against.
And we're first going to actually shuffle everything up because because it's a good thing to do.
Random dot shuffle will will shuffle your your items.
And then we're going to do this, this slightly cunning code here that is going to make absolutely sure
that we have removed from items anything that's already been seen.
So we started with 2.9 million items.
We're just going and making sure that there's no two items with the same title, and then also no two
items with the same full description.
And once we've done that, we're now left with 2,887,000 items.
So sure enough, you can see that we took out a bunch of duplicates when we did that.
Okay, now let's take a look now again at the lengths, the number of characters in across our 2.8 2.9
million and see how that is now distributed.
Here we have it.
It's similar to before, but of course a much bigger count in this histogram as we see how many things
we have with with different lengths, you can see that most of them, the average is 1600 characters.
And then we've got that little spike at 4000.
And let's have a look at how the prices of things are distributed now that we have this enormous data
set.
And we can see again that it's heavily skewed towards cheaper items.
We've got average price of 59.
We've got obviously a lot on the low end.
And you can see there this this enormous peak, which looks like it's like a sort of 30, $40 territory.
And then it's got this tail all the way through to the highest of 99.49, but a heavily skewed distribution.
Okay.
So next we're going to look at the different category of products we scraped from Amazon because we
scraped from from a bunch of different categories.
Let's let's just see how much we have in each.
So by far the majority of our products are car parts or automotive products, almost a million of them.
And then you can see we've got smaller numbers of everything else.
Uh, that includes that.
The next one is tools and home improvement and then electronics.
Okay.
So there's there's perhaps two concerns that I would have for this data set.
If we want to use this in the most effective way to train our model.
One of them is that it seems heavily skewed towards car parts or automotive stuff, as you can see here.
And the other is that it seems so heavily skewed towards cheap stuff.
And I really want us to be able to, to estimate well across, across this whole spectrum of prices.
So these are two things that I'd like to correct for.
And one way that you can correct for it is by taking this distribution of the almost 3 million products
and sub selecting, select a subset of this data and make that subset be slightly more weighted the
way that you want.
And you can tell there's a bit of a dark art to this.
It's a little bit hand-wavy.
I'm trying to build a better data set.
And as as I've said many times in our journey together, the way that you be more the way that you can
be more scientific about this?
Is that really you should curate many different data sets using different kinds of techniques, and
experiment with them and find out which data set performs best when you try and train based on your
business outcome metric.
That's the right way to do it.
And the good news is I already did that.
I've been working on this particular data set for quite a while, and I've been doing all sorts of stuff,
and I've ended up with with this particular set that works really well.
And I will tell you, basically it was it was the first thing I did because I've got a good instinct
for this after doing it for a while.
But sometimes my instincts are wrong.
And there's a few things I tried out that turned out to do worse when it came to training, but this
particular approach has worked well.
But if you're wondering, like, how do I have this intuition?
How do I know that the items are too skewed towards to cheap products?
The answer is you experiment, you try it, you run your training and you see what performs best.
And what I've got for you right now is going to be a data set.
That's going to work pretty well.
Let's see.
142 - All right.
This is the really juicy part.
So we are now going to sub select a population from the big distribution.
We're going to do that using a numpy function numpy.
And this is a function which says okay give me a size 820,000.
And I'm going to take 820,000 out of I'm going to select that, choose that out of the bigger population.
But I'm going to do it in a way that is weighted.
I'm going to favor some items over others, and you're going to pass in a list of weights, which I
will use.
Okay.
And the way we come up with those weights, I'm going to I'm going to penalize cheap things.
I'm going to say that that take the price and square it as a way to encourage it to pick expensive things.
And I'm also going to penalize tools and home improvement, the whole category and the category automotive.
And I'm going to penalize that category a lot.
And I had to penalize that a lot because unfortunately also car parts are often the more expensive items,
so this weighting tend to favor car parts even more.
So I had to really ding it by multiplying by 0.05 to get a good distribution.
So hopefully you get the idea.
This is this is very iterative, very experimental.
You take code like this.
You shift around the weights.
You keep playing until you end up with a distribution that you like.
So let's see this distribution we're going to get right now I'm running this.
It's doing this selection from the bigger population.
We now have ourselves 820,000 items.
And let's have a look at how their price is distributed.
This is the price of the items.
And you first might look at that and say okay well it's still very skewed.
Well it was always going to be pretty skewed because we didn't have that many expensive items in the
first place.
But actually the skew is a lot less.
I think the average price before was $59 or so, and now it's $140, a much more respectable average
price, more aligned with with the kinds of things that I want to test our model with later.
And you can see that there is a fatter tail here.
There are more items.
You also might notice there are these spikes at various points.
And these spikes are because it tends to be that products are often priced at like $399, $499.
And you might wonder why why, why don't I correct for that as well?
Well, that's because that is a real feature of the data itself.
It's true in the real world that products are likely to have prices like that.
So in fact, we sort of want our model to know that and to be able to to learn from that too.
So it's good to have that in our data.
So here we have it.
It's still skewed but not as skewed as badly.
Definitely corrected.
And this is the kind of distribution that I was looking for okay.
And I'm just going to shuffle up the data one more time.
I realize that that we've already done that by selecting from it, but still it's a good practice to
do a random shuffle on your data that mixes it up.
And I'm doing this thing here.
Random dot Seed42.
Setting a random seed is a way of fixing the random numbers so that they're the same every time that
you run this, so that you and I end up with exactly the same data set.
Uh, and, uh, the reason that you pick 42, you'll see that it's that it is customary to see people
setting the random seed to 42.
And there's really two reasons for that.
The reason that you do it is so that it's clear that you're not cherry picking.
42 is a bit of like the standard number people pick.
And so by always doing 42, it shows that it's not like you're experimenting with many different numbers
until you get a number that happens to give you good results.
You're just going with the one that people pick 42.
That's one reason.
The other reason, of course, is that it's it's playing.
It's paying homage to The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy.
Uh, the answer 42 to the life, the universe and everything.
It is like a nerdy joke, a nerdy little shout out to that.
It's why everyone always fixes their seed at 42.
And here we have it.
We are now going to look at the, the, uh, um, prices one more time.
And it is, of course the same as before, shuffling around and didn't affect the prices.
And we're also going to look at how the, uh, how things are distributed into the different categories,
which was the other thing we corrected for.
And here we have our final categories and it looks perfectly decent electronics and first place tools
and home improvement.
And then automotive seems like a nice little, little uh, distribution of different categories.
Sure.
Appliances and musical instruments are right down there, but then there are way fewer of those items.
It would be weird if they're all the same.
So this seems like this is perfectly acceptable.
Plenty of of car products, but not so many that it that it's overwhelming our data.
Okay.
And now, uh, it's uh, let's look at that in a pie chart because some people love pie charts.
Here it is.
Uh, and uh, you can see.
Yep.
Clearly nothing is dominating.
It's not like we have the automotive domination.
Uh, it's a nice, nice distribution of products.
And as I say, if this feels like a bit of a dark art, that's okay.
You should get a feel for it.
You should experiment.
Curate a different data set.
The key is what performs best when it gets to training.
Okay.
We're then going to do just a couple of a couple more looks into whether there are any characteristics
of the data we should know about.
And then that will be a wrap for today.
Let's finish this off.
An important thing to look at with your data is correlations.
Is it clear that your data has some relationship with with there's a relationship, say, between price
and something like how many characters are in the description.
Maybe it's the case that longer text tended to be associated with heavier with with more expensive items.
And so we can do that by plotting a chart to try and see whether that is the case or not.
So here I'm looking at this very noisy chart here, which is showing for for a particular number of
characters in the description.
Uh, how much did it cost?
And, yeah, it doesn't appear that there's much going on there.
I'm not seeing much correlation there.
Nothing.
Nothing that I can tell.
Um, and how about with the wait, is it the case that heavier things tend to cost more?
It might be.
And, well, it does appear that something happening here.
Right.
There's obviously there's a lot of noise because there are things that don't weigh anything and or at
least not that in the, in the Amazon description.
And yet they have a high price.
Um, but there does seem to be something going on here.
So we might have some inkling that that weight is something that can be part of a prediction of how
much something costs.
All right.
That's the end of looking at a couple of correlations.
You should look at more.
You can think of different ways you could dig into this data, think of different ways to analyze it,
use these visualizations.
Of course I'm using matplotlib.
And this is just a cookie cutter stuff that you can copy and paste and change the dimensions, make
new histograms, make new bar charts.
Take a look at the data.
You need to have a really good feel for this data, because we're going to be doing some some serious
data science with the data, and it's great to know about it first.
Okay.
And with that, the final step is to now upload this curated data to the hub so that, uh, the people
that don't want to go through all of this, like maybe you can then just download it from the hub and
it's already being curated and it's a great data set.
So we'll do that now.
So it's super easy to push stuff to the hugging face.
Hub, uh, you need to have your username and I suggest you if you want to just use my data then just
keep my username in here.
These datasets will be public.
You can choose for your data sets that you make to be private or public.
They're private by default.
When you make it public, it means anyone can just download your data.
I'm going to make two different data sets, and throughout the next week we're going to be and a couple
of weeks we're going to be having these two different parallel data sets, one is going to be called
full and one is going to be called lite, and full is the big heavyweight.
All 820,000 items for people that want to really go for it.
And Lite is a more civilized 20,020 2000 data points for people that want to do some training but don't
necessarily want to spend several days doing it.
Uh, if you're not as much as a big old nerd as I am, uh, but, uh, so full and lite are going to
be these two different data sets, my name and then items raw, full and raw lite.
We are I'm going to divide into training, validation and test data.
Remember those three pools of data for the big one.
The training data will be 800,000 items 10,000 validation 10,000 of test.
And I'm going to push that to the hub.
The the the the other one is going to be rather smaller.
It's going to be 20,000, 1000 1000.
Push that to the hub.
So I'm not going to run this right now because I already ran it.
I've already uploaded it to the hub.
You'll see it in there with these names.
They are public and tomorrow we're going to download them and make use of them.
And that is our data set, curated.
And I've put a fun little side note down here that I love making these different visualizations.
And there's a whole set of different colors that you can use uh, to, to, to have, uh, different,
different types of chart.
There is a rather useful web page where it will show you the different colors that you can.
You can use, uh, here for your different charts.
I hope you'll explore this.
I hope you're going there now and making tons of visualizations so that you've really, really got to
grips with this data and you know it back to front.
And with that, we will go back to wrap up this, this day and congratulate ourselves on curating an
excellent data set.
And so congratulations, you have either created your own training, validation and test data dataset
or you've watched me do it.
You've understood enough.
You're fine with it.
You're happy that I've done it, and you're ready to download it from the Huggingface hub.
As I say, it's not super critical that you do this curation.
It's more important that you get the general idea.
You get the gist of what it's about.
You understand that we've curated this data set, we've got rid of anomalies.
We've we've got rid of things we don't care about, like items without a price.
And we've taken a sample of the distribution, which seems to have a good representative population
of the kinds of atoms that we care about, and with the kinds of descriptions that we care about, too.
That's what it's all about.
Okay.
Congratulations.
In addition to everything that you've been doing with open and closed source models, in addition to
Rag with Lang Chain, you can now select investigate, curate your very own data set based on data that
you've pulled from hugging face or from anywhere else like Kaggle.
Okay, next time, lots of stuff.
Tomorrow we're going to we're going to go through a five step strategy for selecting training and applying
LMS.
We're then going to do something really interesting which is pre-processing data sets.
And this is this is a hot idea from from the last six months or so of people using LMS as ways to improve
the quality of their data.
And of course, it's also like an advanced Rag technique to pre-process your data.
So we'll be doing that.
It's also going to be an opportunity for me to show you about a different way to make API calls to LMS,
known as batch mode, which is when you don't call in a synchronous request response kind of way, but
instead you submit a batch of requests and later you come back and collect a batch of results.
And this is like a pro technique.
This is like an advanced LM engineering technique.
And so I'm really happy to be able to show it to you.
Okay.
Tons to do.
It's just a bit more data stuff before we get to training, but it's worth it.
It's going to be great.
I'll see you tomorrow.
143 - Hopefully I didn't put you off with that gory detail of data curation yesterday, because we've got
some more data stuff today.
But then, then we're done with data after today.
So already, in addition to all the stuff you can do with generation and with Rag, you can also select,
investigate, curate your very own data set.
Today there's going to be a little bit of talk stuff.
What I want to go through like a strategy for selecting and applying models to solve commercial problems,
which is what this capstone project is all about.
And then roll up sleeves and do pre-processing.
A very interesting way to get the best quality data using Nlms.
It's also going to be our opportunity to look at a pro technique using batch mode with LM inference,
which is a great skill set for you to acquire as well.
All right, so before we get to the to the juicy technical stuff, then let me talk you through the
five step strategy.
So you're given a task to build an AI system to solve some problem.
And you want to know how to begin.
People often start by asking questions about the architecture, about the technical design.
As I may have mentioned to you once or twice, and my suggestion is to take a step back and approach
this as you would any other science project, to to apply a solution to a commercial problem.
And the five steps are, first of all, to understand the problem that you're working with.
Then to prepare, select the right model for the task that we already covered in week four.
Customize that model.
Figure out how to apply it to the problem at hand and then productionize.
These are the five steps.
And it's no surprise at all that my first step was going to be all about understanding.
It's it's I mean, this is this is like 101 stuff.
I'm sure you know this already.
And yet people, people always dive into solutioning so quickly.
It's crucial, even even in this world, with so much hype about about AI and building AI solutions
for things that before you dive in and start working with AI, you make sure you understand the problem
and ask yourself whether AI is even the right solution here.
First of all, gather business requirements.
Don't.
Don't let a business requirement say I need an AI agent for.
That's not a requirement.
That's a solution.
Challenge your sponsors and yourself to be thinking about the commercial problem first and foremost.
And then when you know the problem you're solving, of course, the next question is how will you how
will you judge success?
How will you evaluate that you are actually solving that problem?
And then look at the data that you've got, the quantity, the quality and the format of the data.
Is it structured?
Is it unstructured?
Uh, do you have enough of it?
And then uh, also challenge your sponsors to explain the non-functional how much does this need to
scale?
What kind of latencies is acceptable?
What's the budget, uh, how quickly what's the time to market?
How soon does this need to be live?
Uh, these are the kinds of questions that you would ask for any project and you should do for an AI
project also.
And the second step is then preparation.
So first you should be looking at non LM solutions, maybe looking at existing solutions that are already
out there, maybe looking at solutions that are just Python code instead of any kind of AI, and then
traditional machine learning solutions and use this to build what's called a baseline model, a model
before you get too fancy, that's your starting point.
So you can tell when you build something fancy that you're improving on the starting point.
Because sometimes maybe the starting point is already something that will solve your problem.
And so that that's a crucial discipline to get after, even if you're sure llms are the way to go,
give yourself a baseline to work from.
And then when you're choosing your LLM, you should follow the exact script we put together in week
four.
Look at the basics.
Look at the benchmarks, leaderboards, and arenas.
Use that to hand-pick a candidate set of llms that you'll use for further R&D And then data curation.
That's part of step two.
That's what we did yesterday and what we'll finish today.
That's about building a good data set that's going to give you the best possible chance for successful
training.
And of course, as I said yesterday, you can build multiple data sets and use them to try and train
with each of them and figure out which one performs best.
Okay.
So you've you've first of all understood the problem.
You've prepared the data set and the candidate models.
It's now time to actually choose the model that you'll use.
You've got your candidates, run experiments R&D, build prototypes, train and validate until you have
the model that's performing best with the problem at hand.
You know this well from week four.
You know how to do this.
That is is is step three and step four.
Then is applying this model that you've selected to solve the business problem at hand.
And there are multiple techniques that you could use at this point.
And you might want to use many of them many of the multiple techniques, um, and these are techniques
that I've been referring to as we go, just improving the prompts and using things like Multi-shot prompting
is is one starting point.
Multi-shot prompting.
When you give many examples of the of the question answer question answer to try and bias the model
into making outputs consistent with the inputs, prompting easy starting point.
Rag would be the second one.
Rag you know so well.
Now looking for ways to select relevant context and shove it in the prompt, maybe using embedding models
and vector similarity to do a good job of finding that context, a genetic AI.
We haven't spoken about that much, and of course I have a whole separate course on it.
Uh, but we will be doing that in week eight a little bit.
We'll be building an agent platform, but in some ways it's really a sort of big extension of of prompting
and even partly of Rag as well.
But but it's about potentially dividing up your LM call into multiple LM calls and maybe having one
of those LM calls decide which of the others to call and what order.
That's like an orchestrator.
LM so now you've got some some idea that the workflow is being determined by an LM, and using tools
as your way of equipping an LM with the ability to do things like digging into the data, uh, or,
uh, just, just doing different, different bits of research, maybe web scraping as a way to better
answer the business problem that's using agents.
And of course, no surprise, the fourth one is fine tuning, uh, fine tuning, which is saying, okay,
we've got this LM we can give it data that we've collected proprietary data, and we can make it even
better at this task.
That's that's fine tuning.
That's what we'll be doing the end of this week.
And then all of next week.
I think it's interesting to take a moment to to look at this and recognize that the first three are
all inference time techniques that are about ways at at runtime, after you've trained to get more out
of your LMS based on the way that you call them, the input sequence that you use, and only that last
one is.
Got anything to do with actually training a model to do it differently?
And this is funny because, uh, in in the past, training was where you always began.
Training was like the big thing everyone did.
And I've said a few times in the course, there are these two different parallel ways to improve the
performance of models at inference time and at training time.
And in recent history, inference time has really grown more and more and more to be the way that people
where people are spending the most time.
People are spending a lot of focus on improving inference time, because that's where we've seen the
biggest bang for the buck in the last year or so.
But before that, it was always at training time.
And the reality is that these are two different orthogonal ways that you can improve the performance
of your model, both at training time and at inference time.
And so we're going to be focusing for the next two weeks on training time and seeing what what we can
make of it.
And we'll make some pretty amazing things of it.
Uh, and then we'll return to inference time in week eight when we add on rag again, and when we use
a genetic AI as well, so that we'll be using both training time and inference time by the end of it.
It's not an either or.
It can be both.
Uh, and uh, yeah.
But these are the four techniques.
And people often ask like, like, how do I know which technique to use for a particular business problem?
And, you know, there's, there's, uh, there's, there's a, there's a long answer and a short answer.
The short answer is you should try them all and, uh, and see which one performs best for the task
at hand.
There's no shortcut to R&D.
Do the R&D.
Try each of these.
Try multiple of each of them together and see what performs best.
But the longer answer will be along the lines of, uh, obviously fine tuning is something that's very
expensive.
This is this is something that is a big deal.
We're going to spend a long time doing this.
It's going to take a long time to get there.
Ultimately, fine tuning is something that can teach a model a new skill that will allow it to generalize,
to do something new, differently and better.
Whereas something like rag generally is just about providing it information that already exists.
It's about giving it expertise based on knowledge that you have in a knowledge base, but it won't help
it to generalize beyond that knowledge base.
If you're looking to add expertise, subject matter expertise knowledge to a model rag is your go to.
If you're looking to teach a model a new skill, something it can generalize to new data it's never
seen before, then fine tuning feels like that's the right answer.
And that's why, when it comes to estimating the price of a product, it feels like a good fit because
we don't just want it to be able to estimate the price of products that we've already got in our scrape.
We want it to to learn that general skill and be able to apply it to new data.
It's never seen before, and that's why fine tuning feels right.
But again, one more time, the right answer is try them all.
Have an evaluation metric measure and pick the approaches that work best for your business objective.
144 - So you've understood the business requirements, and then you prepared yourself with a with a candidate
models, a baseline model, a curated data set.
You then selected the right model for the task at hand, and then you customize the model to apply it
to your business problem by experimenting with multiple different techniques, measuring your business
metric against them, and selecting the techniques that perform best against your evaluation metric.
Excellent.
But there's five steps.
That means there's one more step left.
What is that?
Well, of course that is to productionize to then take what you've built and go live.
And as you probably know, I've got a whole course on that.
It's a whole discipline of its own.
It's also sometimes people people call it MLOps.
It's a whole profession of its own.
Uh, and a lot of it is about, uh, deciding your hosting and deployment architecture rolling out in
a production environment or a production cloud provider like AWS or GCP or Azure, and then looking
at things like scale, can I monitor it?
Is it secure?
Compliant?
Observability is super important for Agentic I can, I can I monitor what the llms are saying to each
other and track them.
And then measuring your evals.
And the main point here, the key point is that evals doesn't stop after step four.
When you've applied the model to your problem, you need to continually evaluate your model in production
to see how it's doing and to correct for something called model drift, which is the tendency of systems
to often start performing worse over time as your real world data starts to deviate from your training
data.
So then coming back and continuously retraining and measuring performance is the key part of step five.
So that is the five step process to applying a model to applying AI or not AI to a business problem.
And we're basically following these five steps along these lines during this capstone project.
We've already looked at the requirements yesterday.
And we'll look just one more time in a second.
And we've been curating our data set, uh, in the, in the last couple of days.
So follow along with these five steps and keep these five steps to hand.
And always give yourself put yourself through the discipline of applying these five steps.
I tell you, I get so many questions from people who are clearly diving into solutioning and building
AI for X, and then they're not thinking about what is X and what problem they're trying to solve,
how are they going to measure success?
Uh, and then doing R&D, wearing that data scientist's hat, being a scientist, uh, getting into
the experiments and the research, there's no shortcut to experimentation.
Okay.
So now let's have a quick refresher on our capstone project.
The price is right.
Remind me the business requirements.
So given the description of a product predict how much it should actually cost.
The input is the description of the product, the output is the actual price of that product.
And the solution is eventually going to be baked into an agentic platform that is going to be able to
look out there in the wild on the internet and find bargains, figure out are they good bargains or
not, based on a prediction of the real price, and then alert us if there's something that could be
an opportunity there so that that is the price is right.
Um, and the way we're going to evaluate that we're being successful is we're simply going to look at
the absolute price difference.
What's the difference between the prediction and a true price?
It's it's both a model metric and a business outcome metric.
It's wonderfully simple.
Uh, and so that's a perfect metric for us to, to really double down on.
That's what we'll be looking at.
So the order of play again this is just a recap again of what I already said this yesterday.
But just so that you know where we are in the story this week is about curating data evaluation and
frontier models.
We already curated the data yesterday.
Today we're going to do this thing called pre-processing, where we're going to use an LLM to rewrite
our descriptions so that they're perfect for training.
And we're also going to use the batch mode which is like this pro pro thing.
Then tomorrow we are going to be working with traditional ML, which I really enjoy.
I hope you enjoy it too.
I know it's a it's a bit of like stepping back in time, but it's very satisfying as you'll see.
And then day four, we then move into the world of neural networks and frontier models, and you'll
see the progression.
And then day five, you're thinking this week was meant to be about fine tuning.
It's not until day five that we finally get to fine tune a frontier model, which you do through an
API.
So it's not like you really get hands on with it, but still we will do it and we'll see the outcome.
And as I say, I do want to set your expectations.
It's not going to blow your mind.
Uh, that's going to be the the order of play for week six.
And then next week is doing real sleeves rolled up.
We're going to dig in, fine tune our own open source model.
Um, it's common, by the way, people people use the expression like like build my own, uh, open
source model.
Now, of course, we're going to be starting from an existing pre-trained model.
We're going to use llama for a meta that we've seen in the past.
Um, we're going to we're going to start with that that you hear the expression, I fine tune my own
model and that's what it means.
It doesn't actually mean you started from an absolute blank, uh, and spent millions of dollars training
it on tokens.
It means you used a pre-trained model, and then you fine tuned it further with your data.
That's typically the way if you wanted to train a model from scratch, it's an interesting thing to
do, but typically it would need to be a toy LLM that could do something like write, write children's
stories or something like that based on a very limited corpus of data.
And those are great projects to do, but they don't tend to be commercially applicable with, with,
with very few exceptions.
When you hear of it in industry, this is what it means.
That's what I do in my day job.
It's what it's what people tend to do.
Take an open source, existing pre-trained LLM and fine tune it.
Okay.
And then in week eight we do all sorts of fancy stuff.
We go back to rag again and we build an Agentic platform and it's going to be great.
That's the order of play.
And I want to remind you, there are these three different ways for you to follow along, and one of
them is just to get the gist of what's happening.
Listen to to how I explain the decisions I'm making and get a feel for it.
Uh, that's that's great.
It's a it's a really good way.
You can always come back and do it again.
If you actually have a project you need to apply it to.
Number two is if you do want to run this with me, uh, but you don't want to spend days doing it.
And so you're happy to use the light data set.
And you remember we uploaded the light one at the end of yesterday and and don't don't actually go through
and curate the data and don't do the pre-processing I do today, although you can do that on the light
data set if you want.
Um, but uh, but but stick with just taking the data that I curate.
Um, and then the third one is, is like, go big.
Uh, come with me every step of the way.
Do the full data, set the 800,000, build your own model.
And I will say as part of that, I do expect you, I expect you, and I require you to to battle with
me.
You need to try and beat me.
There's no fun in doing this if you're just going to do the same as me.
The great thing about this whole project is that we're going to come up with a number like, like a
very definitive number, and I'm going to come up with my best number, and it's going to be much better
than the number I had a year ago.
It's going to be really great, but you can do better because the way to do better, it all it takes
is experimentation.
There's no magic, there's no trick.
It's not like you need to know some secret hyperparameter that means it's better you simply it's trial
and error.
And if you do enough trials, you're going to beat me.
And so that's the challenge.
If you're going to if you're doing number three, if you're going big, then you have to take me on.
You have to beat me.
So stay focused, watch what I'm doing, and make sure that you can think of a few experiments to try.
One of them's going to beat me and I can't wait to hear about it.
You have to post that and you have to to to show your victory.
Be proud and victorious in your post explaining what you've done.
Put it on LinkedIn and I will weigh in for sure and make sure that that I amplify it.
Okay, so with that, it's time for us to go back to cursor.
It's time to pre-process our data using batch mode.
145 - Okay, here we are in Corsa.
We go into week six.
We go into day two.
And welcome back to the Price Is Right capstone project.
And we are on day two data pre-processing.
So here's the thing.
What we're about to do is use an LLM to rewrite our data.
In this case the full description of of products into a format which is nice and tight and short and
a really good description of that product, perfect for training.
And in fact, in the future, when we're when we're trying to to do inference on new products and never
seen before, we can use that same pre-processing to rewrite anything in this same kind of structured
format.
So it's a really nice technique.
It's a really good way of doing it.
And this is something which this, this idea of, of, of turning unstructured data into something structured
in a particular format.
It's something that was an unsolved problem only a few years ago.
It just wasn't possible to do something like this.
And now it's something that Llms can just do in a heartbeat.
It's so easy.
And, and and that's why we're going to do it.
It's wonderful.
And it definitely makes a big impact on the results.
And if you're wondering why my results today are going to be better than they were a year ago, uh,
that's because I'm doing pre-processing.
I didn't do this last time, and it's just such a powerful technique.
Um, okay.
And as I said, I'm also going to be using this technique called batch mode, which is when you call
an LLM not using the usual like OpenAI create, but you do it in batch mode, meaning that you queue
up a large number of requests, you send it off to the LLM, and you come back and collect it later.
And not only is that very convenient for, for for coding, because you don't need to sort of sit there
waiting.
It's also a lot cheaper, in fact, most providers offer this batch mode service at about half price.
And indeed, we're going to be using grok.
Grok with a queue.
The inference platform.
Not not not Elon's grok.
Uh, grok with a queue.
We're going to be using with, uh, OpenAI's open source model.
We're going to be doing that today.
Um, and grok with a queue has batch mode, which is very, very similar to OpenAI's batch mode.
They're basically the same thing.
So that's what we're going to be doing.
Uh, and we'll also be using light LM if you remember, light LM because I love light LM so again,
the business value is that this is something which is a super powerful way to turn unstructured data,
like our product descriptions, into something that's tight and more structured and parsed in a way
that wasn't conceivable before.
So we've got some imports here and now this is the moment for you.
You can choose just just watch what I do, because at the end I'm going to upload a data set and you
can just use what I upload at the end.
Or you can choose to come in and do this in light mode.
Have light mode equals true and you'll be using that small subset, the 20,000 plus 1000 plus 1000 of
the training val and test split.
You can be using that data.
Or if you turn light mode to false, you'll be using the big guy.
And uh and which I have done as well.
But but I won't do it right now.
We'll use the little one for right now.
Uh, you can do whatever of those you wish, but definitely follow it.
Watch me while I do this so you get a sense for it.
Okay.
And the first thing I'm going to do is load in the data set that I just uploaded yesterday.
You remember the name of it was either items raw light if it's the light one or items raw full if it's
the full one.
And I'm just going to load in the train validation and test data set and put that together and see what
we get in it loads.
Roads.
In comes all of our data right now.
And there we go.
We've loaded 22,000 items, which is the full population of the light data set.
Okay.
Next up I'm going to go through these items.
And I'm just going to assign each one a number, which is just what what order.
It's in in in the list.
Uh, so, uh, let me show you what I mean by that.
If I, if I just look right now at the first, uh, of the items, it's got a field called ID, but
that right now is, is is set to none.
After I run this, if I look at this ID again, it's now set to zero.
And item number one is set to one.
And item number two is set to two.
And that's it's going to be handy when we get to to to batch mode as you will see.
All right.
Now on to the pre-processing.
So here is a system prompt for you to look at.
I'm saying create a concise description of a product.
Respond only in this format.
Do not include.
Sorry.
Yes.
Do not include part numbers.
I've stripped some of them out, but there's still some that got through.
Title.
Colon.
Category.
Colon brand.
Colon.
Description.
Colon.
Details.
Colon.
Now, the people that in the know would point out that it's often better to ask models to respond in
JSON, rather than giving something with this sort of slightly janky format here.
Uh, models are great at generating JSON, and indeed you can take it further and use a technique called
structured outputs, in which models are required to respond in JSON.
And that way you can get very accurate results that fit exactly into one one approach.
And I did do that originally, and we will be using structured outputs in week eight.
And I was going to do it here.
But we're working with such a massive data set with so many items that that it turned out that that
was quite expensive because JSON has a lot of stuff to it.
And there are some some newish tricks to reducing the weight of the JSON.
But actually, in our case, I made the decision to keep it really simple and just have it in this way.
It works really well.
If you were doing this for production and you had a bigger budget, you might choose to do this JSON
style instead.
We'll do that in week eight.
Uh, but for uh, for now, this this approach works really nicely.
It's low cost, it's fast.
Uh, and it's going to work great for us right now.
So that's my system prompt.
Uh, so I can put that into, into some, some messages and I can call uh completion.
I'm going to use grok with a Q.
And remember you can replace this with, with any model that you wish.
Looking guide nine for a reminder if you if you want to see how to do that.
Um, but that's what I'm going to do.
I'm going to use GPT OS, the open source version of OpenAI's model.
Um, and it's just the smallest one that is very cheap and it's very fast.
And I'm going to print out what we get.
Um, and I'm also going to print how many tokens were used.
And we'll do this for item zero.
Let's just have a quick look at what item zero is.
Items zero dot full.
So this is the, the uh, the the stuff.
Let's print it.
So we actually see it looking nice.
Here we go.
This this is what it is.
It's this, uh.
Uh f59.
And 613 Andover interior knob with deadbolt, oil rubbed bronze interior half only.
So you can see it's very unstructured.
We've also got all of the different features and bits from the Amazon scrape like listed out here.
So the question is how is that going to look when we run it through an LLM in fact through OSS 20.
And we give it this system prompt.
And then this item, that's what we're going to do.
Now let's see what we get here.
We have it I'm running it and bam we get back.
Do you see how quick that was?
By the way?
Wasn't that crazy?
Uh, we get back, uh, title f59 interior, half knob, oil rubbed bronze, a single piece, oil rubbed
bronze interior knob that attaches to a deadbolt handle for added security features.
Easy installation, a four inch minimum door prep, and a lifetime mechanical and finish warranty.
And you can see this is great.
I mean, this is exactly what we wanted.
It's surely clear that this is going to be better.
It's going to be easier for us to train a model to predict how much something costs based on this description,
than based on this janky stuff here with with lots of things in it and, and far too much data, we've
managed to make it much shorter and much tighter.
There's a lot more signal for the noise, uh, in this rewritten description.
And that's what pre-processing is all about.
Use an LLM to update your data so that you form a version of it that is going to be best suited for
training.
That's what we've done.
And you can see that that there was 446 tokens input at what came out was just 125 tokens, and that
cost us all of 0.011 cents.
And don't misread that.
It's not $0.011.
It's 0.011 cents.
It's a 1/10,000 of a dollar.
So so it's definitely cheap.
That's the great thing about OSS.
But but of course, the bad news is that particularly for the full data set, we've got a lot of this
data.
We've got 800,000 data points.
And so unfortunately it's a very small number times a very big number ends up still being quite a big
number.
So we do need to be cost conscious, uh, even even with such cheap prices.
Well, there's one way that we can be very cost conscious and that is to use a free local model.
Let's do that next.
146 - So this is using a lama now and with light LM, all you have to do is just switch that to say a llama
llama 3.2.
And this is the the API base.
Uh, so now it's going to be running on my computer right there.
It's going to be using llama 3.2 to achieve the same thing.
Uh, oops.
There we go.
Hang on.
Let's run that so my computer, I can see my.
It was very quick again.
Uh, my GPU, like, spiked up for a second.
Uh, so let's see what we got here.
Well let's compare.
You can see immediately that llama 3.2 while it was completely free.
Uh, it's, uh, as you will see from that very precise cost, 0.00 $0.00.
Uh, it's, uh, it's not done so well in terms of, of the, uh, the, the output, uh, you can see
that, that it's got like something funny going on with the title here.
Uh, it didn't, it didn't put the word title.
It instead put a like a markdown title in their, um, category.
It says home security, which feels like that's a very specific category.
I don't actually care that much, but these categories are going to be a hint to the LM that's trying
to to to guess a price later.
But still, you want you want a category that feels feels right like that.
Um, the brand it got right.
Uh, the description provides a secure and stylish entrance solution.
It's fine, it's fine.
Um, but it's clearly not got the precision of OSS 20 b.
Uh, actually, this has made me just just want to mention one other thing.
You might notice.
The output tokens is only 48, and the output tokens here is a much bigger number.
And yet they look visually the same.
And this when I when I saw that 125 I remember thinking, surely that's not that's way fewer than 125
uh, output tokens.
The thing is, it's worth knowing that when light LM counts the output tokens, it's including these
things called reasoning tokens, which is the the tokens that OSS OS created while it was thinking through
how to come up with the best answer.
So it did have a few of those reasoning tokens as well.
Because this is closer to 48 here, it's a nice and short description.
Okay, so for you, if you if you do wish to go through and and work on this, you can choose to use
llama 3.2 for your data.
Of course it takes a long time.
Llama 3.2 isn't exactly super speedy, but you can rewrite everything in llama 3.2.
And still, this data will be much, much better than the original data.
But I'm going to use grok with a Q.
That's how we are going to pre-process all of our data.
And I'm going to do this for the 20,000 in the Lite data set, and also for the 800,000 or 820,000 in
the full data set as well.
And I'm going to use this batch mode as a way to do it really fast and at half the price.
Let's go do that now.
So from this point onwards we're going to be focusing on using grok with a Q for the rest of this lab.
But you can apply something similar to OpenAI directly.
If you wish to have almost exactly the same API.
Or you could just loop through and use llama 3.2 for the 20,000 dataset if you prefer.
But this is what we're going to do.
So first up we are going to have this this little helper function that is going to make a line of JSON.
A single line of JSON for each of the different requests that we want to make to grok with a queue.
That's how batch mode works.
You remember we we talked about this briefly in week five.
JSON L is a type of file which isn't just one JSON blob, which is what a JSON file is, but it's a
file where every line is a separate JSON document.
That's called a JSON l JSON lines.
Um, and what we're going to have on each line is something which says what model we want.
It has messages, which is going to be the usual OpenAI list of dictionaries with system prompt.
And the the user prompt will be the full item.
Um, and you can see that what we've got here is mirrors.
The call we actually made before up here.
So it's exactly that call we're putting in our JSON file.
And we're also in each line.
You also have to put an ID number to identify each line that you're sending in batch mode, because
you're later going to get back responses for each line in your input file.
And this is why I set that ID to be the number of each item, because we're going to use that as our
way of queuing what is in each line.
Okay.
So that's called make JSON L.
And to make this real for you, let me show you what that looks like for make JSON l of items zero.
This as a reminder is what items zero is.
I think we know this one.
Well.
Now it is this Andover interior knob with Deadbolts.
This is what happens if I call make JSON L with item zero.
I get customer id is zero because that's the id we set method is post chat completions.
And then here you'll see that there is the list of DeCSS system user, and the whole thing is in there
from the from the from the unstructured data and then reasoning effort low.
That is what we get back when we call make jsonl.
It like represents one API call in one line of JSON.
Okay, so now I've got a function make file which is going to to go through and make a complete file
by iterating through each item from start to end and make a jsonl file.
And again, if you're not sure what I mean, it's going to become absolutely clear to you now.
I'm going to call makefile starting at index zero going up to index 1000.
I want you to make me a jsonl file.
Call it zero underscore 1000 jsonl and put it in a folder called jsonl.
Let me run that.
It's run.
Let's go and take a look.
Here's a folder called Jsonl.
I've got right here.
Here's the file we just created.
And this hopefully is where this will make sense to you.
It's a file which has.
If I scroll all the way down, hopefully it will have 1000 lines.
Let's see.
It does indeed have 1000 lines.
And if we go back up to the top again all the way back, here's the first line.
Each one you can see has a custom ID 01234567.
And as I go along, you'll see that each one looks like an API call.
It's got this body here which says what is the model we're trying to call.
And then here are the messages uh, system, content creator, concise description, etc., etc..
And so each of these you can look through, each line is passing in a different piece of unstructured
data from an item.
And we're going to ask grok to go through this whole file and process all of this together to give us
our results.
Okay.
And remember, if if you're not following all of this, get some intuition for what I'm talking about,
batch calling and LM through jsonl files.
And you'll be able to to to reap the rewards of this, I'm going to upload the results.
You'll be able to to download them and use them as is yourself.
Okay, so now I'm using, uh, grok uh, provides a library grok, which we're going to use directly
the if you call OpenAI in batch mode, it's basically exactly the same.
Grok copied uh, OpenAI on this.
And it's pretty standard for this, this approach for, for most of the providers.
Okay.
So so I'm initializing the grok library by passing in my grok API key okay.
So the the when you're working in batch mode there are simply these, these steps that you need to do.
There are these basically the three steps.
You create a file.
You then use that file to create a batch.
And then you retrieve the batch.
And that's what we're going to do right now.
So the first thing you do is you create a file in grok.
We're telling grok I've got this file.
It's called zero underscore 1000.
Jason I want you to upload this file.
And the purpose is it's for batch purposes.
That's what it is.
I am just now uploading that file to grok and back.
It came with a file response, uh, which has an ID in it, and it has how many bytes that it's created,
the name, the purpose and so on.
And now I can I can collect that ID.
So this is now a file that I've uploaded to grok.
It's sitting up there on grok.
With this ID done.
We've created our file time now.
So we've yeah we've created the file.
It's time now for us to use that file to create a batch.
And so for that we don't call grok create we call grok batches create.
We say we need you to complete this sometime in the next 24 hours.
No rush.
Take your time.
Because that's how we get half price.
Uh, we give it we say that it's a chat completion that's just standard.
And we give it the input file, the file that the ID of the file we just uploaded, which has its jsonl.
Every line is a different API request.
So we have just created our our batch.
There we go.
It's got this batch ID let's collect that ID into uh into sorry.
Here we go.
Response ID is where we get that ID and when we're ready we can then do the next step, which is to
retrieve that batch and see what's happening with it.
So here we go.
We did grok create to create the file.
Then we did grok create to make a batch from the file.
And now we're doing grok retrieve to.
Now find out what's going on.
We get back uh, the here is the batch ID, the completion window, the endpoint, the input file ID
the status is completed.
So grok had 24 hours to do it, but it did it just like that, which is usually the case for files like
this.
It will be no problem at all.
It will have happened to you two, I expect if you were doing this.
No errors.
Everything looks great.
So it happened.
We've been we've been successful already.
And there is then, uh, another step I should mention, which is to actually collect the results.
And you do that with grok content.
So here we go.
Grok content.
And I just wrote that to a file called Batch results Jsonl also in the Jsonl directory.
Let's have a look.
Uh here it is.
Batch results is right here.
And here we have it.
So this is the contents of the file.
It's a file with each line is a jsonl.
Uh, it's a chunk of JSON.
Look, these custom IDs, they don't match.
It doesn't come back in the order that we sent it, because this thing went off and there was like,
a farm of grok processes that handled it and back it came in some different order.
So we can't rely on the order of the file.
We need to look at this custom ID and you'll see that here are lots of responses.
And if you look into them, you'll find that somewhere along the way here we should have indeed our,
uh, our actual actual, uh, answer if I scroll to the right.
Uh, here's the body.
There's an ID in here.
Uh, and then we're going to we're going to see that there's actually the, the response where we'll
see the response content.
Here we go.
Uh, the message assistant content.
And you can see right here appearing on the screen, you see this all of these title title titles,
these are all the titles coming back from the model title category brand, uh, showing through.
We have got back responses from grok for each of these items.
Brilliant.
And now finally, we can just write some vanilla Python code that will iterate through that.
And then we can collect the ID and then use that to pluck out what is the summary.
And look at this line here.
Items ID summary is the summary that we will pluck out from that jsonl line.
And that is what we will run next.
And then we will examine the results.
147 - And so to quickly recap, and I know you don't need a recap.
You've been following all of this, but recaps are good.
It's good to to repeat.
Repetition is how you learn.
So we started by making a jsonl file.
We then did Grok create to upload our jsonl file and make a file in grok.
It's the same with OpenAI.
And we then did grok create to say hey, we uploaded a file.
We want you to turn that into a batch that you should run.
And then we did grok batches dot retrieve to see how it was going.
And then finally grok files content with the results output file.
When it finished, we collected that, saved it to a jsonl file.
And now we've got this jsonl file.
With all of the results, what we can do is iterate through it.
We can again we can we can pluck out the actual ID which is really an index.
And then we can pluck out the response body.
Content which if you really follow through that jsonl line, you'll find that's what it takes to get
to this point.
While I was agonisingly scrolling through it just then, uh, and then we're going to get that summary
and say items summary is that summary and it's run already.
So a reminder that this is the, the uh, items zero dot full.
This is the full janky thing for the Andover interior knob.
And now item zero dot summary has been rewritten.
And there it is.
This came back from grok and it's been put into item zero dot summary.
How about that.
It worked.
We've just populated.
We should be able to do this for item number 1000 as well.
Item number 999.
There it is.
It's there too.
But if we go for item number 1000 I think that's going to be one too many.
There's nothing there.
We only did the first uh, 1000, which is from 0 to 999.
They've all been populated by this batch.
Uh, and it happened like like in a flash.
We ran all of this, and it will have cost very, very little.
Okay.
And now we've done that.
It's time to run it for the whole lot.
Let's do it.
So we basically have to do exactly what was in the notebook above.
It was it was done just for one file, uh, from 0 to 1000.
And we sort of want to repeat that for multiple files and just cover exactly the same logic.
And the easy way to do things like this, when you hear something like that is you should think, okay,
that sounds like I should make a Python module to do that and nicely package everything up.
And that's precisely what I've done.
And the module is called batch.
It's in the folder.
Here it is.
Batch.
Uh, and you can see here that it's exactly what we just covered.
There's a system prompt which is the system prompt that we wrote together moments ago.
And then it takes the batch size.
We're going to have 1000 in each one of our files.
Uh, you can have much more than that.
You can have up to 10,000.
Uh, at least I think more than that for grok.
But I found it's better to keep these files relatively small so they run fairly quickly.
And so what I've got here is just a few, uh, methods in this, in this class which make life easy,
make Jason creates the sorry make Jason L creates the JSON l file with each row is exactly what it needs
to be.
Make file, build an entire file, uh, and then send file calls create to actually send the file up
to grok.
Submit the batch calls.
Grok create.
To create a batch from a file is ready, sees whether or not the file is ready by calling the the grok
batches dot retrieve and then fetch.
Output is files content and then finally apply output is that little bit of Python that looks up the
id and then applies it to the item that it was referring to.
And then I've got just some helper class methods like create that sets everything up, run that calls,
make the file, send the file, submit the batch and fetch that says.
If this batch is done, then go and fetch the output.
Apply the output.
So I don't I don't want to go through this in very much more detail, because it's just the same as
what's in this notebook up here.
Same thing packaged into a module.
A good way to do it when you want to run something many times over, which is exactly what we're going
to do now.
We're going to run that for all of the 20,000, 22,000 in the light data set.
Okay.
So I'm going to run batch create light mode is true.
So it's going to create 22 batches.
The 22 times 1000 is 22,000.
And you may have just spotted it just created a new directory called light which has batches and outputs
as two empty subdirectories.
Okay.
Now I'm going to call batch run.
And when I do that we get one of these nice Tqdm progress bars.
Remember you can just wrap any, any list, any iterable in Tqdm and it will automatically create a
lovely little progress bar.
You see, I use that all over the place, so you're probably used to it by now.
Uh, so here we go.
The progress bar is filling up.
And what we'll see if we open here is you'll see that it's creating.
Ah, you see it making the one by one making a bunch of JSON files.
Each of these, of course, contains a bunch of these API requests.
We're in business.
We are creating all of these, um, and those batches that are created, those files.
And it also submitted them to grok.
So these are all running right now.
And at any point I can call batch and it will go through and query grok about the status of all of those.
And it's telling me now that it's finished seven out of the 22 batches.
And I should tell you if you are choosing to run this yourself, as it said in the comments at the top,
this this costs just under a dollar for me.
Uh, the cost might be different in different regions, I don't know, but I expect it's the same.
Uh, the whole cost was slightly under a dollar.
Ngrok to run this, which is 50%.
Half price of what it would call cost just to.
Just to call them manually one by one.
And you may say in this case we could actually do it manually.
So it will cost us $2 instead of $1.
And it would still be pretty quick because this is very fast for 20,000.
Maybe you'd have to leave it running for an hour or two.
But remember, I'm about to do this for the 800,000 and that would be completely impractical to do it
anyway other than the batch way.
So run batch dot fetch again.
See how we're doing.
You can run this as often as you want, and it will just collect anything that's still remaining.
It's now finished 18 out of the 22.
Uh, grok is very quick at getting through this.
And this is, this is doing, uh, all of the 22,000 in the light data set.
Run it one more time, finish 21 out of the 22 batches.
Uh, so.
So any second now, it's going to be finished.
And now it has indeed finished all 22 out of the 22 batches.
Amazing.
So again, we created these 22 files.
If I now open up output, you'll see there are 22 output files.
And these outputs will match each of these input files.
Although the order in each one might be different.
And let's just double check that, uh, that everything in our items at this point, every single one
should now have an item dot summary.
And sure enough, nothing got printed.
That means that there are no cases where there was an empty summary.
We have just populated.
Let's go and have a look at a few of them.
We've just populated.
Look at items.
Uh, number.
What number should I choose?
Number 10,234.
Uh dot summary.
We should find that there is a nice summary.
Print that out.
Make sure it looks good.
There it is.
Red barn.
Full photography backdrop in photography and video.
Here it is.
Let's see what the original text looks like.
Something that's.
That's much more janky.
We've tidied it up.
We've made it shorter.
Here it is.
That's success across 20,000 data points.
22,000 in in a flash.
Okay, so you didn't need to do this yourself because you've seen me do it.
I'm now going to upload it to the hub.
So you can you can take the benefit of what I've done.
As long as you get the general idea of this.
We're using an LLM to rewrite the text, the unstructured text in the janky scrape from Amazon that
we collected from Hugging Face.
We've rewritten it so that it's sharp, punchy, full of signal and no noise.
Something that will be good to pass into an LLM to figure out how much it costs.
And we used the batch mode of talking to grok, same as the batch mode for talking to OpenAI.
It's a common technique.
Write your jsonl file and then create that, that file in the in the provider and then turn that into
a batch, create a batch based on the file and then collect the results.
Uh, check, check on the status.
And then when you get an output file name, collect those results.
And those steps are very common amongst many LMS providers.
It's a way to get fast, low cost, kind of asynchronous batch runs of calls to an LMS.
So it's a great skill to have acquired.
All right.
Finally I'm just going to go through all of the items in our 20,000.
And I'm going to to wipe out the full and the ID because we don't need them anymore.
We're never going to use that full description again.
And we don't need to to pollute our data set with it.
So run that and we've wiped out that data.
And then finally I'm going to upload that to a new data sets before it was called items raw light and
items raw full.
Now I'm just going to call it items light and Items full.
And if it's light mode I'll only upload the light data set if it's in full mode.
I'll upload both data sets.
Um, putting in the 800,000, uh, and then 10,000 val 10,000 test.
Otherwise just 20,001 and one.
And I'm not going to run this cell now because I've already done it.
But you can, uh, and you will be able to have your very own data set.
But I've done it.
And so we can have a look at what it looks like in hugging face.
If I launch this up, it comes in hugging face.
This is looking at a data set.
It's my data set.
It's, uh, items light that you're seeing here.
And you can see that there's nice little data set navigator here where you can see the title, the category.
These are all the fields that we got from the Amazon scrape.
Um, so this may or may not match the category that was assigned by OSS.
The price we've got here, the weight which is a field that we've done.
And the summary and you can see here the summary has a title and it has all of the details in it.
Uh, this this is the data.
I'm just clicked on it here so we can have a look at it.
This is the data that was written by, uh, by by GPT oss 20 through grok in batch mode.
So this is the data as it is.
That is the light data set.
We can also look at the full data set.
Here is the full data set.
Look over here you can see the number of rows 820,000 rows here where it was just just uh, 20,000 rows
for this simpler data set.
Uh, there we go.
22,000 there and 820,000.
It's a monstrously large data set.
So much data.
It's going to be great for training.
It's 250MB.
It's not like a massive file that we've got here.
So it's going to be fine for you to work with.
And you can have a look at all of the data that's in here.
This cost me about $30, I think just under in total to run all of this in grok.
And it took several hours.
I had to come back and collect it a few hours later to get everything.
but it was quite fun and satisfying.
But you honestly don't need to do it because I've done it already.
We're just using this data set going forwards, all the Lite variant, but you at least have a good
sense of how I did it, and you know enough so you could do this too if you ever want to do something
similar.
And with that massive congratulations, we're done with data.
We've got a beautiful, curated, processed data set that is going to it's going to do really well for
us in our training.
And hopefully you've got a great sense of what it takes to craft a good data set and the kinds of experiments
that you might want to run.
And as a little bonus, we got to explore running in batch mode, which is something that's super useful
running in batch mode and prompt caching, and are two of the kinds of of tricks to reduce costs that
are used often.
Okay, so remember that today, in addition to the calling models for code and text and rag, we we
covered the five step strategy to how you solve problems with AI starting from identifying the problem
and the eval.
Next time we're going to dig into baseline models, what does it mean to create a baseline model?
I'm going to give you a flavor for traditional ML.
We're not going to go super deep on traditional ML because this isn't a course on traditional ML.
And I and I think you'll be annoyed if I get I do tend to I get very excited by traditional ML, but
I'll try and contain myself and give you enough so that we can build a baseline model, which is such
a good place to start.
So so we know if we're going to work with, with Llms that we we are in fact, doing better than we
could do if we stuck with, with the traditional world.
So it's a good thing to do, and it will also give us a solid basis for improvement.
And we're going to use some of the more trendy, modern, traditional ML things as well, like some
of the models like Random Forest and XGBoost that people love to experiment with.
Even to this day they are still used often in production, so tons to do tomorrow.
I'll see you then.
148 - Oh, I'm really looking forward to today.
I'm going to be able to nerd out with you on building traditional ML models.
It's going to set the stage for what's to come, and it's going to be a lot of fun at the same time.
But first, a reminder what you can already do generating text and code with open source and closed
source models.
Creating Rag solutions with Lang chain 1.0 and Non-long chain two, and evaluating Rag, but then also
a five step strategy to solving a business problem with AI curating data, batch mode, document rewriting,
pre-processing so much that we've covered today, you'll be able to explain a traditional baseline model,
how you build a baseline model, how you build a traditional ML solutions, and you'll be able to apply
some natural language processing techniques.
The countvectorizer bag of words you'll see, and then using advanced ML models as well, like random
forest XGBoost.
Lots to do.
It's going to be great.
But first, of course one more time to look at the Price is Right.
Remind you what it is.
Given a description of a product, how much does it cost?
That's the problem we're trying to solve.
We're using a curated data set that we crafted ourselves.
We started with a hugging face data set that was in fact a scraped Amazon scraped from from from the
last from a couple of years ago.
Uh, we then we curated it and picked out, we sampled the distribution, which was did a nice job of
representing different product prices and different categories.
And we then pre-processed it using GPT OSS 20 B via grok, using grok in batch mode.
So much.
All right.
And we know that this is eventually going to end up in an agentic solution hunting for bargains.
That's why we're building this.
And it's nice that there's this very simple evaluation using price differences that we're going to be
looking more at.
Okay.
And the order of play again on week six.
This current week.
It's about curating data, evaluating frontier models, where you already curated the data in day one.
We pre-processed it.
It was great yesterday.
Now baseline models and traditional ML, then neural networks and frontier llms and then fine tuning
a frontier LLM which goes into the fine tuning open source LLM and into deploying Agentic AI.
The works.
Okay.
Let's let's talk about baseline models okay.
So building a baseline is something which is easily skipped.
People often do say let's just pull out the LLM.
And that that would be an error.
It's a great discipline in any in any proper commercial project you would want to start start simple.
The rule of start simple and build from there is so important.
Uh, even even even if you absolutely know that this is going to be a great model for you, you still
need to have something to compare it with, to be able to to judge how well you're performing and whether
you are state of the art.
So start simple.
Start cheap.
It's always a good strategy.
It also, of course it gives you, as I say, like like a benchmark on which you can only do better,
hopefully.
And although I say that it's always possible that you'll decide that actually you don't need an LLM
in this case.
There are many types of business problem where traditional ML is great.
Particularly, I mean, if you if you know how linear regression works, basically just taking like
a weighted combination of your features.
If the actual true, the truth does turn out to be a weighted combination of the features, then you're
not going to do any better than linear regression.
And you can put the fanciest LLM on the planet in as your model.
It's not going to beat linear regression if the actual answer is just a weighted combination of the
parts.
Um, and so yeah, you might find when there's some problems, some business problems that lend themselves
really well to a simple, uh, simple, traditional approach, perhaps something that judges the probability
of whether a credit card transaction is credit card fraud.
It might turn out that it very much.
There are certain patterns which are just simple to detect, and the probability depends very accurately
on them.
Then potentially a simple baseline model, a traditional ML model might do better.
Or maybe just Python code might do better.
That's why start with a baseline model to find out before you get fancy.
And now this is not a course on traditional ML.
So I'm going to grant myself one slide on just the core things about traditional ML that you need to
know.
I was very tempted to do a whole sort of exercise, a lab full of interesting linear regression stuff,
but I realized too much of a distraction.
We should we should stick stick with it.
But briefly for traditional ML so that the sort of textbook definition of machine learning is it is
like a branch of AI where programs learn from data to make predictions without being explicitly programmed.
But obviously that's a real umbrella definition.
And you can apply that to to any area of machine learning, including like modern AI llms, which in
theory also fall under the umbrella of machine learning.
And that's why this sort of generic definition does does work for anything.
But in practice, when people use the expression machine learning or ML these days, what they're referring
to is traditional machine learning.
And when people say ML, they're talking about models that pre-date, uh, deep learning of the last
sort of five, five, ten years and certainly predates Llms.
So while, strictly speaking, llms are a type of ML machine learning, it's not commonly how people
use this expression.
When people say machine learning, that's shorthand for traditional machine learning.
Things like linear regression, random forests, XGBoost, uh, support vector machines, all that stuff.
That is all what people mean by machine learning.
And whilst some people might say that some of this is old hat, and we know we've now moved to the world
of llms, I disagree.
First of all, there are still very frequently business problems that are better solved by machine learning
by traditional ML.
As I just said, but also even the modern LLM world, it's all based on the same foundational principles,
and it's not possible to understand how llms work if you don't know your foundational machine learning.
You don't need to know it in a ton of depth.
You don't need to know all of the maths behind it you and not for typical everyday work as an AI engineer,
but you need to know some of the the terminology, some of the underlying principles, because they
apply just as much to modern llms as they do in the traditional world.
And much of this is stuff that I've already alluded to as we've gone.
First of all, there's this idea of generalizing generalization, which is the ability of a model to
do well on unseen data.
You've trained something.
Let's again go back to this idea of credit card transactions.
Are they fraudulent, fraudulent or not?
You've got maybe 10,000 credit card transactions, of which 5000 are fraudulent and 5000 are not.
And you've got details like how much was the amount?
Maybe there's suspicious amounts, which are amounts of credit card transactions just below some threshold,
which normally triggers more review.
There might be patterns that are particularly indicate a high probability of it being fraud.
And so you take all of this data.
You write some software that creates features from this data.
And then you build models that take these features and use this to give like the probability that it's
credit card fraud or something like that.
Some output based on the inputs and generalizing is when after giving it lots of examples, it can then
take a new credit card transaction, not one of the ones in the examples, but something different.
And because it's learned from patterns in that input data, it's able to do a good job.
It's able to perform well to be accurate on new data that it's not seen before.
That is generalizing that.
That is what it's all about.
Overfitting is what you call it when you've given it lots of training data, and maybe the training
data has some noise in it, or maybe it has some anomalies and your model has has tried to be so accurate
in fitting to the training data that it's done kind of too well.
It's learned things about the training data that aren't real patterns in the real world.
And so that's known as overfitting when it does that and and the the it wouldn't matter if it only affected
the training data.
The problem is that typically if a model overfits, then when it's given new unseen data, it starts
to perform badly because it's, it's it's tried to account for the noise in the data or something that
isn't real signal.
It's tried to explain that, and that means it's not going to perform well when it's given something
new.
And so this is known as overfitting.
And it's the kind of like the thing that destroys generalization, one of one of many, but it's the
one that people often see happening in practice.
And it's also something that often happens if you train too much.
If you train too much, well, say with the same data again and again.
Then often you'll find that your model starts to overfit.
So it's a very common expression to hear that.
And so the goal of machine learning is to generalize.
I said that before.
It's about making accurate predictions not on the training data, but on new data based on patterns
from the training data.
That's what it's about.
And again, of course, that completely extends to the new World Llms.
These are particular types of machine learning model, which the inputs is a sequence of tokens.
The output is the probability of the next token.
And the ability to generalize is that when it's given a sequence that's different to any of the input
sequences taken from the internet, or all of the other sources of data that's used for training llms
when it's given something new, like a chat with you on ChatGPT, it's able to generalize and still
respond in a way that seems consistent with all of its input data, even though it isn't actually captured
anywhere in the input data.
That's generalizing.
It applies to traditional ML and it applies to LMS.
And now we're going to go to cursor to the lab.
We're going to go and build some traditional ML models.
And we're going to evaluate them in a way that we will do for many other models.
It's going to be so much fun.
Reminder there's three different ways you can follow along.
You can just just think about what I'm doing, get the gist of what's happening, use it to build intuition
about how one goes about these kinds of things.
Secondly, you can follow along.
Use the light data set.
Of course the 20,000.
It will work great with all of these models and use use the data that I've already curated and I've
already built.
It's there for you.
We will download it right now, and there's no cost at all for anything that we do today.
Of course, it's all just just ML models.
And then you can also decide you're going to roll up sleeves and do it with the full data set.
Just copy what I do.
Very satisfying.
Particularly for traditional ML.
It's easy and it's fun.
And of course again, no cost for what we do today.
All right.
That's that's enough preamble.
Let's go to cursor.
Let's go to traditional ML.
149 - Okay, so here we are in Casa opening up week six.
Going to day three.
Let's get going with traditional ML of play.
We've already done curation.
We've already done pre-processing.
We're now doing evaluation baselines.
Traditional ML.
Now there's a bunch of imports here.
These imports are going to bring in numpy say some ordinary libraries.
And then a bunch of stuff from sklearn.
Sklearn, which is the short for scikit learn, is the workhorse of traditional ML.
So many algorithms in here, linear regression is one of the sort of go tos that we'll use.
Of course, Countvectorizer is a basic NLP library, and then Randomforestregressor is where things
get juicy.
Okay.
And I've got light mode set to false, which you can to for this one because this lab we're doing traditional
ML, it should work fine.
If any troubles just switch to true to the smaller data set.
And this is how it loads in the data sets.
It's very simple.
Username.
Keep it as my username unless you've created your own data set.
And then it looks up either items light or items full depending on light mode and loads that in.
From the hub you'll see that I've got items from hub for that data set.
And then what comes out is the training data set, the validation data set, and the test data set.
These are the three different pools of data.
In this case we've got 800,000 training data items, 10,000 in the tests in Val and 10,000 in test.
And I believe this takes about 27 seconds, which means that any second now we're going to have there
we go, 25 seconds, 800,000 training items, 10,000 validation, 10,000 tests.
Great.
Okay.
So the game of the next few weeks is to write functions which take an item and estimate the price of
that item using a bunch of different techniques, using techniques from very simple techniques to very
advanced Balanced techniques.
And we are going to start as part of building the baseline with things that are as simple as we could
possibly imagine.
And the one that is really, really simple is say, okay, what about we write an algorithm which just
makes a guess.
It's given an item and it guesses a number from 1 to 1000 or 1 to 999.
Just just at random like that.
Surely that's the simplest.
Let's start with that.
That's it's a bit silly, but it gives us a starting point to look at it.
And that's what this function is.
Random process takes an item.
It ignores that item.
It doesn't even look at it, and it returns just a random number between 1 and 999.
That is it.
Let's let's dig in to what this could do.
And before we dig into what this could do, I have I need I need to ask you to do something for me.
I need you to get a prop.
I want you to get a piece of paper and a pen, a piece of paper and a pen.
I got I got myself a piece of paper here, and I get a pen and.
Yeah, you'll, you'll, you'll need that and you're going to need that for the next couple of weeks.
We're going to be writing some stuff down.
So, uh, piece of paper and a pen.
If you want to use your computer's notebook, you can.
But it's more fun if you put it on a piece of paper and a pen.
So get that.
Put me on pause while you get it.
And then we're going to start our first experiment a random price.
So we'll see how it does okay.
So hopefully you have your piece of paper and a pen.
Uh, so uh, what I'm going to show you now is going to be quite fun.
I have written a function called evaluate and evaluate is a function which itself takes a function.
It takes a function which is able to to take an item and return a price.
So if you're familiar, if you write a function like this in Python, it calls the function.
If you do it like this, it doesn't call the function, it just passes that function in as a parameter.
And my evaluate function is able to call this repeatedly.
And I also pass in my test data set.
And it's going to call it repeatedly for 200 the first 200 items in that test data set.
Uh, so evaluate itself is, is if we go and have a look at it, it's in Pricer again as as is everything.
Here it is evaluator.
It's quite a long function here because it does a few plots.
You'll see it does a few plots.
It iterates through the first 200 items in tests.
Um, and 200 is just the default size you'll see at the top here, the default size is 200.
It iterates through those 200.
And you can you can override that and pass in a different number if you want.
Uh and here it is.
Evaluate.
It goes through them all.
And each in turn it will calculate.
It will it will look up the actual price.
It will use the function to estimate the price.
And it will figure out the difference between them and see how it does.
And it will then visualize that that's what we're going to see.
Uh, and um, one other thing to mention is that to make things fast, I've actually run this in parallel.
I have workers.
Workers is five means that it spawns like five threads that all run at the same time.
And if that's something that hammers your system too much, you can change that just by passing in workers
one or workers two.
When, when when you call, evaluate.
Or you can just hard code it in the evaluator function so whatever works best for you.
So back here again if this is turns out to not work nicely, you can do like, um, uh, you can say
size equals 100 if you want it to run faster.
Um, and you can say workers equals one if you, if you don't want it to be so, so much parallelized.
But we're going to do 200 and I'm going to run it right now.
And we're going to see what the visualization looks like.
And it's a visualization we're going to see a lot.
So better get used to this.
Here it goes.
Bam.
We've got ourselves a chart.
Let's look at this chart.
I'm going to have to zoom out a little bit on my screen.
There we go.
Um okay okay.
What are you looking at.
Here's the thing.
This is quite, a quite a common kind of chart or charts like this in data science.
And it's sometimes called like a y hat y.
Chart.
The y hat is what you call.
That's that's the terminology for a model's prediction.
In our case, it's what was what did our what did our function say the price should be.
And y is the actual price the true price also known as the ground truth.
So what are we looking at here?
This this is a scatter plot.
Each each of these dots on this picture represents one of our 200 test points.
And so if I, if I hover over this scatter point this is apparently for a tidal front.
Oh, this this is what I know what it is.
It's an HP LaserJet laser printer.
Okay.
Something normal.
So you see where this is?
This is this is a 300 on the x axis, which means that this thing actually costs $300 according to our
Amazon scrape on the y axis, the guess was $433.
That's how much we the the function.
This this random function.
Basically that's what this returned.
It returned the 300 number.
Where are we?
Here we are.
It returned 300.
Sorry 433.
And this point you can see it's 300 across 433 up.
And that's why it's there.
So the closer the points are to this blue dashed line, which is the line of perfection this line represents
when a guess was identical to the actual price.
The closer it is, the better the model has done, and I've colored in the points as green when they're
nice and close to the line, yellow if they're a bit far out, and red if they're way off.
Okay, are you with me?
This scatter plot will see it so many times.
You're going to get so used to this.
This is a way of visualizing our evaluation.
And because our function here is a random function, these are randomly distributed in the y in the
height.
They're just all over the place.
Uh, and you can see that in many cases that's a horrible answer and it's done a terrible job.
And so that's why we're seeing the scatter as it is.
And at the top here, this number at the top is telling us the overall error, the average error on
average.
This model was wrong by $382 382.
That's how far off we were.
And $0.08.
We might as well get this right.
And so the reason for the piece of paper and the pen is that I would like you to write down with me.
Right now, I'm going to write down random pricer.
The random results from this random pricer is 300 random 382.08.
And a lot of what we're going to be doing is going to be using more and more sophisticated models to
try and do better and better at that.
Number.
382.08.
That's where we are.
Now I've also got some other numbers here.
MSE the mean squared error.
That's that's a more sort of a bona fide kind of data science metric.
And it is, of course, take the difference between this and this and square it.
That is what you're seeing with the MSE.
And R squared is another.
It's common for this kind of problem when you're trying to to come up with numbers r squared measures.
How well is your function able to reflect the pattern of the input data.
The trends in the input data and r squared of 100% means that you are perfectly explaining the variation
in your data.
An r squared of zero means that the way that you're explaining data is no better than just guessing
the average across the board.
That would get you an R squared of zero, and a negative R squared means that you're actually doing
worse than just guessing the average.
You've got like something that's that's performing.
You do better just to say just always guess the same number.
And in this case, the random function had a terrible negative r squared, which is kind of funny.
Uh, so so there you have it.
That is what we've got a negative r squared, uh, and a horrible result and $382 off on average.
Surely we can do better.
One other thing to mention on this is that I've got a second visualization here, which I've added in.
One of the things that's very important to keep a careful eye on is that if you're doing a test on something
like 200 data points, the question you need to ask yourself is, okay, but maybe I just got lucky
with those 200 data points.
Maybe if I picked a different 200 data points, I'd have got a completely different answer.
Or maybe if I if I took 201 data points instead of 200, I'd have got a different answer.
And so this is just showing you as you increase the number of data points in the test, what was the
average error turning out to be?
And of course it was.
It was super volatile to start with.
And then you can see it sort of settles down.
and that gray shading is showing you something that is known as the confidence interval, that maybe
that that has some horrible reminder from, from like high school maths.
It's like a statistics thing.
The confidence interval is telling you that within like 95% confidence level, it should.
We believe based on the numbers that we've got, that the true the random pricer result is off by $382
plus or -$37 at the 95% confidence interval.
And it's shown visually by that gray kind of border along there.
So this is a good thing to reference.
It's good to keep an eye on that to make sure we're being disciplined about.
We're going to we're going to really focus in on this number here.
But make sure we know our confidence interval as well.
That's that's a good good practice okay.
There we have it.
This is a visualization that we're going to we're going to see a lot.
And it's really cool.
And the model is not so cool.
The random price has done horribly.
It's time for us to do a bit better.
150 - Okay.
What's next?
Well, remember I told you I was mentioning R-squared is zero when you just guessed the average?
But that might have given you a little idea.
What would it be like if we made a model?
Another sort of silly model that all it does is just guess the average.
Uh, let's let's look at this.
Uh, so, so let's look at our training data.
Collect all the prices in our training data and figure out what is the average price across all of our
training data.
And actually let me print that I'm going to print the training average so we get to see it.
And then we can have another function called constant pricer that takes an item.
And again it ignores whatever item it's given.
It just simply returns this average number.
Let's see what this average number is.
Apparently the average price is $140.56, which may that that vaguely rings a bell because I think we
did print that ourselves.
Uh, earlier in I think in day one.
Uh.
okay.
So now we can just call this evaluate function again with the constant pricer and with our test data.
Let's see what we get.
Maybe picture.
How are you expecting this might look.
You've got any sense of how you think this might look.
Let's see if you're right.
Here it is okay.
Takes a second to take this in.
Right.
What are we looking at here?
Well look remember the x axis is the actual ground truth.
The price of the product, the y axis is how much did our model predict it should cost.
And so hopefully it's like a, like a eureka moment for you that you see.
Of course every point is at the same y axis.
It's all always guessing $140.57 the average price.
And you can see that that that's why it's just a line of dots over here.
And there's a bunch of them are red.
And then there's some green where it so happens that the test data set items had a price that was close
to the average price, and then that goes yellow and red again.
And this is the result.
This is what we see.
Um, and, uh, somewhat remarkably, uh, our error has come slamming down.
And that's because it's convenient that the average is a fairly low number.
So it means that we did get a lot that are fairly close to the average, uh, and a lot that.
Yeah, not not far and a lot of either green or yellow.
Uh, and so we end up with 106.18.
Write that down.
Please write that next on your piece of paper on your prop constant.
The constant number 106.18.
Again this is a very silly superficial kind of model, but nonetheless it gives us a number.
It's off by $100 if you simply guess the average.
And you can see that r squared there is, uh, almost zero.
You remember I mentioned that an r squared of zero is if you guess the average and you might say, well,
why isn't it exactly zero?
Well, there's a reason for that.
If we look at this, you'll see that we're doing we're doing pretty well here.
But there's still some error bars around around here.
This might be one where we could we could easily we could bump up the number the size of this because
it's obviously going to be very quick just guessing the average.
So let's let's put in a thousand.
Let's look at a thousand data points here.
And now when we look at a thousand data points the r squared is now even smaller minus one.
Let's make it like 2000 data points.
Let's see how we do now.
And now R-squared is exactly zero.
So you know with enough points and presumably yeah look at look at how tiny the error bar is.
Now the error is, is, is.
Well I've already written down 106.18.
So that's the official error.
Uh, but this is the, uh, um, the one that we get if we, if we actually use, uh, 2000 data points
in our test.
But let's take that out.
Let's just run it one more time like this.
So we've got our official number 106.18.
There we have it.
That's the constant pricer.
Very nice.
It's finally time for a real machine learning model linear regression.
So linear regression is perhaps the simplest of any ML model.
It's just saying hey take take your data.
Come up with some features.
Something about the data that might be interesting.
And I'm going to see whether some weighted combination of those features allows me to predict the price
based on on your input data.
So if you give me a few features of your of your products, like how heavy they are and how long the
descriptions of them are, maybe I'll find that multiplying two by the weight and three times the length
gives me some kind of an estimate on the price that tends to sort of tie out.
And it uses like basic stats to do that, to figure out the right, the right kind of weights to use.
And that's what's known as linear regression.
Okay.
so first up I've written this little function get features.
Given an item.
It returns a little dictionary of features of useful features.
And we're just going to go with with those ones how heavy it is it confusingly it's the word weight.
The weight sometimes like the weights of the parameters.
So you know I mean heaviness here in pounds.
Remember we calculated everything in terms of pounds.
Item weight gives us that.
And then this is this is often a common trick with linear regression.
If you have a data field, if you have a feature like weight that might be zero and zero represents
that we don't know the weight.
Then give linear regression another feature, which is whether or not that weight is meaningful and
it's known as a binary feature or weight unknown, which is either 1 or 0.
And that way linear regression can account differently for those two different cases.
And then the number of of letters in the summary is like a silly thing.
But maybe longer summaries have a higher price or lower price.
Okay.
So those are the features.
There's a little bit of code here to convert that dictionary into a special object called a pandas data
frame.
Pandas is a library that gives you sort of Microsoft Excel kind of functionality in Python.
And this is like turning it into a little Excel grid, turning each of these dictionaries into a little
bit of of of of a grid, a data frame.
Um, and then we're going to do that for some training data and test data.
And then we're running linear regression.
This is just some very standard stuff.
We're telling it the feature columns we're asking it to.
We're giving it the training set and the test set.
And then you just call this model is linear regression model fit all of the scikit learn models.
You just create them and you do model.fit and you give it some input data and some output data.
And it does its best to fit to that.
Uh, obviously I'm not going through this in tons of detail because this isn't a course on traditional
ML.
You can just use this exactly as it is.
And it's giving us here some facts about how important was the heaviness, the weight, how important
was, whether the weight is known or unknown, how important was the text length and the intercept?
Uh, and we can now turn that into one of our functions for prediction, linear regression.
Pricer.
It takes an item.
And now we do look at the item.
We're not going to ignore the item for once we get that we use our code to get the features.
We then use this data frame thing to to turn that into a data frame.
And then we call Model.predict.
And that is how we say to our model, okay, given everything that you've learned, tell me what should
be what is your prediction for the price?
So the key things to know for traditional ML for using scikit learn, you create a type of model.
You do model.fit given some some x and y, some some input and outputs, and it fits to those inputs
and outputs.
and then you do model.predict to then predict something new on some new unseen value.
That's what we do.
And we run it.
And it's pretty terrible.
It's, uh, I mean, you know, like what we were on 106 before.
Linear regression has got us to 101.56.
But I hear you, it's not linear regressions fault.
We've got this this slight, like maybe it's done a little bit better than than guessing the average.
Uh, but, uh, this is not because linear regression is bad.
What is it because, well, why why is this so, so hopeless?
It's because we've given it terrible features.
We've given it the weight.
The things depend on how heavy they are, the price of things.
Not.
Not really.
And maybe sometimes, uh, and the length of text.
Yeah.
What?
That doesn't reflect anything, really.
We've given it nothing to work with.
It's no surprise that it's not done well.
And in fact, a huge part of traditional machine learning is about what's called feature engineering,
which is about spending tons of time digging into what features could we possibly come up with that
might help linear regression or might help some other model?
And that used to be a huge part of the job for a data scientist doing feature engineering.
In modern AI, you no longer have to do that.
Models work out the features for themselves.
That's the sort of aha with with using deep learning.
But in traditional ML you had to get the features.
And that's why data scientists in the traditional world needed to be real experts in the business domain.
You needed to know about, like Amazon products in this case, and what kinds of features might we want
to explore so that that whole sort of craft of feature engineering, it's no longer a thing unless you're
still working with traditional models.
But you can see if we wanted to do any, any good here, we'd have to come up with a lot more features.
151 - But wait, maybe there are some easy features that we could use linear regression for that are that
are within arm's reach.
Supposing, for example, we thought we looked at the description, the text itself, and we said to
ourselves, well, maybe if the word luxury is in that description, then it might be something that,
that that is a little bit higher priced.
So we should we could have a feature, which is how many times is the word luxury in this description.
And maybe the word uh, maybe there could be uh, some something like guarantee that might mean that
it's priced higher.
There might be something that is like, like a smart as in a smart TV.
If we've got TVs here, that might mean it's priced a bit more or less.
And maybe there are some words that might mean that something is is not priced so well.
Uh, budget might mean that it's like a cheap item or something like that, or maybe cheap.
Uh, so there might be maybe we should build some features by counting up how many times different words
are there, and then passing a feature that's like count of luxury, count of cheap, count of smart
and pass that in.
That might be an idea.
It's a great idea.
And in fact, you might might be thinking about this already or you might already know, but but, uh,
you don't need to to to like, like come up with the words.
What you could do is say, okay, let's take all the training data, let's find the 2000 most common
words in there and then treat that as being our 2000 features, 2000 features which which are each one
reflects one of the 2000 most common words.
And for each feature, we then calculate it by counting the number of words in each of our data points.
Um, so maybe one of them is luxury, one of them is smart.
And then we form this list of features for each of our data points, counting up these common words.
Okay.
That's a thing.
It's known as bag of words.
Uh, and there's particularly there's there's a, um, a class in scikit learn called Vectorizer, which
uses that idea the bag of words to to count up the number of common words.
And it's called a countvectorizer, because what the result of doing this is that for each of our items,
there will be 2000 counts, or however many the 2000.
You can decide how many common words you want.
We'll go with 2000, so there'll be 2000 numbers associated with each of our products.
If it doesn't have any of the 2000 most popular words, then that's just going to be 2000 zeros.
If it just has the word luxury once, then that'll be a lot of zeros, except for the one of these numbers
that represents the word luxury, which will be a one.
And then lots of zeros.
Uh, and so you could think of this thing as like a vector to use the, like the vector.
Obviously, it's very different to the vectors that we had in week five, but it is a bit like a vector.
It's a very coarse kind of vector, coarse grained vector, just counting the number of popular words.
It's nothing like the encoders that we've met before, but that is a very simple technique and we can
do that and that is what we will do now.
So we're first going to gather all of our prices in a numpy array.
And all of our documents.
Our documents will be the summary text of every item for all of our training data.
And then we're going to set a random seed.
And we're going to call this countvectorizer, which turns all counts up.
The most popular 2000 words we say 2000 is the number of features.
And then it counts them up for each of our documents.
Uh, and this, this thing here, stopwords is how we tell it.
Hey, please ignore words like and and if and and something that is just like a common English word
that really doesn't matter.
Don't include that in your counting.
We don't care about those.
We want 2000 interesting words.
And then vectorizer dot fittransform documents is the thing that is going to go ahead and do all of
this.
I should kick this off because this will take a minute.
Um, so again, this is this is, uh, nothing like the interesting the amazing stuff we did in week
five.
This is much more simplistic.
This is traditional ML bag of words is the technical name for this.
And it's a first example of natural language processing, NLP, this idea of just counting up these
words.
So it's happened.
And now we can dig in and look at our 2000 words and at some of these vectors.
Okay.
So now we're going to to take our vectorizer and we're going to ask it, what are the most popular 2000
words that you identified.
And I'm going to print how many there are and just print like randomly.
I'm going to go from number 1000 to 1020.
Let's see what they look like.
So there were indeed 2000 words found.
And just here's just some of them.
Jack jacket, Jeep jet, jigsaw joints, uh, kilohertz kickstand, kids and King.
So, so uh, again, this this one here, Jack, is number 1000.
So we're going to, we're going to have for each of our inputs, we're going to turn it into 2000 numbers.
And if the word Jack appears twice in the in the product description, I guess it's like a car Jack.
Then, uh, I don't know what it is, but whatever it is, the number two will appear at that point
in the, uh, in the in the vector that represents that particular product.
So we've turned we've, we've we've switched every product instead of just being a bunch of text.
It's now this very simplistic vector of 2000 numbers, which counts up how many times the most popular
word is there.
And we can now run linear regression.
So again we create linear regression.
And we fit all of this data to the, the prices.
Um, and uh, it ran it took a few more seconds.
There's a bit more to it.
And now we can simply run the same write a function.
Natural language linear regression processor.
And we can we can do the the turn item summary into a vector.
And as before we call regressor dot predict.
Remember with traditional with these scikit learn libraries you you create the model, you fit it given
x and the and the ground truth the y.
And then you then, uh, on the other side, when you're trying to predict, you call this model that's
been trained dot predict.
It's as simple as that.
It's like two lines of code.
And now we're going to call our evaluate function on this on natural language linear regression Pricer.
Let's see how it does.
This is traditional natural language processing NLP.
It's linear regression based on the features 2000 features which are a bag of words count of the most
popular words.
Let's see what it looks visually better.
And wow, look at that.
We're down to $76.
76.81.
This is natural language for linear regression.
And we are at 76.81.
I hope you've written that down.
That is where we are.
76.81.
Excellent.
And look at r squared creeping up now at 41.8%.
That's quite a difference from the random one.
Uh, and it looks visually you can see it's starting to look like it's like shaping this much less red.
It's looking a lot better.
That's what you get with good linear regression when it's given some interesting features, counts of
words.
And this kind of traditional, uh, NLP is this is this was a, this was what people were doing maybe
15, 20 years ago.
Okay.
It's time now for us to turn to a couple of pro ML models to, to look at what the sort of the frontier
of traditional machine learning is able to achieve.
152 - And first up on our voyage into the frontier of traditional machine learning is the one of the really
cool ones, the random forest.
Here people talk about random forests a lot.
Here it is.
And I'm going to just select a subset of the data because it's very slow.
If you want to run this with a lot of data, you can bump this number up and leave it running overnight.
It'll also hammer your computer because it really, really pounds it.
Um, and again, the way you work with these scikit learn libraries is so simple.
You just give the name of the model, you pass in the parameters it needs.
It wants to know that these things let me set this running because it takes a minute.
Uh, and then you call the model dot fit, which is where you run it.
And you can see I'm plucking out the subset of X and prices.
So what is random forest.
So it's a type of model called an ensemble, which means it's a model which itself combines many smaller
models, a super powerful technique in ML.
And in particular, each of these smaller models is something quite simplistic, which people often
say in a bit of a negative way.
It's called a decision tree, which is a type of model which is basically a bunch of if statements.
It tries to figure out, like, like I've got an example here, but like if it sees if the word TV appears
more than a certain number of times and led and HD, then let's say the price is $500.
That would be an example of like a decision tree model.
And decision tree models are often seen as a bit of like people roll their eyes, they're seen as a
sort of fake AI, not really AI, it's just a bunch of if statements.
It's just a decision tree.
Well, Random Forest isn't just one decision tree, it's tons of them.
In fact, it's 100 of them in this case.
And you can make it more, uh, and what it does is it just creates it takes a subset of your features
and a subset of your data, and it builds a decision tree off that.
And it does that 100 times and then lets them sort of be combined to come up with a best prediction
as some sort of a combination of all of these little, little decision trees.
And that produces something more powerful.
And so now, of course, you remember we've created the model, we've done model.fit, and now it's
simply model.predict to now get it to predict the, the what it should be based on a new unseen data
input.
So this is our new function, random forest.
It takes an item.
And now we can evaluate that function to see how the random forest does.
Here we go off it runs and it's complete.
And again visually it looks a bit better.
It's actually.
I glanced down at my piece of paper.
It is only slightly better than than the already very good one that we just had.
But it is better.
Random forest and we're getting to 72.28.
And that's that's getting a pretty, pretty good pretty respectable number here.
And you can see that, uh, r squared actually looks like the r squared, uh, is, uh, I mean, there's
obviously some, some noise in the r squared, but it's, it's the same, same territory, let's say
uh, and uh, but $72 an excellent result.
And obviously if you have time and you want to bump up that number 15,000, you can leave this running,
you'll get an even better number that is random forest in action.
And now we go on to the model that the cool kids use, at least the cool kids in traditional ML land
XGBoost.
It's similar to Random Forest.
It's also an ensemble and it also uses decision trees.
But.
But unlike Random Forest, Random Forest creates each of these different decision trees based on a completely.
They all run independently and it combines them in an ensemble.
XGBoost builds one tree and then it builds a second tree which corrects for errors in the first tree,
they sort of compound on top of each other using clever techniques.
Uh, that I'm not going to get bogged down on.
You can.
I'm sure ChatGPT can do a much better job than me at talking you through why it is that XGBoost does
so well, but the the real reason that it does well is that it's much, much faster.
And because it's much faster, and it's also very good at generalizing at a very quick, quick pace.
It means that that we can use the entire data set, uh, and it will run pretty quickly.
Now, this this import is the thing that imports the library.
And it might not work on all systems because it needs like a, a, um, a particular library installed
on your computer if you want to run this, if you're on a mac, you might need to run this brew install
command.
If you're on a PC and it doesn't work.
I think actually this does come with I think it's already installed on PC, so I think it will work.
But if not, honestly, this is just one quick experiment.
It's not such a big deal.
You can see me doing it.
I'm going to run the x g boost with lots of estimators, a thousand of them, and for the entire data
set.
So it's now running for everything.
Uh, and uh, it's also it's running with with four different jobs, and we will see what kind of outcome
we're able to get from the the power of XGBoost.
It finished in 15 seconds.
This again, you remember one more time the standard pattern.
We create a model.
We do the model.fit giving it x, the which is the input data and giving it y the prices.
And then when we're at inference time, we simply do the model dot predict.
And the model.predict is where we get our answer.
So there we have it.
It's time to run evaluate.
Let's see how XGBoost does.
Visually it looks even better.
And yeah, we've ticked down again.
The error is now on the piece of paper.
The error is 68.23 68.23.
There we have it.
Yeah.
Hopefully you've written more neatly than I have, but you've got yourself a nice little handwritten
list of these models.
But a picture tells a thousand words.
Look at that.
You can see visually how much better the model is doing.
R squared is creeped up as well.
It looks.
It looks really good.
It had some problems with the with the, uh, things that were actually more expensive.
Uh, but it's done.
It's done very well across the board.
XGBoost for the win.
The strongest model that we've looked at that is great.
And that is the last of the models that we're going to be running today.
Okay.
And while our official, uh, prime record, our golden source of truth for, for these experiments
is going to be that piece of paper that you've got your results scribbled on that, that, that right
there, your piece of paper that's precious to us.
Uh, I have also taken the liberty of typing this into this cell here so that we can also just visualize
right here this prediction error from each model that we've experienced so far.
I haven't included the random one because that's just too silly.
Uh, just guessing.
A constant number is 106.
Linear regression comes down here, uh, using natural language processing.
still linear regression, but passing in the 2000 vector and look, we slam down to 76.
Then random forest comes down to 72 and XGBoost is at 68.
You can see nice, uh, progress that we're making there.
And of course you can do things like experiment now.
Like, it was so much fun to experiment with linear regression.
You could experiment with turning up that countvectorizer from 2000 to vectorizing more.
Maybe.
Maybe we'll get better and better results.
You could do random forests for the whole data set and leave it overnight, and it will beat XGBoost
handily.
I'm very confident and combining all those things together, you can do pretty well with traditional
ML.
It turns out that given the words in a description and given these different models, uh, given given
their ability to find patterns in data, you can do very well, but you should be expecting we should
start to see diminishing returns because there is natural volatility in the prices of things.
Even on Amazon they change day to day.
So so it's not like you could ever know for sure what something's going to cost.
So we are expecting there is true error in the numbers themselves.
So there's only so far we can go.
But still this is our results so far.
And it looks fine.
And uh we've obviously we've still got some some room there for some improvement.
And tomorrow is when we see what it's like to start layering in, uh, neural networks and LMS into
this picture.
And, and I'm excited to show you that.
But first, back to the slides for a wrap.
Well, I had real fun with those traditional models.
I hope you did too.
I hope you're exploring some more.
You know, there's lots of others in scikit learn.
There's tons to choose from.
Support vector machines I did in the previous version of the course, and they, uh, definitely random
forest and and XGBoost do better, but but play around, see what you find.
It's it's just there's so much juice in there.
Um, obviously there's and the amazing thing is that the LMS have just been big for the last five years.
There's like 50 years of, of, uh, of of ML tradition behind it, uh, that you could dig into tons
to explore, and I, I do hope you enjoy it.
It's just create the model model.fit and then model.predict to to predict on unseen data.
Okay.
But at this point, in addition again to generating text and code, uh, with frontier models, open
source models, choosing the right LM for the task, creating Rag solutions with and without Lang chain
and evaluating them, and following a five step strategy to solve commercial problems.
Curating a data set.
Pre-processing data with the batch API.
So many things that you've picked up, you're honestly you're built all of this expertise.
And now next time you'll be able to build a vanilla neural network.
We're not going to get in tons of depth on that.
I just want to give you a flavor for it.
You'll be able to to run a business problem against a frontier model, and then compare leading models
for how good they are at solving a business task.
All of that tomorrow.
See you then.
153 - Well, it's week six, day four.
And what a day do I have in store for you today I can't wait.
As always, we have to start with with where we are.
You can generate code.
You can generate text with open and closed source models.
You can build Rag solutions and evaluate them.
And now you can follow a five step process to solve problems.
You can create a data set, and you can build a baseline model with traditional ML from linear regression
all the way through to random forests and XGBoost.
And you can visualize the results.
And you are now familiar with the y hat y chart.
What we're going to do today, we're going to build a vanilla neural network.
And we're going to do more than build it.
We're going to train it.
We're actually going to train a neural network from scratch to do this problem.
And then we're going to use a frontier model.
And then we're going to compare a bunch of frontier models against a task using our wonderful eval chart,
our y hat y.
All right, let's get to it.
But again, to give you good context for what we're doing here.
A reminder of the order of events.
What we're doing this week is all about curating data, evaluating models, and then working with frontier
models.
On the first day we did that data curation stuff, all of those charts, we made sure that we had,
uh, products with the right price that we took from a scrape of Amazon data that was on hugging face.
Then the next day, we pre-processed the data.
We sent each of the product descriptions to an LLM.
We use GPT OSS to TB to rewrite them into something short and tight and high in signal.
Then we built some baseline models a silly model that gets a random number, something that gets the
average straight line guess.
And then we used traditional machine learning.
We built a simple linear regression with some bad features.
And then we built one with with natural language processing, with some good features with common words.
And then we went to to Random Forest.
And then we used XGBoost and got some decent results today it's neural networks.
We're going to build a vanilla neural network and we're going to train it.
We're going to train a neural network and see how that performs.
And then we're going to move to frontier LMS.
And frontier LMS are of course neural networks, but using a much more complicated architecture involving
self-attention layers, part of the transformer architecture.
And you saw a glimpse of that in week three when we dug into what a model actually looks like.
So we'll move to neural networks, to frontier models and try them out.
And that really paves the way for tomorrow, when we will then fine tune frontier Model next week.
Of course, we're fine tuning an open source model and then we're going to bring it all together.
We're going to add in rag Agentic and have a great finale.
That's the plan.
And I now want to do a little bit on training models.
And I want to emphasize that next week is when we really get into this.
And so I want you to consider this a preview.
This is a teaser.
You are not expected to understand all of this.
Maybe you already know about all this.
In which case you could just rush me along, put me on two acts.
But if you are new to training, if you've never trained a model before, consider this.
Just give you some, get you some some intuition for some of the terminology, some of what we're going
to be doing because we're going to use training now with a vanilla neural network.
Just so we've had our first experiment with it.
So what is training?
Again I expect by this point this is pretty clear to you.
But training is saying, okay, we've got a machine learning model.
It contains within it parameters.
These parameters decide how it's going to make a prediction based on some inputs.
And traditional ML.
You have typically like 2 to 20 of these parameters with modern with deep learning deep neural networks.
Llms you have millions or even billions, sometimes trillions of these parameters, and the parameters
are tweaked during training so that it gets better and better at predicting the outputs given the The
inputs.
But it's not just about predicting the outputs in the training data, it's about doing it in a way that
should generalize so that not only is it able to predict outputs, but then after training at inference
time when it's given some new input, it still does well on that too.
And the way that you go about training should lend itself.
It should encourage this ability for the model to generalize, because it's seeing general patterns
in the data, rather than overly solving for exactly what the input is.
And that would result in in overfitting.
Okay.
Hopefully that's that's clear.
So when you actually go about training, you do it by carrying out four different steps.
And you do these four steps many, many times over with little, little bits of data, you could do
it one data point at a time, but typically you group your data into chunks called batches.
And then for each batch you go through these four steps.
So what are the four steps in training?
They go by by some names.
I'm going to throw some terminology at you.
And later on in the course we will get more into what they all mean.
The first of the four steps is called the forward pass, and it's a fancy name for something very simple,
which is you're given some inputs in your training data and you simply calculate, you go through your
neural network to say what is the prediction given these inputs.
That's known as the forward pass.
And the second step is then known as the loss calculation.
And this is when you've got this prediction.
But because it's the training data you also have the ground truth.
This is y hat.
You also have y given to you.
And you can say how different are these.
How wrong was I.
How badly did I do.
And that is known as the loss.
And that is the second key step in training.
And the third step is known as the backward pass.
And the backward pass is saying, okay, now that we've got this loss, it came out of doing the forward
pass.
We got a loss at the end of it.
What we're now going to do is work our way back through the neural network and figure out if we twiddle
each of the parameters by a little bit.
Does it make the loss bigger or smaller?
Does it improve the situation or make it worse?
And doing that is also called calculating the gradients.
It probably sounds it sounds a little bit familiar to you.
It should have slight shades of calculus from high school math.
And it is.
It's some calculus calculations that happen to figure out how sensitive is each parameter, or how sensitive
is the loss to changing each parameter in turn, calculating that for the whole neural network.
And then the fourth step when you've done that is called optimization.
It's about taking a small step in the direction, changing each of the parameters by a tiny amount,
so that you're now going to do a little bit better next time you change it in the direction that would
make loss lower.
And that that also known as stochastic gradient descent.
At least that's one of the ways that you can do it.
One of the simplest ways is about making this small step in a direction that is going to make your loss
smaller if you get the same inputs again.
That's the idea.
These four steps forward pass loss calculation, backward pass optimization.
And you do this for each of your little chunks of data, your batches again and again and again.
And every time you do it, you're just tweaking all the weights in your neural network so that next
time it's going to do a little bit better.
And if you knew this already, you probably know that I'm oversimplifying here and there.
But the idea is just to give you a general sense of this.
And you might be thinking, I don't even know what a neural network is, let alone what what these these
steps mean.
In which case, don't worry about it.
We'll do more over time.
The idea this is a practical course.
First and foremost we're going to be doing stuff.
And I'm hoping that that some of this kind of theory will, will rub off on you as you go.
That's the way that I like to learn things.
I like to learn things by doing, and then by picking stuff up like this and just getting a little,
a little tease of theory from time to time.
And that's what this is.
So the reason I show you these four steps is that we are going to go into some code and train a neural
network, and you're going to see these four steps.
And it's one line of code literally for each of the four steps.
It's that simple.
So you now know what to expect.
And one final point to make about this is that there are some settings that relate to to the whole setup
of your, your training or of your neural network that aren't parameters in the model that get tweaked
as part of training.
They're just overall settings that control everything you're doing.
One of them, for example, is the size of these batches.
I mentioned that your data is is chunked into these batches.
How many bits of data go in each batch is one of these like it's like a parameter, but it's not one
of the parameters that gets tweaked.
And these kinds of parameters that aren't aren't real model parameters.
They're just sort of extra parameters.
They are called the hyperparameters.
They're kind of general.
They affect everything, the hyperparameters.
And I mentioned that word before in the context of something called hyperparameter optimization.
And that is taking some of these hyperparameters.
And I mentioned a couple here.
Epoch and learning rate.
Epoch is how many times you go through your entire data set.
Because typically you don't you don't just go through all of your data once during training, you do
it another another couple of times, sometimes like 10 or 20 times, to see if you get more and more
benefit each time you do it.
Uh, so epoch is another hyperparameter.
How many epochs learning rate, which is, uh, how much, uh how much is that tiny step when you make
that tiny step in optimization, how big is that step?
You can make it really, really, really tiny.
Or you can make it, you know, a little bit bigger.
And there are tricks to doing things like starting with quite big steps and gradually reducing them,
uh, so that so that you start to take a finer and finer steps.
So changing all of these epoch and learning rates is called hyperparameter optimization because you
are optimizing your hyperparameters.
And that sounds like like super high tech hyper parameter optimization.
Uh, and uh, yeah, it's basically, uh, a way of experimenting in order to get the best set of hyper
parameters that gets you the best results.
And the point is that the way that everybody does this essentially is trial and error, that people
come up with lots of fancy approaches for, for searching through all the possible values.
But at the end of the day, it is just trial and error.
And so when you hear a data scientist telling you that they're very busy because they're doing hyper
parameter optimization, you know that it's just fancy talk for they're just doing trial and error.
They're like, oh, let's try this batch size and this batch size and see what happens.
And so that's it.
That's hyper parameters.
That's hyper parameter optimization.
Try saying that three times.
And uh we are going to do some of that in just a moment.
And with that let's go do it.
Let's go to let's go to the frontier.
Let's see how different models can perform with our problem of predicting product prices.
Let's go.
154 - Okay, here we are in Cursa.
Let's go to week six.
Let's go to day four.
It's already day four.
Here we have it.
Ah, the price is right.
Capstone project.
Uh, order of play.
We're in, uh, day four, deep learning and al Alam's.
Check this out.
We've got a bunch of different imports here, and you can see some exciting stuff.
There's an import torch.
We're going to be using PyTorch.
Uh, and uh, so today is going to get get quite juicy.
Uh hang on I'm going to clear all that.
But so we're starting from scratch okay.
So again as before you can choose the light mode to be false or true.
I recommend you start with true.
We've got a lot more on our plates today, uh, when we do some training.
But I'm going to do false I'm going to go with a full big 800,000 data points.
Remember to ignore this note here.
It's not important.
We've logged into hugging face.
And we're now going to load in the, uh, the full data set.
Um, and you will presumably be loading in the light data set at this point.
Let's let's have it load right here.
Okay, so while that's happening, let me introduce you to the next section.
The next section is a bit of a surprise for you.
A little surprise which you may not have been expecting.
Um, so, uh, we're about to launch into artificial neural networks when we compare, uh, how a neural
network works against traditional machine learning.
And it occurred to me that before we do that, there is another kind of neural network that we might
want to to put to the test first before we see how artificial neural networks perform on this, it seems
like it would be a good idea to put a distinctly less artificial neural network to the test.
We should see how humans perform on this task.
I've been telling you that it's a difficult task.
It's not as easy as you might think to guess the price of a product.
And and, you know, it's easy for me to just say that, but we don't know for sure unless we try.
So it seemed to me that the sensible thing to do would be for me to go out and canvass a group of people,
to take some descriptions of products and estimate how much it would cost based just on the description
of the product.
Uh, and so I went out to do that, and I quickly discovered that no human, no human is willing to
put themselves through the indignity of coming up with prices of products based on the description,
at least no human.
That's, uh, that's a good enough friend of mine to do it.
Uh, and so eventually, after a lot of time, I managed to find one human that was willing to to put
put themselves through this, uh, and that one human, of course, is me.
Uh, no one else would do it.
I had to do it.
Um, and and so.
So first of all, you should please, uh, uh, pre pre-work.
You should get your piece of paper and pen that you that we did before with the model so far.
We need to have that we're going to be able to add a human, uh, one particular human onto this list
to see what this task is like.
So the first thing I did was, was I wrote a little bit of code that takes the first 100 test items.
I maybe I should do 200 to be consistent with everything else.
But I gotta tell you, this almost killed me.
100 was the most I was willing to do.
If you if you were willing to do 200 yourself and put yourself through the human challenge, then by
all means do it.
So I wrote a CSV file out called Human Human in CSV.
And this is if we open this up, it looks like this.
It's just a set of descriptions in a comma delimited file that you can then load into something like
Microsoft Excel or Google Sheets and use that as, as a way to, um, sorry, as a way to, to have
a file that you can then populate, go through and populate your guess as to the price of that product.
And I encourage you to do it, but I certainly won't force you to do it.
And I will now read in what I put in there.
Uh, so I put myself through it.
It took me ages.
It's much harder than it sounds.
It's much harder.
And I should reveal that I did this a year ago.
And when I did it a year ago, I did it to the full.
I guess I think it was 250 products I did it to.
And, and I can tell you that my score has improved year on year.
Uh, but, uh, let's without I won't give the game away.
You know, you can give a guess.
Where do you think I do?
How far off am I going to be?
And and where will I compare to just, uh, like a regression models and traditional ML.
And then we'll see whether or not I can be beaten by by deep neural networks.
Uh, so I've got this a function, human pricer a function just like our other functions.
And what it does is it looks up the index of the item that's passed in, and then it looks that up in
the CSV file that I've just written out, you see.
So it's just basically doing just a lookup.
That's it.
And as a result, uh, we'll be able to see our results side by side.
And let's first just take a look at the first test item.
Let's see what I said.
And we'll print the actual price.
And then what this human predicted for the price.
The actual price I predicted $120 and it actually cost $219.
This does not bode well.
And well, without further ado, let's run it.
I've got size equals equals 100.
Sorry.
Get rid of that.
I've got size equals 100.
We're going to call it evaluate just as before.
Let's see what happens.
Here we go.
Here are the results.
Uh, make this a bit smaller.
Um yeah.
I mean, it's pretty hopeless.
It's pretty hopeless, I'm afraid.
I let the team down.
I let down Team Human.
I did a horrible job.
I was off on average by $87.
So, uh, take out your piece of paper and put human or editor, because maybe you can do better.
We better put editor down representing humanity.
I scored $87.62.
That was how wrong I was.
And if we compare that, that means that, okay, I beat random numbers.
Uh, and I did beat just guessing the average, uh, and, uh, I did just beat linear regression,
just the traditional linear regression.
But I was beaten by natural language linear regression, which was 76.8 Eight, beaten handily by Random
Forest and obviously easily by XGBoost, which is kind of embarrassing that like a traditional machine
learning would be better than than me.
I would love to hear if anyone no one has yet taken me up on this.
Let me tell you.
But if anyone feels like they would be willing to go through and try it out, then I would love to hear
whether it's just me that's hopeless or not, but one that I do want to tell you.
I want to tell you that when I did this last year, my error was, I think 126.
So, so disappointing and terrible, though this, this, this score is I've at least improved.
I've learned something over the year.
I'm slightly better at guessing the price of something based on the description.
But also what you'll notice here is that I get a very slight r squared.
I'm slightly more useful than just getting the average.
And again, I want to tell you that when I did this last year, embarrassingly, humiliatingly, I scored
a negative r squared.
Which means that if you went shopping with me and you saw something like, oh, I'm interested in getting
that, you'd be better off guessing the average than asking me to try and say how much that costs.
I would be worse than just guessing the average as of last year, but this year it's a new me.
I've learned something.
I am just slightly better than guessing the average, and I should mention that it is in fact a different
test set than it was last year.
If you were just thinking, but you already had this like a second shot at the same thing, it was different.
Different test and I did better.
You can see some of the things that I really flubbed by looking over here.
Canon EOS rebel.
So oh wow, I see, I see I thought that would cost $400.
Uh, that's like a, I guess a DSLR, like a really pro camera.
And it actually costs $800.
And I thought 400, I don't know.
Uh, uh, there we go, there we go.
You can hover over and see the, the despicable, uh, guesses that I made.
Okay.
That's it.
That's our human.
That's where the bar is set.
And in all seriousness, this was a bit of silliness, but it is actually a good practice to understand
what is human level performance so that you can see how models compare.
It's now time for us to look at our first neural network.
155 - So obviously we're not going to go deep into vanilla neural networks because that's not what this course
is about.
It's about LMS.
But we do this as a way of having our first look at training a model and our first look at, um, uh,
operating neural networks before we do proper training next week.
And of course, we've done some training already because we trained some traditional models before,
like like linear regression.
But now we're going to train a neural network.
So the first thing we do is we take our training data, and we are going to, to take, uh, the price
of every item, make it into a numpy array and call that y, which is what you normally call your your
ground truth, your results.
And I'm going to make a file called documents, which is going to be all of the summaries of all of
the items.
So we've now got documents and y okay.
So we're going to use the Countvectorizer again to make a vector of uh, each of the, each of our documents,
a vector that is just composed of numbers to represent whether or not the product is in there.
I'm not going to use the Countvectorizer actually, even though it says they're using them.
Let me change that using the hashing Vectorizer hashing Vectorizer is the same as the Countvectorizer.
It's just more efficient.
It's much faster.
And uh, you might say, then why, why, why would you?
Why don't you always use the hashing vectorizer?
The the only disadvantage is that the hashing vectorizer it can't tell you which words it's selected.
It turns everything into hashes and everything is done with just numbers instead.
Uh, and you can't go back.
You can't see what were the English words that were picked.
And before I wanted to show you what the actual English words were.
So now we don't need to know that anymore.
We trust it to be picking the most popular words.
And we'll use the hashing vectorizer, which is faster.
And we're going to use 5000 words, not 2000, so that we've got a bigger vocabulary.
And also I've got this here.
This binary equals true.
Binary equals true means don't count the number of times that a word like luxury or Samsung or whatever
appears in there rather just have zero if it's not there, and one if it's there any number of times.
And it's traditional to use this sort of binary 0 or 1 when you're working with with neural networks
that are obviously there are pros and cons you can experiment with both.
I did it with a smaller version of this, and the binary is true was just slightly better.
And generally speaking it's considered uh, more, more common practice to, to to use binary like this.
It's sometimes called a one hot vector.
When you have a vector which just contains zeros or ones, depending on whether that that is present
or not present.
Okay.
And so then we do this Vectorizer Fittransform.
And that's the thing which is going to go through now.
And it's going to come up with it's going to replace every document with something which has, uh,
five, 5000 different zeros or ones relating to the 5000 most popular words.
So it's what we did before with linear regression.
It's run much faster now.
And we've got 5000 of them.
Okay.
Time to unveil a neural network.
So here it is.
Here is our neural network.
It's a class that is a subclass of of a PyTorch class called module.
And this is the whole extent of it.
You might be thinking, wow, there must be a lot of engineering to build a neural network.
PyTorch makes this stuff unbelievably easy.
This is an eight layer neural network, which is just something that I've constructed.
Uh, eight layers, I think.
There's no there's no fixed definition to what makes a neural network become a deep neural network.
Deep neural network means there's many layers, but there's not much of a definition for what makes
it deep.
Uh, eight layers is probably not enough to be deep.
You could say it's deep.
Like.
Like you could say anything more than a few layers is deep, but probably eight layers is still just
a shallow or just a neural network.
Um, so that's what we've got here.
Eight layers.
And now I'm not going to go into how these layers are made up.
But for people that know that already experienced with this, they're basically linear layers with a
ReLU activation function after each one.
And that's the set up all of your layers in the constructor in the init function, and then you have
this one function forward.
You may remember that word because it's what we call the forward pass the working through the model
to get the output.
And that simply gets output of each layer of the neural network by calling the previous layer and then
putting it through a ReLU activation.
Do that eight times.
Out comes the output.
If you don't know about this, it doesn't matter.
The idea is to get some intuition.
We have something that is that is eight layers of calculation.
Each of these calculations are like lots of little linear regressions, lots of Little Mix's.
If you've seen my YouTube video, eight layers of them and out comes the output at the end of it.
That is it.
We have just defined our own neural network.
It's very vanilla.
You call this a vanilla neural network?
There's nothing too fancy really straight out of the box.
And the big the sort of the big thing, the important thing about building neural networks like this
is that you don't particularly engineer features.
You don't give it anything specific to work with you let it through.
All of its parameters work out itself.
What matters through training?
Okay.
Uh, and so now I've got some stuff that turns our our numpy arrays into PyTorch tensors, which is
the PyTorch object that it can work with.
And I break it up into a training and validation set within the the training data and get everything
ready.
And then I have something called the data loader I'm using from PyTorch, which is where you can specify
a batch which is a batch of 64 data points.
We're going to clump everything into.
And we put that into this train loader thing.
And then this final line here model equals neural network input size.
That is when we create our neural network.
This is going to take a really long time.
It doesn't take any time at all.
It's going to be done in a matter of seconds.
And we will have our very own neural network.
And I'm going to then print out how many parameters do we have in this homemade neural network.
So it's taking longer than I thought because it's loading in all of the PyTorch classes.
There we go.
18 seconds.
So it wasn't that quick.
Uh, let's print it out.
The number of parameters in this model is 669,000 parameters.
So it's not many parameters by like, like LM standards.
But when you think of traditional ML, like the several hundred parameters at the most, this is a pretty
enormous thing.
All right.
It's time for us to do some training.
You ready for training?
Okay, here we go.
I'm going to kick off the training.
And while it's running, I'm going to talk to you about what it does.
Off it goes.
It's it's off.
So you specify how will we calculate the loss.
Remember the loss is this important thing.
We're going to use the mean squared error I think I told you before that that while we look at absolute
error is the number we're focusing on because it's so tangible, so concrete.
It's common in data science to use mean squared error.
And we have this optimizer is how will it do its step.
I mentioned stochastic gradient descent.
This is a slightly more more advanced type of optimizer.
This thing here is the learning rate.
That's the other hyperparameter which is the small step.
again.
You don't need to remember any of this.
This is just to give you some intuition.
Okay.
Two epochs I mentioned.
Epoch is a hyperparameter.
It's how many times do we go through the entire data.
So for epoch in range.
So so we're going to do all of this twice uh go through all of our batches.
And then there are four lines of code.
And these four lines of code represent the four steps in training.
Hopefully you kept that noted down somewhere.
You remember the four steps.
What were they?
The first step.
The first step is doing the forward pass.
And this is the expression outputs equals model pass in the batch x.
And that's going to give you some outputs.
That's going to go through this forward pass here.
It's going to do all of that.
Okay.
So that's the first step.
The second step calculate the loss call the loss function with the outputs and with the true the batch
y which is the actual price of these items.
Loss dot backward is when you go back through the whole network and calculate the gradients, all of
these parameters.
How much would the loss change if we tweaked each of them by a little amount?
And then optimizer.step is when we then take a tiny step by this much 0.001 of a step in the direction,
that would make loss a little bit lower.
Why don't we take a massive great step?
Because if we did that, we might overfit or we might go too far.
There's lots of things that could go wrong.
You just want to make a tiny step each time.
And that ends up usually generalizing really nicely.
And then we'll do some printing.
And it's just completed.
It's done.
We just trained our own neural network.
And you could be running this too.
You'd have done it as well.
Congratulations.
And now it remains for us to actually run this thing.
Inference.
Which is super easy.
Here it is.
This this is our neural network inference.
We tell it that we're not training.
We tell it.
You're in.
You're not in training mode anymore.
And then we take in an item.
We turn it back into its vector of 5000 zeros or ones, and then we turn it into a to a PyTorch object.
And we just call our model with this object.
And that's the result.
That's that's it.
That's going to run our neural network.
Let's see the results okay.
Here we have it.
Here is a a artificial neural network an eight layer vanilla neural network.
Super simple without us doing hardly anything at all.
It ran super fast.
And the results we got are our best results so far, by quite a way.
Write it down.
A vanilla neural network got 63.97.
That is pretty cool.
And R-squared look has just crossed crossed the 50% mark.
We're doing pretty well visually.
It looks great.
It looks really good.
Uh, we've made tons of progress.
That's so cool.
And hopefully, uh, you've got some intuition for some of what's going on.
You don't need to understand it all, but you've got a decent sense that it's really quite easy to set
up a vanilla neural network and train it and get pretty good results, just like that.
Nice.
Okay, now it's time for us to to move on to LMS.
I'll see you in the next video.
156 - So you already have some intuition for how and how we go from a neural network into an LLM, because
we we pointed out the model in week three and we saw that it's it's basically something which which
has many layers.
And it's a bit like the vanilla neural network we just built, except it's got more sophisticated layers
that do things like attention, figuring out which part of the layer above matter.
It's got lots of stuff to do with things like embeddings at the top, which is basically vector embeddings.
The same thing we use for Rag is like the first layer of one of these llms.
You've got the attention layers, and then you've got lots of other stuff to make it be really good
at generalizing.
That's all built into the neural network architecture called the transformer, which is a good deal
more sophisticated than this, this simplistic thing we have right here.
I mean, it's not like hugely more sophisticated, but it's a it's a fair bit more.
And of course it's they're much, much bigger.
They have they have billions or trillions of parameters, not a few hundred thousand.
So that is what we're going to do next.
We're going to go and extend this to look at a real LM and try and run the same analysis with that.
But the key difference is that we're not going to be training anything.
We're just going to be taking an LM off the shelf and saying without any training, any extra training,
just using your base training, the world knowledge you already have as part of the $100 million that
OpenAI spent on you, how good can you do at this task?
So this is saying off the shelf, LM no fine tuning.
How can it perform on this task?
Let's see.
Okay, so here we go to the frontier.
We're going to see how frontier models do out of the box.
No training just inference just using their world knowledge okay.
So first up let's let's write a little function that if it's given an item it will come up with a prompt
to the LM.
And the prompt we'll use here is guess the price of this product.
Respond with the price.
No explanation.
Uh, maybe I'll make that estimate rather than guess that might do better.
Uh, there's definitely mileage to be had by experimenting with this prompt and crafting it to be just
right for each model.
I've just come up with something quick here.
If you want to spend some time experimenting with this and see if you can do better, that would be
really great.
And students have done this and have got better outcomes by giving it some sort of some smarts, some
context here.
Uh, and one thing I would suggest is that I think that that even though all of the test data is priced
between 0 and $1000, I don't think we should limit it and say that nothing costs more than $1,000,
because we do want this to to represent being able to price anything.
It's just that we've constrained our training data, but we want to have the general expertise to be
able to price anything.
So that's a subtle point.
But apart from that, we can we can run this.
So now if I look at the first of our test items, let's look at its summary.
Um, this oh let's print that.
So we get to see it properly.
See what this is.
This looks like something quite interesting.
Uh, so it's actually, it's it's a guitar pedal.
A pedal that you use to distort the sound if you're playing an electric guitar and, uh, it's, uh,
called an excess V2 distortion modulation pedal.
The brand, the makers of it is a brand called Old Blood Noise.
I'm.
If you're a guitar player, you might know if that's a great brand or not.
You feel free to comment.
Um, and it's got a description about it.
So this is what we need to price.
So if we if we look at what is the messages that we get for that, we get of course a list of dictionaries.
Just one dictionary role is user.
The content is estimate the price of this product, respond with the price.
No explanation.
And there's the details of it.
So we can now write a function called like GPT 41 nano.
So it's a function like the functions we wrote before that do that, make a prediction.
And we're going to run this through our evaluator.
But instead of just calling a model or doing doing, guessing the average or whatever, what this does
is it calls an LM.
It makes an API call.
I'm using light LM.
You could of course, instead use OpenAI create.
We're going to go with the model GPT 4.1 nano.
And you might be wondering why why that when when there's there's five one already.
And maybe for you there's GPT six or GPT seven.
But for me there's five one I'm picking GPT four one because I want something very fast which which
it is.
And also because when we get to fine tuning, we're going to want quite a cheap model to start with.
And this is a good candidate for fine tuning.
And we want to compare it with this.
So that is our function which works out the, the uh, the value of uh of this.
And now let's run it for the first test item.
And we get back $180 is it's guess what was the actual cost of this.
Let's see $219.
So GPT four one nano isn't far off.
Okay.
That's exciting.
Let's now run the full evaluation.
Let's see what happens.
Off it goes.
You can see it's running where you see results.
You see them in green, yellow or red.
If you get a rate limit error when you run this, then remember that you can always change this to um
uh workers equals one or workers equals two to stop it doing things in parallel if you get rate limit
errors.
And here's the results, you're probably already seeing it ahead of me.
This is the chart 62.51 62.51 is what we get from GPT 4.1 nano.
Write that down 62.51 uh and a ticking up R squared.
And here it looks visually look it gave a lot of things this this number it guessed quite often $150.
Exactly for lots of stuff.
Uh, and it thought something's a steering wheel, it thought would be 1200.
So, look, you might feel like $62 isn't isn't what you were hoping for.
It might sound sound quite high to you.
It did, of course, beat our vanilla neural network, but only slightly.
Only by $1.
But here's the thing.
The vanilla neural network is something that we trained with 400 with 400 with 800,000 data points.
So it was something that we really trained to be good at this task with tons of data.
This is GPT four one nano out of the box.
No training, nothing.
Just using its world knowledge, using common sense, not using trained model.
And it's already superior to a trained neural network which has been given product prices.
And it's clearly significantly superior to a human level performance, which was a miserable $87.62.
So I would say this is actually a pretty good result, pretty respectable going by GPT 41 nano.
Okay, so what we're now going to do is just do this again for lots of models and lots of pricey models
too.
But you don't need to because I've done it.
You can you can take take all of the glory of my results without having to run it yourself.
But if you wish to, you can do so.
even with the expensive models, it's not particularly expensive because these are very, very small
tasks.
And the you can also, instead of having size be 200 points, you can make it just be ten points and
then it's insanely cheap.
It's not.
It's off the radar.
So we're going to try Claude opus 4.5, which as of right now for me is the most powerful model from
anthropic and arguably one of the most the most powerful model on the planet.
But everyone seems to disagree on this one how it rates compared with GPT five one and Gemini three,
which are the big, big ones for me right now.
I'm sure every week something new happens.
So no doubt you are many, many steps ahead of me and you should try it for the latest models, of course.
So this is where we can evaluate Claude for opus, I want to remind you, you can say size equals and
make this like ten.
If you want to limit it, you'll get bigger error bars.
But that's fine.
And you can also say workers equals one.
If you haven't subscribed to one of the if you haven't paid to be on one of the higher tiers.
Um, then I will kick this off.
And off it goes.
It's going to be a little bit slower because this is a bigger model, but it is working at it.
And yeah, just to clarify there, when I said if you haven't paid to be on the higher tiers, you may
wonder what I'm talking about.
The way that these, these frontier providers typically work is that depending on how much money you
have spent in total on their API, they move you to a different tier and you can look up their rate
limits.
There's tables where they'll show you what are the different tiers, how much must you have spent to
be in that tier?
And at higher tiers you're able to to spend more and to have more things running in parallel.
And the reason that they do this is, is to try and encourage you to spend more money.
Well, maybe it is, but at least on the face of it, the reason they do it is because they just want
to make sure that that you really do intend to spend this much money.
They want to make sure that only people who are more professional get to spend, uh, get to do things
like lots in parallel to avoid someone spending more than they meant to, and to avoid people getting
in trouble with APIs and so on.
So I'm sure there's lots of reasons for it, but that at least is one of them that they want to make
sure that you've got a track record of spending this.
It's what you like to do before they say, okay, you can move to a higher tier rate limit.
We trust that you know what you're doing, that you intend to spend this much and that you're not going
to get caught off guard.
So that's that's the theory behind it.
Uh, and, uh, it's allowed me to prattle away about that while while, uh, Claude, opus 4.5 finishes
off, uh, if you ever want to move to a higher tier with OpenAI or anthropic, just look at the rate
limit section on their website.
It makes it super clear what's needed.
Bam!
Here are our results.
Opus 4.5 scores $47.10 47.10.
That is pretty remarkable.
Claude 4.7.
That's called 4.7.
Claude 4.5.
Scores 47.10.
And for people that took my course last year, you will know that this was the number that I got to
as the very best.
Like this was this was the sort of the incredible finale moment.
So Claude, opus 45, has already beaten last year's absolute best, best, best.
Uh, and here we have it.
And, you know, if you're thinking to yourself, guessing the price of a product and being off, on
average by $47, that doesn't sound so impressive.
Then I challenge you.
Go try it yourself.
Go, go do that and I'll wipe that smile off your face.
It's much harder than you expect.
Much harder.
Uh uh, you can you can message me and say, no, you're wrong.
I was within $3.
But but but I don't believe it.
Uh uh.
So, Claude, opus 45.
Uh, really?
Stonkingly good results here.
$47.
Fantastic to see this.
Congratulations to anthropic.
Congratulations.
47 is now our running best.
And we can see.
Of course, we should always be disciplined and realize there is an error bar associated with this,
but still terrific result.
157 - Okay, it's time for Gemini three, which as of this time is considered most epic in artificial analysis.
This is the number one smartest model as of right now.
For me.
Again, this is this is more pricey and it's slower.
So only run this if you wish to.
I'm I've got here size is 20 and I had to put workers down to two.
Otherwise I was getting, uh errors.
So we're only going to run 20 data points.
Oh, I suppose this is the real one.
Let's make it 50.
Uh, and I'll go off and get a coffee and come back.
We'll set this running.
We'll get 50 results so we can see how Gemini fares.
And I will put you, uh, on, on, on hold because this is going to take you can see it's just done
one and it took ages.
Uh, but it did quite well.
Uh, but we will see the results in a second.
Okay.
So running it with 50 items took five minutes.
So it wasn't exactly zippy.
But here are our results.
Gemini three Pro Preview scores a very decent number.
$50.
Not as good as Claude 4.5.
Gemini three Pro gets 50.54.
Uh, and a very high R squared there.
What was the R squared from?
From Claude again.
Let's have a look.
Uh, that's interesting, isn't it, that the r squared is slightly higher?
Uh, not slightly.
Quite a lot higher.
Just just meaning that it did a better job of getting the sort of trends right.
But the main number we're looking at is the absolute error.
Gemini three scored close to Claude, but not as good as Claude at its knowledge of estimating the price
of a product based only on its description.
And I've also got Gemini two five flash.
Um, there's this flash.
There's also actually what we might do is do flash lights because that's really fast.
And that will give us a nice way of doing it.
Let's see what happens here.
Oh, and now change this to flash lights.
Uh, and let's see what we get.
Hang on, uh, from this light, simple, powerful model from Gemini.
It's nice and quick.
Look at that.
Uh, and it can run in parallel.
They don't have such strict rate limits.
Slamming through our 200.
See how flash light does.
And here's the results 58.68.
Pretty respectable.
Better than GPT four one nano, only slightly better.
But that is possibly.
It's, uh, it's it's, um, its rival in this field.
Gemini 2.5 flash scored 58.68.
Uh, so so far are by far our winner right now is Claude 4.5.
What else?
How about Grock 4.1?
The latest model for me from Mr. Musk.
Uh, maybe you might have a newer version of Grock again.
I'm using, uh, I'm going through light.
LM I've already set up a grock key, which I've got in my Em file as Xai API key, which is what you
need to have to be able to run this.
I'm using grok for one fast non reasoning, and I'm going to run that in this function.
And we'll see how that does in a second.
Here we go.
Run that function.
And now it evaluates off.
It goes nice and fast.
So again as always the evaluate function you pass in a function to be tested.
And it goes through each of these test points.
It calls this function each item in turn.
And it's up to our implementation of this function to decide what it is that's getting tested.
I don't know if you noticed, but also I've got some some cunning code there that gives the heading
of the chart based on the name of the function, so that it calls it grok 4.1 fast.
And it took that from the name of the function.
So here are the results.
Uh, 57.
Uh, so grok, Mr. Musk, uh, when it comes to, to uh, he doesn't do as well as the, as the big
frontier models.
But this is the fast version of grok 4.1, and it does just slightly better than Gemini 2.5 flash with
7.62.
Okay.
And finally, GPT 5.1, the full big version reasoning effort as none.
You can choose reasoning effort.
None.
Minimal, low and high.
And actually I found that none did best in this in my pre-testing.
So giving it the opportunity to reason didn't actually help it.
It made it make make mistakes.
So it does best with none.
And with that, we can kick this off.
Uh, and I think it's going to be super close whether how this competes with Claude 4.7.
So this is this is a battle of the Titans.
Uh, Claude.
Claude 4.7.
Claude 4.5, which scored 47, uh, against GPT 5.1, which for me is OpenAI's strongest model at the
current time.
This is the battle of the Titans, these two very strong models.
We are going to find out which one takes the prize for today when this line gets to the end coming right
up now.
And the answer is GPT 5.1.
Wow.
With a really staggering result there 44.74 that's that is remarkable.
This is the result really really fantastic outcome here.
It's done very, very well.
The um yeah.
The the um, I mean, the visualization speaks for itself.
You can see that GPT five one, um, which is in many, in many places considered the most powerful
model on the planet right now, just without any training, just off the shelf, it is able to get within
$44.74 of guessing the value of a product based on its description, which is significantly better than
the best of any of my models, including everything last year.
So it's it's really staggering to see how far we've come.
This is a fabulous result and a fitting way to wrap up our model research for today, but you can keep
going.
Explore other models.
Whatever you have access to, you can use Olama to run models locally.
They don't tend to do so well, but you can do that and see what you get.
Experiment with some local models with this, um, experiment I ran it with with with OSS and I got
quite a high number like it was 100 and something, actually, uh, but you could try it with some yourself
with free models.
You can also, if you have access to open router, you can try out a ton of different models on open
router.
It's great fun.
Uh, figure out find your own leaderboard, see if you can beat 44.74.
Also, experiment with prompting.
It's a very powerful way to improve on this number.
Enjoy the experience.
See how good you can get and do.
Share any screens that you reach.
Any, any, any opportunity that you have to beat my numbers and I will I will see you for the wrap
up.
Okay.
And for the wrap, let me just start by bringing back up the the latest, the leaderboard, the results
so far.
You'll remember we didn't even show the random guess on here.
It was 300 and 300 something constant got us an ERA of 106.
Linear regression brought it down to 102, but only slightly better than constant.
But when we added in NLP with linear regression the bag of words, we came all the way down to 77.
Random forest did a bit better even with a small data set.
XGBoost did better again with the full data set.
Super fast human level performance in the form of Ed, uh, did miserably.
Uh, 8788 um, but, uh, the vanilla neural network came in and did great at 64.
The really impressive GPT four one nano, though, without any training at all.
This was trained on 800,000 examples.
Uh, but the GPT four one nano out of the box, based on its general expertise from all of the training
it's been through, it's able to to write poetry.
It's able to write, write a marketing emails, it's able to translate languages.
And guess what?
It's also able to predict product prices to within $63 for one.
Fast does a bit better.
Gemini three Pro does better again at 50.54.
And of course, there's fairly big error bars on this because we had a small 50 data points here.
But I'm not showing the error bars which is which isn't very disciplined of me.
But you can add that in if you wish.
And Claude 45 sonnet blew me away with terrific results at $47, better than anything I did last year.
But GPT five one stole the show.
Best results of the lot 44.7.
Actually, I did just rerun this now with reasoning at high, and I got basically the same number,
so it didn't do worse, but it also didn't do better.
So 44.7, uh, that is the leader on the leaderboard.
That is GPT 51, without any training, without any fine tuning based only on its pre-training, it's
already able to guess the price of a product to within $44.74.
Very nice.
Okay.
And finally, finally, after all this talk, we're actually going to get to do some some fine tuning
next time.
And, uh, yeah, I've been giving you a couple of hints that, uh, all may not go according to plan.
So as long as you're mentally prepared for that, then as a recap, you can already run open source
closed source models.
You can do prompt caching, you can do little alarm, uh, you can create advanced Rag solutions with
lang chain, including evals and without lang chain.
And you can follow a five step strategy.
You can curate data, you can make a baseline model with traditional ML.
And now you can throw deep learning in there, at least somewhat deep learning.
You can you can work with deep neural networks with with eight layers.
And you can just add in more layers if you wish.
And you can make a frontier solution to a business problem, as we just have.
Next time you're going to know how to fine tune a frontier model, create the fine tuning data set and
then test a fine tuned model.
Very exciting stuff.
It's a real pro move and it's all happening tomorrow.
I'll see you then.
158 - Welcome to week six.
Day five.
Welcome, finally, to fine tuning a frontier model.
Now look, I've had this image up on this slide for the start of every day this week with Laura strapped
around her brain.
And you've probably been thinking, What is Laura?
When is that going to explain what Laura is and how that's related to fine tuning?
And, well, the answer is I'm going to actually be really explaining that next week, which is when
we fine tune an open source model and we roll up our sleeves and we get to the guts of a model and fine
tuning and building these things called Laura matrices and target modules and all sorts of stuff.
But, but with with fine tuning a frontier model, you're really just making API calls to tell OpenAI,
hey, I'd like you to fine tune this.
You don't really get to get into the guts of doing the training yourself, and it's generally understood
that OpenAI uses this technique called Laura themselves when you call them to do this fine tuning.
But they don't reveal that particularly.
And they don't they don't announce how they do fine tuning.
So we're not actually going to be looking at the guts of Laura today.
We're just going to be trusting that that's what's happening.
And that's why I'm not going to explain.
I'm not going to tell you that Laura stands for low rank adapters, because you don't need to know that.
I didn't just say that, but we're going to do that next week.
And for now, just know that we've got Laura strapped onto this brain in the OpenAI cloud.
Okay, so with that already, of course you can work with open source models and frontier models.
You can create Rag solutions and you can solve problems with a five step strategy, including curating
data, pre-processing data, making a baseline model, and so on.
Now finally, you're going to be getting to, uh, how do you fine tune a frontier model?
We'll go through the process, create the data, run it and test it.
Let's go.
So when you work with OpenAI to to fine tune the model, and we're going to be using OpenAI for our
fine tuning.
And other providers support fine tuning.
And it tends to work in a very similar way for all of them.
So what we'll do with open AI, which is the most common for this stuff, but it would be very easy
to translate it to others.
The way it works is that there are three stages, and it's actually quite similar to what happened when
we used grok in batch mode.
It's got a lot of similarities with batch mode, and that's why that was quite useful that in day two
this week you got that first experience with it.
These are the three stages.
The first stage is that you need to create training data, a training data set in a particular format.
And that format is a JSON file, a file that you are now intimately familiar with, a file where every
line is a separate document JSON document.
So you put your training data set in JSON format and you upload it to OpenAI.
The second step is when you run the training and you'll start to see results.
You'll see the loss coming from each of your training batches.
You'll see loss coming down and you can monitor it and see what's what's going on during training.
And then thirdly, you take this and you evaluate the results.
You tweak the results and then you repeat them.
Okay.
So with that prep I'm now going to take you in to go and actually doing some fine tuning.
But before that I want to show you, uh, some stuff on OpenAI's website to explain the different types
of fine tuning that they offer and tell you which one we're picking and why we'll go do that now.
So I'm now on the OpenAI platform site in their docs.
If you go to platform and then click docs, you'll be here too.
And there's great documentation for the various APIs OpenAI offers.
And you can scroll around to see that, uh, for example, they have a lot on what they call the responses
API, which is their alternative API to chat completions, which we know well, which they tell you
is something that they encourage you to go on to.
They say that that is that is the future.
That is a bit of a trick.
That is, they're doing that because they want to lock you into their ecosystem, because if you use
the responses API, you get to take advantage of some of the paid functionality, but it won't be instantly
fungible with other models.
So personally, I advise actually not using the responses API sticking with the chat completions API,
but there is lots of stuff here that is, it's OpenAI proprietary, but it's great.
Uh, there's there's agent stuff that you can read about that.
Of course, I cover a lot of on my agents course, there is some real time stuff that's super interesting
here.
Um, there's, uh, the real time API right here, if you're interested in exploring having, like,
real time, uh, text to speech or speech to text and things like that, then you'll get a lot of it
here.
Um, but I want to take you to fine tuning, which is what we're doing today.
And when we look at fine tuning, you'll see that they have a number of different types of ways that
you can fine tune an OpenAI model.
And starting with the basics, it's important to understand that when you fine tune a frontier model
like OpenAI, you're getting your own private version of it only for you.
It's something which which you'll be able to use for a period of time.
And that's that's key.
That's all of these give you an ability to have your own private little version of an OpenAI model.
And of course, it's also worth whilst we are going to dig into what Laura means next week, you've
probably got the general sense that this is all about being able to change a small number of parameters
and have a small number of parameters affect the bigger model.
So when I say that OpenAI gives you your own private copy of this, what you're actually getting is
a small copy of a small number of parameters.
And those are used to to slightly nudge the bigger platform, the bigger GPT.
And your little parameters here get tuned in a way that that gets applied to this big model.
And now I'm explaining what I said.
I was going to leave till next week, but Laura stands for low rank adapter and rank is another word
for dimension.
It's saying that it's it's something which adapts the big model, but it's got fewer dimensions, smaller
set of parameters that adapts the big model.
That's how it works.
You train one of these, this is what you get saved, and this gets applied to the big model when you're
at inference time.
But we don't have to worry about any of that because OpenAI does all of that for us next week we are
going to have to worry about it.
So so here we have it.
These different types there is supervised fine tuning.
This vision is obviously we're not we're not working with images right now.
So we'll skip that one DPO direct preference optimization and RFT reinforcement fine tuning.
So these three SFT and RFT are the three big ones that we'll look at now starting with supervised fine
tuning.
So this is one where what you provide is examples of input data and the output that should come, the
correct responses.
And it's something which lets you train an open AI model with examples for your specific use case.
The result is a customized model that more reliably produces your style and content.
You can use it for now with any of these three models GPT four one, the big Guy, the mini, and the
nano variants.
So you see why I picked four one, not five one.
They don't yet support it for the models more recently than this, but maybe they do by your time.
And please keep note of whatever you see here, because you might have to update the model name if what
they support now is different to the one that we'll be using, which is this one right here.
So this is best for classification when you're trying to classify things into buckets for translating
with some kind of nuance, for generating content in a style, and for correcting for some kind of failures.
If things if your main model keeps doing things wrong, you want to give some examples of how to stop
it doing that.
Uh, that's how it works.
That is SFT supervised Advised fine tuning okay and DPO direct preference optimization is about.
When you want to to refine a model based on some good examples and some bad examples.
It's really it's an example of where you've surfaced a couple of different possibilities to your users.
And your users have given a thumbs up or a thumbs down to the, to the different variations that they're
seeing.
And you want to to to hone your model to, to fine tune it.
It's hard not to use that word.
Uh, so that it's more likely to give this kind of thing than this kind of thing based on this preference,
this this thumbs up, thumbs down, kind of tweaking.
So this is something that's that's considered very a very powerful way to make a model have, uh, be
more nuanced, be able to be slightly shifted in one direction.
And it's typically like it's stuff like getting the right style and tone in a conversation, um, maybe
focusing on the right things.
It's saying here, it's enables the model to learn from subjective human preferences.
That's the idea.
And this is really the successor to something called RL that you might have heard of, reinforcement
learning from human feedback, which is something that was the big breakthrough that got from the prior
GPT to ChatGPT in 2022.
It was this kind of technique.
So that is DPO direct preference optimization.
Okay.
And now for the most advanced one and possibly the most fashionable one RFT reinforcement fine tuning
to get expert level performance within a domain.
The idea is it's fairly similar to supervised fine tuning, but but instead of having it's a case where
you don't have a set of correct answers, it's not like you have labels for all of your data, but rather
you can have a program which is able to grade the different responses, and it will shift things based
on that grade.
And that program that does the grading can in fact be an LL.M.
An LL.M.
People sometimes say that's LL.M.
As a judge, an LLM with a particular prompt, which helps it assess whether or not an answer is a good
answer or not.
And this is it's very subtle, but it allows you to again, it's about nuance.
It allows you to align a model with nuanced objectives, because you can have an LLM assess what's happened
against those kinds of nuanced objectives.
So this is how you can really shape a model to craft it to be, to be effective at perhaps, um, not
not having security loopholes or something like that or.
Yeah, medical diagnoses.
That's the kind of thing that an LLM as a judge can decide whether or not this is a sensible diagnosis
based on the on the conditions and based on the facts.
Um, so, uh, these are some of the examples.
The key it's similar to SFT.
The difference is that you use SFT when you have specific labels and you use RFT when you don't have
labels, but rather you have a way to judge whether or not what's been produced is good or bad with
some kind of a grader, and you're going to build the grader, and it's going to use that dynamically
to decide what to do.
That is reinforcement.
Fine tuning.
RFT and RFT can only be used with reasoning models because it's all about shaping the reasoning based
on this, this feedback.
And so right now oh for mini, we've way, way moved past the O's, but for mini is the only one that
you can use for this.
Okay, so that explains the different types of fine tuning that you can do through the OpenAI API.
And I'm sure you've already got the idea of which one suits us in this case, the the one that is clearly
the right use case for us is SFT supervised fine tuning because we have labeled data.
So we've got the facts.
We don't need a grader because we've got the perfect answer.
We could write a grader that just compares it to the perfect answer and decides, but that would be
a complete waste of time.
We don't need to do that because we've got the real answer here.
Uh, and so we're in a case of SFT and I should say this is generally by far the most common of the
approaches.
It's not as fashionable as using DPO and using RFT, which are more subtle, nuanced things that handle
sort of special cases.
But SFT is what people do.
Most often this is the go to.
This is when you've got labeled data and you want to fine tune a model.
Remember, we're not actually going to fine tune the real GPT because that's enormous.
Even GPT four one nano is no doubt billions of parameters, maybe a trillion.
We're not going to be doing that, but rather we behind the scenes, we believe that OpenAI is going
to be training some smaller set of parameters, which we'll use to apply to the big one, and that's
what it's going to keep and maintain for us.
We're not going to have total visibility to that.
We're going to use some API calls to be setting things up, running the training, measuring the results,
and all of that is what we will do in the next video.
159 - Okay, here we are into week six into day five.
How quickly the days have gone by.
You're thinking, no they haven't.
Not this week.
This week was a bit, uh, a bit more pro.
Okay, so day five, fine tuning a frontier model.
We're going to use OpenAI's API to fine tune our private variant.
We're going to use GPT four one nano.
Not many.
Uh, and uh, it's going to be uh, it's going to be it's going to be great.
We're using supervised fine tuning, which is the most common by far and clearly the right fit for our
use case.
So I'm loading in all data.
As you'll see, it doesn't matter whether you here you do the false or true.
Um loading in the full 800,000 data set.
Let's do that and print out our data to make sure we've got it.
And we're going to be using the OpenAI client library.
You remember OpenAI is OpenAI.
This seems like ages ago that we did this stuff, uh, all the way back in, in week two.
Um, so that is our Python client library that we will be starting there.
And then we're going to talk about how many data points are we going to use for fine tuning.
So look, here's the thing.
OpenAI recommends that you do not use many data points for fine tuning.
They recommend starting with only 50 to 100 data points and then only increasing if you want to.
The the reason for that is that SFT, you're you're working here with a massive pre-trained model,
and the idea of fine tuning OpenAI is to just add on some hints, some give it some some ways to, to
understand what it is you're after.
Maybe you want it to always reply with a bit of sarcasm.
Maybe you want it to always refuse to answer personal questions.
It's something that you're trying to teach it in addition to what it does, and it shouldn't take too
many examples for that.
So, as you may get a bit of a hint here, what we're trying to do, which is teach a really very different
skill, and we have masses of examples That's not exactly a great use case for fine tuning a frontier
model.
It's a better use case for fine tuning an open source model for building something yourself.
Not so great for fine tuning a frontier model.
We're still going to give it a good old stab.
Now, look, I'm going to go a bit crazy here, and I'm going to try putting in 20,000 points, a ton
of data, because I really want to try and teach a frontier model this skill.
It costs me $3.42.
So it's still not hugely expensive because Nano is a very cheap model.
So I wanted to go with a really cheap model and give it tons of examples, because the way I see it,
we can't expect it to pick up too much expertise unless it sees a range of prices, at least for every
category.
But you should not do this many, so I'm doing 20,000.
You should just do the 100.
I'm going to change this to 100 for when you run it, so that I'm going to, uh, I suggest we go with
with with with a hundred 100 examples.
I'm going to go with a bigger number.
But you you shouldn't do that.
So let's just see here if I, if I do Len fine tuning train, mine is going to still say 20,000 because
I changed this after I ran it.
But you should say 100.
It's going to cost you nothing.
And that's a good a good number to be with.
Okay.
So now let's get to our prompt.
Now I actually I made this prompt a bit better yesterday I think.
So let's go and use the prompt that we ended up with yesterday.
Let's keep everything the same.
So what was the final prompt that we went with yesterday?
Estimate the price of this product.
Respond only with the price.
No explanation.
Let's take exactly that and put that right here.
Uh, estimate the price of this product.
Respond with the price.
No explanation.
And then here we have the price.
And, um.
Yeah, I see here we let's let's make it give the whole price like that Iceland dot price.
Um, so we're giving it this, this, uh, this, this data as a list of dictionaries, which has the
price of the product, and then it responds with just the price.
So let me give you an example.
If we look at the the training point number zero, it says estimate the price of this product, respond
with the price, no explanation.
And there's the stuff about some interior knob deadbolts included and what comes back role assistant
content.
And that's the price.
So this this is what we want it to learn how to respond.
We want to say, hey, look, if we give you this user prompt, we want you to respond with this assistant
response.
That's what we're structuring our data as.
Lots of examples like this.
So it can learn that this is the type of assistant response that should come as a result of this user
request.
Okay.
That's the game.
That's what we're going to do.
We now want to put together 20,000, in my case 100 for you examples of this.
Package it up and tell OpenAI, hey, go and make me a variant of GPT four one nano that has learned
from this data.
Okay.
So we're going to have a function called make jsonl.
Sound familiar?
It's quite similar to what we did in day two.
So it's going to go through it's going to take a set of items.
It's going to iterate through those items.
It's going to call this messages for function to turn it into messages.
Turn that into JSON and dump that into a line of JSON file.
Okay.
So what does that look like if we take the first three training points?
Well look it looks like this.
It's a three lines of JSON which has messages.
And then we've got exactly the the stuff that came from here.
We've got uh, like estimate the price of this product.
There's the details of the product.
And at the very end here is the response that that should be coming back from the model.
Okay.
Very nice.
So that is a jsonl representation of three of our training data points.
Okay.
Here's another little function called write Jsonl.
It will take the items and a file name and it will write that to a file.
Great.
This is super easy.
So we're going to use that same folder jsonl over here that we use before when we were doing our batch
mode.
Let's write a new file called Fine Tune Train for all of our fine tuning data set.
And by the way, we're also going to have a separate data set called validation.
You may have noticed I also like put put to one side 50 data points to be used for validation.
So we'll we'll we'll also use them.
We'll write that to to to a file as well.
Uh here we go.
And we've now written two files fine tune train and fine Tune validation.
Let's go into our jsonl folder and make sure that we can we can see that uh where are we now?
Jsonl.
Here we go.
There's fine tune train.
There it is.
Look at all these.
And fine tune validation.
There should be 50 of these.
And here we go.
Here there should be for you 100.
Make sure there's only 100 for me.
There's going to be 20,000 because I'm crazy.
Uh, so I want to spend another $4.
I want to do my best to get us something, uh, worth.
Worth our time.
Uh, so there we have it.
Uh, go back to day five.
Okay, so now what we're going to do is tell open AI, I want you to create a file.
Upload a file, uh, of of this, of this jsonl I'm going to give you.
And the purpose is going to be fine tune.
And this is where we do it.
And I'm hoping this is going to be quite similar.
This is going to be familiar.
You're going to be like oh I recognize this.
We before had grok create.
We passed in a file and our purpose was batch.
When we told grok, hey, we want to upload a file for batch purposes.
Guess what?
OpenAI has exactly the same kind of API.
I think I mentioned that to you already.
Uh, and it's OpenAI create and you could put purposes batch or in this case the purpose is fine tune.
And so that's what we do.
And we have now we are uploading a file to OpenAI for the purposes of fine tuning.
And it's really thinking about this one.
And it will be fast for you because you've only got 100 items in there.
I run it and here we go.
It has a file ID.
Remember that we had that with grok as well.
And we can do the same for our validation file.
And this is what that looks like.
Great.
We've just uploaded two files to OpenAI.
And in case you don't believe me, I've got a little link here to platform OpenAI.
Let's click on that.
Up we come into OpenAI.
Here we are in the storage section.
And you'll see up here a couple of files a couple of JSON files that I just uploaded seconds ago.
Status is ready.
It's 27kB.
Uh, the validation file, this one, the training file is 11MB.
Because I've got the 20,000 things in there.
Yours, presumably will be much smaller.
Yours will be about 50 K or so, 60 K.
So there are the files uploaded at the ready sitting in OpenAI.
Time for us to do it.
They even say the purpose is fine tune.
It's there.
They're sitting there.
They're ready.
It's time for us to fine tune.
160 - Okay.
Onwards.
Step two.
Fine tuning.
So this time we do OpenAI.
Fine tuning.
Create.
Okay.
It's that's an API call.
This is a new one.
This is this.
We didn't this isn't similar to any of the grok ones.
We need to provide a training file.
Well that's easy.
That's the train file.
We got a validation file.
That's a validation file a model.
We're going to use GPT four one nano.
This is the exact thing I took from that documentation page.
You should check the documentation page if you're running this.
And make sure you take the same model ID across the seed.
Means means you remember that we're starting from a fixed set of random numbers, and you know why it's
number 42 and the hyperparameters.
We're going to do one.
Epoch.
The epoch is one pass through all the data.
There will be no point in doing multiple passes through the data.
Why would there be no point?
Well, because we've got tons of data.
If we wanted to do more data, we should just add more data in rather than doing two passes over the
same data.
We've got buckets of data, so so we're spoilt for data.
That's not our problem.
No need to a second epoch batch size.
This is something which you would want to vary and experiment with.
This would be an example of something which is hyperparameter optimization.
Uh, trial and error.
Uh, for you, I would actually recommend you have that on one because you've only got 100 points.
Honestly, you can you can afford to go through each one.
But I'm doing so many points that it's smart for me to do it faster and have 16.
So I'm going to run this and it's going to kick it off and off.
It's gone.
That is the fine tuning job.
I'm going to change this back to one so that when you run it, it's one in there and you have a batch
size of one, which is smarter for a small a very small set of data.
Okay.
So now that we've done that, what we can do is we can say, hey, I want to list what are my fine tuning
jobs that are currently running.
And by putting limit is one, I just want the latest one.
The one I kicked off most recently.
And here we go.
We get we get back a fine tuning, uh, job.
You can see there this is running.
You can see that that matches the job.
That was just right here.
Uh, and we can see when it was created.
It's not got any errors yet.
That's good.
Uh, and, uh, it's got some hyperparameters.
The batch size, uh, learning rate is automatic.
It's going to figure out what learning rate it wants to use.
And, uh, you can see everything else that is happening here.
Okay.
So we can now collect this job ID by by taking this, uh, this piece of data and get that ID.
Let's just grab that ID.
Let me just print that to make sure we've got the right job ID.
There we go.
You can see that that ID right there matches this ID here and this ID here.
This is indeed the ID of what we're running.
We can now call OpenAI fine tuning retrieve for this ID to get the latest information about it, that
here it is.
We can see again, no errors so far.
That's good.
Uh, and uh, the fine tuned model is none means that it's not finished yet, and that is no surprise.
It might have finished for you already with your small data set, but for me, it's going to take a
minute.
Uh, this is the learning rate it's decided to use for, for whatever reason.
Uh, and, uh, yeah, we can see it's got lots going on here, but what it's doing is it's currently
validating the files they like, uh, the OpenAI has written stuff that that checks through the files
in particular to make sure that I'm not trying to do something evil.
I'm not trying to train a model for bad purposes.
So it's checking through my data to make sure there's nothing sneaky in there.
And, uh, hopefully it will not find anything sneaky because these are all products scraped from Amazon.
Nothing very scary in this training data set, but off it's going.
Going through everything.
Um, and we can now call OpenAI Finetuning events.
You pass in the job ID and you say, hey, just give me up to ten events and let's see what they look
like.
And what we can see is there's only been two events so far, and those events are that it has created
the fine tuning job and it's currently validating the file.
And this is something which is going to take a minute or two minute or ten, maybe even 20.
So I will be be gone and I will come back when we've got more to discuss.
And I should mention that, as before, we can also go in and look at the fine tuning that's happening.
It's at OpenAI.
Fine tune and up it comes.
This is the fine tuning section on the left.
This is the same the same place.
This is the dashboard.
If you've if you've come into the platform click on dashboard.
Scroll down here.
You'll see fine tuning is here.
A moment ago we were at the storage part of this looking at our files that are right here.
We're now in the fine tuning section, and you can see that what it's doing right now is validating
this file for you.
This should have completed quite quickly, so you might already be seeing the next part for me.
I'm sitting here watching it validating.
It's been validating for five minutes so far.
I'm going to let it keep going.
And once it's validated, we'll have some more things to look at.
Okay.
And now it's no longer verifying the data set.
Fine tuning is happening.
So I'm seeing here fine tuning I see that that swirling progress.
And over on the right here I see information about it.
The training method is supervised.
The base model is that GPT four one nano.
And if I scroll down I can see epochs is one batch size.
Remember is 16.
This is the learning rates that it picked and the seed.
Um and I see it's actually it's a learning rate multiplier.
So it's probably the learning rate is probably a much, much smaller number than that.
But this is how much it's further reducing it by would be my guess.
Uh, but but OpenAI don't reveal all the internals of how the training works.
Just some of the of the details.
Okay.
And it's got you can see it just popped up there.
I think it's actually about to finish.
Uh, so what you can see here is the change in loss in this chart over the course of the batch.
So loss started quite high.
And slam down accuracy, which is like the opposite started low and slammed up.
Uh, and you can see here is the status.
This is very similar to what we saw in code.
The fine tuning jobs starting the files validated it finished validating.
Uh oh sorry, I'm going the wrong way.
Created validating at, uh, 41 minutes past it.
Finished validating.
It took about eight minutes.
And then, uh, it started the fine tuning job.
Um, now there's something here which looks which looks worrying, which is our first indication that
all may not be going according to plan.
Anything look wrong to you?
The problem is.
So it looks, first of all, great news that loss has come slamming down.
But this is something which you almost always see in training and is not to be distracted.
The reason this happens is that the the format of all of our training data is very similar.
Our labels, we always begin with a dollar sign and then the answer.
And then that's the end of our of our message.
And very quickly the model learns.
That's the format of all of our answers.
We don't have the the price is we have a dollar sign.
And as it gets that format and structure right, the loss comes flying down.
We'll talk about how loss is actually calculated next week.
But but of course to start with it's coming up with with different bits of text.
And it quickly establishes that this is the right answer.
And so down it comes.
The thing that I find a bit concerning is, and actually, this purple line appears to be at odds with
what I'm about to tell you.
But it seems to me that from that point onwards, I don't see a trend which is showing the loss further
reducing.
So it looks to me visually, it's of course bouncing around because sometimes it's a bit off, sometimes
it gets a bit right, but it's not really learning very much.
Oh, and look, that purple line that OpenAI is trying to draw.
The trend is sort of showing that that it can't really see.
It thinks it's doing better and then it's doing worse again.
Uh, so it looks to me like I'm not seeing great amount of learning happening beyond that initial benefit
of getting the right format.
And this is kind of consistent with what they say about, you know, maybe you need 5050 examples for
it to clearly get the right format of the response.
So that part is working fine with just a small number of examples.
But in terms of getting better at actually having the expertise to predict model product prices, I'm
not necessarily seeing that from the data here, but of course the proof will be in the pudding.
Uh, so this is it still still fine tuning.
This is an interim result.
I will come back when we've got some some final outcomes to look at.
161 - Okay, so training is in the final stages.
I've come back and I've actually zoomed out a bit in my browser so we can see more of what's going on.
Fine tuning.
Still still in progress here.
If we scroll down we can see here this chart.
Hang on, I'm going to put it back to to to how it began.
This chart is showing us the the results.
Again it's very bumpy.
Hard to see if there's a trend here.
There's a couple of ways that can help to try and spot a trend.
One is that you can smooth the line a bit, which you can see I was doing before, to try and see if
you can spot a trend doesn't look like it.
And you can turn on, put this into a log mode and maybe it does look like it's getting a hair better
by the end.
There's a very slight trend when we look at it in this way that really sort of exaggerates smaller changes
at the margins.
Okay.
And then this is same, same chart for accuracy.
Uh, and here we can see the time frame of what happened.
We set off the batch for me at 40 minutes past 41 minutes past validation took about eight minutes.
And then it was doing the fine tuning.
Fine tuning took just shy of 20 minutes.
That has completed.
It's currently evaluating that the fine tuned model still meets OpenAI's various policies.
In terms of we haven't taught it to do something evil.
We've taught it to figure out how much things cost.
Not not not something, something unpleasant.
And so hopefully they will quickly figure that out and tell me that I can use this model.
Another thing we can do is flip over to metrics, where we see the numbers in a table, and we will
see here the training loss that is calculating the loss for each of our little batches of data.
But also we'll see validation loss.
What is that.
Well that's taking our validation data set the 50 data points that we provided that are not used for
training purposes.
They are held out.
And it repeatedly tests with the same 50 items so that we can judge in an unbiased way whether we're
getting any better during training.
So this is how we can actually hopefully tell.
Uh, so we start with 1.138 as the starting point.
Okay.
Let's see what happens.
1.138 goes to 1.179.
That's a lot worse.
So unfortunately, and of course, there's some random noise in here, so it's hard to know if we're
within the plus or minus.
But the first time that we did this validation test, it was worse the 1.138.
Uh, let's see what else we come up with.
Uh, 1.141 is pretty similar to the starting point.
Uh, you can see the scroll bars 1.133.
Is a hair better than where we began.
But I do believe the next one was, let's see, 1.284 was significantly worse.
And to me, what this indicates is again that there's just random jitter that the true validation error
has a big plus or minus a big sort of error bar around it.
And we're just sort of bouncing around that.
I doubt that we're actually making a model that's worse.
But look here we have 0.932, apparently a much better validation loss.
Let's just go all the way to the end and see where we end up, see what this tells us.
Work our way back 1.225.
So for what it's worth, we end up, it seems the last validation loss calculation, uh, was was higher
than when we began.
But I wouldn't read too much into it because you can see the numbers bouncing around too much.
It indicates that we're not.
If we are making improvement, it's within error bars, so we're not going to see it with this relatively
small data set of validation data.
Um, okay.
So that that is our our interim results.
The batch has now succeeded.
It's finished.
That is the name of our completed batch.
It's time for us to now go back to the code and put this to work.
So here we are back in cursor.
And you remember we had done this open air.
Events.
If I run this again last time we just got two events.
Presumably now we will see the full set of events.
That's consistent with what we just saw in the UI.
Here they are.
You can see that there was some some finishing steps here.
And then the new fine tuning model was created evaluating against usage policies, moderation checks
completed.
Usage policy completed.
The job successfully completed.
Hurray!
Time for action!
So the fine tuned model name is OpenAI.
Fine tuned retrieve, fine tuned model.
That was the field that used to be none up here somewhere.
This field here is now going to be populated.
Let's see it.
Let's print out what the name is.
Uh, there is the name.
And presumably that is going to be exactly the same as what we just saw in the user interface a moment
ago.
You could also just copied and pasted it from there, of course, but this is how to do it programmatically.
Okay.
So here is our test message.
Now I've got to update this to match exactly with the prompt that we used before.
Uh, this is our prompt.
This is the message.
Let me take this.
Let's go back down here and replace this message with that.
So estimate the price of this product.
Respond with the price.
No explanation.
This time.
We are only putting in the message.
We're not giving the assistant response.
Of course there's some people that have taken the course and that at this point made a mistake with
their test messages.
They included the assistant's response, and when they then run the test, they get a perfect score,
an absolute zero error, 100% of the results are spot on and they tell me they fine tuned the model.
That is perfect and I have to break the news to them that that is an unlikely outcome, and it is more
likely that they messed up their taste test dataset.
So always be sure when you're running the tests that you don't tell it the answer you need it to respond
with the assistant response.
So let me show you what I mean by that.
If I if I get the test messages for test zero, it says estimate the price of this product.
Respond with a price.
It's our favorite distortion guitar pedal, uh, from uh, from the old Blood Noise brand.
And here it is.
And we've just got that single user message.
We don't have the assistant response.
It's the assistant response that our fine tuned model is going to create for us.
Okay, finally, the moment of truth.
Here we have a function Gpt4 one nano fine tuned we call OpenAI create for the model name.
We don't pass in gpt4 one nano.
We pass in this very sophisticated name of a of a fine tuned model here FTE, GPT four one nano personal
Pricer and then this funny idea at the end of it, that word pricer, by the way, is there because
when we first set this batch up, we put suffix is pricer.
That just gives us an opportunity to to have something in there that we'll recognize.
So I can tell the difference between all my different models.
Um, okay.
So that's that's our model.
That's what we're passing in right here.
We pass in our test messages and we we only need, uh, seven tokens.
Sounds fine.
That's our response.
We return it.
This is our function.
Okay, so let's print the actual price of test number zero.
Uh, the the the old blood noise distortion pedal.
And see what.
Guess GPT four one nano has the real price is 219.
Our fine tuned model guesses 199.
Okay, it's fairly close.
Uh, I don't know how that compares to to before, but it's time now, finally, for us to run our big
test.
Let's see.
Okay, here we go.
Kicking it off.
It's running right now.
It's doing the calculations pretty quickly.
As GPT four one nano gets through our, uh, the fine tuned version of it gets through our 200 test
data points.
And here is the results.
Okay.
And yep, it's a disappointment.
It's a bit of a clanger.
It's, uh, $75.91.
Write that down on the piece of paper.
Uh, the good news is, it still it's superior to, uh, to the human level of performance and to many
other models, but it's inferior to our frontier models.
And in fact, strangely, it's inferior to GPT four one nano.
Not fine tuned.
The fine tuning has not helped.
It has, in fact hindered the results.
We've gone backwards a bit.
And this is there's a there's a huge volatility variation in this number.
Sometimes when I run this it predicts one of the numbers is like $10,000.
It gets it way off.
Uh and then sometimes it seems to do all right.
And I ran this a few times with, with different types of training, uh, with um, with GPT four one
mini, I was able to get, uh, error of with 200 data points.
I got an error of 96, uh, with 2000, I got an error down at 79, which is kind of similar level to
this with nano.
With 2000 data points, I got 82 and with 20,000 data points the same as this, I got 67.75 when I ran
it before, but this time I do a bit worse and sometimes when I run it, it generates like crazy high
numbers.
And this error is huge.
You might see that yourself too.
So what is going on?
It's disappointing.
We've done fine tuning.
I've been winding you up all week about the power of fine tuning.
We finally get to fine tuning and the results are slightly worse.
Or at least what we can say, perhaps, is that there's a lot of variation.
Perhaps we've not actually materially made a difference.
Why would that be?
What's going on?
Why hasn't fine tuning worked for us?
Let's talk about that back in the slides.
162 - Okay, well, hopefully you're not feeling too let down at this point.
You're like, ah, because I did.
Sort of.
I set your expectations that there was going to be something not so awesome ahead.
So what happened?
What's going on?
How can we make sense of this?
It's important to understand why one goes about fine tuning a frontier model.
And when that's not the right tool for for what you're for, you're after the problem at hand.
So the reason that you fine tune Frontier Model is, is these kinds of use cases.
You want to set the style or tone of a model.
You want to to improve how reliable it is at producing a certain type of output, like fine tuning is
used to, to make sure that it produces Jason in a particular format before we had structured outputs.
Um, you want to create for, for for failures, uh, when, when it's following a complex prompt and
does something wrong and handling edge cases, a similar thing, and you maybe want to perform a skill
or a task that you can't clearly explain in a prompt.
So by giving it lots of examples, you want it to pick up what the task entails.
And that's not exactly the situation we were in.
We we were trying to to teach something very specific with lots of examples.
And in a way, you know, we can already we had a task that could already be very clearly expressed
in a prompt.
We knew exactly what we wanted, and we can just directly ask that to GPT for one mini.
And it has enormous world knowledge.
It's been trained with like hundreds of millions of dollars worth of training, huge amounts of data
to have all of this expertise.
We could ask it the question, and that's indeed what we were doing yesterday.
So fine tuning it based on like concrete examples like this, it doesn't naturally fit well with a frontier
model that's had so much knowledge crammed into it, and we're trying to just tweak it, hone it slightly
with a few very specific product prices.
And so as a result, we didn't effectively we didn't we didn't materially change performance.
I suspect we didn't we didn't measurably make it worse either.
I suspect we just introduced a ton of noise into the process.
And that's why we're getting sort of different looking numbers.
Sometimes better, often worse.
Um, but uh, yeah, it's all because that's not really why you fine tune a frontier model.
But I have good news for you.
That is exactly why you might fine tune an open source model.
So this is this is whilst this is a temporary setback, it's something where maybe you were hoping that
I was going to throw at you some amazing numbers of fine tuning, a frontier model.
It's really been a learning point for us about where it makes sense to fine tune a frontier model.
When you're doing this kind of crafting of its behavior, or trying to make it follow a particular style,
it's not so much for teaching this kind of core expertise.
Um, but but we're going to see how well that works next week.
Uh, and, uh, yeah, I guess I make the sort of general point that, look, having experiments go
wrong.
That's part of the job.
That's what a data scientist does.
And so we should take take joy in the fact that we've had something that gave poor results, because
that shows that we're iterating.
We're we're doing R&D.
When you're when you're working as a software engineer, a problem is always bad.
A bug is a bug.
That's never a good thing.
You know, maybe you learn how to not do it again, but it's not like, uh, that there's ever something
positive to take from that that you wanted.
It's like, oh, hooray!
I have a bug.
Uh, but in data science, that's not true.
Like, the R&D is about trying, exploring and and failure paths means you've eliminated one kind of
technique for this problem at hand.
That's an important learning point.
So I know I'm a very upbeat, optimistic type.
So maybe I would say something like this.
But I'm trying to assure you that even though the numbers were.
I guess they sucked.
It's still something which is a an important point on our path to to really crushing this business problem.
And so setting up experiments and some of them passing and some of them failing.
That's part of the job.
That's what it entails.
And so yeah, we should we should be be be satisfied with that at least.
But in the meantime the challenge for you for this, for this week, for week six is to go and recreate
this, do do some fine tuning just with a very small data set.
Don't do my 20,000, just do 20.
Uh, I did actually think I was thinking that the 20,000 was going to slightly beat the previous number
because it did for me when I ran it before, but it didn't this time for whatever reason.
So there you go.
Uh, sometimes it does seem to beat it, but with 20, just experiment with the hyperparameters.
Try things like just try the number of epochs, try the different batch sizes.
Use it as a way to understand what's going on.
See if you can't do better than me.
Maybe you can.
It's, uh.
It's pretty quick to run these fine tuning, uh, runs with just a small amount.
It's good to get the practice.
It's good to see the training loss, the validation loss, get a sense for what's happening.
Um, and you could also perhaps explore using this for a use case that where it fits better.
You could if one of these different use cases, uh, suits you and something that you are looking to
do, then maybe explore trying out fine tuning for that purpose, doing something that actually is productive,
fine tuning of a frontier model so that that would be the task at hand.
Uh, so that's perhaps not the conclusion that you are expecting from a week that was all about fine
tuning.
And all I can tell you is that I do have redemption in store for you.
Next week is going to be such a juicy week as we roll up our sleeves and dig in to to fine tuning an
open source model, and there you're working with something that is a much smaller model, you have
much more control over how you go about fine tuning, so you've really got the opportunity to put different
models to the test and to to really explore how we can move the needle.
Fine tuning a model, uh, to be able to, to try and compete with models that are much, much bigger
than it.
So that's all in store for you next week.
But first, I did want to leave you only on a low point, so I wanted to have one.
One nice outcome for this week.
One more thing to do.
So I have something different for you.
I want to take you back to cursor for one little extra surprise.
Something to have you smiling at the end of the week.
What could that be?
You're wondering.
Let me show you.
Let's go to cursor.
Okay, so we're back in cursor.
Let's go to the week six folder.
And I want to show you that I've got another file that I've added.
I've decided to try and build one new kind of model just to show something to you to, to end with some,
some good results.
And I'm going back to making a neural network.
Again, remember, we made a vanilla neural network a couple of days ago, but I thought, why don't
I leave you with an example which is not a vanilla neural network.
It is actually a deep neural network, perhaps not as deep as like a transformer architecture, but
certainly a step in that direction, something that's pretty sophisticated, that shows you the cutting
edge of neural networks, what they can achieve.
So if we go into the week six folder in the Pricer package in here, you'll find there is in fact a
module called Deep Neural Network.
And this is what it looks like to build like a professional neural network.
Um, you can see there's this class deep neural network.
This is like before it was a subclass of NN module.
And it just had like before it had our layers.
There's something a bit more now.
It has a bunch of layers that are made up of this residual block.
And this is in itself a number of different layers.
The linear layer.
You may remember we had that before.
There's some other layers called layernorm.
There's ReLU again that we had before.
Dropout designed to make sure that it that it doesn't overfit.
Another linear layer.
Another layer norm.
And yeah, this this is all put together into one block.
Uh, the deep neural network itself, it contains, uh, ten layers or the specified number of layers
where these layers are, each of these modules which themselves have multiple layers.
So this is a pretty big neural network.
The way that you count layers in a neural network is sometimes people do it differently, but depending
on how exactly you count this, you could say this is anywhere from from a ten layer network to like
a 40 or 50 layer neural network, depending on on how you're counting.
Uh, but there's lots of layers basically all put together.
Um, and this, this is the extent of the neural network.
It's not exactly complicated.
Uh, but then I've got something called the deep neural network Runner, which is more of a utility.
And this has much of the same code that we had before, but it's just got a little bit more technicality.
But it has this function train which has the four steps of training.
It has the forward pass.
Uh, there it is.
The, uh, the forward pass, the loss calculation, the backward pass, and then the optimizer step.
And there's lots of little bits and pieces around here.
I'm doing something clever to to normalize the input data.
I'm doing lots of sort of pro tricks to get the best out of a neural network.
Um, and then I've got like an inference function at the end here that just runs inference for it.
So this is just a sort of model of a more pro grade neural network.
And what we're now going to do is see okay, so it's not an LLM.
But this is again something we can train ourselves and we can see what kind of performance can we get
from, uh, so this isn't traditional machine learning.
This is now like deep learning deep learning in action.
What can this give us?
Let's find out.
163 - Okay, so if you're in the week six directory, I've got a new notebook in here called redemption.
Run!
Open up.
Redemption run.
This is completely optional.
You can just see what I've got here.
You can run it yourself if you'd like to experience the magic of this.
So I'm going to do some imports, including importing my neural deep neural network that we were just
looking at.
And we're going to use the full data set.
You can also run training with just the small data set as well.
So load in all of that just as before loading in items full because I'm going with a full data set.
And when that's done, I'm going to then call our deep neural network runner, which sets everything
up for our training data and the first 1000 data points in our validation data set.
So it takes what about 30s to load in the training, all of our all of our data set.
And then we will get to going okay.
Everything is loaded in.
So now we're going to run this.
Now this this is setting up our neural network.
You remember our previous vanilla neural network.
It had quite a few parameters.
I think it was 600,000.
Is that right?
About 600,000 parameters in vanilla neural network.
This one.
This one is it's a beefier neural network.
We're going to have more parameters.
Let's find out how many more.
It's just about to print.
Uh, and, uh, yeah.
As I say, it's something which which you can choose to to train yourself, or you can just load in
the one that I've already trained.
So it has 289 million parameters.
So, you know, I mean, it's still not like a frontier model with billions or trillions of parameters,
but there's a lot there.
It's a it's a hefty model for sure.
And it's using my, my GPU or my Apple Silicon Mac.
And it may say using Cuda for you if you're on a PC with an Nvidia card.
Okay, now there's a choice for you.
There's a there's there's three options.
Number one, you could just do nothing and watch me and see the results I get.
Number two you could choose to download the file.
Uh you go to this Google Drive link?
There's a file called deep Neural Networks PyTorch.
You can take this file, put it in the week six directory.
You can see I've got mine right there.
It gets git ignored.
I haven't put it in the repo because this is like seven gigabytes or something.
Oh no that's that's the random forest.
It's more like two gigabytes.
It's not that big.
It's two gigs.
Still too big for the repo, but it's fine to be on Google Drive so you can download it if you wish.
And then just, just it's just one line to load it in.
Alternatively, should you wish you could actually train this yourself, it takes about 40 minutes per
epoch.
So running five epochs is about four hours or just under.
Um, and I've run this already in redemption train.
You can see that this is run, it ran.
It took 40 minutes per epoch and it completed.
And that's what the Redemption Train notebook is exactly the same as this, but it actually runs these
two lines here to actually train the neural network.
But we're not going to do that here.
We're simply going to load it in.
I've already got this file.
I've saved it right here.
There it is.
Deep neural networks, PyTorch.
And it loaded it in.
It just takes a few seconds to load it in once it's been already trained.
So that's a perfectly cool way of doing this.
And it just remains for us now to run the test.
And as usual with these things, we wrap it in a nice little function deep neural network.
It's just going to call the runner dot inference, which is just exactly the same as how we did it before.
Uh, let's run this and see how it does.
It's very fast indeed.
Bam!
It's done.
The visual looks good.
The error 46.49 46.49.
Let's take a look at that.
That is pretty incredible.
So our own homegrown neural network look we did it.
We didn't beat GPT five one.
That is still in pole position.
But we got very very close.
And we beat Claude 45 opus, which is like an enormous multi-Trillion parameter model.
Uh, and, uh, we beat it pretty nicely.
Uh, so this is, this is really cool to see.
And this is a model that is totally homemade.
This is coded from scratch.
And PyTorch layer by layer.
You can dig through it.
You can look at the code yourself.
This is something where we've really built this from the ground up.
Now if you're saying to yourself, hang on, how can something with with only like two, whatever it
is, 289 million parameters take on this monster model with trillions of parameters.
The reason is because we have trained it.
We've trained this model ourselves with our own cut of data, and we've trained it with 800,000 points.
And we it hasn't been distracted by all of the other stuff it can do.
It doesn't know how to write poetry about about the president.
It doesn't know how to how to do, uh, how to to respond to your to your sales email or write a LinkedIn
post or whatever people are using Llms for.
But what it can do is predict the price of a product, and it can do it pretty well within $46.
Uh, almost as good as GPT 5.1, the strongest model on the planet.
So I think that's really awesome.
It's a great point for us to get to.
I realize it's slightly off, off, off track because we were fine tuning frontier models, but I wanted
to end with a really great result.
And I'd encourage you to experiment with this and play with it.
And if you do want to, if you've become interested in looking at basic neural networks without even
looking at transformers, this is an opportunity for you to come in and look at the code there.
Ask an LLM to explain some of it.
If you're unsure, look at some of the hyperparameters you could tweak there.
You can change things like batch size and learning rates and other things.
Experiment with it and see if you can't do even better with a home made deep neural network and enjoy
that.
Now let's have one look at all of our results side by side.
And so here we have our latest results across the board.
This is the prediction error.
You remember our improvements with traditional ML.
This was the disastrous Ed performance.
Our original vanilla neural network.
This is the frontier models.
Improving.
Improving.
This is our disappointing results for sure.
There's no way I can say it from fine tuning a model.
I will say, as I say that that one time I did it, I got better than GPT four one, nano and fine tuned.
But there's clearly a lot of variation in this fine tuning frontier model has not been fruitful for
us.
Um, but this here is a nice way to end it.
The deep neural network that we trained with all of our data that's done really very well.
It's almost, almost beaten GPT five one, but it's beaten other frontier models, including Gemini
three Pro, uh, handily.
So a nice a nice way to wrap the week, some great experiments, some great outcomes.
We've we've had some setbacks, but we've learned through the process and we're we're absolutely ready
for getting deeper into fine tuning open source models next week.
Wow.
Can you believe it?
You're somehow 75% of the way through this journey.
I haven't been giving you the percentages for a little while.
And you've been maybe wondering, where am I now?
75% I appreciate this week.
Did feel like it was.
It was quite a lot going on.
It was a lot to take on.
But but it was worth it.
I hope we covered tons of ground.
I'm hoping you've got some real practical sense of what it takes to do things like building these JSON
files, running a model in batch mode, running fine tuning with a frontier model through the API.
You've got a good sense of when to do that and perhaps when not to do that.
And you've also, into the bargain, got a bit of a feel for what it takes to work with traditional
ML.
Uh, it's not super common, but it's still very much there.
And it's a great basis.
Always good to use for a baseline model.
And you've even got some exposure to deep learning and to to building a neural network from scratch
like that.
Not again, not something that's that's common day to day.
But it's great to have got that grounding and to see how it works should you need to do it.
So this has been really important material.
The other thing that's been so, so essential about this week is that we took on a commercial problem,
figuring out prices from descriptions.
And we built like a harness, a test harness for evaluating a metric.
We really zoomed in on this on this absolute price difference.
That's been the metric that is both a model metric and a business outcome metric.
And we've been measuring that throughout, and we've been watching the progress of our experiments.
Not all experiments have gone according to plan.
Not not the most recent one and not the human experiment.
Goodness.
Uh, but many of them have been fantastic.
And, you know, GPT five one has really shone.
And that's what it's all about running the experiments, hyperparameter optimization aka trial and error
doing this is this is where this is where you find results.
This is where you're able to achieve great performance with your business problems.
Okay.
so massive congrats on being 75% of the way through.
Uh, take a break, take, take a breather.
Get a good night's sleep.
Because when we start next week, we're really getting it gets super juicy.
This is where I get if I'm not already overexcited.
This is where I get extremely overexcited.
As we get into fine tuning an open source model.
And our objective for next week is to say, look, open source models are free.
They are tiny, we're going to use a miniature one, and we're going to see, can we get to a point
where we are getting close to a frontier model performance?
Like, could we take on like GPT four one nano and its numbers and maybe get get close ish to GPT five
and doing it using a tiny model with just just like a llama 3.2 a really small model.
What can we do with that?
If we use fine tuning, that is the mission.
It's going to be really, really interesting.
I can't wait to show you.
I will see you for week seven.
Coming right up.
164 - Week six was tremendous fun, but it's ancient history now.
Welcome to week seven of the core track of LM engineering, a massive week.
This is when things get professional.
This is when we get advanced.
But before we get advanced, let's remind ourselves what we can already do.
Of course, you know, you can do lots of lots of generation of text and code.
You can use front end models, open source models with tools.
And you can also use you can create Rag solutions to business problems, giving expertise, looking
in a knowledge base using long chain, long chain 1.0 no less.
And do it without lang chain as well.
And you know the importance of evals and you know how to evaluate both your retrieval and also your
question answering.
And then last week of course we we looked at a five step strategy.
Given a business problem, how do you you get an AI solution starting by understanding the requirements
and the evals.
Evals.
Super important.
And then we embarked on solving a problem about predicting a number a price from some text.
We solved that problem using traditional machine learning from simple basic like linear regression all
the way through to some some really interesting XGBoost.
And then we moved to deep neural networks.
Well, first a shallow neural network.
And then we went to LMS.
And then we did fine tuning of a frontier model.
That was disappointing.
We learned when not to use fine tuning I guess.
And then we did a deep neural network just to finish things off.
And along the way we we looked at evaluating objectives using the sort of y hat y chart that we did
and really digging into how you track the performance of your experiments.
And so today, today we moved to what it takes to fine tune a model.
And often when people talk about fine tuning an open source model, they use an expression like I built
my own model from scratch.
And if you hear that sometimes people actually mean that they went ahead and built something from the
ground up.
Usually that would be to make a sort of toy LLM that can do something very simplistic.
Normally when people say and every day we built an LM like we have an LM.
In my day job, what it means is that you took an open source model and you fine tuned it using a technique
like Q Laura, which we'll use, which is, I think, the most popular technique, uh, using techniques
like that to fine tune a model to get better at your business objective.
That's what it means.
There are, as I say, there, there are some cases where companies have fine tuned, have not fine
tuned, or built their own model from scratch.
Bloomberg famously did this with with Bloomberg GPT.
But I think what becomes clear very, very quickly is that if you do that, then the Frontier Labs will
come out with a better model very quickly and you'll be back.
You'll be be saying to yourself, okay, do I do I retrain everything again, taking advantage of the
latest technology?
And that would be extremely expensive.
So it turns out typically to be a better strategy commercially to be thinking about fine tuning an open
source model that has been pre-trained by a lab like meta or deep seq, uh, rather than trying to to
build one from scratch or Gemma from Google or five from Microsoft.
Okay, so with that, let's dive in.
Let's start, of course, as always at the beginning of the week by just reminding ourselves where we
are in the journey.
Here we are.
You started out some six whole weeks ago over on the left.
We spent the first week looking at the chat completions API.
We were talking about things like tokens and stuff like that.
By week two, we were looking across all of the frontier APIs.
We were using tools for the first time.
UIs Multi-modality.
We had some fun with the with the airline thing in week three.
We dug into hugging face.
Of course, we'll be coming back to that today.
We also looked at Google Colab.
We'll be using a lot this week, almost exclusively with, with one exception, and we did open source
work.
So that's when you got your first exposure to hugging Face Transformers.
And we actually looked at a model.
If you remember, we looked at the layers of a model in week four that was all about selecting the right
LM for the task at hand, and we used it to generate code with spectacular results.
Week five was Rag.
We used Lang chain one zero.
We worked on on some question answering and we evaluated our success.
And then we did it without long chain.
Week six was about fine tuning a frontier model, although I say it, but that turned out to be the
most disappointing part of the week.
We did lots of other great stuff, including working with traditional ML.
That was fun curating a data set that some people hate that, but I loved it and I always enjoyed digging
into data.
And then we had some successes.
Fine tuning or not fine tuning, training a deeper neural network by the end of it.
So it was a very interesting week indeed.
This week.
This week is fine tuning and open source model, which some people would say is like building a model.
And then next week, the finale brings it all together with an AI project with the return of rag.
Lots of stuff.
And at the end of all of that, you'll be able to say for sure you can wear the LM engineer badge with
pride.
You will be an AI engineer.
Just a couple of weeks left to go, and I've got some huge weeks in store for you.
And one more time, don't kill me.
But just to remind you, The Price Is Right is the name of our capstone project that we're working on.
The idea is you're given a description of a product and predict its price.
You're like, I know, I know what this project is about.
And it's great because we've got the true value of products that we're that we've got to hand.
Eventually we're going to incorporate this into an agentic AI solution that's going to hunt for bargains.
That's going to be the prize at the end of this.
And frontier models have done amazingly well.
Of course, they've been trained with hundreds of millions of dollars pumped into them.
The question is, can we fine tune an open source model that is thousands of times smaller and try and
get something that can have comparable performance with the frontier, but at a fraction of the cost?
It's basically a fraction of the size, and it's free for us to run it ourselves.
So that's the challenge that we're laying out.
That's what we're going to try to accomplish this week.
And with that, let's go for the order of play for this week.
So last week, you remember, of course we did the data curation eval frontier models.
So this week it's all about fine tuning the open source model.
Five.
Five days, five steps.
Today I'm going to introduce Q Laura, it's going to be a day with some theory stuff, but in the context
of practice I'll show you the layers.
We'll talk about dimensions.
It's going to be interesting.
Tomorrow we're going to do go back to data one more time.
We're going to refine our data set.
So it's perfect for fine tuning a bit of turning it into prompts.
And then we're going to run it against a base model to evaluate our starting point.
Days three and four is the meat of the week.
This is when we do our training, and day five is when we bring it together.
And we evaluate our performance and see if we've got close to a frontier model with a tiny open source
variant.
Okay.
And then of course, next week is when we add in rag agentic, blah, blah, blah.
It's going to be terrific.
Okay.
That's it for for for setting the stage.
Let's get on the stage.
I'm going to tell you what Q Laura is and how it allows us with a relatively small piece of hardware
to fine tune models of this size and shape.
Let's get to it.
165 - So Q Laura is the name of the game.
That's what we're going to be doing this week.
And Q Laura is actually two different ideas, two different tricks, and one of them is called Laura,
and the other is basically Q and so they're put together to make Q Laura, there are in fact two different
tricks.
Uh, so we're going to start by talking about Laura and make sure you're comfortable with that.
And then throw the Q on the front of it.
So here's the scoop.
We are about to take a model.
We are in fact going to choose llama 3.2 from meta, which is for whatever reason, I think because
meta was first first to come up with these open source models.
It's so common in industry that people start with llama that that's the model that they use.
And so I think it's great prep for you to get really deeply into the llama model.
If you wish to use any of the others, then for sure you can do so.
They will all do great.
They might beat the performance with llama, maybe not.
You could give it a try, but llama is a fabulous model to start with.
So we're going to be using llama 3.2 and that has 3 billion weights.
It's a small model.
3 billion weights is considered a small model, almost one that could fit on a on a device on a phone.
But when it comes to training, 3 billion weights is still an enormous number of weights by by any normal
size.
Remember that that huge deep neural network from from last week was 200 million weights and that was
maxing out my machine.
3 billion is like off the charts.
It's far too much for us to be training on a single GPU.
You need to have some hardcore kit for that kind of thing.
Um, so so there's a trick.
There's a trick to allowing us to train something which is so enormous.
And that trick is called Laura, which stands for Low Rank adapter.
And I've already given some of the game away with what the trick is.
But just in case you didn't get it, let's do the trick right now.
So the architecture of llama 3.2 is something we briefly peaked at in week three, and you might remember
it consists of 28 groups of modules that are stacked on top of each other that are known as the llama
decoder layers, and each one It has different types of layers.
It has these things called self-attention layers.
You might have done some reading up on that when I showed you in week three.
These are the layers that what they learn how to do through data is they learn which parts of the input
sequence matter the most, which should they pay attention to in calculating the most likely next token.
And then it has multi-layer perceptron layers MLP, which are these layers that are connected to the
layer above and have weights.
And then it has an activation function called Selu that I think I remember showing you briefly and then
some Layernorm.
So, so these are all all things which you could dig into.
We'll look at them in a second and get a bit more perspective on them.
But the the thing to keep in mind is that these all together form one module, and there are 28 of these
modules stacked on top of each other.
And this makes up the Lama architecture.
And these parameters together take up 13GB of memory just before you even get to training.
Just to have this in memory, it needs 13GB of GPU Ram.
So as you remember, training involves these four steps.
Training involves doing a forward pass through all of these 13GB of parameters and then calculating
the loss.
How wrong were we?
And then the backward pass.
If you were to twiddle all of these 3 billion parameters.
13GB worth of data, would it make the loss better or worse?
And then the step in the right direction to to reduce loss.
Well, the first thing you do with Laura is you say, you know what?
We're actually we're not going to change any of these parameters at all.
None of these 3 billion parameters are going to get changed.
We're going to freeze them, freeze all of these weights.
They will not be subject to gradient based optimization.
We won't be changing them at all.
They're going to stay static.
Okay.
So we're not training them.
Well so yes we are going to train.
We are going to first select a few of these layers that we think are the ones that are most important,
the ones that varying them is most likely to be able to shift the behavior of the llama model, and
these are called the target modules.
It sounds very sci fi.
It sounds like something out of Star Trek, but they are modules.
You remember I said that there are these these these stacks of modules, and the target modules are
the ones that you are targeting.
So that's what they are.
So you're thinking, okay, I get you and we're going to shift the parameters of these target modules.
No you don't change anything in llama 3.2 everything is frozen.
But you've identified these target modules.
You're like okay so so what do you do to these target modules.
Well you come up with a separate matrix, a separate set of parameters of weights with less dimensions,
way fewer dimensions than, than the llama architecture.
And these things you have off to one side and because they have fewer dimensions and rank, is another
word for dimensions, they are called low rank adapters.
That's what you create these these little matrices of off to one side okay.
And you're thinking, so what do we do with these matrices?
Well, these matrices are used to adjust the target modules.
They are applied to the target modules.
And it's these smaller matrices that we train these we do the forward pass.
We then do adjust these we calculate how much does changing these little things these little smaller
parameters affect the loss.
And then we shift these so they are used.
We train these and we apply them to the target module.
And what does it mean to apply them.
It sounds very high tech.
It is very high tech.
They just get added together.
So so basically it sounds Laura sounds like it's super fancy, super complex, and there's lots of lots
of technical jargon that comes with it.
But basically what we're saying is the llama model is too big to train, so we train something smaller
instead that gets added to it.
Uh, and uh, and that's how it works.
And you train these smaller adapters, these Laura low rank adapters and, and as you train, every
time that you do a forward pass through, you just add in the value of the low rank adapters.
It sounds kind of simple right now.
As always, there's a little bit of technicality.
There's something that makes it slightly not not as simple as that.
The problem comes to to matrix dimensions, and the fact that you can't just add a small set of matrices
to big set of matrices.
And so what actually happens in practice is that there aren't there isn't just one Lora set of parameters
for each of the target modules.
There are two.
And they're known as lora A and lora B and lora A and lora B get multiplied together and that gets added
to the target module.
And the dimensions all worked out so that you can do that.
And I'm not going to get deep into linear algebra.
I'm going to show you the dimensionality.
And if you wish you can look it up.
Or you can just do it on a piece of paper and satisfy yourself that by combining multiplying together
two smaller matrices which have a particular shape, you can get one larger matrix that can just get
added in to the target module.
It's not super important to know that.
It's just that there is this trick that allows you to work with fewer parameters and have them added
in and have them influence, affect, adapt the whole of the target module, allowing us to train a
much smaller set of parameters.
And whilst OpenAI isn't clear about how exactly fine tuning GPT works, all of us are sort of led to
understand that this is they they almost certainly use this kind of technique.
They also allow you to build to, to to fine tune a small matrix that then gets used to adapt larger
layers in GPT.
And it's what we're going to be doing this week.
And as one final little extra when you do this, this multiplying and adding, you also scale up this
matrix by a factor.
And that factor is called alpha.
That's how many how much you scale up the result of multiplying Laura a and or b.
So in the end the target module has added to it alpha times A times Laura B.
And that's that is everything about Laura.
You now know Laura.
166 - So one more time.
Here you have it.
Here's the picture.
We have frozen the weights in llama 3.2.
We've identified some target modules in there.
And then for each of the target modules we're coming up with a pair of matrices called Laura A and Laura
B.
And it's worked out in such a way that the target module has a large number of dimensions.
It's got lots of dimensions.
Laura A and Laura B have much more fewer dimensions than it's designed, such that you can multiply
together Laura A and Laura B, and you'll get a bigger matrix with with the right number of dimensions,
you scale it up by alpha.
You add that to the target module, and that allows you to train Laura A and Laura B, and have them
influence the target module such that you can basically affect all of llama 3.2 by only fine tuning
some small matrices.
That's how it works.
Okay.
And now to introduce some essential hyperparameters that go along with that.
Remember, hyperparameters is just a fancy name for any kind of settings that aren't the actual parameters
themselves and the model.
It's something else that affects the whole training and you can explore those.
Try them.
Setting them differently.
Uh, before you train and the process of changing these hyperparameters and experimenting with different
values is known as hyperparameter optimization.
And it's really just just trial and error.
And it's a big part of training, trying out different hyperparameters and seeing which ones work best.
So what are the hyperparameters for the Lora process?
What are some essential ones?
Well, you may know them already.
The first of them, of course, is r uh, which is uh, the the number of dimensions in these smaller
dimensional matrices.
Uh, the, uh, often you see people begin with an R of eight, have eight dimensional matrices, and
then go up to 16 and then go up to 32.
But eight, 16, 32 are very common values for R.
Generally speaking, there's this thing in data science that hyperparameters are often powers of two.
You'll often see we're going to do a lot of these things, and you'll often find that people use different
powers of two for the hyperparameters.
And I think it's like this sort of urban legend and myth that that some of these are necessary because
they improve the the ability of a model to use memory efficiently.
But a lot of this is more myth than, than substance.
It's become almost a superstition that people tend to just always latch on to powers of two for hyperparameters.
And this idea that it's more efficient for memory because of course, bytes are organized into into
powers of two.
Uh, I don't know if it's really true.
Uh, so so it's just what everyone does.
It's like.
Like, uh, it's so common that it's almost second nature.
I feel uncomfortable when I'm trying to come up with a batch size that's not a power of two, because
it's so ingrained in me that it should be a power of two.
But as we'll see, we may do some experimenting with this.
You certainly don't have to feel like you're constrained to a power of two.
You could have a value of R, which is 11 if you wanted.
It would feel galling.
Somehow.
It would feel evil.
But it's not.
It's fine.
Anyway, that is our.
So what's another one?
Another one is Alpha.
You remember what alpha is.
Alpha is simply the scaling factor.
How much you're multiplying these two matrices by before you add it to the target module.
And and the rule of thumb that everyone just does is you pick alpha to be double R.
You don't have to.
But I always do.
I did once try having different values of alpha, and I can confirm when I did that that the different
values of alpha performed worse than having just double, uh, but only very slightly.
It didn't make a huge amount of difference, I've got to be honest.
Uh, but yeah, the alpha you start at least with it being twice the value of R, and so if R is 32,
alpha is 64.
That's just what you do.
But for sure you should explore a couple of other options to see if you do better.
So that is R and alpha.
And then the other one is which target modules do you pick.
And this is something which is again it's just there's a sort of rule of thumb.
You tend to pick the attention heads.
You'll see that in a second when we go in and pick them.
Those tend to be the layers that you target, at least initially.
And then you can decide to also target the MLP layers as well.
If you want to have more flexibility, you want to have more, even more ability to absorb your training
data and change the model.
Um, but but normally you'd start by just affecting the attention head.
See how that does?
Add in more if you need to.
Uh, and yeah, that's that's usually what you see people doing most of the time.
targeting the attention heads.
I try, I've tried both with this project and I get.
I think I get slightly better results when I have more than just the attention heads, but only slightly,
and it takes a lot longer.
So so generally, rule of thumb start with just the attention heads, which you'll see in just a second.
Now I know what you're thinking.
You're thinking okay, so you've explained Laura very nicely, but we're not here to learn about Laura.
We're here to learn about Laura.
So let's hear about the cue.
So the cue of course stands for quantization.
It's something we met in week three already.
So you know a little bit about this.
The idea is look even even at llama llama 3.2 has 3 billion weights.
That's still a lot of data.
Each of these parameters, each of these parameters is modeled as a 32 bit floating point number.
And that adds up 32 bits, which is like four bytes.
So 3 billion times for bites.
You can do the math.
That's going to be like 12GB.
It's actually 13GB.
Uh, rounding.
Uh, so so it takes up 13GB of Ram and, uh, there's, there's this idea which which, uh, someone
had which it sounds like one of those intern ideas.
It's like like really, uh, of like.
Okay, so so what if we we keep all of these weights, we keep the 3 billion weights, but rather than
having them, each of them be be 32 bits.
What if we reduce the precision of each one?
Here's how to think of it.
You can think of each of these weights like it's like it's a dial, a dimmer, a dimmer switch for your
lights.
You're turning this dial.
It's turning your lights bright and dark and and what we're saying is, okay, we've got all of these
different possible settings that the lights could be on.
What if we made that more coarse grained?
We made it so that there's only 256 possible settings here, or that would be eight bits only 256 possible
settings.
Click click click click 256 times.
Or we can make it even more coarse grained.
It could be just 16 possible positions.
It's four bits.
Just 16.
Click click click.
And the lights would get brighter brighter brighter.
But keep all of your weights.
What if we considered trying to do that changing lama to be to be using just four bit numbers?
Well, I mean your first reaction would be okay, well sure fine.
But but that's taking a lot of information out that was trained as part of pre-training.
There was all this careful wiggling of the parameters to make a good model.
If you if you turn everything down to just, just a 16 possible positions, you're losing a lot of info.
And presumably that's not dissimilar to just taking out three quarters of the layers and just going
all the way down to just a quarter of the layers with with full precision.
Well.
Well, it's kind of funny.
This is one of those weird situations where you sort of have your cake and eat it for sure, going down
to just four bits, just as very coarse grained click, click, click definitely reduces model performance.
The results come down, the accuracy gets poorer.
They do worse on all of their benchmarks, but not by as much as you might think, not by nearly as
much as you might think.
They just do a little bit worse.
They don't do much worse.
They're certainly not like four times worse.
It's much, much better than taking out three quarters of the layers, which would be devastating to,
to to a model.
Uh, uh, so, uh, so it's, it's a strange kind of experimental result.
It's very empirical.
It's like we tried it and it's kind of okay.
And we save like we get down to a quarter of the space, a huge memory saving without too much of an
impact on performance.
Just a slight impact on performance.
And so it turns out that this is a really good trick.
Just experimentally it works really well.
The assumption is that when we do training, we sort of get more detail than we perhaps need, like
there's more information baked in to the neural network than is necessary.
And reducing the precision is a very efficient way of compressing a neural network.
You're still getting a lot of the explanatory power, still getting a lot of the intelligence of the
neural network, whilst massively reducing the amount of space it takes up.
That's the that's the thinking.
It's some kind of a of a clever trick to allow us to compress a neural network very efficiently, a
bit like the way an MP3 still sort of sounds pretty good, even though it's massively smaller than a
full WAV file.
Same kind of idea, I guess.
And so yes, it's very common to reduce from the 32 bits down to eight bits, It's or go even further
and take it down to four bits, which is, uh, just 16 possible positions, really tiny.
And that's what we will do.
And that is what's super common color is going all the way down to four bits most of the time.
And there's just a couple of technicalities to mention that that is a common point of confusion, even
even for pros sometimes.
Um, first of all, it's worth noting that when I said I said it comes down to like 16 possible positions.
A four bit number is like typically between 0 and 15, the 16 possible settings.
But it's not as if we we take these numbers to be integers, as a four bit number is usually interpreted,
but no.
Rather it's interpreted as a float that there are 16 possible positions, and these are mapped to to
16 possible floating point values.
And they use usually like like a, like a normal distribution to, to be able to very cleverly represent
a possible range of floating point values with only 16 coarse positions.
So you can think of these 16 settings as kind of clicking through the possible values of a floating
point number might have in a way, that is, that is most likely to keep some of the knowledge of the
neural network.
So that's a key point.
It's not it's not being converted to integers.
And the other technicality that sometimes confuses people is that this business of quantizing this is
being applied to the base model.
The base model is being quantized down to four bits.
We're not quantizing the Laura matrices.
We'll talk about their precision another time, but we are quantizing the base model down to four bits.
Um, and that's it's confusing because the name Laura sounds like it sounds like it's saying like quantized
Laura or something.
What you're quantizing is the base model.
The Laura matrices are separate.
So those are two important, uh, qualifiers to this.
But now with that, you know all about quantization and you know all about Q Laura.
167 - Well, this is a nice surprise.
We're not in Cursa.
We've gone to Google Colab.
This week is mostly except for one lab.
I'm going to be in Google Colab, and I'm here looking at Colab for week seven, day one.
And you may be thinking to yourself, where do I find this link to the Colab?
There are many places where you will find the link to the Skylab.
One of them is just by going in cursor to the week seven, day one.
In that day one lab in in the repo.
I've got a link to here.
I've also got a link in the readme, and anywhere else where I can think of putting the link.
It should be quite easy to find a link, but you could always start by going to the week seven day one.
Find a link to Colab.
This Colab is the new week seven day one Q Laura.
Intro.
As we dig in to Q Laura matrices, models and all that good stuff.
And here we are in Colab.
And just first of all, a few things to remind you about.
Now on the top right in Colab, you hopefully remember from week three we're looking at this, you can
choose a runtime type and we want to be on a T4 change runtime type, make sure that T4 is selected.
Doesn't need to be high Ram.
This is the free box that you get for free with Google.
As long as you have a Google account, that's all you need, which is also free.
Uh, so you can use this for free, but you do need to be on a T4.
And the other thing to remind you is that you may find while you're doing stuff that you get this strange
runtime error Cuda is required, but not available for bits and bytes.
And just remember, that's a common thing.
It doesn't mean you need to do any Pip installs or imports, it means you need to disconnect and delete
the runtime.
Start again from the top, including this first line here that installs, uh, bits and bytes.
But if you don't start with a new instance and do that from the top, then you won't be able to get
around this problem.
It happens when Google transparently swaps your hardware from under you and in a lower spec box because
they ran out of capacity or something, and then you can't just keep going from where you are.
You have to go back up to the top.
Hopefully you remember that.
Uh, and one other thing to remember.
Uh, I'm sorry, uh, but just one more thing.
And that is this business about your hugging face key that hopefully, again, you did this in week
three, but over here is this little key symbol.
When you press here, you should see that any keys you've ever set up in Colab should be here.
You just have to enable this or it may already be enabled for you.
Um, and make sure that that hugging face token is available for this lab or it will prompt you when
you get there and you take that hugging face token from your hugging face account.
There is actually a link later on in this lab, and with that you are set up.
You are ready.
You are hopefully now connected.
You've you've maybe gone to runtime and said restart session or, or you just press the connect button
up here so that you are on a T4 box.
The way you check is you go here and you go to view resources and you can see that you, uh, have a
nice T4 box with a GPU with 15GB.
Look, I need to restart my session here so that we're starting from scratch.
Restart session?
Yes.
So make sure that we've got a totally empty Ram.
You can see I've got three active sessions, and I'm spending lots because I'm doing lots of things
right now.
But you hopefully only have the one active session which is this.
Okay.
Good to go.
Let's get started.
Okay.
And the first thing to do always is to run this line here this pip install the first cell shift enter
to run it of course.
Um by the way minus Q means quiet.
So it doesn't give you tons and tons of output.
And minus minus upgrade means it gets the latest version of bits and bytes, which is the package that
deals with quantization.
A funny name, bits and bytes.
Uh, and then we've got a whole ton of imports here, which, uh, and I don't know that all of these
are necessary, but maybe I could trim this back a bit, but but anyway, a bunch of imports that includes
importing transformers, the famous library from hugging face that we first explored in week three.
And now there's lots of constants that we're going to be to be playing with here.
Uh, the first constant is a constant called the base model, which is the model that we're going to
be using as our, as the base model that we will be fine tuning this week.
And we are choosing llama 3.2.
The 3 billion variant of it.
If you wish, you can choose any different base model that feels about the right size for you.
Similar kind of size.
Similar sizes of Gemma perhaps or Phi or deep seq.
Um, and they should all do great.
This one of course, needs you to be approved for access, which we did in week three.
If you skip week three and you shouldn't skip week three, it's great.
But if you did, then you'll now need to go and request approval for llama, and you might want to go
back and watch the week three videos if you don't know how to do that.
Alternatively, you could always use Kwan uh from Alibaba Cloud, which which has a much.
I don't think they have any approval process at all.
Or if they do, it's very quick and streamlined.
Any of those models will do great as well.
Llama is most common in industry.
Meta really did a great job of bringing this to industry quickly.
So I do focus on this here for you so that you can use the one that you're most likely to find in practice.
Okay, so I forget if I ran the constants, but now I've run this.
What else?
Light mode.
You remember, light mode is true.
If you want to just just use the simple data set the short data set false if you want to go the whole
massive great data set.
Although we will, we will do a little bit of looking at both right now.
So we're now going to and here this fine tuned model thing here, this is pointing to a model which
I have already fine tuned.
And so I'm sort of diving ahead.
This is looking ahead into the future.
The reason I do this I just want to show you the layers of it.
But you don't need to.
Obviously we're going to build we're going to do some fine tuning ourselves.
So you don't need to worry that you won't have one of these just yet, but it's public, so you should
be able to just use it as it is.
Okay, so now I'm now logging into hugging face.
This relies on me having given access.
If you haven't done, you'll get a little pop up that says Grant access to your hugging face token and
you say yes, and you'll now be logged in to hugging face.
Okay, we are now going to just look at different versions of the llama 3.2 model at different levels
of quantization.
So this is the way we first load in llama.
Um, we're passing in this base model and we're going to load it in.
We did this before in week three.
So this is somewhat familiar to you.
It's now downloading onto this box the llama 3.2 model.
And wham up goes our GPU memory.
It's using up like 12GB of Ram right away.
And uh, we are going to let this run.
And when it's completed, we're going to print the memory footprint.
And then we're going to look at the model itself, which we did before, once in week three, uh, just
to remind ourselves about the different layers of the neural network.
Um, okay.
That seems to have run and run fast for me because, um, since I last, um, even though I restarted
this kernel, it's running on a box that was already running, and I ran this once before.
The first time you run it, it takes about two minutes.
All right, now I'm going to print the memory footprint, and it takes up 12.9GB of memory.
Uh, most of that is on the GPU right now.
And so that that is the, uh, the size of it.
And now we're going to dig into the base model itself.
Okay.
So let's print the base model.
And here's what it looks like.
When you print it you get to see all of the layers of the neural network.
It is a it is PyTorch set object with a series of layers, just like the neural network that we built
a few days ago.
Well, just like it, but but uh, but more uh, so we looked at this briefly in week three.
So some of this should be familiar to you.
There is like an embedding layer.
There are then 28 sets of these Lama decoder layers.
And they each have self-attention followed by MLP, multi-layer perceptron, and that then goes into
layernorm and then into smaller norm.
And then, uh, that's, that's basically it.
And then head at the very end of it.
And you remember back in week three, I gave you some links for more reading, should you wish to dig
in a bit deeper, you could look back on that.
You could also simply paste this into ChatGPT and say, walk me through the architecture of llama.
Explain each bit if you want to get a bit deeper.
And generally I want to be gradually sort of getting you deeper into this as we go through the course.
So the layers of a neural network like this, they are each sets of these things called neurons, these,
these algorithms that are basically like they're doing a little linear regression calculation, just
a weighted sum, and then they're putting it through some kind of function called the non-linearity,
which in the case of llama is a selu function right there, which also I think I gave a link to before,
uh, the, the way that this is implemented, because doing these linear regressions is basically doing
a bunch of multiplies and adds, it essentially turns out to be just a matrix calculation.
Each layer is basically just doing some matrix multiplies.
And that's that's just the way to implement all of these linear regressions in parallel.
It's it's again from my YouTube videos.
It's like doing lots of of mixing of mixing boards all in parallel.
And a matrix is a fast way of doing that.
And that's why these things all run on on matrix calcs and why they're very fast on GPUs, because GPUs
are designed to do lots of matrix calculations, very fast in parallel originally so they could show
games, uh, build, build each of the screens of a refresh of a screen when you're projecting a 3D
world into the 2D with polygons and stuff.
Lots of matrix calcs.
So each of these layers involves doing having a matrix of and there's some, some level, some number
of dimensions that is the, the input to this layer and some number of dimensions.
That's the output.
And it contains matrices with parameters to be able to to to create those outputs from the inputs.
And so this very first layer, the embedding matrix has this many input dimensions 128,000 input dimensions.
And that's, that's that's 128,000 different numbers go in.
And what goes out is just 3072 dimensions.
And that's that's the main, that's the sort of inner dimensionality of the llama model.
So so looking at that, you might be wondering, so what on earth is in this 128,000 dimensions?
And the answer is very simple.
So actually this is used to pass in the tokens, the tokens that are in the input sequence for the model
and the tokens.
You may remember for llama, there are in fact 128,256 different possible values of that token.
Uh, that's that's the token index.
And if you're if you're following all this and don't worry if you're not, but if you are, you might
say, well, hang on, why isn't that just one dimension?
It's one number which can take that many different values.
Why isn't it just a one dimension that gets passed in and 3000 dimensions comes out of this embedding
layer?
And the answer is this ties back to something I just said when we were, I think it was just a couple
of days ago that neural networks they like to have as their inputs things called one hot vectors, which
are vectors with just zero and one, not with not with multiple numbers.
And so the token is turned into a one hot matrix vector, which is zeros everywhere except the location
that represents this token, where it is a one.
So if your if token index number one is the word and then the vector would be 100000 and 128,000 zeros.
If the first token is the word yes and that's and that's number two, then you'd get like 010000 for
128,000 zeros.
So the input tokens are turned into this one hot vector, which is 128,000 dimension vector with just
a single one somewhere in there.
And the embedding layer is responsible for taking this enormous one hot vector of lots of zeros and
a single one, and then compressing it into something with 3000 dimensions, which is the embedding
vector for that token.
And that's what the embedding layer does, the first layer of the llama model.
And that's perhaps more detail than you needed.
But but I thought for those that are interested, I wanted to give that perspective again.
Paste this into your favorite LLM if you want to go deeper on what this means, and you can then look
through the other dimensionality and remember that this is how many dimensions come in and how many
dimensions come out.
And so you can see that there are four different kinds of layers in the attention layer.
I remember again, we did speak this briefly in week three, but there's the Q, the K, the V and O
for output.
Uh, the the query, the key, the value and the outputs.
And they have 3000 dimensions in.
And then some of them have 1000 dimensions out.
Um, and the final output ends up with 3000 dimensions.
Um, and that that is the self-attention and the MLP you can see has, has a gate which is 3000 in 8000
out and then up like breaks, takes, takes the 3000 dimensions and explodes it out to 8000 and down
takes the 8000 and brings it back to 3000 again.
And that's the the MLP set of layers.
Um, and all of this together is done 28 times.
Um, and then has an LLM head and that has the input features, the 3000 inner dimensions.
The output features again is 128,000 dimensions.
That's what's coming out of the very end.
And what is that.
Can you imagine?
What do you think that might be?
What?
What goes in this 128,000 dimensions each.
Each one of those dimensions is the representing the probability that that token number is going to
be the next token to follow the input.
That's what comes out of the output.
So this may be more detail than you're expecting.
It's more detail than you need.
It's just important to get some intuition for what you're seeing here.
Look through this get a sense of it, put it in ChatGPT or your favorite LLM.
Get a feel for what it means to have these different layers and the different dimensionality.
It's not like you need to know all of this to be an AI engineer, but it helps to have some intuition
for what's going on.
And once you've done that, and once you've you've experimented a bit, restart your session by going
runtime restart session so that we clear everything out.
We need to get this GPU Ram back down and then come back up to the top again.
And I will see you for the next video to look at the same thing, but quantized.
168 - Okay.
And so you've restarted your session.
Your GPU Ram has come down to zero.
Come back to the top.
You need to run this pip install at the top.
Otherwise you'll get that funny, uh, error about bits and bytes.
Rerun the imports, rerun the constants, and then scroll past what we did.
Oh sorry.
And login talking face.
Uh, and then scroll down, uh, and, uh, come back down to here to this cell which says load the
base model using eight bit.
And this is where we set this quant config, which is a bits and bytes object, where we say load in
eight bit is true.
And then we have, other than that the same the same code to load in the base model.
But we pass in that quant config.
So we're doing that.
So it's now going to load it in.
And as it loads it in it converts it down from each of the parameters which, which generally have 16
bits are coming down to eight bits.
And let's have a look.
The previous memory footprint was Point nine gigabytes.
That's how large it was.
So what we want to know is how large is it going to be after we have taken this down to just an eight
bit version of it?
And we're also going to print the base model again to see how that looks, to get a good handle on the
base model.
And I will see you in a second when this is loaded for me.
Okay.
So that's loaded.
We have got our base model here.
It's uh, now an eight bit version.
The memory footprint is much smaller.
It's 3.6GB.
And if we look at it here, you will see that we've we've printed it out.
It looks it looks very similar.
Do you see any differences here.
Same architecture.
But you'll see that these layers have been replaced with a linear eight bit.
Here it was linear and now it says linear eight bit.
It's been reduced in precision.
The base model is smaller.
Um, but otherwise it is basically exactly the same, uh, same architecture, lower precision in the
weights they click through 256 possible values instead.
Okay.
And with that, it's time to restart the session once more to free up the GPU.
Restart the session.
Uh, yes.
And then come back up to the top again and uh, back up at the top again.
Run the pip installs, run the imports, run the constants, log in to hugging face, and then come
and join me.
Go past the first thing we did.
Go past the eight bit variant.
Restart the session.
Here we are.
It's time to load the tokenizer and base model using four bit.
And this is the bits and bytes config that we use.
All right.
So this quant config is where we we describe how we want to bring this model all the way down to four
bits load.
And four bit is true means we do four bits.
Use double quant is like an extra trick it uses to do this.
This pass of quantizing twice that shaves off a little bit more space, so it's even more efficient.
And people like to do this.
This is saying when you're running compute, there are a couple of different ways to do it.
You can you can use a couple of different data types.
And this one, the binary float16 is one that's particularly fast on this kind of GPU.
Actually, we'll switch between them depending on which GPU you have.
When we get our final version of the code, and this one here is saying okay, so we're going to reduce
it down to just four bits to 16 possible values.
But how do we decide how to map those 16 possible values to to to actual numbers.
And Ncf4 is a particular methodology for doing that, which is by far the most popular one.
And this is the one that works really well.
And it sort of tries to associate 16 possible values with where it's likely that numbers might be in
the whole floating point space.
So this just basically gives you a configuration which can very efficiently change the precision of
the entire Lama based model down to just four bits.
And I really should have run this while I was talking.
Uh, but there we go.
We're now going to do this.
We're going to load it in, and you're going to see that the GPU, Ram as well.
You already saw last time it only blipped up by a little bit.
We didn't need to restart the the kernel.
Probably.
If you didn't then you probably found that for yourself.
We're now loading it in in four bits.
And then we will print the memory footprint and the base model one more time.
And here we have the memory footprint is all the way down at 2.2GB.
It's really small.
And here we've printed the the neural network architecture.
Again it's the same architecture, the same setup of the layers.
But you'll see that we've been we've replaced these layers with four bit linear layers inside here as
we've reduced the precision all the way down.
That's what quantization did.
It turned it all the way down to this very small level of precision.
Okay.
And then the final thing we're going to do is load in the fine tuned model.
This is like a peek into the future.
We're going to build this fine tuned model in the next few days, but I've done it already, so I'm
just going to load in the one that I made earlier.
Uh, and uh, this is how you do it.
This this, um, library model stands for parameter efficient fine tuning.
And it's, uh, hugging face name for their library that implements Lora.
So we are loading in a base model and some llama, some Lora matrices on top of that.
So that is what I'm now loading in.
So this is now it's the four bit model, this 2.2GB version of our model but with some extra parameters
loaded in.
So how big is this.
The total size is 2.27GB.
So it's this 2.2GB with like 70MB of extra stuff and that extra stuff.
That's where the magic happens.
The extra stuff are the Lora matrices.
Okay.
Let's see these Lora matrices.
We can print the fine tuned model and take a breath, because there's quite a lot to it.
Here it is.
Let's take a look.
Now it fits on more than one page.
I might need to zoom out so you can see all of this.
Zoom out again.
Oh my goodness.
Uh, well, hopefully you can see this on your screen.
There's a there's a fair bit to take in here.
Uh, and let's just, just spend a second to look through this.
So at first blush, there's definitely some a lot of similarity.
It's it's the same as what we were looking at before at a high level.
But inside there's a lot more detail.
So you can see that the, the, uh, the base model that's now called a Lora model, it's still it's
still llama.
It's still got the same embedding layer, same thing there.
And then here comes the 28 llama decoder layers.
All right.
And here's the self-attention section right here.
And now remember self-attention has the Q, the k, the V and the O.
Each of those are quite a lot bigger.
Now they've got the same linear four bit layer we had before.
But they've now got a Laura A and a Laura B.
These are the two Laura matrices that get multiplied together in order to be able to be added to the
to the base layer, but multiplied by that alpha scaling factor if you're following.
If you remember all this, and I would suggest that you dig in and look at the dimensionality.
So in this case this is a very typical Laura setup I've got here.
Where are the dimensions of the Laura matrix.
R is 3232 dimensions.
So what you'll see here is that Lama has 3000 dimensions in 3000 dimensions out in its Q proj.
So if you dig into Laura A and Laura B, you'll see that the Laura A is 3000 dimensions in and 32 out,
and Laura B is 32 in and 3000 dimensions out.
And so you can you can do do all of the, the the maths if you remember your matrix maths.
But if you've got a matrix which has that kind of shape and a matrix with this kind of shape, and you
multiply them together.
You have something with this kind of shape that you can just add it to it.
That's how it works.
That's why Laura is training two small matrices, one that's kind of looking like that, and one that's
kind of looking like that.
And when they get multiplied together, you get one big matrix that can get added after scaling up by
alpha, just giving you the intuition for what's happening.
This is the mathematical trick that allows us to to just train these small Laura and Laura B matrices
and have them affect adapt the bigger Lama matrix.
And we're doing that for each of these for for q, for k for V and for O.
And we're not touching the MLP.
And then that is the end of it.
That is Q Laura, uh, the Laura part and the Q part in action in a fine tuned model.
Again, get the intuition.
And if you want to go deeper, put it into your favorite LM, get it to dig into it.
You can also look at the actual hugging face code to get a sense for how this neural network is constructed.
And as a final thing I want to do, I just want to do some quick matrix maths to show you something.
So the the most common Q Laura setup, and the one that we'll use for our light training if you have
light mode is true.
That's the training you want to do, which is a pretty standard stuff.
The training data size is 20,000.
And as a rule of thumb, people often say that that's should be your sort of starting point for doing
Laura fine tuning like this.
Although there's no you should experiment.
Sometimes way fewer data can do great.
Um, so, ah, the inner dimension is 32.
That's the common value.
And you'll remember that 32 is indeed the inner dimensions you see right here.
So with R is 32, how many parameters are there in our Q Laura setup?
Well you can take a look at the different different matrices in that in that neural network you'll see
that q, k, v and O the four attention layers.
We've added these size matrices.
So that's how many parameters in total are in those matrices.
So that sums up.
And it's the most standard default with Q that your target modules are the self-attention layers.
That's very common.
So it's very common to start with q v and o.
And so if we add up the total number of parameters each Laura layer would have the sum of these four.
There are 28 layers.
So I have to multiply that by 28.
Remember that with with with Q Laura, while you quantize the base model you don't quantize the Laura
matrices.
They are full 32 bit numbers.
So we multiply that by four for four bytes and divide that by a million.
Just so we get things in megabytes.
This would be the total size of our Laura matrix of our setup.
There will be a total of 18 million parameters and that will be 73MB worth of data.
169 - Okay, so to recap, we've just been digging into how many parameters would be in this Lora matrix and
this classic case of when we are looking at applying Lora to the attention layers, the V and O layers,
and we have an R of 32, those inner dimensions.
And we've added up that we'd have 18 million parameters and it would take up 73MB of space.
And 18 million is a lot of parameters for sure.
That's a big number.
But but remember the llama model has 3 billion parameters.
So this is dramatically smaller than Llama and Llama.
Remember the original llama was like 12GB large.
This is just 17MB.
And that 17 number might be familiar to you.
Because if you remember, we said that the memory footprint was 2.27GB of the whole thing, and the
original non quantized model was 2.2GB.
And the difference between those two numbers is 17MB.
So it works.
It really works.
The difference there are these extra parameters that have come from this maths right here.
Uh, and just to really prove it works.
I have one more thing to show you.
Check this out.
I'm going to go into hugging face and I'm going to show you this is the the model that we were just
looking at.
This is a fine tuned model saved in hugging face.
When you're looking at a model in hugging face, you can always flip to the files and versions tab.
I'm just I'm just in the models right now.
This is this is my model that we were just looking at there.
And if I look at the files themselves, there is a file called adapter model tensors.
And that's the file to look for.
That is actually the Q Laura the Laura matrices saved in this directory.
You don't need to do this.
I do this just to prove to you that the actual size of this on disk is 73.4MB worth of data.
That's what we're going to train later this week.
You're going to have this number.
And I just want to take this moment to show you that 73.4 remember that number 73.4.
There it is 73.4.
It is.
It's really the case that it's these matrices that we're building.
These are the parameters.
And that's what gets saved in hugging face.
Uh and so this is uh Hopefully making things more concrete for you.
You could really see the reality behind it.
But but this is if you wish to go the light route, I'm going to be going also the heavy route of training
a big model with all 800,000 data points, and I can afford to splash out and have slightly beefier
Cultura matrices, Lora matrices.
And I'm going to go a bit crazy here.
This is extreme.
You don't normally find tune with such a big data set.
Um, but we're gonna and so I'm going to try having R at 256.
Again a power of two.
You always have powers of two.
Um, but, uh r of 256.
That's definitely higher than people normally do, but 800,000 is more data than people usually use.
So I feel like it's worth it.
Um, and so if we work out what that does, that's going to mean that R is going to be a higher number.
This is the same calculation as before for our attention layers.
I'm also I'm not only going to target the attention layers, I'm also going to target the MLP layers.
Uh and that's something which, which which is common for when you're doing more training.
You've got more data, you target as much as you can.
And so if we add all of that up, we times it by 28 for the number of these these stacked decoder layers.
Um, and then times that by four for four bytes, um, in a, in a 32 bit number.
And then let's print that out and see how much this will take.
So this is then going to have 389 million parameters.
So it's a lot more parameters.
It's still ten times less than llama has.
You know we're still just a 10% of the size of the big model.
But it's definitely a bigger model.
And it's going to be 1.1.55, six gigabytes worth of data that we're going to have on disk.
So it is going to be a bigger model.
And that's going to be the meatier one that I will train as well to show you the full one.
And if you wish, you could do that too, if this sort of thing pleases you, but the light one will
do just fine as well.
And just to to show you this as well in the full format.
This is a model that I've saved the full model.
And you can see here that the total size of all of the adapter models safe tensors is 1.56GB.
Remember that number 1.56GB.
There it is.
Same number.
That's what it is.
It's 1.5GB 1.56GB, which is all of this stuff right here that's being saved.
And so that's giving you a real tangible sense of what does it mean to do?
Q Laura, with a model, what does it actually look like under the hood?
And how does this map to the actual parameters that we train and then get saved to disk, and how they
actually get applied to to adapt your model?
Great.
Let's go back to the slides to wrap and to remind you.
Then we we started out by saying that the original llama 3.2, uh, was at 13GB worth of data associated
with that when we slammed it down to eight bits, uh, we went all the way down to 3.6GB worth of data
that we had to load in there.
When we reduced it down to four bits, it was 2.2GB of data.
It's much, much smaller.
But during Q Laura fine tuning, when we're only fine tuning the Laura matrices, we're not having to
fine tune 2.2GB worth of data.
It's just 73MB.
That's all it is when R is 32, when we're not going crazy.
Uh, and, uh, it's just worth noting that that they represent 32 bit numbers.
There's just way fewer of them.
And that's why in total, it comes to just 73MB worth of data to be trained.
That's the sizes that we're looking at here.
Hopefully this now all feels very real to you.
As I say, it's not important that you fully understand about the layers of neural network and the matrices
and so on.
It's just good to have that intuition because it's going to mean things will start to click.
And if you do know this stuff already, then hopefully some of this was interesting and you've dug in
more and you could probably, uh, like, like, you know, I've oversimplified a few things, but but
it's all basically in the spirit of what we're doing.
And with that, well, this is this has been a real day of, of getting deeper, more, more advanced,
more pro because now some of the stuff that you've already been able to do is like like solving, solving,
uh, APIs and open source problems is easy for you now.
Tools, assistants and even rag with with the lang chain one zero or not with lang chain.
But you can also curate data, make a baseline model, fine tune a frontier model with disappointing
results in our case.
Um, but now you can also explain.
Q Laura, you know about the Q part and the Laura part, you understand, hopefully got good intuition
about how that translates to actual parameters and the size on disk.
And you also know about the target modules R and Alpha three critical hyperparameters.
And indeed, if you're thinking when I was talking earlier about about targeting the self-attention
layers or targeting the MLP, the multi-layer perceptron layers as your target modules, and you might
be thinking, okay, so so how do we know what's the formula for knowing when we use which?
Uh, and of course, you know, the answer to that is the answer is the original formula.
It's a hyperparameter, which means that you have to do some hyperparameter optimization, which basically
means Yes.
It's trial and error.
You run some experiments, you try some target modules.
You see what happens.
Good rule of thumb.
Start with the attention layers.
Start with those four attention layers that I had there.
That's where people almost always start.
If you need more juice, more, more explanatory power, then you often add in the MLP layers.
There are some situations when you want to add in the ML header.
The LM ahead as well, but they're quite rare.
That's when you want to perhaps output something that has a particular format, which is different,
and you'd want to do some training there.
Um, but but these are just rules of thumb.
The most important way to get the right target modules is to experiment and find out what performs best
with your eval metric.
No shortcut to experimenting.
And with that, experimenting is what we're going to do next time.
We are going to do a little bit more data set stuff.
We have to prepare our data set for fine tuning.
We're going to look at the base model we'll be using, and we'll evaluate it against the business objective.
And then we get to the juiciest moment of all.
So so yeah this week is really, really exciting I can't wait.
I'll see you tomorrow.
170 - Welcome to week seven, day two.
No time for preamble.
We got to get straight to it.
We got a cracking day in store today.
We get into proprietary models.
We really get into building what, as people say, building our own model.
Although of course it's fine tuning an open source model.
You know what you can do already working with frontier and open source models.
Five step strategy.
And now Q Laura, this is old hat.
Today we're actually going to get to doing some.
We're not going to do fine tuning yet, but we're going to be absolutely poised for it starting tomorrow.
And it begins by us polishing off our data set so that it's just perfectly ready for fine tuning.
So let's go and do that right now.
We're going to go back to cursor.
First of all no time for slides straight to cursor.
See you for day two okay so here we go.
We go into week seven.
We go into day two.
We are looking now at doing some final massaging to our data sets to make it perfect for fine tuning.
The order of play is given here.
So you know what we're doing this week.
We're going to start with some imports.
You will have had to set the kernel if you hadn't already.
Start with some imports okay.
And we're going to start by going through with the light data set, the simple quick light data set.
We log in to hugging face.
And now we're going to load in.
This is the same code you're used to doing when we load from the hub.
The 20,000 training data points.
There they are okay.
So what we're now going to do is load in the base model llama 3.23 B.
And we're going to to set up a tokenizer loading the tokenizer for this base model.
And let's just calculate with this in mind how many tokens will we have in each of our each of our different
items.
And let's just plot that.
Let me show you what I mean.
Basically, if we turn our text into tokens, we get different numbers of tokens with each of our different
data points.
Some of them have more tokens, some of them have less.
You may remember before there was a chart which which was cut at 4000 characters.
When we were looking at the length of these bits of text.
This is what it's like when we turn it into tokens.
The vast majority have less than like like 100 tokens in them, but there is a tail and the highest
has 245 tokens.
A lot more so there is quite, quite a long tail there.
Now, when you're running fine tuning, you have to set up in advance what is the maximum number of
tokens in any of the training data?
Because it's going to have to build like it's going to have to be able to support anything up to that
much.
And the amount of memory that you use up on the GPU is it's linear.
It's a proportion to the to the maximum sequence length that you need to support.
So basically, it's quite problematic to say that we could have up to 245 different different characters,
different tokens in our inputs.
That means that it will have to reserve memory for lots of space and all of the inputs that don't reach
that amount.
245 get padded with a special pad character, and as a result, we use up all of this memory with pad
characters, and that's a big waste of memory and it slows down training.
So it's kind of sensible for us to cut off at some point and say that, look, let's, let's pick a
number like 110.
Let's say anything that has more than 110 tokens, we will cut it at the 110 point.
Uh, and so if I were to do that, that means that out of my 20,000 data points, 1255 of them would
get chopped towards the end, and that's about 5% or so, 5.7%.
And this this is something that, uh, there's there's no easy answer to this.
Again, there's no formula for this.
This is a like a hyperparameter.
It is a hyperparameter.
You can experiment with this.
Having a letting in more data potentially means that you can you can give more information to train
on.
So it gives more rich data sets for your training.
But it uses up much more memory, which slows down how much training you can do at any given amount
of time.
So there's a trade off, and that trade off is something to experiment with.
and my instinct of doing this for a while is that this is perfectly reasonable.
I've also printed a bunch of these that got cut off to satisfy myself, that most of the interesting
and important content comes early on in the description, because you remember the way that we write
these things.
If I print one out, hang on.
Just remind you what they look like.
Uh, let's let's just take, like, um, uh, items.
Uh, sorry.
We should take the train.
Training data.
Zero summary.
This is what.
This is what we're looking at here.
Uh, so let me print that for you.
So what what we're seeing, um, is something which has the title, category, brand description.
All this is bound to be within the first 110 characters.
And some amount of the detail might get truncated in 5.7% of the cases, it's getting truncated.
So it feels like that's probably not going to be taking important signal away from the model, but it
allows us to be much more efficient with training.
So 110 is the one I've picked to be at 5.7%, and it means we can train really efficiently.
You could experiment with changing this number and see what you get.
Typically, changing your data set is one of the most powerful ways to impact performance.
It's not the most glamorous of hyperparameters.
People like to explore R and Alpha and all sorts of other things.
Learning rates, lots of things that people explore.
This kind of data related hyperparameter might feel less attractive.
It often makes an enormous difference.
Um, and particularly for me, it made a big difference to make this a smaller number, because I was
able to get much more training done in the same time frame by being quite, quite tight with how much
data I allow in.
So 110 is that's what we're going to do.
And now we're going to craft a data set with that cut off.
So I've got this function here make prompts which is in the items module.
And let's just quickly take a look at what Make Prompts does.
Here it is.
It's got make prompts and it takes a tokenizer.
It takes a maximum number of tokens.
And it has this thing do round which is whether or not to to round the number.
Uh, let me show you what this means.
Um, so I'm first of all, turning, turning the summary.
I start with the summary, I turn it into tokens, and if it's got too many tokens, more than maximum
tokens, then I truncate it at maximum tokens and I turn that back into English again.
Otherwise I just stick with with the summary.
If it's if it's within max tokens.
Okay.
And now I build something called self dot prompt a prompt.
And that is going to be question.
And then the summary and then prefix.
What is that.
Here we go.
Question what does this cost to the nearest dollar.
And the prefix is price is dollar.
And that is what's going to turn into the prompt.
It's going to say what does this cost to the nearest dollar.
And then some stuff and then price is and then the, the actual outcome.
Uh, so uh, that is what we're putting into, um, into the prompt.
So it says price is dollar and then we're not including the actual outcome.
That's what the model is going to want to try and put there.
That's what it's going to be trained to get good at doing.
So that's what we're doing in in in in self prompt for Self-completion.
We're actually putting in the price itself.
And there's just this little, little thing I'm doing here that for Self-completion if, if we're if
we're building the training data, then I do round it to the nearest whole number, because I want to
train a model to just be able to predict the price to within the nearest cent.
And now you may wonder why I'm doing that.
Why not have it predicted all the way to, to to cents?
And there's a subtle reason for that that I will get to in a minute.
But if we're building the test data set, then I want it to have the actual final price, because on
my testing we want to test it always against the true price.
So this is what make prompts does.
And to make that real for you, let's actually run it and see what we get.
So here we go I'm going to run this.
I'm running make prompts and I'm rounding for the training and validation data.
But I'm not rounding for the test data okay.
So let's have a look at one of these.
Let's let's look at the prompt and the completion.
Let's start by looking at that just for the for the very first test item.
So for the first test item it's what does this cost.
The prompt is what does this cost to the nearest dollar.
This is our favorite distortion pedal from old blood noise.
Here it is.
Price is dollar.
And that's what the model is going to be trained to put.
It's going to complete this and completion.
There is the price and it is rounded to the nearest dollar.
Uh that is all we have there.
So this this is what it is being trained to do.
It's being trained to try and get good at this.
Uh, so that is the prompt and the completion.
And now let's look at, uh, what does this look like if we go for a training item.
Actually let's look at test number one.
Because actually of course this is a you'll see that because we're looking at the test data set.
This is not rounded.
This is showing you the true number the true price.
Um but here here again is the um.
Uh, what does this cost to the nearest dollar?
That is the description of the first test item.
Let's go for the second test item.
That's the prompt.
What does this cost?
The nearest dollar.
That's the completion.
Okay.
And now let's look at some training data.
Training data.
We're expecting to see something very similar except we'll see that the title what what does this cost
the nearest dollar.
There we see this completion.
And there 64.00 is what shows here.
And let's go for training item one.
And you'll see what this cost.
The nearest dollar a mini electric air duster fan electronics price is dollar.
The completion 79.00.
So run this for a few examples of the training and test data, and get a sense for what is the prompt
that we're putting in there, and what is the completion.
And the reason we're crafting the data this way is that we are going to be fine tuning a model, so
that when it's given this prompt, it is most likely to provide this as the completion as the most likely
next token to come.
171 - So to summarize again, we have now written something which can produce two bits of text for each of
our items.
One is called the prompt and one is called the completion.
And the prompt has like a question what does this cost to the nearest dollar?
And then the description of the item, the summary and the completion has the price.
And we've done it this way because we want to do fine tuning and teach a model how, when it's given
this prompt, it should complete it with this completion.
And we're organizing our data in this very efficient way.
Um, and one of the things I said I would come back to and explain is why exactly is it that for the
training data, I've done this business of just putting it rounded to the nearest dollar, and I've
put cost to the nearest dollar here, and, and for the, for the test data, I'm going with the, with
the full number.
What's, what's up with that.
Well well here's the thing.
So first up recognize that if the model is able to get prices to within the nearest dollar, then we've
done a terrific job.
It's if it's within $1 of the true price That's good enough for what we're trying to work with here.
We're currently our best model right now is out by by $44.74.
That would be GPT five.
So you know getting to within a dollar is terrific.
Um, and but when we're doing our test data, when we're testing and comparing it so that we're comparing
apples with apples with our previous experiments, we want to make sure we're always testing against
the true price.
And that's why for the test data, we're not we're not messing around.
We're not going to round anything.
We're going to go with the true price.
But for training I'm doing this rounding.
And why is that?
Well, here's the thing.
We're trying to teach a model to get good at predicting prices.
And we want to focus our energy on the most important part of that teaching, which is figuring out
roughly how much it costs.
And we're this is basically it's like a regression kind of problem for people, for data scientists.
We're doing something that's trying to predict a number, but we're using next token prediction as a
way of doing it.
We're trying to take a model that knows about natural language and asking it to come up with something
which is more numeric.
And that's a sort of interesting thing to be doing, because the model doesn't have built into it any
sense that the difference between numbers or like a decimal point and things like that, the model just
is thinking about what's the most likely next token.
So in order to be able to get the best out of the model and not have it be, be worried about things
that don't matter as much.
It's better for us to train it.
Focusing on the real number, the amount of dollars.
Because if we train it on the dollars and cents, then when it's trying to generate tokens, as far
as it's concerned, getting the number of cents right would be just as important as getting the number
of dollars.
Right.
Because it's the loss is calculated based on which tokens it basically gets.
Right.
So we'd be training something where it's motivated just as much to get the actual number of cents right
as getting it.
Whether it's $10 or $100 would be just as important as whether it's $0.10 or $0.99.
At the end.
And that would be a waste.
That would be silly.
We'd be we'd be giving it all the wrong kinds of of of loss calculations.
So.
So that's the reason that I do this.
I want to focus training on getting the right number of dollars.
I don't want to distract the model training it with the number of cents.
And if you didn't do this, this, this rounding trick, you might have you might think, well, I might
not have thought of that.
What would have happened?
It would be fine.
It would still work.
You'd still get outcomes.
But I believe training it this way, you'd find to be much more efficient.
It will more quickly hone in on doing a good job of predicting whole dollars.
So again, it's like a hyperparameter.
You can experiment with these different prompts.
You could try taking out the nearest dollar and not doing the rounding.
And I think you'd find it would take longer to train.
It wouldn't be as productive.
Uh, but that's an example of just a good trick to focus training on the right thing.
And this was, you know, it's not super important that we go into it, but I did want you to have that
perspective.
And it's the kind of decision that one makes as a data scientist.
Uh, experimentally, empirically, you try one, you try the other and you say, okay, this, this
achieves a better outcome faster.
Let's do that.
Okay.
The other thing we did, of course, when we ran this is we truncated the input.
We made sure that it was never more than 110 tokens.
But we also added on a little bit of stuff as well.
We added on this question and we added on the price is dollar.
So actually it's the maximum number isn't going to be 110.
It's going to be a bit more than 110 because we've added on some more tokens.
So let's figure out what that actually is.
Let's let's count these things up.
Uh, find out the total number of, of um, of prompt tokens, including the question and the prices
dollar and the answer.
And let's now plot that.
And what we find is that the average is 101, the highest is 126.
So it's the 110 that we had.
And then another 16 tokens that went into that question and the dollar sign.
So 126 is now the longest sequence that we have here.
And when we go to to the actually doing training, I'm going to have to tell our trainer, The maximum
sequence length that it should reserve.
And I'm going to use 128.
I'm gonna use 128 because it's good to have a tiny buffer in case there are some extra tokens that get
shoved on.
For some reason, we never want to be truncating.
So I'm going to use 128, but I'm also going to use 128 because because it's a power of two and everyone
loves powers of two.
So we should do that.
We should have 188 as a power of two.
That makes great sense.
It makes me feel happy.
Relieved that we're going with a power of two.
Um.
You may.
I hate to to to confess the honest reality, which is that I did partly come up with that cutoff 110,
in order that I could have a power of two as my sequence length there is, is actually a real reason
why you might want it to be a power of two, because it does have to reserve the memory.
And it's probably good that when you're reserving memory that you have something that is a that is a
power of two.
But but it's mostly the superstition, like a data science superstition, that it just feels right to
have it be 128 is our maximum sequence length.
So that's silliness.
But that's what we do.
And then this final line here is going to push this data set to the hub.
But remember we started our first data set was called like items raw light.
And then when we made it pre-processed we changed that just to items light.
We've now got our final data set which is called Items Prompts light.
It is the prompts.
It is a data set which has two things in it.
It has prompt and it has completion.
And those two things are the two columns in our data that we're uploading.
And I didn't just choose them as it happens like like randomly to be prompt and completion.
Those are in fact the actual column names that hugging faces code expects by default.
When it's doing training, you can come up with others and you have to tell it, and there's some ways
to get to do that.
But if you choose prompt and completion, then out of the box hugging face expects that and will just
run with it.
And so that makes life easy.
That's why I did it.
You run this cell, I won't do it because I already did it.
And it will upload that data set targeting face.
And hopefully you did that and you have a nice light data set.
I'm now going to clear the outputs restart and I'm going to come back.
But this time I'm going to have light mode is false and I will run each of these cells.
I'm now going to be loading in the base model again, and the tokenizer and counting the tokens for
the entire full data set, and then plotting that chart.
But now it's going to take longer because we're not doing it for the 20,000 data points.
We're doing it for the 800,000 in our full data set.
So it's going to take a few seconds.
I will see you back with the chart of the tokens.
Uh, once this thing has has counted up in just a few minutes.
And here we have the number of tokens in our distribution of the full data set.
Now that it's loaded, the average is 86.6, quite similar to before.
The highest is totally crazy.
There's something in here with 4582 tokens in it.
And you might say, how can that be when when we, we truncated it at 4000 characters before?
How can something have that many tokens?
And I would suggest a quick exercise.
You can find this and have a look at it and you'll see that it's it's a pretty bizarre product that
has, uh, description that has tons of product, uh, numbers in it.
Uh, and each of them turn into lots of tokens.
And so it ends up being this enormous number of tokens, and it's mostly complete nonsense.
And so it's absolutely no problem whatsoever in truncating it.
And so again, we'll use this magic number 110 that I used some very important and complicated principles,
uh, trying to get to a power of two.
Uh, so, uh, we end up with, um, 47,000 items getting truncated out of our 800,000, which is again,
5.7%.
If we look at the first training item, it is this, um, bronze knob that we saw before.
And now we can go through and make the prompts for the full data set.
Remember, for the training and validation.
We're going to do this truncation, this this rounding thing where we we round the price to the nearest
dollar because we don't want to distract the model trying to train for cents, because that'll be a
waste of its effort trying to do that.
And it doesn't realize that we don't care about the sense we care about the dollars.
It will think that both of them are tokens, that it has to predict that it has to be correct.
But for the test data set, we are going to put the real number in there so that when we're doing our
test calculation, we're doing the same calculation that we did before.
We're not cheating and doing a different calculation when we do that.
So that's that's going to run.
And while it while it completes, let me just say one more thing about this, this business of, of
how we're using an LM to predict prices.
Again, this fact that it's that it's basically a regression kind of problem.
We're trying to do something to predict a number when token prediction is not actually a regression
problem.
For people that know about this terminology, When you're when you're running an LM to predict the most
likely next token, it's actually a classification problem.
It's actually something where the the neural network is trying to predict.
It's trying to bucket the next token.
The most likely next token fits into a different bucket.
And there are like 128,000 possible buckets.
And they represent each of the possible next tokens.
So it's giving a probability distribution.
It's saying I am classifying what is the most likely next token.
So in many ways it's trying to classify, uh, the price of an item into a bucket.
And there's a bin for all of the possible next tokens representing the price of the product.
Uh, and, um, yeah.
And so we don't want it to have to worry about classifying the sense that doesn't matter to us.
And that would be a waste of time.
We want it to focus on classifying the number of dollars and that that also final point on this, while
this finishes off, is that in the case of the Lama model, lama actually, uh, It has an interesting
thing with its tokenizing that all three digit numbers get mapped to one token.
One token in Lama.
Many other models it gets mapped to multiple tokens, but for Lama it only goes into one token.
All.
All numbers from 0 to 999 get one token.
And that means that actually the whole price of the product is reflected in one token prediction, which
is very convenient.
It's not necessary if you use Quen for this, it will also do very well.
But it means that lama is a particularly good model for this particular problem, because classifying
one token happens to to map to guessing a price between 0 and 999.
You are you are bucketing it into one of these price points.
So it's a it's a side note.
It's an interesting one.
It means that if you are thinking about whether to pick Lama or Phi or Gemma, you don't normally worry
about tokenization strategies because they don't tend to make a huge difference.
But in this case, that might be one reason why Lama gets the edge as the best model to pick for this
particular experiment.
172 - Okay, well, that finished and we can quickly print here to see the, uh, the.
This is just as before the first training prompt.
Actually, let's go back to the zero training item and see what that looks like.
This is the interior knob.
Uh, and here it is.
This is the prompt.
This is the completion rounded to the nearest dollar.
If we go instead to the zero test item, we'll see the prompt and the completion.
Again.
These are the two columns that hugging face expects.
And you'll see there's the prompt.
There is the completion.
Let's now just look at the whole of the distribution of tokens in this, so that we see whether or not
we are cutting off.
We hope to be cutting off at such a point that with a little buffer, we can be using maximum sequence
length of 128 for a power of two.
Let's see.
Okay.
It's finished.
Let's have a look.
Here is our chart.
The average 101.
And good news.
The highest is 126.
We can use a maximum sequence length of 128.
And feel good about our power of two.
And this will now upload that to Huggingface and we will be in great shape.
So we have now produced two data sets.
One is called uh items prompts light and one is called items Prompts Full.
These data sets, they only have two columns.
They have prompt and they have completion.
And that is the that is exactly what Huggingface expects.
And next we're going to go back to Colab and check out what what these data sets look like.
And sorry before we look in Colab, let's look in hugging face at these two data sets we just uploaded.
Start with with light.
So this is it.
In hugging face you'll see that that it is.
First of all, it's something which has three data sets.
It's got a split of train val and test 20,000, 1001 thousand.
So that means it's 22,000 rows in total.
This is what it looks like.
It has a prompt and a completion.
The prompt is things like what does this cost to the nearest dollar title category, description, brand.
That's that's the, uh, the prompt, the completion.
This this prompt ends with price is dollars.
And we're training a model to complete this, to give the next tokens.
And we want it to complete it with the tokens for 64.00.
And the reason that we're running everything up again is because we don't want to distract the model
trying to predict numbers of cents.
We'll just focus it on this, which conveniently in the case of llama, will always be one token.
Everything from 0 to 999 will just be a 1 to 1.
99 will just be the single token.
That's perfect.
That's the light data set.
And if I look at the test data set presumably.
Yeah, we'll see in here that it's the same except in the case the test data set.
We do in fact have the real numbers so that when we're testing we get that right.
So that is the light data set.
And if I come into the full data set here it is.
It's bigger.
It's got 800,000 rows 10,000 10,000.
And you can see the total number of rows 820.
But otherwise everything is the same.
It all looks great.
That's what we've been doing.
We've uploaded this data set perfect for fine tuning.
This is how you would do it too, for fine tuning for your task.
Okay.
We are now going to open up Google Colab and let's come in to week seven.
Day two of The Price is Right.
So, uh, we have to first start by connecting to a T4 again, a free T4 box.
Be sure it's a T4, be sure you've got the right one, make sure you've got the GPU, come here and
do a view.
Resources.
Otherwise things aren't going to work.
Make sure you got the GPU Ram in there.
Excellent.
So, uh, as always we start by doing the bits and bytes pip install.
Otherwise you'll get problems later.
So be sure that you've done that.
There's also this curious line here.
Look at this.
What is this doing.
Wget Q and then a whole lot of stuff with my name in it.
What is this with something called Utils.py.
Well, well so what I've got is I've written a little utility class and running that I've put it in
the week seven folder in GitHub and this just downloads it onto this colab, and it saves me having
to have lots of tons of code in here, but it's the same evaluator thing so that we can have that cool
graphic and not have to have a retype all of the code every time.
So in fact, in Colab, there's this little file icon here if you go there, basically it's just downloaded
this file utils.py and plonked it right there.
And yeah, you could, uh, open this up and look at it, but you would find that utils.py.
Is there a way that we can view it right here?
Uh, not that I can see, but I'm sure there's a way that you can get.
Oh, there we go.
Double click.
Who knew?
Double click on it and we see this file and you might recognize this.
It is in fact the same, uh, evaluator as before.
And that's going to mean close that down that we can do some imports.
And one of our imports here is from util import evaluate.
That's going to let us do our evaluation.
Lovely.
So we're doing some imports.
And now we have a few constants.
This is the base model we're going to be using.
The project name is going to be the name price.
That's going to be something that we'll be using I've got light mode is false right here.
Um, but actually, I don't think it's going to matter for for this one, so I'll make this true for
now.
Um, that should be absolutely fine.
And then we're going to load in the data, uh, picking the right data set.
So this is very familiar code for you I hope because it's basically the same that we are used to.
And that ran so fast.
Probably because I've already run it in the past.
Oh, no.
Because it's just the constants.
Uh, we haven't learned anything yet.
We first have to log in to hugging face.
So you have to make sure that you've got your hugging face token set and that that tick is.
Yes.
And now we log in and it logged in, and now we load our data.
So we loaded our data set and we separate out the train the validation and the test data loading in
this is the one that actually is not going to be that quick because I haven't done it in advance, but
it's quick because, uh, it's a small data set.
And we'll print the first test item and check this out.
It's just what we would hope.
It's a dictionary with two fields prompt and completion.
What does this cost to the nearest dollar?
Our favorite V2 distortion noise pedal if you ever needed one of them, now you know all about it,
and it costs a wonderful $219.
There it is.
That's just test number one.
There it is.
And let's do train number zero.
And we're expecting to see that it's nicely rounded 64.00 which is the interior knob.
Another thing that you always wanted.
Okay.
So now we are going to say we would like to have four bit quantization.
So let's set our quant config right here.
And we're going to load in our tokenizer.
This is basically the same code as before.
I don't know if you remember from week three there's this fiddly stuff that you have to do when you
tell it this this.
The pad token should be the same as the end of sentence token and padding side should be right.
You don't.
Don't worry about this.
You just always do this.
You just always use this code whenever you load in a tokenizer for this kind of purpose.
It's just just the standard stuff.
If you don't do it, you just get a few warnings, which is annoying.
I don't think it actually interferes with anything.
And so you always see the code like this.
And at the end of it.
We'll print the size of it again.
We're looking for that same number as before.
We're expecting to see what was it, 2.2GB.
That should be the size of the quantized llama.
I think it was 2.2 before we added in the Lora matrices.
So this will load in.
This is going to take 30s or maybe a minute.
And when it's done I'll be right back okay.
It just loaded in.
It is 2.2GB I remembered.
Right.
Uh okay then here's a new function for you.
It's called model.predict taking an item.
And this is something which is going to take our base llama 3.2 model quantized down to four bits.
And we are going to try to predict we're going to predict what, uh, what what is the result of um
of, of, of, of asking it to, to complete, to predict the next token that comes after that input
right off the bat?
No fine tuning just as it is.
Uh, and, uh.
Yeah.
So so basically we take the, the inputs, we take the prompt column of an item.
Remember, that's the thing up to the price is dollars.
And we put that on Tokuda puts it on the GPU.
And then with torch.
Nograd.
You might remember that from our neural network experiment.
This means that we're not going to do any training.
We just want it to be an inference mode based model saying we want you to create produce the next token
given the inputs, and produce up to eight new tokens.
Just just in case, uh, it comes up with, with something first before the actual number, we'll give
it an opportunity and then we will turn that we will we will pluck out of it just what it generated
the new stuff.
And we will convert that from being tokens back into being letters again.
And that is model predict.
Okay.
So with that let's run this.
We're going to run.
We'll first look at what is the first test item.
In case you have forgotten, the first test item is in fact the, uh, the blood noise distortion pedal
that actually costs $219.
So what we're now going to do is we're going to call a quantize llama 3.2 model to complete this.
It's going to be given this prompt.
It's going to be asked to predict what are the tokens to come after this.
And we will see what we get.
This is what we get.
Drumroll please.
We get 349 .99 what is the price.
So maybe it was what is the price that you have or something.
It wants to keep talking.
Uh but that's what it told us 349.
It was I mean, it was in the right vague territory, but it was pretty far off.
That is base llama.
Okay, this is interesting.
So now we're going to run evaluate.
We're going to run the cool evaluate utility to see what this does.
But first I have one more sidebar.
That's one more super important thing to explain to you.
173 - Okay, so I said, I have one more sidebar for you, and it's a really important one.
This isn't a distraction.
This is core learning.
You may have spotted something.
You may be wondering, which is that the way the structure of the data we're passing into the model
here is different than the way we did it for frontier models before.
We've always had like system prompts, user prompts, and assistant responses, and that's how we've
prompted our models.
Here we only have prompt and then completion coming after that.
And you may be wondering why.
Why are we why are we tackling this so differently?
And why does our predict here look so different?
We're not we're not creating an assistant response like we did with GPT.
Okay.
There's a good reason for it.
There are in fact, these two different types of model.
There are models called base models.
And then there are models called chat or instruct variants.
So there's a base and then there's a chat variant or instruct variant.
They're synonyms.
You can use either either term.
And as you actually know there is also now a third type the reasoning or thinking models, which is
like like another third category.
But but that isn't involved here at all.
So we're thinking about either base or chat variants.
One of those two, the base model, is the starting point.
That is a model which is given an input sequence, and it is trained to try and predict the most likely
tokens to come after an input sequence.
And that's all that it's trained to do.
It's like predictive text.
There's some sequence and what's likely to come next.
And the early versions of GPT were all base models.
GPT two and three and 3.5 was a base model, and it was kind of weird to try and interact with it because
it was always just trying to complete whatever it was given.
And OpenAI were the ones that invented this idea of saying, hey, let's take a base model and let's
fine tune it a bit more with a kind of structure where there is a system message, a user prompt and
assistant response, a user prompt.
Let's teach it.
This kind of chat style, this this interacting messages.
And then we'll make it so that when someone talks to it, it gets really good at answering rather than
just completing the sequence.
And so these these fine tuned models were known as the chat variants or the instruct variants based
from a base model made to expect this kind of structure.
And so when you're working with those kinds of models and typically they're often named the same as
this but with like hyphen instruct at the end of it.
When you're working with the instruct models, you do have to structure your inputs to have these special
tokens.
The system prompt, the user prompt the assistant response because it's been trained that way.
And that's the data it expects and that's what it will continue.
And you can alternatively use just the base model which does not expect this, which won't know which
which can't have a you can't put in a special token because it's not been trained with them, doesn't
know what to make of that.
It just expects input tokens and it will predict what comes next.
Both models, base and instruct are available and they're also reasoning models too.
But but that's a for a very different kind of problem.
So there are these these these two different kinds of models.
And actually you can use either for fine tuning.
You can start with either.
So why have we started with the base model here.
Well the short answer is you can do either.
You can do the use the base model or you can use the instruct variant and have all the special tokens
in there.
Typically, base models are better when you are trying to teach some new skill, which doesn't require
a chat and doesn't require instructions of different sorts of instructions.
There's only one instruction, and you just want it to to predict what's coming next.
And that's clearly the kind of problem we have here.
And chat models work better when you are trying to operate in that kind of of sort of instruction response,
instruction response kind of mode.
And the instruction might be different and you want it to act according to that instruction.
So, so those kinds of problems lend themselves better to starting with the the pre-trained instruct
variant.
But of course, the short answer is you should always try both.
You should experiment and pick the one that performs the best.
And in this case, I did do both.
Although my instinct was that the base would be better.
I did try both and actually, yes, the base performed better.
The instruct variant did slightly worse and needed much more tokens.
That special tokens set it all up.
And so it was harder work and the outcomes were slightly worse.
Not much in it though, but that gives you a good sense.
In that case, my my instinct is often wrong, but it was right.
In that case, it is better for this sort of simplistic problem when we've just got a prompt and we
want to complete it to stick with a base model, have your data organized in this very simple, simplistic
way.
And this is very common indeed for fine tuning.
When you're trying to teach a specialist skill like this.
Okay, without further ado, let's run the evaluate function.
And you can see I have taken the whole, uh, function across.
We get our nice, colorful, uh, results as they appear.
This is this is the error that's being printed out each time with red, yellow or green depending on
how far off it is.
And you can see it's it's not as speedy as we as we are used to because it's actually not parallelizing.
I'm just doing them one at a time rather than doing anything in parallel.
For this version in Colab, you can see that we're using up the 2.2GB of GPU Ram and a little bit more.
And, uh, looking interesting.
So one more time, what we're doing here is we are running the base model, an untrained and fine tuned
base llama 3.2.
We're taking advantage of the fact that it's got some world knowledge.
So when it's given an input like this and it has to complete it, it should give a completion which
will be roughly along the lines of what we're looking for based on its training data.
And we discovered that when we used a frontier model like GPT 5.1, it had such great knowledge, such
good world knowledge that it did a really fabulous job out of the box.
No fine tuning.
And in fact, uh, the GPT model did slightly worse when we tried to fine tune them because they're
not really, well, well suited to fine tuning like this.
Um, but in this case, uh, we are we're going to be interested to see how the massively smaller llama
3.2 and also quantized as well, just just 2.2GB large, how that fares.
And I will come back.
We're about halfway through now.
I'll come back when it's finished for us to see the results.
Okay.
The results are in.
Let me scroll up.
Here we go.
110.72 A pretty horrible answer.
Um, it was, of course, you could see it's been pretty miserably affected by two really, really lousy
numbers.
But generally speaking, it's not done well at all.
R-squared is a big negative number, uh, which is never good to see the error.
110.72 not very good.
The base llama llama 3.1 there.
It should say llama 3.2.
The base llama 3.2 did not do well against our test data set.
Well, at least it gives us a starting points.
110.72 is where we are with Bazlama.
Hopefully you saw that too.
And I hope that you've got your prop, your piece of paper and that you've written down on your piece
of paper.
My piece of paper has got very busy now.
I wasn't very neat and I wrote them down.
Hopefully you're neater than me and you've written down that 110.72, but it's always better to visualise
it.
So let's let's take a quick look.
Here we have it.
I don't know if you realize this, but 110.72 it's even worse than the constant, the one our worst
model to date had been just the thing that just guessed the constant, not including the random one
that was that was silly.
The constant one was 106.18 and base Lama.
Worse than just picking the constant base Lama is 110.72.
Even Ed did better than base Lama, not last year I don't think.
But this year.
This year I'm better than base Lama 3.24 bit accuracy.
Uh, it does a horrible job, a horrible job.
Uh, so take a look at this visual.
Remind yourself of everything we've done with our training, and remember the.
The objective for this week is to now take this base llama.
Because it's a tiny model.
It's been quantized down to 2.2GB.
Just it's titchy.
It can fit on a on a mobile phone, this tiny model, can we compete?
I mean, you know, let's see if we can do better than add better than human level or perhaps a lousy
human level.
Uh, do better than that.
Uh, and and can we get closer?
Maybe.
Maybe close to a nano variant of a model?
Uh, so that with just with a free open source on device, tiny size of model, we could have something
that that could actually achieve a commercial objective.
That's the goal for the week.
It's the goal for the next couple of days, uh, which is exciting.
Uh, so that's what we're going to get after.
And hopefully this visual makes it real to you.
And goodness gracious, we're somehow already at the 80% mark your 80% of the way through.
And hopefully you actually you feel 80% like you feel like there's real expertise now that now that
we're really building into some some of the more advanced material, a lot of stuff should be coming
together for you.
It's looking way back to the times when you were able to to work with front end models, open source
models, API's, prompt caching using light LM, switching between different models using tools and
how that works, inference time techniques, building assistance and then onto rag.
Using rag to retrieve context.
Using an encoder to be able to to vectorize inputs and answer questions and measure evaluate that.
Use long chain and don't use long chain.
And then of course, everything we did last week with curating and pre-processing the data set our baseline
models, fine tuning frontier models.
And now this week you can now explain Lora matrices, quantizing models using open source models for,
for uh, and understanding things like target modules R and Alpha.
And then selecting.
You now know the difference between like selecting a base model and a chat variant.
Uh, and, and you understand that you can select as your base, like Llama or Quen or Gemma, and they
should all do fine.
And they maybe they'll be marginal differences between them.
There is a slight benefit.
Llama has this tokenization thing that it turns out to be very convenient for the problem that we're
working on.
So lots of core expertise built.
And please, please, please don't worry if you're not following everything.
Remember there's three different ways you can engage for this.
For this material.
You could just be using this to build intuition, get a sense of it.
Or you could be be be working with the lite model or really digging into the full model anyway is great.
Next time we're going to look at more of the hyperparameters that are used during training.
We are actually going to set up an SFT, a supervised fine tuning trainer ourself, and we are going
to start training our own proprietary LLM.
It's going to happen.
It's all going to happen here tomorrow.
Biggest day of the course so far.
See you then.
174 - So look, everyone is different and everyone finds different parts of this crazy AI field interesting.
But for me, the next couple of days is what it's all about.
This is the the most interesting and personally the most enjoyable part of the whole journey.
We're actually going to fine tune our own model.
At least.
You know that's how people say it.
Of course, we're using Meta's Llama 3.2 as our base, but it's going to be our our own model at the
end of it.
Once we're finished already, you can work with frontier and open source models.
You can you can find you can find you the frontier model and make a baseline model.
And you can now explain.
Q Laura, today we're going to go through some hyper parameters.
These are the general settings that you that you make outside the actual parameters.
They get tuned.
And we're going to set up a supervised fine tuning trainer.
And we're going to kick it off and set it going, look at some charts love it.
And then come back tomorrow for the big outcomes.
All right.
So.
So that's the order of business.
Uh, and just one more time.
Don't kill me, but I'll take you through the order of play.
And so here it is.
The order of play.
The Price is Right is the name of the project.
Last week, curating data, evaluating frontier models, fine tuning frontier.
This week, fine tuning our open source LLM, we introduced Q Laura.
Yes.
Two days ago we did the setting up the prompt data set prompt completion.
And we explain the difference in a base model and a chat instruct variant.
And then we evaluated our chat our base our base model, our llama 3.24 bit quantized.
And the result was 110.72.
Uh, a miserable result, even more miserable than the human result.
And that was where we left off.
And now today is part one of training, tomorrow is part two of training.
And then we get to the evaluation.
Okay.
Let's let's talk hyperparameters.
And yes, I should also mention, of course, week eight is when we deploy the models at in Rag and
Argentic products.
All right.
Sorry.
Now on to hyperparameters.
So we're going to cover five important hyperparameters that affect the Q Lora fine tuning and then five
hyperparameters for training overall.
So what are the Q Lora ones?
Actually we've met these already.
So the target modules you'll remember this hyperparameter is saying which layers of the neural network,
which ones are we going to target for our Lora matrices.
And the target modules I said you often start by targeting the attention layers.
And then sometimes you add on other layers as well.
Those are called the target modules.
R is the number of dimensions of your your Lora matrices.
R is short for rank I guess, which is another word for dimensions.
And it's the r in Lora and alpha is once you've done this multiplied Laura A and Laura B, and you're
multiplying two matrices, which you may remember from linear algebra, you multiply two matrices like
that, you get one bigger one, uh, and as a result, uh, alpha is how much you scale that up by before
you add it to the base model.
Uh, and it's, it's typically, it's always a thing that you just double R that's what you do.
Uh, quantization is about okay.
So the model is a proper full floating point number.
We can reduce the precision down to eight bits or even four bits and see that, that, you know, that's
definitely going to make your results poorer.
But it frees up so much memory that you'll be able to do more.
You'll be able to run more training.
You'll be able to to try out more intensive things.
And so when you're thinking overall, you know, you've got a limited budget instead of time to try
and get to a result, it might make sense to sacrifice some of the explanatory power of your base model
in order to have so much more room to do much more.
So that's why you quantize and drop out.
That's the only new one here.
Here's a new one.
Drop out.
You may have seen that when we were looking at the model, a dropout.
Is this this this very easy, this very simplistic sounding trick that's used with neural networks where
you you have some dropout probability and it's most commonly 10%.
And that's what we'll use.
You can also try 20%.
It is sometimes 20% is often another common choice.
We'll use 10%.
And what happens is that randomly 10% of these neurons of these little calculations, these these mini
linear regression units inside a deep neural network get wiped out, get zeroed out.
When you're passing through, when you're doing your training and a different 10% each time and you
might be thinking, okay, what?
Why that sounds sounds very hacky.
Um, a lot about data science is very hacky.
So why why exactly do you do that?
Well, it's a technique to try to make sure that you generalize well, that your neural network doesn't
overfit to the data, because what you don't want to do is have different parts of your neural network
be looking to identify an exact input, and when it finds that exact input, come up with an exact output
that matches your training data, because that's not learning a general pattern and a general skill.
It's learning something that's very specific with this set of inputs always produce this output.
And the dropout is just like a technique that tries to encourage the model.
If it wants to always be doing well with loss, then rather than just changing small, very localized
areas of your neural network to solve for different problems, it's got to generally make sure that
the neural network as a whole is good at solving different, uh, different inputs, projecting outputs
that are likely to be, uh, what we were expecting.
So it's it's a kind of a it's an odd one.
It's saying we should be able to to remove different pieces randomly 10% of our neural network.
And it still does a good job.
And that's what we try and train it to do.
And using that technique makes it more likely that it will generalize well and do well with new, unseen
data.
So that's what dropouts about.
It sounds super hacky, but you know what?
Experimentally it does quite well.
It does help with this.
And higher values of dropout tend to mean that you can generalize better.
But of course, as you could probably guess, higher values of dropout means it takes much longer to
train because you're doing this, this thing of removing bits.
So it's got to learn in some way.
The whole neural network has got to be able to learn how to respond to different inputs, rather than
allowing it just to cheat and just kind of have different parts of the neural network be focused on
different types of input.
So that's the meaning of dropout.
Again, I'm giving it in a bit of a hand-wavy way.
I'm trying to give you some intuition for it, but that's good enough.
That's what it does.
That gives you a sense of what it means to turn up or down drop out, and how it ties in with generalising
and overfitting that we covered last week.
Okay, and now five important hyperparameters for the whole training process overall.
So epochs we covered last week and epoch of course, is a complete pass through all of your data.
And you often do multiple epochs because you might think, but why are we putting in the same input
data again?
Remember in this in this cycle you're only you're finding the gradients and you're only doing a small
step in the right direction.
So it can make sense to make multiple steps as you get better and better.
There's another reason why epochs make sense.
Remember that we don't we don't pass data through one data point at a time.
We batch up our data into batches and those batches every time we start an epoch, the batches are randomly
selected.
So it's a different batch of data each time with each epoch.
So it's not like it's identical input data.
It's a different set of different selected data points.
And then that ties nicely to batch size.
Batch size is how many of these data points do you put in a batch?
And basically you try and do as much as you can to fit in the memory of your GPU.
That's really the rule of thumb that people use.
You keep a bigger and bigger batch size until your GPU couldn't fit it.
And then and then you reduce down.
Now there are the more the pro people will point out that it's more complicated than that.
There are some times you obviously you.
The ideal case is that you only have a batch of one, that you train one data point at a time, but
that would take far, far too long.
It's faster to have bigger batches, but when you have bigger batches, you're training in a in a slightly
more approximate way.
It's not as accurate, but there are also some benefits to that as well, because it means that there's
a bit of a random noise element that's added to your training.
So there's pros and cons of different batch sizes.
Generally speaking, the basic rule of thumb is you pick the biggest batch size that will fit on your
GPU.
And the other rule of thumb, and this one is crazy, is that people really love using powers of two
for batch size.
Like you'll see 16, 32, 64, 128 people always have powers of two.
And, you know, again, there's this this sense that it makes sense from a memory point of view to
keep it to being a power of two, and that GPUs perform faster when it is a power of two.
Personally, I think that's a bit of an urban legend.
I don't know if it's true.
I certainly I mean, if you have a batch size of of of 16, a power of two, and you make the batch
size 17, it's going to be faster, it's going to do better.
A larger batch is going to run faster through your data.
There might be some sense at which if you're on a power of two, then it's even more efficient.
So the jump from 15 to 16 might be a better.
You might get even more juice than going from 16 to 17, but nonetheless, a bigger batch size is going
to run faster.
Uh, so don't if you can fit 16 and you can't fit 32, don't force yourself to stick with 16, even
though it's very tempting because it's a power of two.
But you can you can go off a power of two.
Try 20.
It's still going to be faster.
You can try it.
Uh, and then uh, learning rate.
You remember we also did look at this once.
Learning rate is about how big a step do you take each time.
Uh, every time that you make a step change, you worked out how how much your loss changes.
If you make a tiny wiggle to your parameters, the gradients, you've calculated that for the whole
neural network.
And then you just take a step in the right direction.
How big is that step?
That's called the learning rate.
You often start with 0.0001.
It's a very common starting point.
And then this is a this is a hyperparameter that you'll often experiment with trying it.
And for learning rates people almost always go in factors of ten.
So you either do 0.0001 or you just try 0.001 or 0.00001 and you try those and see which one works better.
And then just occasionally you pick like the halfway .0. naught naught naught five.
Um, but yeah, usually, usually it's a power of ten that you're doing there with learning rates.
175 - Now there's a couple more things to say about learning rate.
The there might be you might be thinking to yourself, why not make the learning rate nice and big?
A big learning rate means you're taking a big step in the direction of making your loss lower.
Why not make big steps?
Well, think of it this way people like like to picture these.
The loss.
How?
Loss is affected by changing your parameters as if it's like a valley.
You can imagine that your loss might be this, this, this level.
And as you move the parameter, it comes down and then it goes back up again.
So it's like like a sort of this valley thing.
And what we're trying to find in training is we're trying to find that point at the bottom of the valley.
We're up here somewhere.
We found the gradient.
The how much is the loss is affected by wiggling the parameters.
And then we change the parameter.
And if we take a very small step, we just go a little bit down.
If we take a bigger step, if learning rate is higher, we might take a big step down and get close
to the bottom or close to the bottom of the valley, which would be great.
But if we take a whopping great step, we might go past the valley and over to the other side of the
valley and end up somewhere higher.
We might jump the whole the whole length of this, of this thing, which is sometimes called a minimum,
a local minimum.
And so you want to to avoid this situation where you're jumping across like that.
And so sometimes it can be good to have a learning rate which is quite small, not too big, so that
you don't jump all the way over to the other side or miss your minimum altogether.
That's why you might not want learning rates too big.
Okay, so you're like, fine, I get it.
We don't want a learning rate too big.
We don't want to miss the minimum.
So why don't we make it nice and small?
Let's make it nice and small.
Learning rate.
It'll take a long time to train, but we don't mind that.
That's good.
At least we'll get to our minimum.
Well, there's another problem.
And that problem is known as being stuck in a local minimum, which is an expression that people use
in the real world to when they're debating things sometimes and what that means.
You probably already have a good picture of what that means.
imagine if the truth is not this nice one valley, but the truth is a valley like that.
And next to it is a much bigger valley.
And the real lowest loss point is down here.
That's what we want to get to.
Well, if learning rate is too small, there is this risk that if we start over here somewhere, we
might sort of find our way down to that minimum right there.
And then if we try and go any further, we go up that wall and we fall back down again.
We're always trying to move in the direction that minimizes loss.
So we end up quite literally stuck in this local minimum, this minimum, which is kind of local to
where we began.
And we never find our way to the much bigger minimum that's next door.
And if we had had a larger learning rate, we would have got out of the local minimum altogether, and
we would have found ourselves in this happy place where there was a lower valley, the great, the global
minimum, the real minimum that we're trying to find.
And so that's why you don't want a learning rate that's too small.
And so you're like, huh?
Okay, so we kind of a big learning rate.
We kind of have a small learning rate.
So what learning rate can we have?
And of course, the answer is you experiment, you try different learning rates.
You find out you use your numbers to figure out what works best.
But there is there are also some tricks.
There are things called learning rate schedulers that are that are ways to vary the learning rate based
on how far through training you are or what kinds of results you're getting.
And so one that we will use in training this this time is pretty simple, but it's called a cosine scheduler.
And it just basically, uh, it varies your learning rate.
It starts quite high.
So you're hopefully bouncing around trying to find the right big global, uh, section to be in.
And then over time it gets smaller and smaller and smaller so that your steps are trying to then find
the best possible local minimum and you're not jumping out of where you are.
So that kind of learning rate scheduler very common approach.
We're also we're going to do a learning rate scheduler with a warm up period, which means that it doesn't
start at the biggest number.
It starts a bit lower, it goes right up to the biggest number, and then it gradually comes down and
you'll see that pattern.
We're going to be looking at the learning rate and how it changes.
So watch out for that.
You will see it.
This is a very ordinary approach.
There are some other really cool approaches.
There's a way you can have a learning rate scheduler that automatically changes the learning rate when
results aren't getting better.
That's a really nice pro technique that works sometimes, but this one is going to work really well
for us now.
And it's very, very common.
And that that finally tells you everything you ever wanted to know about the learning rate.
Let's go on to another hyperparameter okay.
So the next one is called gradient accumulation a bit like batch size, but gradient accumulation is
another way to speed up your training.
And it's saying okay.
So the idea is you remember the four steps of training.
I hope you remember the four steps of training, the forward pass, the loss calculation, the backward
pass.
Take a step.
Well, gradient accumulation is saying what we can do is we can do the forward pass, uh, the loss
calculation and then the backward pass to calculate the gradients.
But don't take the step.
Don't update all the weights everywhere.
Just hold on to those, those those gradients.
And just repeat this a second time and add up those gradients.
And then just do one bigger step at the end of it, because probably that's fine.
Probably that first step won't have affected your second calculation by that much.
And so you can do this several times over.
And it's a way to speed up your, your batch.
And it has some other nice effects.
We're not going to use it I find it it adds a bit of noise to proceedings, but I'll have the hyperparameter
in there.
So if you want to experiment with gradient accumulation you definitely can.
You'll see some of the pros and cons in action.
Maybe you'll get a better result than me, but it's an important one.
One to watch out for gradient accumulation.
And then the optimizer.
So I mentioned of course the fourth step.
You know the four steps.
It's forward pass loss calculation.
Backward pass.
Take a step in optimization.
It's called.
The way you take a step is something which can be very simplistic or it can be quite sophisticated.
The simplistic one that everyone always starts with is called stochastic gradient descent SGD that I
mentioned I think last week.
And that really is basically just what it sounds like.
You have some kind of gradient and you take some small step, gradient descent.
So you take a small step in the direction that decreases the loss by the learning rate amount.
That's SGD, that's all it is.
But there are some more sophisticated types of optimizer.
There's one that we will use called Adam that is super popular.
And these more sophisticated ones have they try and they try and be more cunning about it.
They do things like they have some momentum.
So if you've been stepping in one direction for a while, you keep up a bit of that stepping momentum,
even if your gradients seem to go another way.
These are all sort of tricks that help you move in the most likely direction.
And so they take up a little bit more memory, but they tend to have much better results.
And so Adam is super popular.
There are a bunch of others.
Um, and yeah, I think Adam is the one that's used by most people most of the time.
Or SGD if you're starting out and you want something very simplistic.
So that's what we'll use.
That's what the optimizer is all about.
And it remains to me one more time to remind you of the four steps of training that I've just been alluding
to.
But I do want to really impress this on you.
Uh, remember, this is all about how do we tweak the parameters of the model.
In this case, we're tweaking the Laura matrices, we're tweaking our Laura parameters based on the
training data, and we're trying to do it in a way that should generalize so that not only does it get
better and better with the training data, but it also gets better on unseen data.
And that's going to be a crucial point for what we're about to do the forward pass.
That's when you take the inputs and you predict what should the outputs be, including adding in the
law of matrices.
Applying them by scaling by alpha.
Adding them in.
Get an output that is your first step.
The loss calculation and we will cover what that loss calculation is another time.
But you make some calculation about how different was it to to the ground truth.
The thing that you know should be the outcome that's stored in that, in that, in the completion variable,
the backward pass is you now go back through and you say, how could I tweak the parameters so that
I do better next time?
And remember we're not going to tweak the parameters in llama 3.2.
There are 3 billion of them.
No.
We're going to focus on just tweaking the parameters in our Lora matrices in those small Lora matrices,
32 dimensions, just going to tweak those parameters because they get applied to the main llama.
So we tweak them, we figure out what are the gradients.
And then the final step optimization.
This is where we use the optimizer.
It could be stochastic gradient descent SGD, or it could be an Adam optimizer.
To take a tiny step in the direction so that we do a little bit better next time we get the same inputs
or something with a similar pattern.
We're trying to do it in a way that will generalize.
That's how training works.
Uh, you you, you know now for sure that we have these hyper parameters, which are the other settings
that controls the whole way.
We did this not not related to the parameters themselves.
Uh, epoch and learning rate are the ones that we've just talked about amongst others.
Hyper parameter optimization is what it what it means to experiment with these.
And in many ways, this is just a fancy term for trial and error.
Okay.
Take a look at this again.
Recognize this.
Remember this from when we trained our own neural network.
Because we're about to do this with Laura matrices for reals in in a colab.
Um, and uh, yeah, this this this is the moment I've been waiting for.
Finally.
It's here.
Let's go do it.
176 - Okay, here we are.
Week seven, day three Colab.
And of course, as always, the link to this colab.
You'll find it in curser in the GitHub repo in the week seven day three lab.
Or you can also find in the Readme or you know, anywhere you think you might go and look for it.
You'll probably find it there.
Ah, here it is.
We are in the colab for training days three and four.
We're going to be working in this, in this notebook and we should enjoy it.
This is going to be terrific.
So first up you choose between the light mode and the dark mode.
The big data.
The full mode with light mode is false.
I'm going to start by kicking this off on the light mode because that's what you might do.
But then we're going to do it for the full mode as well, so that you can take joy in the big data set,
even if you don't want to run it yourself.
The light mode is all free.
Everything is free.
But to use the light mode, you need to connect to a T4 box.
You need to make sure it's a T4 box.
Don't make a mistake with that because it won't work, and you can always check by opening your, uh,
viewing resources to check that it looks good.
It's always worth having these resources front and center when you're doing this stuff.
We're now going to start with some installs, and now we're not just installing bits and bytes.
We're also installing, importing installing a library called TRL which is the Transformers reinforcement
learning from Hugging Face, which is the package which is going to do all of the fine tuning that we're
going to be doing.
Okay.
And also we're getting the eval.
I don't think we use it today, but but we'll we'll use that in a future day.
Uh, so we then got a bunch of import statements.
Let me run these right now and these import statements, including importing something called Wonderbar.
And you may wonder what Wonderbar is.
And and wand bar is actually short for W and B, which is short for weights and biases.
Weights and biases is a really fabulous free platform for monitoring training and open source free platform.
I mean, they have a paid tier two, but you don't need it for this course.
Um, and, uh, yeah, it's something which is very, very popular.
Um, and, um, yeah, I don't know that it's that the code is open source.
I don't know why I said open source, but it's free.
And, uh, it's something which is, uh, has has, of course, an open source library for connecting
to it.
And it's what I will be using for tracking.
And I very much recommend that you do as well.
And I'll show you how to set it up super easy.
And it means that you will have access to, to many things.
All right.
But first up we need to look at the constants.
And now there are a lot of constants.
And this is controlling ah everything that we're going to do I'm going to zoom out a little bit.
So we see more.
And I'm actually I'm going to load in all these constants.
And I'm going to um, I think I might set this, this loading so that we, you're not waiting for,
for that point.
Now we'll get to it later.
Okay.
So here are the constants.
Let's talk through what we've got here.
The base model.
You're comfortable with that.
It's llama 3.2 The project name, we're going to call it price, and we're going to give it that name.
So that that price, that name is going to appear in Hugging Face, and it's going to appear in weights
and biases.
We're going to know to expect the project called price.
This username here is where you should put your hugging face username.
This is where we will be saving our model as it's trained.
This is this is going to be your username.
Put in your hugging face username right there.
Lights mode.
You know true if you want 20,000 data points false if you want 800,000 data points okay.
The data user.
So we're also going to collect the data set that we just uploaded.
And if you uploaded a data set yourself you did.
You did the stuff.
You made your prompts and completions and you've uploaded it to hugging face to your account.
Then you should put your username in here.
But if you'd rather just use mine that I've already done, it's already there and and it's going to
be identical to mine.
Well your one should be as well.
But but if you, if you just want to stick with the one I've got, leave this data user as editor donor.
And you'll be just taking my data set and it will work great.
And so this this picks the data set name either light or the full depending on light mode.
Okay.
So far so good.
One more thing is that we're going to come up with something called the run name.
We're going to have a run name.
And I do this because we're going to see this run in weights and biases and in hugging face.
And I want to make sure we know which one is which.
So I'm just going to use the current timestamp, the current date like this date and time spelled out.
It's also common to have like a description of your run.
Like if you're testing something like I'm trying doubling R or I'm trying more drop out, you might
have that as text in your run name, and you then see that in wherever you look.
But after a while that gets quite confusing, because I used to run so many experiments and I'd have
this long set of different texts, and I found it easier just to put the timestamp and you'll see all
the different timestamps listed out there.
But but whatever works well for you.
And if we're in light mode I'm going to put like a suffix light just so it's clear to us which one is
which.
Okay.
And then I turn all that into a combined project run name, which is the project name, price, hyphen,
the run name.
And this is where that will get put on the hugging face hub.
It will be my username Edna or your username.
And the model name is going to be this full project name.
So the name of the model that will be in hugging face is going to be like price hyphen and then the
timestamp we ran it.
And maybe hyphen light if it's one of our light models.
Okay.
That should all be very clear to you.
This is all simple stuff.
This is this is structuring, organizing our runs so that we're coordinated about it.
All right.
Time to define our hyper parameters.
And I've got them in three categories.
Some overall some Q related ones and some training related ones.
And then finally, these aren't these aren't really hyperparameters at all.
There's some stuff about how we track and report at the end.
So here are the overall hyperparameters.
How many epochs are we going to run?
So we'll have one epoch if we're on light mode and this will last in total about an hour to run.
Otherwise three epochs.
If we're in the full on let's do everything mode.
Okay.
So that's that's that good batch size 32.
Uh, if we're in light mode 32, I've made it so that that fits perfectly on a free T4.
But this code stuff changes a lot.
So what fits for me might not fit for you.
You might get an exception and out of memory exception when you run this, in which case you should
feel free to tweak this down to 30 or 25, or keep going down until you don't get an out of memory,
and maybe start by halving it to 15 and then see how much headroom you have looking at the GPU Ram.
But as of right now with the code versions are on right now, a batch size of 32 just fits tightly on
a T4, and on the the the heavy, the full mode, we're going to have a batch size of 256.
And that's actually going to fill it up with some room to spare.
Uh, and you may you may say to me, uh, how did you come up with these numbers?
32 and 256.
They look suspiciously like powers of two.
And after giving you that little lecture about how it does not need to be a power of two, I have clearly
broken my own rules here, and I can't resist, I can't resist, I can't help, it's just like, built
into me.
I find it, like, so jarring to do this that I just can't do it.
Uh, and I do.
I think the amount of memory you use does jump up quite a bit.
So there is some truth to this urban myth about urban legend, about about powers of two.
But, uh, yeah.
Anyways, power of two.
It is, um, the maximum sequence length.
This is a crucial hyperparameter.
This is about how much memory it reserves and builds the maximum length of any of your inputs.
Remember, the true number is 126.
Leaving in a couple of bit of space there for some extra tokens that might get shoved in.
And so 128 is what I'm going with, which just happens to be a power of two and gradient accumulation
steps.
Remember this is like how many steps does it do before it optimizes.
I've got this at one.
You could choose a bigger number if that's what you wanted.
If you want to explore that, that might well get you better outcomes.
I explored this a year ago and I found that it didn't.
But but things have changed and you might well get I haven't tried it this year, so.
So you could do that.
Those are the overall hyperparameters.
Okay.
And now on to Q Laura, and you're expecting this.
You've seen some of this already.
We are going to quantize to four bits.
You can make this false.
If you wanted to to have an eight bit variant.
We are going to pick 32 as our R if we're in light mode 32 is really common.
R often at 16 is less, 32 is common.
Otherwise we're going with 256.
That is extreme.
People don't normally go that high.
I'm going quite high I actually I've done my tests and this does give better results, but only slightly
than having a smaller.
Uh, so so I think I've got a good justification.
We've got so much data that it makes sense to have a bigger Laura matrix, but this is definitely on
the high side.
sighed.
Laura.
Alpha.
We just double Laura r.
That's what everyone does.
You can try some other Laura alphas if you want.
I say I did that a year ago, and I did find that it seemed to work best at twice, but I have to say,
I found it was very marginal.
Okay, then, here's just two constants.
These are the attention layers, the attention layers in the transformer architecture for llama three
two.
And these are the MLP layers, the multi-layer perceptron layers.
Um, the uh the query value key.
Key and value and output.
And this is the gate and the up and down projections in the MLP layers.
So what I'm saying is that if we're in light mode, we will only target the attention layers.
Otherwise we'll target all of these layers as the target modules for our Q Laura and dropout, I mentioned
dropout this is that that like super hand-wavy that that really like like hacky thing of let's just
wipe out 10% of the neurons in the neural network and it's going to help it, not overfit.
It's going to help it to generalize better.
Turns out this works pretty well.
10% is super standard.
People usually pick 10% or 20%.
Okay, that's the Q Laura hyperparameters.
All right.
And then here we have some more learning rates, you know.
Well I told you it's usually either oh point naught naught one or oh point naught naught naught one.
And we're going with the latter right here.
Warm up ratio is about how long it takes to um, uh, before it hits this this number.
It's like like how how it how it warms up at the start of training.
You're going to see this visually.
And then we're going to use a learning rate scheduler.
The type will be cosine which is one which does a really nice elegant.
It starts quite high and then it tails off and does this.
That's a cosine scheduler we'll use.
And then the optimizer we will use is going to be a type of Adam optimizer.
In particular it's it's called Adam w which means there's a thing called weight decay.
And that's where I set the weight to K.
And I've got some docs on this lower down if you want to read about it.
But these are very common choices.
They're good choices.
Um, and they're pretty standard.
Okay.
And then there's just something here I've got, which is, uh, I just just figure out whether basically,
are you on a T4 or an A100 a100s can do for your GPU.
You can do something which is a little bit fancier, um, called a BF 16.
So I'm just I'm just figuring out whether you're on that computer or not so that this notebook will
work on, on either type of GPU.
And finally, some hyper parameters here, which are just about the sort of management of everything,
um, the vowel size.
So one of the things we're going to do during training, we're not only going to have the training data,
we're going to use the validation data.
Remember that we've got three pools of data training, validation and test.
Test we do at the very end.
That's how we that's that's what this is about.
It's our test data.
Uh, training is what we'll use for training.
Validation is going to be held out from training.
But repeatedly during training, we will test out how we're doing against validation, and that's how
we know that we're not overfitting and that we're getting better.
And you're going to see that super visually while we do this.
So we can pick how many data points do we want it to use.
And I'm going to say if we're in light mode, we'll do it for 500 points.
If we're in heavy mode, we'll use 1000 points because you've got more time to kill.
So we'll we'll do that.
Um, log steps is how after how many of these batch steps, these mini batches of of this many.
Um, where are we now?
Uh, the the batch size here.
How many of this number of data points does it log progress to?
Things like weights and biases will be logging.
That is is log steps.
Save steps is after.
How many of these steps does it actually take a version of the model as it's been trained, and upload
it and save it to the Hugging Face hub?
So we've got a snapshot at that point, and when it does that, it takes that opportunity to also run
all of the validation.
So we'll get at periodic intervals a snapshot of the model and how it's performing against validation.
And that's a super important trick to use because it allows you to do to do something that people sometimes
call early stopping, which is that you can you can you can run this for many epochs or for many training
steps and let it see how the model gets better and better and better and better.
And after you've trained too much, it might start overfitting and do worse and worse and worse.
And you can look back, see that your validation loss.
See when it was at its best possible value, pick that snapshot of the model and that's the one that
you use.
That's when it was best before it started to overfit.
That's a technique that we'll be using during training.
It's very common.
And that's why you want to repeatedly save.
We're going to do it every 100 steps if you're in light mode.
Otherwise every 200 steps.
And this log to weights and biases.
If you're going to do what I do and log this to the free platform weights and biases, then leave this
at true.
That's our hyperparameters.
Congrats!
We're almost ready for training.
177 - Okay, so I've run the constants and you know, your hyperparameters back to front.
You may think I'm spending far too much time on hyperparameters, but this is where you really learn
how to how to train your own model.
Uh, so this use BF 16 thing, uh, that I that I set here that's set to false because I'm on a T4,
which is just what we expect if we're on an A100, we want this to stay true.
Okay.
So I mentioned we're using the Adam W optimizer if you want to read more about them.
This is obviously more of a pro thing.
I've got the link to the page in the docs which which describes the kinds of optimizers, and it's got
some more gory detail on optimizers, if that interests you.
Do do read up on that.
Okay.
Now I imagine by this point you already have a hugging face account.
It's hard to imagine how you could have got here without one.
But hopefully you've done that and you already have your API key in here and you have to turn it on.
There is another API key for you to add in at this point, should you wish.
And this is the weights and biases uh account.
So you can go to w and B dot AI.
I might have said.com before, but it's w b ai.
This is their home page.
Um and so this you can see I have a bunch of different, uh, different projects here.
This is what you get when you, when you come in.
You'd have to sign up.
It's free to sign up.
Um, you get you get to set up different projects.
You can see price is the project we're doing right now.
I've got a bunch of others.
Uh, and, uh, you can, um, you can then once you've done that, go to the avatar menu.
You need to have created your account.
I use Google auth.
So I sign in with my Google credentials and you have to go down to API key right here.
And I'm not going to press that because when I do it's going to show me my API key right away.
They don't they don't cover it up.
Take that API key and copy it.
And that API key.
You're going to want to go back into Colab, press this button and put it in here as W and B API key.
Put in the value and turn it on.
Now you know if this were week three or week two, then I would go through this in laborious detail
with you.
But surely by this point you are complete pros at putting an API key in your secrets?
I don't need to tell you about that.
So you've done that.
If you don't want to use weights and biases, no problem at all.
Just turn this here to false.
But I do recommend it.
It's free and it looks really cool.
And it's very popular in industry too.
All right.
So I'm logging into Huggingface right now.
And I'm now going to log in to Weights and Biases.
And I'm telling I'm setting some environment variables to tell weights and biases about my project.
Um, so that's happening now.
It's logging in hopefully.
There we go.
Logged in as Edna.
Hopefully you've got a message just like that.
If you haven't then you know how to debug API keys by now.
And we're loading in the data set.
Uh, we're loading in the train Val and test.
We're going to use train and Val we're not going to use test.
And it's in.
And now we're going to call weights and biases dot init which is going to create this project with we're
giving it the project name price and the run name which is going to appear as a run under this.
So there it goes.
It's done.
It's got something in weights and biases, and you can view the run just by clicking on this link right
here.
But there's going to be nothing to see just yet.
So we won't do that yet.
Okay.
So now this is a familiar code which is picking the right quantization.
And now this is also familiar code.
We're going to load in the base model Llama 3.2.
We're loading it in and we're going to print out how large it is.
It's going to be quantized down to four bits.
That means you know how large it is.
How large is it.
Yes 2.2 gigs.
You knew that.
I knew that, uh, it's it's loading in, uh, and when it's done with that, in they come.
We are now going to set up the configuration for training.
And this is where, this is where the rubber hits the road.
This is put in your favorite expression for for for this is where it really happens.
Um, obviously there's one involving fans, but it's not that it's all good.
Uh, okay.
So we first set up a variable called Laura parameters, a Laura config object.
And this is where we specify the alpha, the dropout, the r and some other constants.
So you don't need to worry about.
And then the target modules.
And we're just of course setting it to be the constants that we defined in our hyperparameters at the
top of this colab.
Um, we could have just typed them directly in here, but it's nice nice to keep your constants at the
top.
So this defines our Laura parameters.
How we're going to do fine tuning.
Our model is still loading.
And then look at this long list.
Here is all of our training parameters.
And it's basically specifying everything about training that we set above the number of epochs the batch
size gradient accumulation steps telling it which optimizer how often to save this save total limit
equals ten is going to prevent it for saving on the local Google file system.
Here more than ten models.
Otherwise, you can actually fill up your disk over time and the whole thing can crash.
You can imagine that happened to me once and I lost lots.
And I was furious.
And so since then I always have saved.
Total limit is ten and it cycles.
So when you get to the the 11th one that it saves locally, it deletes the bottom up.
And some other things here that don't matter much.
Uh, I don't think that's the warm up ratio, that learning rate scheduler reporting to weights and
biases saving.
This is how to save it to the hub.
And, uh, that's really it.
One other thing I want to mention is eval strategy.
The eval strategy is saying to hugging face.
How often do I want you to run an evaluation over the validation data that I'm going to give you to
see how I'm doing on unseen data, and we're going to do that every time that we save the model.
And we're telling it that, and you're going to see how that works.
It's going to give us some really important information as this finished.
Loading.
Nope.
Still loading.
Uh, but we'll run that cell when it finishes.
And then finally, we create the trainer.
The trainer is a helper class from Huggingface called trainer supervised fine tuning trainer.
It's a class that takes care of all of the training for us.
It's going to do those four steps.
We hand wrote them using PyTorch last week.
We don't need to do that this time.
Hugging face has written some utilities for us, but we're going to call into that and we pass in the
base model.
We pass in our training data set, we pass in our validation data set.
And somewhere I've already I've shrunk this down to just be the first 500 points.
Let's see where I did that.
Somewhere here I believe I did right here.
Look at that.
I sneakily I took the validation data set and I shrunk it down to just be val size, which we set right
here to be a smaller number because we don't want to we don't want to do tons of calculations every
time we're trying to validate, because we're going to do it quite often.
Uh, okay.
Sorry.
So so we pass in the training data set, the validation data set.
We pass in our Lora parameters and we pass in our training parameters.
And all of that is used to create an SFT trainer that is set up to do all of the training for us and
report to the weights and biases ID that we gave it.
So all of that has now run.
We've loaded our model.
It did indeed take up 2.2GB I remembered correctly and so did you.
And now we have created our fine tuning our SFT trainer here.
It does some stuff now um, it's just it's noticed that our training data set didn't have a special
token.
It's meant to have at the end of it called the end of sentence token, the aeos, which you normally
put at the end of your training data set.
Uh, and so it's added that in you remember when I said that I wanted to leave a little buffer in the
sequence length?
Uh, and you might have thought I was just only saying that so that I could have a power of two.
There was actually a real reason for it.
There really was an extra token that Huggingface slaps in, and it's now just turned all of that text
into tokens.
It's got everything ready for both the training data set and the eval data set, and everything is poised
to actually run fine tuning.
Finally, uh, and uh, yeah, the only other thing to mention is, you might be wondering with this
train and Val data set, how does it know?
Like what's the prompt and what's the what's the ground truth?
What's the output?
And the answer is by default, the Huggingface SFT trainer expects you to provide data using the fields
prompt and completion.
That's what it looks for by default.
And that's exactly what we did.
Uh, in my previous version of this course last year, that functionality didn't exist and we had to
do all sorts of faffing around that's not needed anymore.
Now it's all baked in as a default, so it's super easy for us.
We're ready to go.
It's time to train.
178 - Okay, so here we go.
We're going to fine tune.
And you do it with this beautiful single line of code.
Fine tuning dot train.
I'm going to I'm going to kick this off and then we'll do do some some talk.
Uh, okay.
So first of all, it's got some, some, uh, warning messages here.
And these can be safely ignored.
And you might get other warning messages.
I get lots of people like, like, ask me questions.
In data science, one becomes quite immune to warnings.
A lot of hugging.
Face code gives different warnings, and you tend to be like, if something goes wrong later, I'll
look back at this, but otherwise I'm not.
I'm not going to get too, too fussed about it.
Okay, so training is underway.
What are we what are we looking for right away?
First up, we come over here and check that the GPU is okay.
We we're quite close to the 15GB, but we're not hit it yet, so we're being efficient.
We're using the GPU.
It's not breaking.
If you've got an out-of-memory error, you might have to go up and decrease the batch size until it
fits in.
Um, but as it is right now, it's tight, but it's running, uh, and everything seems to look pretty
good.
You can see here as well this progress bar.
And this gives us a sense of how long is it going to take.
And it's telling us right here that it's going to take 56 minutes.
So this is all going to run this entire training of the light data set.
It's going to happen in under an hour.
How cool is that.
So that's that's great.
Uh, and um, yeah, you'll also notice that in this code, once I finished training, I do a final
model push.
Uh, just because I don't want it to be that, um, you walk away, the run completes, and this, this
colab gets shut down, as Google sometimes does, and then you're like, oh, no, I've lost my model.
So so I've made sure here that it will definitely save it right away.
Um, and that leads me to point out that that probably if you're if you've been using the free version
of Colab for a while, you're familiar with the fact that it is a bit flaky and that Google, because
it's free, Google reserves the right to kick you off whenever it feels like it wants to.
So that is that is, uh.
Yeah, sort of, um, an operation hazard.
And, uh, that's what you get for, for for being on the free tier.
It generally I would say that I've seen it usually, um, being quite good for an hour.
So you should be completely fine.
But if in doubt, be sure to scroll around and make sure that you're clicking and things so that that
doesn't think that you've you've left it.
I don't know if that makes a difference, but but uh, yeah, uh, try and try and make sure that it
stays active.
I think it will.
Um, I've got some stuff here to how you could resume if you wanted to, but that's never it's not ideal.
It's not it's not great to to resume.
There's some downsides with it.
Um, so it's best to try and get it to all fit in one.
Um, okay.
So with that in mind, it's still, it's it's processing through the first train.
You can see here, it's done 28 steps out of the 625 steps it's going to do.
All in all it's doing 625 steps.
Let's just do bring up my calculator here so I can check this.
It's 625 steps.
And each step uh the batch size was 32.
Um, for this.
So times 32, 625 steps 625 times 32.
Perhaps you could do this in your head.
That would be our 20,000 training data points.
Uh, so, uh, that's why there are 625 steps.
Um, and you may remember that I think it's every five steps.
It's going to be logging the data so far to weights and biases.
And, uh, what was it every uh, let's go back here.
Sorry.
It's every 100 steps.
It's going to be saving.
So it's going to be saving and validating about six times in the course of the hour.
Um, let's go and check out what, uh, the what what are our run looks like right now?
So if we scroll back up to where we initialize weights and biases, there is actually here a link we
can go and we can view the project or we can view the actual run itself.
And that's what we'll do next.
Okay.
Well here we go.
I'm going to click right here on viewing the run up it comes and weights and biases.
Loading loading loading.
Here is the run.
So what are we looking at right here.
There's lots of lots of stuff to look at.
We are looking at a train section.
There's typically a few a few sections.
So first of all you can see that the name of our run is the current date and time hyphen light.
That's what you should see as well.
Um okay.
So what are we seeing here.
So the most important diagram, the first thing you look at immediately is this one here, uh, training
loss, the loss number.
And I'm going to go through how you calculate the loss later.
But the loss is the number that you want to see it coming down.
You're hoping to see over time that loss will come down.
And we're seeing every every ten steps.
It's getting reported.
Sorry.
Every five steps.
Look at that.
Every five steps.
We are getting a report and we're seeing what's happening to loss.
And as yet it doesn't look like it's necessarily coming down.
But it's early days over here.
On the bottom left is the learning rate.
You'll see this sort of it started low and it zoomed up.
That was the warm up period that I mentioned.
And now you see that it appears to be sort of like a constant number.
It is 0.0001, which is which was our learning rate.
But you maybe can start to see that it's coming down slightly.
That is the learning rate scheduler in action.
So these are the two two charts to really look at.
Uh accuracy is the kind of opposite of loss.
For whatever reason, we all prefer looking at loss because we're used to it.
Loss coming down is what we're looking at.
So this is all the training information now training loss coming down.
It does appear that the training loss did just come down.
Uh, training loss coming down means that each individual training data point is coming up with a better
number.
And that's a good thing for us to see.
We want to see the training loss coming down, but it's not the most important thing to see.
What's the most important thing?
The most important thing is validation loss, not loss on the training data, but loss on the unseen
data that wasn't used at all, because that's telling us how it's performing against unseen data.
And now, if you're if you're really following all this, you might say, okay, but hang on a second.
No training loss is still important because the training data, we're only doing one epoch here.
So every one of our training batches is in fact new unseen data every time.
So it is actually just as valid to see the training loss as it is to see the validation loss.
To which I say good point.
I'm arguing myself here.
That's a good point.
I do agree, but the great thing about validation loss is that you're always using exactly the same
validation data set that you're not using during training, and you're repeatedly taking that same data
set.
So with training data, there's always a lot of noise because every training data batch is a bit different.
So sure that it might be coming down.
And that might be because you're getting better at training, but it might just be the random jitter
in training, in training data sets that are that each batch is a bit different.
If you see your validation loss coming down, then you can get some confidence that the same data set
is performing better.
And that's why we love validation loss.
Uh, and I always regret the fact that last year when I first did this training, I skipped out on validation
data loss because I thought it's always new data.
You don't really need it.
And as a result, we never got through this discipline of seeing the validation data loss.
So I'm making up for it this time.
We're doing validation data loss.
You don't see it yet because it's got to get to 100.
And then we will see it.
And I'm going to not let you see it right now because I want to hold out interesting stuff for for tomorrow
for training day for.
So we have training in action.
We can see it in weights and biases.
We can see it happening now.
We can come down here and watch this.
We can see here that we are uh, we're at eight minutes in with 46 minutes to go.
Our memory is nice and stable.
Everything is looking good.
Training is underway.
Super exciting.
It's.
It's time to to come for the wrap and then prepare for tomorrow.
And so with that, uh, that's a that's a wrap on on day three.
I've left it.
Hopefully you've got tension.
And I really hope you're running this too, because it's super exciting.
Uh, what you can already do, in addition to all the stuff about open source, closed source, rag
and and training with a with a frontier model.
Now, not only do you know about Q Laura, but also you understand about how you set up all the different
parameters, how you set up the SFT trainer, uh, and you kick off a training run providing the hyperparameters,
and you do that with, with the Hugging face TRL library.
And you can also watch results in weights and biases.
Next time we're going to dig in to training loss versus validation loss.
You're going to see your model being saved in the Hugging Face hub.
And we're going to compare the performance of different runs so that you can do hyperparameter optimization,
uh, in uh using weights and biases.
That's all coming together.
That's like pro training.
And we will wrap up the training all happening tomorrow in week seven, day four.
I'll see you then.
179 - Oh my goodness, how cool is this?
We are in week seven.
Day four.
It is the moment of like hardcore training.
Everything is happening.
You know what you can already do with models and rag but but in addition you know how to configure a
fine tuning batch with the SFT trainer and how to make decisions about all of your various hyper parameters
and kick off a run and you've set up your weights and biases account.
Today is the day when we are going to really dig in, and we're going to go back to the very same,
uh, colab that we're on yesterday.
It's the same one.
The link is also there in cursor.
But but you don't need it because you've already got it open.
Hopefully we're going back there.
We are going to review what's happening with our run.
Let's go.
So first of all here we are back in week seven.
Day three.
Uh, even though it's day four, uh, and it's still running.
And you may notice that this is running from just just a few minutes after where I left you yesterday.
And that's because I'm cheating for me.
For you.
I hope it's the next day because you're you're rigidly sticking to the days that I laid out.
But for me, it's just a few minutes later, the when I last spoke to you.
Funny that.
But but so here it is.
And you can see that it's.
This table shows you that this has completed the first of the 100 steps.
So it's calculated the validation loss for the first time.
So this is the loss calculation happening on our validation data set of 500 points that we gave it.
It's taken 500 data points.
It's calculated the prediction.
It's compared it.
And it's used that to calculate the validation loss.
And so now if we now go to the the weights and biases we can we can see what's going on here.
And we can see that there's um there's there's more information here.
There's the uh the training loss.
You can see that.
Let's just refresh the screen.
Uh, it's done it for us.
Hang on.
Uh, here it is.
Here it is.
So, so back we are with with this this validation loss.
You can see this is still, like, bouncing around a bit.
It does appear like it's come.
It started at around the 0.3 .0185, and now it's at, uh.
Hang on.
Oh, I see, I see, hang on.
So this axis is misleading.
Let's let's look into this this diagram right here.
We can do better than this.
If I click on here it comes up right here.
Look at what's happening.
I've fixed this y axis.
Um I did this before and it's remembered it.
So if I change this this to be three, uh.
And apply.
Hang on.
That didn't work.
Sorry.
Uh, because I had it on the wrong side that way.
Three.
Look at that.
Okay.
This is a better sense of what's actually going on with training loss.
Now, that's more like it.
So you can see this effect that the training loss came slamming down to start with.
And then it sort of it's been flattening out a bit.
And that will look familiar to you.
You'll recognize that pattern because you saw that pattern when we were fine tuning the uh the frontier
model.
The the reason for this very dramatic drop in loss to start with is that very quickly the model realizes
that we need it to always be predicting a number, and then a decimal point and zero zero and then end.
And if it always does that, it can immediately get its losses into a manageable territory.
So it very quickly learns that.
And that's why you see this steep decline in loss to slam down from about three point something at the
start, with 3.01 all the way down quickly to 1.3.
Uh, that's what we saw before.
So this doesn't surprise us in the least.
But what we now need to see is we now need to see this line slowly improving over time.
And it's not like we're yet seeing that, to be honest.
Uh, we can do some smoothing.
You remember we did this with with with the frontier as well.
If we do this, then we'll start to see, uh, some, uh.
Hang on.
If I do show original, we see them both.
You can see that is the smoother curve and that is the jittery curve.
And yeah, I mean, okay, so now we see it this way.
It does look a bit as if we're seeing some improvement.
It looks like we're seeing some benefit to fine tuning, but it's early days, obviously.
Um, and, uh, so it's, so it's hard to read too much into it.
I should have applied that.
Hang on.
If we want to, if we want to make sure that we see that, that higher y value than I need to do this.
The reason before I zoomed in on that is because once you get used to the fact that you get that sharp,
uh, that very abrupt fall at the beginning, it becomes uninteresting.
You don't want to know about that.
What you really want to drill down on is this region right here.
And that's why I very often will bring this up and change this to like a number, like one point for
this Y range so that we're really homing in on the interesting stuff.
Are we seeing a trend here or not?
Um, okay.
And uh, what we'll also notice is that above these training charts, there are some new charts that
have appeared.
And these new charts are called eval.
And these charts this this is where the magic happens.
This is what you need to pay attention to, because this is about running the validation data set and
evaluating the progress with training on the held out data consistently every time, every every 100
steps.
So this one here eval loss.
This is everything to us.
And again we should always take careful take take take a look at the axis to make sure that we're not
deceiving ourselves, because it looks like there's been this enormous fall in eval loss, which would
be amazing.
But you can see that the axis is this is a very slight change from 1.2894 to 1.2693, so it has dropped
eval loss has dropped.
The same data set put through a second time has come down.
But we know from our previous experience with this that there can be some natural jitter.
There can be some some randomness to it.
So we don't want to declare early victory yet.
But based on two data points, it looks promising.
So here we are back at looking at running away.
And what I'm now going to do is something that that you may find a bit objectionable.
Do you watch those those those cooking shows, those cooking shows where where a master chef is preparing
some amazing meal and they're teaching you how to do it.
And it looks looks like simply you're following this and doing all these different ingredients in there,
whisking it up, doing the stuff you're figuring you're following.
They've got this, this, this cake that they made and they're taking that cake and they're putting
it into the oven and you're like, I'm with you.
I could do this too.
I got something that looks similar.
And then they say, oh, and and here's one that I made earlier and they're pulling out something else
and you're like, whoa, wait a second.
That looks completely different.
That looks amazing.
And I don't know that what you just put in is what you took out.
That's what I'm about to do.
So.
So rather than sitting here waiting for this, which which admittedly, I could, I could do offline.
I did kick this off yesterday.
And so I do have a run that's completed already that I'm now going to switch to, as if this just ran.
But the results are the same every time, so you will.
If you've been running this, you will get exactly the same results, and you will see that when this
does eventually complete, it's going to be identical.
Uh, so I feel like this is not such, such a big fib.
I'm just I'm just using it for time efficiency.
Uh, so here I have it right over here.
Here is a chart.
Here is what it looked like when I let it run to completion.
So you can see here we're looking at the training loss.
First up take a look at the learning rate.
Look at this.
Doesn't it look nice.
Now you know what the cosine scheduler does.
There was this warm up period when it went from zero up to to the to the.
You can see it's oh point naught naught 999 up to almost 0.001.
Um, and then it had this nice little gradual fall off as learning rate reduced and reduced and reduced
and got really, really tiny.
And that's what it was at step 625, which was the end of our batch.
There it is.
Uh, and if you come over here you can look at the training loss.
Let's zoom in on this a bit.
So I'm still I've got this this axis just going up to 1.4.
We want to really hone in on that.
I mean it looks promising.
It's not it's not it's not amazing.
But let's let's just, uh, just do the smoothing and see what this tells us.
Hang on.
Do this.
Do the show original.
Um, so, uh, yeah, I mean, check that out.
That does appear to be what appears to be a fall off and then sort of flattening out a bit.
So it looks like there was real learning happening there.
It looks good, you might say.
Maybe, maybe I shouldn't have had the learning rate scheduler.
Maybe we should have learned more.
But I tried that.
But you should to see see what you think.
See if learning rate is often.
That's one of the first hyperparameters people try playing with.
Do do experiment with that too.
All right.
So, uh, okay, I'm going to cancel this.
That's training loss.
And I know what you're saying.
You're saying I don't care about training loss.
I want to see eval validation loss.
Well, I got it right here for you.
Eva.
Loss tells a pretty nice story.
Check this out again.
Be careful of the axes.
Misleadingly looks like it came slamming down.
It went from.
From this number here down to this number here 1.248.
And it began at 1.29.
And the interestingly, there was a period when when Eva loss got a bit worse, but then it definitely
seems to have been getting better.
It's not like we have a huge number of data points.
But for what it's worth, this looks like a respectable improvement.
It does appear that things have improved.
It appears that there was this was productive training.
Now this is the Eva.
Loss doesn't mean much.
You're like, okay, what does this mean in terms of the number, the business metric we know?
I haven't even told you how you calculate loss yet.
I'm going to do that next time.
But cross entropy loss.
What is it exactly?
It's like a math calculation about how good was it at predicting the next token?
Uh, so we don't know what this means yet, but we will.
We're going to do that tomorrow, though.
For today, we're just focusing on the training metrics.
Okay.
So that is what it looks like when the batch completes.
That's exciting.
It looks like progress was made.
It looks like in the time of a one hour time with 20,000 data points, we were able to fine tune a llama
3.2 base model using Qlaira to reduce validation loss, improve accuracy on a held out data set.
Excellent.
What could we.
What could we possibly do now?
What?
What?
What's next?
180 - Well, you know exactly what I'm going to do next.
I'm going to to this is the training set up that's running right now.
I am going to come in and I am going to, uh, save a copy in drive, which means I'm, like, duplicating
this whole notebook to make another one.
Here it is.
Let me clear the output.
So this is starting from fresh.
Let me save this.
So it's saved.
This is a brand new, uh, Google Colab.
And I am going to use this to train again a second time.
But this time light mode is going to go from true to false.
We are going to train with the whole lot 800,000 data points, and I'm going to connect not to a T4.
I'm going to change runtime type.
I want an A100 with high Ram, and I'm going to connect to this.
And uh, yeah, it's connecting.
And you know, Google only has a limited supply of these.
So it's not like it's always guaranteed that you'll get one.
But I'm hoping that I will.
Yes.
It says I'm connected.
If I do a view few resources.
I will see what's going on here.
I've actually got other I've got the the training that we know about that's running right here.
And I've got another one of these ones running too, because I'm greedy.
I'm doing a lot uh, and so I'm using up a bunch of these credits.
So if you want to do this with me, if you want to get an A100, you need to be off the free plan and
you need to be paying.
And Google has a bunch of different ways you can pay that have different deals depending on what you
want to do.
Uh, I have a subscription, but you can also just buy, uh, amount of units and pay as you go.
And generally speaking, like it's something where you should be able to run the full training for one
epoch for just a few dollars.
But it's something that you can monitor and see how it goes.
I've spent about $50 in the last couple of days because I've been loving this.
I've had lots of sessions going.
I started out with 1900 compute units and I'm down to 730.
So yeah, I've gone a bit crazy, but I love this stuff.
And you should not spend money unless you particularly want to.
Um, okay, but here we go.
We've got our sessions Now the Google A100s have 80GB of Ram.
They are a monstrous.
They are incredible.
A year ago they only had 40GB.
And we are gonna we're gonna really pound this machine and make use of most of these 80GB.
But we're going to start as usual by doing the the installs.
And we're going to download my, my file, although I don't think we're going to use it today.
And then we've got the the usual set of imports to get everything together.
Let's run that.
And here we have the constants for training that you're used to these.
Now light mode is false.
What does that mean.
It means we're going to load in the full data set.
It means we're not going to have light in the in the hyphen of the name.
It means that we're going to be running with three epochs.
Now, whilst it took one hour for one epoch before, it's about seven hours for each epoch.
Even though it's an A100.
We've got so much data.
It's an enormous data set.
So it will be this.
This is like a 24 hour thing to leave it running for.
And by the way, Google Colab shuts you off after 24 hours.
So, so this is, this is, uh, the, the, uh, the most uh, the batch size is going to be 256.
It happens to be a power of two.
Uh, and uh, the, uh, the, the Laura R is also 256, which is, as I say, bigger than you normally
use.
We're going to use both the attention layers and the MLP layers.
We're going to have a lot of target modules and keep the dropout of 0.1.
Learning rate is going to be just before, just as before with the cosine scheduler that I love.
Um, and uh, let's run this.
And because we're on an A100, it's now going to stay true to this thing right here, which means we
get to use a faster data type.
There's we're going to use the usual optimizers.
So now we're logging into hugging face.
Oh we need to grant access.
Look here I need to grant access to weights and biases as well.
You should have done that already.
Uh, okay.
Now we're going to log into weights and biases.
And then we're going to load in our data set our training validation test data set is going to load
in this time.
We're going to load in 1000 validation data points, not 500.
It takes about two minutes to do each of those validations.
So so you know, a bunch of times during the run we're going to be running a validation.
And it's not doesn't make a huge impact okay.
Then we're going to log in to weights and biases.
Here it goes.
Uh, we've got a new new link here that we can go to to watch our run.
We're going to pick four bit quantization.
And you should experiment with, with with something else.
And we're going to load in our base model how large is our base model.
And all that matters.
But you know it's 2.2 gigs uh, which is way, way smaller than, than the normal Unquantized Lama.
And then we're going to be ready to kick off training.
So as before, we're going to set our Lora parameters.
We're going to set our training parameters.
I might just mention here, you can see here when we're doing training, we tell it this thing about
the data type that it gets to use, which is just a way that is that is a little bit more efficient
if you're on an A100.
So we're going to set that.
And finally we are going to create the SFT trainer all set up and ready for training.
And this is where we then are going to kick off our big run.
But first it's going to have to go through and add that extra token to the end of the data set.
And then it's going to have to tokenize the whole data set turning text into tokens.
And this is going to take a minute because it's a massive data set.
And it's going to have to get through the whole thing.
So this is one where we'll need to get a coffee and I will see you back, uh, which will be a coffee
for me.
It'll be an instant for you when this is finished.
And we're ready to to to press the big button to kick off fine tuning for the full data set.
And here we are.
We've got everything loaded.
It's time now to run fine tuning dot train.
Uh, and, uh, as it's the same as before, we're gonna we're gonna have the fine function of train,
and then immediately afterwards we'll save the model.
Um, although, uh, Google Colab, if you're on a paid plan, they are much more generous with how
they leave it running.
And it's fine to have this running in the background.
And they will be, uh, more after 24 hours.
They'll cut it short so you can't have it running for more than than 24 hours.
So this is going to be kicking off our big fine tuning with an enormous data set.
And it's going to be interesting to see how much of the GPU do we use up.
How much of the 80 gigabyte GPU do we use when we are training with 256 batches in our batch size on
this hefty A100?
I will see you in a second when things are underway.
Okay, so this is fun.
It's kicked off, it's running, and you can see here that on my GPU I have used up 70.1GB, which is,
uh, which is exciting.
We're really slamming this computer.
I have to say, I found it quite unpredictable how much GPU ram I used up.
I've had this strange experience, which I personally can't explain, which is if I tried doing a run
where I reduced the number of uh, of um r, I reduced R down to just, uh, more, more reasonable
32, which is more common, uh, rather than having it the 256 level, I had Laura R 32 for this run
with all of this because I wanted to see the difference.
But when I did that, the GPU Ram went up and it ran out of memory.
And that makes no sense, because having smaller R should use up less memory.
Uh, and I can't explain it.
And when I did that, I had to reduce the batch size for it to run.
Uh, and the results were worse, but, um, yeah, I don't fully know why.
So.
So I think the answer is that there's a lot of moving parts with the ways that the the, uh, fine tuning
algorithm decides how to package things up and send them to the GPU.
A lot of decisions get made.
And depending on exactly what you've done.
Things might fit in memory or they might not.
So even though I've been able to squeeze this whole run in and I've used up 70GB and it's running great,
you might find when you kick off this with only a tiny, innocuous change to the hyperparameters, that
suddenly it's not fitting.
And if that happens, all you do is you just turn down the the batch size.
That's the simplest tool that you've got to free up more memory.
But as it stands right now, with this particular set of hyperparameters, with this particular model,
we are indeed able to run the whole thing here.
It's going.
It's off.
And if we come down and have a look right here, we'll see that it is merrily going, uh, now the,
um, yeah, the progress bar is telling us here that actually this is going to take 15 hours to run
the full run.
I said, I think it's about seven hours in epoch, so this will be a 15 hour run.
Uh, so it's quite, quite a monster if you do decide to go for it and run this.
Of course, you only need to run one epoch.
You don't need to do three.
You also, some people get concerned that they've run it for a while, and then they feel like they've
got enough.
And they they don't know.
They don't know what to do.
There's no harm in stopping this.
You can stop this just by going runtime disconnect and delete runtime at any point you're saving regularly.
The hugging face hub, you can use it at any point.
There's no magic to the fact that we happen to have crammed 800,000 data points in here.
You can stop after 100,000 or 200,000.
You'll get good results.
So, you know, leave it running if you wish, but you don't have to, and you certainly don't have
to do multiple epochs.
If you're like me and you're a total sucker for this stuff, then do it and you'll love it.
Uh, I find this, uh, highly fascinating and entertaining to be running these runs.
All right.
Anyway, so it's running.
Hopefully you're sharing in my enthusiasm.
And the only thing that'll make you more enthusiastic is to actually start to look at the results in
weights and biases.
Fabulous platform.
Perfect for this.
Let's go.
181 - So I'm going to go now to the point at which we registered for weights and biases, which is right here.
And there is a link, as before, to viewing the run.
I can click on this link to bring it up.
So we see what is going on with our run.
So it's it's started off and uh, the first thing that you'll note hang on again, we may have no,
actually we don't have the first data point of the training loss.
We go straight to training loss.
That's where my eyes take me.
Immediately.
You can see that it looks.
First off, it looks.
It looks smoother than before.
We saw some very jiggly.
Or it's just gone up.
The training loss just jumped up.
Uh, it looks smoother.
The reason it looks smoother is that we've got much bigger batches, so there's a lot more that goes
into each batch.
So we're going to see less noise.
Sometimes people make the case that it's better to have smaller batch sizes, because that noise, that
jitter is actually beneficial during training because it helps basically stop you being in a local minimum.
It causes some random noise to be added to the training process.
so that is sometimes considered a disadvantage to having such large batch size as 256, but at the same
time, having 256 means we're able to to really fill up the GPU Ram, and we get through things a lot
faster.
But if you're looking for some hyperparameters to change, learning rate and batch size are usually
some of the first couple that people latch onto.
You can see the the learning rate itself appears to be going up, and you might say, why is it going
up?
When I thought learning rate was going to come down.
And the reason is because we're still in that warm up period.
If you have if you run for three epochs, this is an important thing to know.
If you run for three epochs, then the learning rate scheduler doesn't apply to each epoch.
It doesn't do this.
It applies to all three epochs.
So it basically starts slowly going up.
And then it will gradually come down throughout the period of the three epochs.
And that's really smart.
That makes a lot of sense because you want to start the whole training process with a bigger learning
rate and gradually over time, over the course of the three epochs, get tighter and tighter.
That's why it works that way.
And it's and it's really nice.
Okay.
So you can see all of this happening.
And you may be disappointed to see that we don't yet have an eval set of charts.
And that's because it's still too early in the training.
I will put you on hold.
I will be right back when I'm back.
I hope to have some eval charts for you.
So it's now run a little bit longer.
You can see we're on step 275 out of the 9000 steps.
It's got to run.
Uh, and let's just do that calculation that I did a little time ago.
So there's a total of, uh, let's see now.
There's 2000, uh, sorry, not 2000, 9000, uh, 9375 steps.
Each step has 256 batch steps.
And if I multiply those two together, you can see that that means that there's a huge amount of data
points.
How are there so many when we've only got, uh, we've only got, uh, a total of 800,000 data points?
Well, that's because we've got three epochs, and you could probably do this calculation in your head.
But if I divide that number by three, then you can see that we end up back with our magic 800,000 data
points.
Perfect.
That makes sense.
So after step 200 it did an eval calculation.
And we got our validation loss of 21.27.
Uh, so now if we go back into weights and biases here we have our training loss.
So far.
You can see it's been meandering around.
It did jump up, but it appears to be going in a direction that looks visually like it's going lower
and it's just refreshed while I was here, uh, to show us our first eval point right here.
Not much of a chart yet because it's just an eval point, but there we have it.
Okay, okay.
So now again it's it's that time.
It's the time when I put this in the oven and I pull out the finished product, because I'm not gonna
wait 17 hours right now.
I ran this, in fact, this one I think I ran a couple of days ago.
Uh, and, uh, it's it's run, it's completed.
It's time for us to go and see what do these charts look like after the full thing has run for its complete
set of of, uh, whatever it is, 17 hours or something.
Uh, and it's completed, and we'll look at what it looks like in weights and biases.
Let's go do that.
And here I present to you the result of three epochs of training across 800,000 data points, a total
of 2.4 million data points organized into its batches.
This is what it looks like.
Take it all in.
First of all, on the bottom left, this is the learning rate.
Over the course of the full three epochs, you see the warm up period.
You see that beautiful smooth path all the way down as learning rate got smaller and smaller.
And now look over here, of course, at training loss.
This is the big guy.
And remember it started probably a bit higher I just I just truncated it down.
I've put the axis to start at 1.4.
Check this out.
It looks really, really good.
But there's some warning signs.
There's some warning signs.
You see that that it appears to be coming down very nicely.
And then it seems to be leveling off a bit, and then it suddenly slams down.
And then it comes down more, more, more, more.
And then it slams down again.
And then it comes down more, more, more, more.
But maybe that's not coming down anymore there.
Uh, and this slam is a really significant one.
So what's going on?
Why do we have these sudden jumps like this?
What what is happening?
Can you can you see can you figure it out?
It's obviously the fact that we've got three epochs.
That's the first epoch, the second epoch and the third epoch.
Uh, three sets through all of the data.
Okay, sure.
But why?
Why does it jump down suddenly after the epoch?
Well, it's not good news.
It's not good.
What we're seeing, there's potentially many problems with that.
And one of them is not, not not a bad thing.
Just just a visual problem.
One of them is a big problem.
So the potential problem that isn't a major problem is just the fact that okay, so on the second epoch,
the data that's coming in is the same as in the first epoch, just jumbled up differently.
So it's not a big surprise because it's actually seen that very data before that it can do better when
it sees the same thing the second time, because it knows the model has been trained with the exact
answer.
So it might be pretty good at predicting the price of apples.
But when it's particularly asked to predict the price of a Golden Delicious apple of this from this
particular manufacturer, it's seen exactly that before.
And so, you know it's going to have a leg up.
Not that we have apples in this data set, but you know what I mean.
So that's why you would expect to see a bit of a drop, but the time when one one should be concerned
is when that drop seems unreasonably significant.
Because if it's really getting that good at recreating prices of things it's seen in its data set,
then that might indicate that it's it's it's good and it's maybe too good to be true.
Maybe it's recreating the exact price that it was given in training time in some cases.
And what's wrong with that?
Well, that would be a sign of overfitting because, you know, the items like like Golden Delicious
apples have some natural price range.
And we wanted it to figure out that the general trend of what was going on, we don't want it to always
produce the precise price of this apple.
Every time it gets a description that's like that, that would indicate that that maybe we've gone too
far.
It's latching on to the training data, and it's sort of solving exactly for what it's being given,
which makes it more like a big if statement than than something that is, uh, that is actually learning
the patterns of the data.
And what's the problem with that?
Well, the problem with that, of course, is that then when we give it unseen data in the future,
it's not going to do a good job because it hasn't learned the general trends, but rather it's sort
of built a bunch of if statements.
It's kind of learned precisely to look for gold and delicious.
And if it sees gold and delicious, it gives exactly this number.
And that won't generalize well at all.
And the the general errors will, will go up.
And I'm trying to speak to avoid saying the thing that that of course is the answer, which is we need
to look at the validation loss.
The validation loss is looking at the loss on unseen data, on data that was held out.
And that is where we should see.
Are we actually learning or are we getting in trouble here?
So that of course you can see I've got that.
Those charts are right here.
I've got them scrunched up.
And so now the reveal.
Let's look at the evals.
182 - Okay.
Here goes.
So we're looking at the results and weights and biases from our massive run.
And I'm going to open the evals so we can compare the eval loss with the training loss over here.
Let's do this.
Okay.
To give you a second to take it in.
But I'm sure you've seen the only the only chart here that we want to see is this one right here.
Let's let's look at this side by side.
Wow.
What are we seeing here?
Okay.
There's a lot to take in.
The first thing to note is that we have, uh.
First up, we've seen this little spike in eval loss that happened early on.
And I'm going to explain that in a minute.
But then we see some nice performance of the eval loss clearly coming down a lot.
It comes down to 1.24, uh when it began at 11.27.
So it came all the way.
Sorry.
Not 1.24.
Yeah.
1.124.
I mean, I was stopping myself there.
That wouldn't be so impressive.
1.124 when it began.
At 1.27, so that is quite a big drop.
Uh, that's that's that seems to be like a significant improvement.
But then, wow, what happened here?
It just suddenly got massively worse back almost to where we began.
The Eva loss jumped up and then it stayed about static here.
And look at that.
Look at how where I hover my mouse.
It shows the chart below.
What happened this moment when it went from the lowest possible loss after 6200 steps at 1.123, it
jumped up to 1.283.
Uh, the next step or the next couple of steps.
And that was when it began epoch number three.
So this this is absolutely the the key sign of overfitting happening beautifully.
We're seeing it so clear.
And this is why this is this is what I missed last year when I didn't track eval loss.
And I saw it when I then went to run the tests later, I saw that my model was was losing performance,
but I couldn't tell exactly when it happened.
Of course I could.
I could guess that it was happening at the same time as this sudden drop down, but I didn't have the
evidence.
Here we have the evidence.
We've caught you red handed.
We've caught our model here.
It is overfitting.
On the third epoch, it's suddenly the performance gets worse.
Uh, and you can see it's starting to trail off.
We weren't getting such good results.
And then bam!
So this this is this is the magic of using a platform like weights and biases to really dig in and see.
It shows us that we were productive for two epochs, and then suddenly we got worse.
And yeah, that that is that is fascinating.
And because we've been saving as we go, we've been saving along.
We've saved after 6 or 600, uh, sorry, after 6000 batch steps, that means that we know which which
batch step to to pick in our results in hugging face so that we have the best possible results.
We want the one.
Oh, no, we want the one up to 6200.
That's our that's our best, best case right there.
And then we definitely don't want 6400.
100.
Uh, so, uh, yeah, that that is, uh, that is really powerful.
Really great to see this.
And hopefully you, you appreciate this.
And, um, you've, you've, you've seen what's going on.
And I mentioned I would say a few words about what happened here when it suddenly when Eva lost spiked
up.
Well, if we take a look over here at the learning rates, you can see if you look at the chart on the
bottom left, that this is when the learning rate was at its absolute peak.
It had warmed up and it was hitting our model with really big learning rate, the biggest it ever got
to.
And my guess is what we were seeing there was this business of of jumping out of local minimums, of
global minimums even.
And so the learning rate was too high.
And so our model wasn't training properly, it was just bouncing around.
And that's why the loss like flew up for a little bit.
Uh, but then the learning rate got more manageable and we started to see learning.
So I wouldn't worry about this, but it might be a sign that maybe my, my highest learning rate point
was just a hair too high.
And we might do better having a smaller number than that, but it didn't seem to affect too much things.
Things got back on track.
But the real, the real learning point here is that we see that a couple of epochs were productive.
And the third epoch was not.
And it's not clear that we even need to do a third epoch.
It might not be possible, but if you wanted to try and get more juice out of this, then you would
want to try and research.
How can we do better?
How can we avoid overfitting on the third epoch?
And there are many ways to go about doing that with hyperparameters.
The most obvious one, of course, is to take dropout.
I told you that that's what dropout is all about.
I chose a dropout of 10%.
You could try 20%.
You might be able to get the same kind of performance here, although it wouldn't do quite as well.
Presumably it would be a little bit behind, but it might then be able to keep training and get to a
better point after three epochs, because dropout is higher, resulting in less overfitting.
But maybe not.
There's no way to find out other than to experiment.
And there are.
There are other things that you can do to to try and do this.
One of them might be, You could argue, maybe my R is too high and maybe I've targeted too many target
modules.
So I've given the model too much flexibility, allowing it to start overfitting.
So there are there might be tricks to try and reduce the amount of flexibility I've given the model.
Maybe I went too far, but doing two epochs and getting results is still pretty good.
So I'm fine with this for now.
But definitely the challenge for you is going to be to dig in and see if you can't optimize the hyperparameters,
see if you can't do even better than this lowest eval loss again for 6201.
That's funny, isn't it?
It's an easy number to remember 1.12345.
That is the loss for you to beat.
Uh uh, one.
Yeah, yeah.
That does appear to be my my lowest ever loss.
So if you can do better than 1.1, two, three, four, five, then then, uh, then you have beaten
me, at least when it comes to eval loss for this data set.
Uh, and of course, what we really want to know is what is the actual test performance on this?
Okay, so that's, uh, those are the results.
Uh, the next thing I want to talk about is generally hyperparameter optimization and comparing different
runs.
So we're looking here at the results of this batch that ran a couple of days ago.
Uh, but what we can do, if you look up here in the breadcrumbs, you can see that there's my my user
account.
It should have your name, projects, price and then these runs and I can click back on price.
And what I get to see is all the runs that I have done in, uh, on, on, on this, on this test,
uh, and you can see that I've been, uh, going a bit crazy with this.
Uh, so, so how does this work?
So what you're seeing is you're seeing all of the charts together in one place.
And over here on the left, you get to choose when, as I click here and I click on and off, I can
turn on and off different charts over on the right, because if you show everything, it can start to
get really busy.
Um, here are all my different runs that I've been running.
Let's take out some of them so it's not too crazy.
Uh, I the, uh, this one here main is the one we were just looking at.
Now, when you hover over a run on the left.
So sorry to to.
I'm overexcited, so I'm not explaining myself well on the left.
Here are the names of all of the runs that you've done.
On the right are the same charts we saw before, but it's got all of the graphs superimposed.
Uh, and so also when I hover on a run on the left, it highlights that chart on the right.
And when I turn on and off the I symbol here, it shows or hides one of the runs.
This one here called main that I'm hovering over now is the one we were just looking at.
And, uh, that that you can see, um, is, um, is, is, is actually the best results that I got.
You can see eval loss on the right there.
The lowest number I got was for the run.
I just showed you, uh, that that is the my my best.
Even though it slams up and starts overfitting.
You can see I've got another one that does pretty well.
Uh, not that one.
Uh, one of them.
It's one of these here, I think.
Uh, there it is, there it is.
It's this one, uh, also does quite well, but it doesn't do any better, I don't think.
Uh, so, uh, all of these start to overfit pretty quickly.
This one actually did quite well after the first.
Let's have a look at this one.
Let's see what the eval loss turned out to be.
Uh, it turned out to be 1.13.
So slightly higher.
Still not my best run.
My best run is the one that we were.
We were just looking at this one here that I've called main.
So this is where you run your experiments.
This is.
You're not an engineer.
You're a scientist.
You're putting on your science hat.
You're running different experiments, experimenting with hyperparameters, try different batch size.
You can see this high LR.
Low LR is when I tried a lower learning rate and a higher learning rate to see how that affected the
results.
And it turned out the one the learning rate I picked was the best one.
And if you're wondering, wow, you're really great at this.
How did you pick the best learning rate as one of the earliest runs you've done?
Well, first of all, I've deleted a bunch of things that were failed experiments.
But also remember, I did all of this last year and so I've already had a whole bash at making the right
learning rate.
So I was starting from the best that I had last year, and this is a whole lot more.
Turned out that what I got to last year is pretty much still the best hyperparameters for most things.
Anyway, the trick is to come in here, experiment, do do lots of tests, try things out, try some
batches with smaller batch size which will then have lots more steps.
That's why they go longer.
If I take that one out then then we'll see a bit more of all of our charts.
Uh, and then look at everything together.
Use this as your way.
Uh, look at these training losses.
Look at the, uh, you can really see how it's very much not the case that a good training loss is going
to be a good eval loss.
Why it's so important to measure your eval.
Uh, and, uh, yeah.
Use this as your way to, to experiment, test your experiments and, and find the best model for the
task.
183 - Okay.
And just a couple more quick things to show you.
Looking here again at this beautiful display of all of our all of our training runs, our training and
our eval results over here on the left, you've got the different the runs, as I said, and they're
shown as timestamps.
And the benefit of doing it this way is that they appear in order of when you ran it like this.
And it's quite easy to see what you did when.
The disadvantage, of course, is you can't see in a in a quick glance what was going on at each point.
Sometimes I've added in a suffix to help me.
Another way you can do this is you can actually click on the on this menu right here and say Edit Run
name.
And this allows you to change a display name that allows you to, to make something say like like over
here it's for main I can say edit, run name, change the display name to main best.
And then when I press save this is only changed the user interface, the weights and biases UI.
It hasn't changed the actual name of the run, and it gives you a way to keep track of what you've done.
So it's very convenient, particularly when you end up with huge numbers of runs as I often do.
Uh, so there you have it.
The final, final thing I wanted to show you is going to hugging face.
So I'm going to flip over to my my hugging face page.
You go you go to your hugging face account.
You click on your avatar and go to your profile page right here.
And if you come down to models, you'll see all of the models that you've created.
I've got 199 of them.
Uh, and uh, you can come into here and look at them all.
And of course, it's been, it's been given the name of the price hyphen, the run name, which is how
we uploaded it to the, to the, the hub.
But you can call it whatever you want in the code.
Now I want to find the one that ends in 007.
I remember this is the one that is our best our best one.
So if I click into this I'm now looking at this model.
This is the model.
There's some default readme that I should probably overwrite which says about it.
And remember there's this Files and versions tab that shows us this is uh, hugging face is essentially
a git repository.
These are just the files that are stored against this fine tuned model.
The adapter model safe tensors.
This this is the real thing.
This is 1.56GB worth of precious data that has our fine tuned results.
There's a file called adapter config, which gives you all of the sort of the basic parameters.
There's Lora alpha being 512.
There's R being 256.
These are the target modules that we were targeting.
So these are all of the parameters that were used for this.
Um, but the one thing I really wanted to show you that's so important is this thing right here, history
48 commits.
You go here, you click here and you see the different commits.
And you can come down here and find commit number 6200.
This one of course.
This is the one that 6200 was the one which is at the very bottom.
Our best possible results.
So this one here has a commit ID that references this very version of it.
And we can copy that to the clipboard.
And that means that that in a second or in a second tomorrow when we, when we actually run this thing,
we're going to be able to say, hey, we want this checkpoint, this version of the model, because
that was when we were at our best evaluation.
And that's what I mentioned to you before.
That's what people sometimes call it early stopping, or they usually say that when you actually stop
training at that point.
But it's this ability to look back and say, we're going to hand select the model that performed best
on validation loss.
And as a subtle point, this is also why you need your validation data to be separate from your final
test data.
Because by selecting the the version of the model that performs best on our validation data, in a way
we're kind of doing some training.
We're involving that in our decision making process about what's the best model.
So if we were to just use your validation data to to also to test, we know we get a good answer because
we selected it for that purpose and that would be cheating.
Maybe we just got lucky with some random noise and it's doing better on the validation data for random
luck.
That's why it's important that we held out a separate set of data, the test data, the third pool of
data so that we've got training, validation and test.
The test data was not used to select the right model.
And that's how we know that we've been pure and careful, and that the test data will really tell us
whether our model is any good.
So anyways, we've copied this into the clipboard.
That's how we select a particular version of the model.
That's something that we'll be using tomorrow.
Okay, that's enough of looking at runs.
I hope that you've been having fun running your own runs.
I will see you back for the wrap.
Okay.
What a day it's been.
So we've done our training.
Hopefully you've done your training too.
We've we've, uh, got to the point.
We've got our evaluation.
Loss of validation.
Loss is low.
It's a 1.1234, if I remember right.
Uh, and, uh, we've, we've got the very checkpoint of the model that did.
Well, what we got to do now is actually evaluate this, see, see how it is in practice on our test
data.
And that is what we're going to do tomorrow.
I can't wait for it.
Uh, and then and then at that point, you will know how to confidently carry out the end to end process
to pick a commercial problem like guessing the right prices and, uh, work all the way through fine
tuning your own model to be able to solve that problem.
See you tomorrow.
184 - Well, here we are.
It is week seven.
Day five.
Somehow it's the big reveal.
The results day.
Uh, but first, a reminder.
You can already work with open source, closed source models, with calling tools, with with assistance
with Rag five step strategy to solving a business problem, including curating data, fine tuning a
frontier model, and now running Q Laura for an open source model including hyperparameter optimization,
monitoring the training, and the fabulous weights and biases.
Hopefully, hopefully you didn't get as overexcited as me, but at least you enjoyed the process of
doing it.
And today, of course, it's results day.
We're going to to run inference on a model which has been fine tuned.
So with Laura matrices and stuff.
So there's some some things to cover there and wrap up with, you know, so you're in a position that
you could confidently do all of this yourself.
That's the big part of it.
Um, and I'm, I'm excited to show you the results.
Of course, what we're trying to, to get towards is get something that is close to the performance
of a frontier model.
Recognizing we're working with llama 3.2, a 3 billion parameter model, a tiny model by by comparison
to multi-trillion dollar frontier models, recognizing that we've quantized it down to four bits so
it could run on a mobile phone pretty much for sure.
And so it's very small.
The question is, can we get close to frontier performance at least?
Can it beat Ed?
It should at least be able to beat my my abilities.
Maybe it could get close to GPT four one nano or something like that.
That that's that's what we're striving for when you're trying to fine tune an open source model because
it's free and it's something that that you could use.
Okay.
But first, before we we do that before we run inference, I do want to to close the loop on something
that I've had hanging out there for a while, which is explaining what exactly is this loss calculation
that we we keep covering.
What is the loss?
How is it calculated.
Just a bit more detail on training.
So a few theory slides before we get into action okay.
Here we go.
You remember the four steps of training.
You know them well now.
We coded them one by one.
Uh, a week ago.
But now we know that you first do a forward pass.
It's when you have some input data and you predict what will be the next token by going through that
input data, the loss calculation, some calculation that says how wrong were we.
You do the backward pass, which is when we say okay, if we tweak each of these parameters, does it
make the loss better or worse?
And then we take a tiny step in the direction that reduces loss.
It's called the optimizer.
You remember we used an optimizer called Adam Adam w I think we used which is very popular.
The, the original one is called SGD stochastic gradient descent.
That's the one which is basically just saying take the learning rate times the gradients and going the
other way and negative learning rate gradients take a step.
That's it.
So those are the four steps in training.
Uh, you've experienced this a few times now.
And what we're going to dig into is this loss calculation.
And just a bit more perspective on this, this this whole idea.
So again the first step is the forward pass.
So there's an input prompt input sequence like price is dollars.
And then that's the next token.
It's got to predict that is an input sequence.
It's turned into token IDs.
Those token IDs are fed in to a a neural network which consists of a base llama 3.2 and then some Lora
adapters which have some some things which will able to adapt, able to slightly tune llama that get
applied.
What comes spitting out at the end is the predicted next token.
Let's say it says the price is $99.
It predicts 99 is the most likely next token.
That's the forward pass.
The loss calculation comes next.
The loss calculation take the predicted next token is 99.
Let's say this thing actually cost $89.
We're off by $10.
So we need to calculate some loss.
And that loss has got to be related to how wrong were we if we were exactly right.
If it was a perfect prediction, then the loss should be zero representing no error.
It was perfect.
If if the if it's a if we're more wrong, the worse we are, the higher the loss should be.
Okay.
A bigger number means worse result.
Sure.
You're thinking so you might be thinking, okay, why not?
How about we take the difference between them?
The absolute error.
That's what we've been using all this time.
Or maybe the mean squared error that linear regression uses.
But there's a problem with that that we will come to.
But you get the general idea.
That's what loss is all about.
Then we do something called the backward pass, which again is saying, okay, let's go to every single
parameter and say if we were to twiddle it a bit, would that make loss bigger or smaller.
And that of course is called calculating the gradients because it's like a calculus thing and that we
only have to do that for the Laura adapters because we've frozen all of the base model.
So we're only doing this, this tweaking for these, these smaller Laura adapters, they are being subjected
to gradient based optimization.
It's how you'd explain it.
And doing this is something that would be very laborious and complex calculation involving tons and
tons of maths.
But there is a clever trick.
A trick that's known as back prop or back propagation, which is a way to calculate the gradients,
calculate how sensitive everything is to being just changed slightly by working from from the the the
bottom of the neural network, working all the way back up to the inputs again, and calculating all
the gradients as a function of the gradients that came before.
And it's because it uses a mathematical trick called the chain rule, which is something that you might
remember from high school, like a calculus thing, which is how you're able to calculate gradients
in terms of other gradients.
And so it uses this approach of repeatedly applying the chain rule working backwards.
And this was something that was it was invented some time ago.
But this this trick is one of the sort of secrets that has made, uh, made training neural networks
so effective.
It's such an efficient way to do it that an operation that would have been very, very time consuming
can happen rapidly.
And particularly it can happen very efficiently, in parallel rapidly.
And so we're able to calculate the gradients in this thing called back propagation or back prop.
And all of that is known as the backward pass.
Okay.
So that's backprop.
And you've probably heard that expression.
If you want to know more about backprop then then it's easy to look it up and get more detail.
But I don't want to get too into the gory detail here.
It's actually the the algorithm itself is very old.
I think it's from the 1970s or so, but it was in the 1980s, I think 1986 that that it was there was
the very famous paper.
One of the authors was Geoff Hinton, who is like a, you know, considered one of the godfathers of
modern AI, uh, and that that really sort of brought it to the forefront of using it for neural networks
in AI.
Um, so backprop super essential.
All right.
And then optimization is the fourth step.
And this is where we take all of the adapters and we slightly step them in the direction.
That's going to mean that next time the loss will be less okay.
You get it.
You know about these four steps.
So now let me go one level deeper deeper so that I can explain what exactly is the loss calculation
itself.
185 - Okay, back to this diagram again.
Remember this.
We just saw this.
The forward pass.
I told you that the forward pass is about taking an input prompt, going through and predicting the
next token.
But that's not exactly true.
I didn't lie, but I oversimplified in a way that is is necessary for us to go go deeper.
Now, that's not what a forward pass actually does as actually, you know, from from when we did this
like week three, I think what the forward pass does, it doesn't it doesn't predict the next token.
It outputs a probability distribution for every possible token in the vocab, every single one of the
128,000 possible next tokens.
Each one is given a probability.
And and that's why if you remember the the output of the LM head, the last layer of the neural network,
it was a it was a 128,000 dimensional matrix because of a vector, because every element of that vector
is the probability that that is the correct next token, and it's designed in such a way.
It's the sort of process such that it all adds up to one, so that you have to be able to, to, to,
uh, you can't you can't have 200 tokens.
You have to it has to be organized such that the probabilities will all add up to one.
And the model has made its prediction in a probabilistic way.
And typically when we talk about the predicted next token, we're talking about the way that it samples
the picks, one of these tokens from this probability distribution.
And I realize we've covered this in prior lectures.
You you probably know this already.
Uh, sometimes you just pick the maximum, the token that got given the highest probability.
And that's typically what happens if you set temperature to zero.
So what you're saying you want um, sometimes as well, instead of that with a lower temperature you
just sample from these probabilities.
You pick the one that has the highest probability.
So that's that's a that's how it actually works.
And so when we say the predicted token is 99, what we mean is that got a 15% probability, say, and
that was the highest probability.
So that was the one that we picked.
Okay.
So then the loss calculation.
So we came up with a next token of 99.
And the actual next token was 89.
How do we calculate the loss.
What do we do between these two numbers.
Well here's the thing that might be slightly surprising.
If you don't know this, we actually don't consider that 99 token at all.
It doesn't have any bearing in the loss calculation.
You're like, what?
Uh, we don't look at that, but rather.
And this is the this is the aha moment.
Rather we say what probability did the model give to the, to the token that we actually wanted?
What probability did it give to the token for 89.
It doesn't matter what it said for 99 because that wasn't the right answer.
What did it say for 89?
Um, and you know, because it can't because everything has to add up to one if it gave a 15% probability
to 99, then it must be less than that.
If that wasn't the max, it's got to be some smaller number for 89.
So what probability did it give to 89?
That's the next thing we look at.
And basically if it gave an 100% probability to to 89 then it would be a perfect model.
It said it is a 100% likely that the next token is the token for 89, and that that would mean that
we would, uh, we would want the loss to be zero.
If it had a any other number, we would want the loss to be higher.
And the smaller the number, the higher the loss.
And so they use a formula, uh, to, to get this.
They want to have a formula where if the probabilities are 100 then the loss is zero.
If the probability is smaller, we want the loss to be higher.
And that formula which is just a bit of maths for you, they take the negative log of the probability
you remember logs.
Well you in case you don't remember, logs.
The log of one is zero, so the negative log of one meaning 100% would be zero.
So it certainly passes that test.
And the negative log of a smaller number would be a higher number.
So it passes both tests.
So the negative log of the probability that the model gave the actual next token the one we were looking
for 89.
That is how the loss is calculated.
And if you're wondering why, it's because that just sort of works out really nicely with the maths.
It works out nicely when you're calculating this.
The back prop, when you're doing back prop, using the negative log just just works out elegantly and
makes things easy.
And so it meets all the properties.
It performs well.
And so that's what we pick.
And it means that trying to reduce that negative log of the probability, the actual next token does
a great job of training neural networks and doing that.
Uh, that combined with this idea of calculating probabilities that is known as the cross entropy loss.
Cross entropy loss.
That's what that calculation is all about.
And you hear the expression cross entropy loss a lot.
I've been saying it lots of times.
And those loss numbers that we were seeing, both for the training loss and the validation loss, they
were cross entropy loss.
And maybe you're thinking, okay, but why?
Why didn't we just take the difference between these two numbers or something like that?
And that's because remember that these LMS, they're not really designed to be coming up with numbers.
That's not what they do.
They're really trying to predict tokens and natural language.
It could be a price.
It could be some English comment.
It could be anything.
So whilst taking the difference between the numbers might work okay, in our case it wouldn't generally
work.
You wouldn't be able to use that for any other case.
The great thing about this cross-entropy loss calculation is that it works for anything, for anything
you can imagine.
Just saying.
We wanted it to to come up with this recommendation, find out what probability it gave to that recommendation
and take the negative log of that probability that works for everything.
It's a standard way of calculating loss for for a classification problem.
And what we've got here is really classifying.
We're trying to classify the most likely next token.
That's what's happening.
That's why this works so well and why it is across the board used for for for LMS okay.
That's the loss calculation.
Uh, and uh yeah.
So so we take the negative log of the probability of the true value, the negative log of the probability
of $89 in this case.
And if you take the negative log of one you get zero.
So if you if you say it's 100% gonna be 89 and you're right, that's perfect.
No loss.
Otherwise the negative log, the smaller the number, the higher the loss.
It works great.
That is the loss.
And then having calculated that loss, we do backprop.
And then after that we do optimization.
As before, we're doing a little step so that next time the probability of the true thing will hopefully
be slightly higher.
So that loss is slightly lower.
It works perfectly.
And so just to summarize all of that one more time then.
So the output of a model, it's not just simply predicting the next token, it's the probability of
all the possible next tokens.
And yeah I said it's the output of the last layer which isn't quite right.
The people who are were dying to correct me.
I'll say it right now, you actually use a function called the softmax function, which turns the outputs
of that last layer into probabilities.
And then during when you're in inference, you can either just pick the token with the highest probability,
or you can sample based on the probabilities.
Lots of ways of doing it.
Uh, and temperature.
And there's other, other parameters you can pass in inference.
Time to choose how you pluck out each of the tokens and the loss function.
As I was saying, it's it's perfectly simple.
What probability did the model assign to the true next token should have given 100%, but it didn't.
It gave it a lower number.
And so you take the negative log of that probability.
And that just works really nice.
And this approach of using the softmax function to come up with probabilities, and then using the negative
log likelihood as the negative log of the probability that is known as cross entropy loss and is is
super common.
And and what we do with LMS so that that is the background that is now, now you should feel like you've
got that, that theoretical foundation.
Of course, there's so much more that can be said about all of this, and you can do a bit of research
yourself if you've got more questions or of course, ask me, but but uh, yeah, hopefully now a different
bits are coming together and you're thinking, all right, I've done it.
I've put up with all of your slides.
Now, is it not time for us to see some results?
186 - Okay, without further ado, we are in the week seven day five Colab, which we will find linked of
course in the repo under week seven, day five and I'm going to connect.
I've just connected to a T4.
Be sure that you're connected to a T4 and I'm going to run the pip installs.
At the top one is the couple of Pip installs.
And then also I am fetching our eval script and this time we will indeed use it.
We're going to run some imports and then we're going to define some constants.
Okay.
Let me pause on this for a second.
That is the base model that you know.
Well this is the Pricer, uh, the project name.
This is my hugging face username if you want to use my models, if you've done this yourself, of course,
you put in your models like mode.
Let's put light mode as true initially.
We're going to run this in light mode first.
So uh, what I've got then the data user, of course if you're using your data set change it to you.
Otherwise keep mine load in the right data points okay.
And then if we're in light mode we're going to use the saving of that I just showed you.
That makes some progress.
If we're not in light mode, we're going to use the hefty run that I showed you.
And this.
This is where I have pasted that revision number, that checkpoint ID, the hash that I took from hugging
face from the repo for that was aligned with step.
Was it 6200?
I think step 6200 of the run.
The best step we've got.
And then we will put this together to a project, uh, and a hub name.
And this is going to give us hopefully.
So right now we're going to be looking at the light mode okay.
Then we log in to hugging face.
We load in the data sets.
Um, and let's just quickly check the first test item.
Remember the validation calculations we did was on a different data set.
We've held out this test set to the very end.
And of course the first item the test set is our favorite one our modulation pedal.
We're going to do some quantization.
And here we go.
We're now going this is where the juice happens.
So we we set a tokenizer.
We set the base model so far exactly as before.
This is the line that's different.
This is where we say, um, the fine tuned model is the model is the parameter efficient fine tuning
that is hugging face name for Laura.
Uh, path model from pre-trained.
And we give it the base model and we give it the name of the model on the hub that we want to collect.
And it's just as simple as that.
It will load in these, these Laura matrices.
And it will make a new model called a model, which is ready to have that base model and these adapters
on top of it.
And if you want, you can specify a revision, which means that you want it to look for that particular
checkpoint.
So if a revision is set then it does that too.
So this is what we are now running.
This is our way of of loading in from disk.
The uh the fine tuned model that we've got.
And I will, uh, let, let this load in because it takes a minute.
I'll see you in a sec.
And so that ran nicely.
And the memory footprint is two, two, seven, one megabytes, which makes sense.
We saw this before.
It's 2.2GB for the base model, plus about 70MB of adapters.
Okay, let's actually print this model.
Here it is.
Uh, this this is the adapted llama model.
You'll see that the self-attention layers, the Q, V, and O layers, they have been adapted with lora
A and Lora B matrices.
They have 32 inner dimensions.
That's because R is 32.
And if you keep going, you'll see that the MLP layers they have not got adapters because when we did
the light training we only focused on the attention layers.
So this is all as expected.
It's now time for us to run inference and to run inference.
We've got a version we've got we've got a model predict.
This is another function which we're going to test against.
It's responsible for taking an item and for returning the cost by calling an LM.
And you may recognize this function because this is what we use to test the base model a couple of days
ago.
Same approach.
We're using this now to test our fine tuned model.
Starting with the light variation we're going to try and at least beat human level performance.
Ed got $87.
Uh, my my finest hour.
Uh, and, uh, then we're going to to also see can we get close to GPT for one nano, which got 62.51.
We've got two cracks at this.
We've got the the light version and then we'll try with the full version.
Let's see.
Okay.
Here we go.
It's time to to run.
Uh, so off it goes.
It's running the evaluate algorithm right now.
Well there's some nice green.
There's some red though.
Okay.
This is exciting.
This is this is like the moment of truth.
This is what we've been waiting for for so long.
Uh, it's it's slamming through them.
It's got 200 to do.
Uh, and, uh, I feel I feel anxious, um, and we're coming up to the quarter way point.
I feel like I'm a commentator here.
Uh, and, uh, probably I'm probably not going to.
I'm not going to hang on in there.
You're not going to watch me sweat.
Uh, I'm going to, um, finish off and come back in just a second when this is complete.
Well, I thought I'd let you watch the final, final ten countdown for me to to see what you see.
Here we go.
Here are the results.
Bam!
Okay, okay.
There we go.
So the final number is $65 and 40, 65 and 40.
That means that it did better than Ed.
And it got very close to GPT 41 nano.
That's pretty impressive.
This is a model.
This is a model which is based on a simple llama 3.2.
And it took like it was trained on a free T4 box.
No, nothing spent at all.
And we were able to get a very decent result.
You look at this chart visually, it looks really impressive, really nice, a great outcome.
That's so cool.
Hopefully the least.
I of course you could have just used this to to take intuition or you might have done this free training
yourself and you should have the same result and you should be pretty pleased with that.
You've just built a model which is basically competing competitive with the frontier performance from
GPT 41 nano, and that is a fine, fine result.
187 - Okay, but.
But we've got one more thing to do.
Haha.
I haven't forgotten and I'm sure you haven't either.
Let's do a run time restart session and clear all of our outputs.
Get everything back to scratch again and it's restarting.
We're still on a T4.
We will run this, but the difference is light mode is false.
We are going the whole hog here.
We are going to test this model.
We're going to pick this run name and this revision and see if we can't get a bit more competitive with
GPT for one nano.
Uh, okay.
So again we go through we load in our data set.
It's going to load in the full data set.
We don't actually need all the all the training data.
But but but whatever we'll load that in.
We're then going to load in the base model again and see you in a second when everything is loaded and
we're ready.
Okay.
It's loaded in the total model size is 3.753MB.
And that, of course, is the 2.2MB of the base model.
And then there's like a 1.5 or so gigabytes.
So 2.2GB of base model, 1.56GB of the adapters.
Okay.
And uh, if I print out the fine tuned model, what you'll see here, of course, is that the Lora adapters
are on all of the attention layers.
And they've now got more dimensions, 256 dimensions because R was 256.
But also if you scroll down to the MLP layers, you'll see that they're adapters there as well.
Uh and look you'll see the 0.1 dropout in all other places as well for, for both of these models.
Uh, so there they are.
This is hopefully exactly what you're expecting.
It's time again for us to run model predict.
We know we should be able to beat the performance.
That's not hard.
Uh, but we're now hoping.
I mean, we're going to be close to this.
It would be nice if we could beat GPT four one nano.
that would certainly be quite satisfying.
Let's see what happens.
Well, it hasn't started.
Well.
We've got a yellow and a red to start with.
Well I will, I will see you closer to the time, closer to the big reveal.
See you in a second.
Okay, so we see some reds, yellows and greens.
We're coming up to the end.
Looks promising.
There's a lot of greens there.
Three more to go.
Here we go, here we go, here we go, here come the results.
And holy moly there we have the results 39 and 8539 .85.
Let's write that down 39.85.
What does that mean.
That means that this model just outperformed every single other model that we have tested.
This model just crushed not only not only did it do better than what I was driving for GPT four one
nano, but it crushed every frontier model Gemini three.
Nope.
Claude 4.5 opus.
Nope.
G 5.1.
Considered the strongest model on the planet as of.
For me right now.
Nope.
We beat it.
It scored.
Uh, what was it, 44.74?
And we crushed it with our own homegrown model.
We just got a three handle and we got 39.85.
We got it into the 30s.
Wow.
Wow.
Now, you might be completely mind blown by this.
How is it?
How is it conceivable that a model with so few parameters, a four bit quantize llama 3.2 model that
could fit on a mobile phone with with these these adapters that we've we've got that still just a fraction
of the size.
How could that have performed better than a frontier model that's had $100 million worth of training.
Well, that's, uh, that's something for us to discuss.
But but before we do that, let's just take a moment to just marvel and celebrate the success of this
result.
This is an astonishing result.
We have just built a solution to our commercial problem that has beaten the frontier.
This is the strongest model at predicting the price of goods according to our test set, the strongest
model on the planet.
And of course, to bring bring it back to to ground.
Before I get too overexcited about this, you need to keep in mind what we've achieved here is we've
been able to make an LLM be the strongest model on the planet at a very specific business task, with
a lot of very specific data.
So, you know, the the point is that fine tuning gives us this ability, given a concrete task, to
do really, really well at it.
In fact, better than a frontier model with hundreds of millions of dollars of training, because we've
made it specifically better for that task.
And that allows you to achieve superior performance to the top frontier models for your task.
If you have data and that's that's where fine tuning really excels.
It's at building a skill, a particular expertise that can generalize outside its training data.
If you have enough of that proprietary data like we had here.
So, you know, with that in mind, maybe it's not so shocking that we manage to do it.
It's still really satisfying though, and it's great to have got this point of 39.85 beating frontier
models at our task, and it only remains for me now to reveal the the chart that we like looking at.
Here is the chart with our latest results in it.
So what we see here of course is the original traditional ML then the disappointing end results and
then the the traditional neural network and then not traditional, but like a modern neural network.
And then the results from a series of different frontier models.
The the GPT 4.1 nano fine tuned, which did a terrible job, then the deep neural network that did a
really good job.
Uh, and then the base llama, the fine tuned just with one hour of training, which did fine.
It beats, uh, the fine tuned GPT four one nano.
It beat editor, but it didn't do better than even even a simple vanilla neural network.
But.
But when we fine tuned a model based on all of our data for for many hours for two epochs, as it turns
out, because at the end of the second epoch, the snapshot that we took, we were able to beat everything
else on the board.
We got into the 30s just we scraped into the 30s with this astounding result, and that is a really
satisfying conclusion to week seven.
And with that, that is a wrap on week seven.
We've completed it.
We beat the frontier, which is really what I set out to do.
And we did it.
And you may wonder, what is the assignment for you?
Of course, there's an assignment for you.
The assignment for you is to come in now and beat me.
That 39 number you've got.
I haven't done that much hyperparameter optimization.
There is juice in there.
There is room.
I am waiting for you to beat me.
Come in, run some runs, experiment and explore and see if you can't get it down into the lower in
the 30s.
I'm sure it's possible if I get there first.
And of course I will.
I will update the, uh, the materials to to boast about it.
I'll probably put it in the, in the repo so you can see my latest.
Um, and I'll keep sharing anything I do to get better.
But the challenge for you do some hyperparameter optimization.
Look for ways.
Often the biggest use comes from manipulating the data in some way to be able to teach it better.
So that's something.
Something to keep in mind.
All right.
But now celebrating your success as we wrap up week seven, not only not only can you generate text
and code, use tools, use assistants, not only can you build with Rag, follow a five step strategy
to solving a business problem with LMS.
Fine tune a frontier model.
But now you can confidently carry out the process to fine tune an open source model so that it can perform
well in a commercial task.
And if you have enough data and if you have a clear enough objective, then guess what?
You can beat frontier level performance.
You can be better than GPT 5.1 at your task.
Wow.
Okay, so if you thought that this week was as good as it gets, if you thought this was just brilliant,
I hope you did, I did.
Then I have news for you.
Next week is even better.
I know that sounds hard to believe, but it is.
Next week is when, first of all, we do some really interesting stuff about Productionizing.
When we take this model we built, and we use the serverless AI platform to make it be up on the internet
so that we can call it remotely from anywhere.
We're also going to build a large scale Rag pipeline.
We're going to go back to Rag for this specific the same problem.
You get sick of this problem.
But but we are going to use Rag because it's such a great use case for rag.
And then finally we're going to build an agentic solution a genetic AI, all the rage.
I have a separate course on genetic AI, but in this one we're going to build one from scratch and it's
going to use our model.
It's going to use a ton of stuff, and it's going to give you a fitting finale that will blow your mind.
You need to get some sleep because it's a lot happened this week.
You've got a lot done.
Hopefully you beat my numbers as well.
Get some some rest and recharge and come back ready to go for week eight.
I'll see you then.
188 - Well, I promised you a finale, and a finale is what you're going to get.
Welcome to week eight.
Welcome to the last week.
It's going to be a really storming week.
Let's get to it.
So already, you know you can generate code, you can generate text, you can use frontier closed source
paid models and open source models through a llama through hugging face.
You can use tools, build assistants, use rag with lang chain and without lang chain and evaluate it.
You can follow a five step strategy to solve problems, including curating your data, making a baseline
model, fine tuning a frontier model.
And now you can confidently carry out the process to fine tune your own model starting from a pre-trained
model, turning it into something that with enough data and with a good task, you can outperform the
frontier.
What a week was last week.
This time everything comes together.
This week is going to be about revising all the different bits and pieces we've done along the way,
and bringing it together into something that weaves agents into the mix.
Agents, of course.
Super exciting.
We're going to bring in agents.
We're going to also bring in, uh, rag again, a repeat of rag in a way that will hopefully surprise
you.
And we're gonna start by today deploying an LLM in a serverless AI platform called models.com, which
is really terrific.
So we're going to be doing something that is a sort of nod towards productionizing your product.
We're going to take a fine tuned LM, deploy it on the cloud with models.com, and then we're going
to turn it into an agent.
All of that is going to happen today, but let's just see the diagram one time.
Uh, you began there all the way over there.
All the way over on the left.
It seems like eons ago we did the foundations, the chat completions API.
We looked at different frontier APIs.
We did some UIs for the first time and multimodality.
Then in week three, we dug into hugging face.
We used the pipelines and then the model transformers libraries.
And then in week four, we selected the right LM for the task at hand.
And we built something that made code massively faster porting from Python to C++.
In week five, we dove into Rag.
We built a question answering system and we did it with long chain without long chain.
And then in week six we curated a data set and we ended the week disappointingly fine tuning a frontier
model without too much success.
But we made up for it in week seven, as I promised we would.
We fine tuned an open source model and it outperformed the frontier.
And now, in week eight, a gentle guy, the return of Rag, and lots of other bits and pieces to come
together in order that by the end of this week you will be able to say, okay, I got there.
I am an LM engineer and to remind you of the capstone project, but to give you a bit more, it's more
sizzle now, the capstone project.
So we're going to build an autonomous A genetic framework that takes the model that we've built and
turns it into a product.
The idea is to feel really agentic, which I will define in just a second.
But ideally you want something that feels like it's got a kind of it exists beyond just the context
of a chat with a user.
And so we're going to want to have a system that is running.
It's going to be watching for deals published online by subscribing to RSS feeds.
And when it finds deals that are published, it's going to examine the deals.
It's going to pick ones that feel juicy and it's going to to estimate the price of how much it really
costs.
Who knows how it's going to do that.
And then once it's looked at that, it's going to say, okay, so so here's a bunch of things online.
Here's how much they're being offered for as a bargain.
Here's how much I think they actually are worth based on on all of my smarts.
And so now I've identified which one is the most compelling deal.
And so that it can feel really autonomous and out there.
It's then going to send a push notification to your phone, to my phone and your phone with the deal
so that we can get hold of that deal and maybe buy ourselves a new TV or whatever.
So we are going to have seven different agents collaborating on this.
They're going to be doing all sorts of things, identifying deals, pricing them, and we're going to
be using, of course, as you figured, our model that beats the frontier to estimate prices.
But we're going to do more than that too.
We're going to build a second model to estimate prices as well.
And it's going to use Rag so that we bring everything together.
That's the capstone project.
Conclusion.
That is the price is Right.
We will have that up and running and serving you deals by the end of this week.
And so to give you the order of play, what I have in store for you and I should I should warn you that
this week is going to go at a fast pace.
Your pros at this point, you know, this stuff.
You've got this.
We can go quickly.
So of course, in week six, two weeks ago, we we curated our data, evaluated our models, and tried
out frontier models.
Last week we fine tuned our open source model.
So this week, what do I have in store for you?
Here are the five days ahead.
The first day today we're going to take our LLM, our fine tuned model and deploy it on the internet
using serverless AI platform Modalerts.com, which is it's a great way to productionize your models.
It's what I use in my day job.
It's it's extremely popular for reasons that we'll we'll talk about tomorrow.
We're going to then make an alternative Pricer, which is going to use a frontier model with Rag.
That's going to be super interesting.
On day three, we're going to to to build a scanner agent that is able to subscribe to RSS feeds, parse
them and find good deals, and a messaging agent that's able to send a push notification to our phones.
And then day four, this is when it gets the heat gets turned up.
We're going to build our autonomous planning Agent that orchestrates activities across the agents and
decides what to do when.
And then we'll wrap it up with the grand finale on day five.
This is what I have in store for you.
Okay, so I want to remind you again that there are the three different ways you can follow along with
this.
It's absolutely fine just to get intuition for what's going on.
You don't have to run the code, particularly if the last couple of weeks have been very new to you
and it's felt like this has gotten super advanced.
It's all good.
Just get intuition for what's going on, get the concepts.
However, if you'd like to follow on, that would be lovely.
You should be able to to stick with the light data set so that things move fast.
There's a couple of places where you can take shortcuts, especially if something goes goes awry.
If something goes bump, you can just bypass lots of things.
I'll try and I'll try and point it out when we when we get there.
You could also just dig in and figure out how to how to bypass different, different parts of it very
easily this week in particular.
And then the third option is you could roll up sleeves and dig in, use the full data set, tweak,
make some changes to make this even better as we go.
This is for for for those people that really want to get into the detail.
This week is going to be a lot of opportunity for that.
Now, this week, of course, is going to be introducing a genetic AI.
And as you know, I have a whole course on genetic AI.
And so we're not going to go into tons of detail on agents.
But I thought I should I should start by defining what agents are so that you've got some context.
There are, of course, so many different definitions of agents.
There are, in fact, memes about how a genetic AI can be whatever you want it to be.
Generally speaking, people, people think about things like, does it?
Does it have autonomy?
Does it have agency?
Is it a platform which which has a sort of existence beyond just a chat with an individual user?
Anything like that gives you the impression that you're working with a genetic AI.
But there are a few definitions that have bounced around, and I thought I'd just lay out a few of them
now so that you have that context.
The first definition is one that I don't know if Sam Altman has directly used these very words, but
he said stuff like this.
Uh, and so it was sort of like a understood definition for a while from OpenAI that, that agents are
AI systems that can do work for you in a way that is independent.
So it's a slightly sort of anthropomorphizing version of it, which is equating it to like human workers.
And it's saying like it's an AI system that you could consider, like something you can delegate to
and you can imagine, like OpenAI, what was used to be called operator, it is now called GPT agent.
This, this idea that you could you can have something and say to it, hey, find me a restaurant reservation
that's available next, next Thursday for for Chinese food in my area.
And off it will go and and do the research and find somewhere and potentially look on OpenTable and
book it for you and all the rest of it.
And you have that sense that there's something off and running.
That was the first definition of agents that was sort of bounced around.
And then around the start of 2025, there was a sort of emerging view that the right way to define agents
was that this is an AI system where the LM controls the workflow, where an LM controls the workflow.
This was something that that came out of.
I saw it in Hugging Face.
Anthropic was along these lines in their seminal blog post, Building Effective Agents.
Uh, so the idea is here, you've got some kind of a system where there isn't a fixed order of doing
things.
You don't do A, then B, then C, but rather you first prompt an LM and you say, hey, you're able
to do A, B, or C and you need to achieve a goal of this.
Now decide what you want to do when.
And it generates tokens.
And in those tokens it describes whether you do A or B or C, and you write code that then takes action
as a result of what the LM has predicted.
And so it is it's you can think of it as a system where the LM has some kind of autonomy.
It gets to choose with agency, which steps are carried out in what order.
And this is really used to contrast with something called an agentic workflow, which at least in Anthropic's
definition, that was something where there are multiple LM calls like A, B, C, but it's just orchestrated
with Python code.
Just do A, then do B, then do C rather than through an LM call.
And that was a distinction that was drawn between true agentic AI and just agent workflows with multiple
LM calls.
And then the third definition, which is the kind of new emerging definition that people are really
getting behind, is that an agentic system is one where there's a there's an agent, an LM that runs
tools in a loop to achieve a goal.
So you've got an LM or maybe multiple llms, and there's some sort of an objective, and it's equipped
with a set of tools, the kinds of things we did in week two.
And it in order to, to carry out that objective.
It can call a tool.
And then if it hasn't yet achieved that objective, your Python code calls it again in a loop.
And it keeps being called again and again and again.
And the kind of place where you really feel this experience is using something like code that I demoed
right back at the beginning.
You really see it there with a to do list, and it's looping and it's going through carrying out activities.
But to a large extent, many of the different things that we do with, with LMS equipped with tools
involves using a loop.
So this this applies to most of these kinds of systems.
So what we're going to build this week we pretty much tick all these three definitions.
Mostly the one in yellow.
There's going to be an agent which controls the workflow that involves calling other LMS.
But to a certain extent there's going to be a loop.
And so there is there is this idea in there that there's something that loops around until it's ready.
Uh, so we we do tick all three boxes this week.
So hopefully that gives you some useful context and sets the stage for what's ahead.
189 - So this week we're going to be building seven different agents.
And now I'm using the agent in a way that's not consistent with the definitions I just gave you.
The whole platform is like an agentic architecture.
And often when you do this, each of the different LM calls, you call it an agent as part of your agent
architecture, but it's not like each one is running in a loop.
There's in fact only one running in a loop.
These others are just separate LM calls that are that are being orchestrated in order to achieve our
goal.
But you often call them agents or subagents.
So our agent architecture is the way that these different LM calls will be orchestrated in order to
solve our problem and meet our business objective.
And I do want to stress that what I'm about to do is something that I personally frown on a lot, and
I often push back on people that do this.
So I sort of feel like I'm guilty of falling into my own trap.
I often find that people, when they're trying to solve a business problem, jump too quickly to an
agent architecture.
It feels like something you want to do, particularly for those of us that are coming from a software
engineering background that are used to coming up with an architecture for how you'll solve a problem,
and it's very common for people to to kind of identify human like responsibilities and put responsibilities
against agents.
And that, that that's a trap.
That's not the right way to do it.
The right way to do it is not to start sort of humanizing and putting responsibilities, but rather
to focus on the business objective, to test out your prompts, to have an evaluation, and to figure
out how can you best organize your LLM calls to solve this business objective.
And I cover this a little bit more in guide 12 in the guides folder.
So it can be very tempting to dive into an agent architecture.
And I would urge you to always start by focusing on the business problem.
Make the simplest possible solution to start with, which is usually just one LLM call, and divide
into multiple LLM calls because it helps you solve the business problem more effectively, not just
because it sounds like those are roles that humans would have if they were working on this problem.
So you'll have to give me the benefit of the doubt that I didn't just dive straight into an ancient
architecture because it sounded like these were the right agents.
But I worked on this starting simple with one LM, and I broke it out into multiple as I saw that that
was the more effective way to solve the problem.
And that's how you should do it with future problems that you work on.
Anyways, we're going to assume that's happened, and here are the agents that we're going to be building
this week.
I want to first of all start on the on the right because it's easier to start there and work back.
We're going to build a scanner agent.
It's an agent that's able to subscribe to RSS feeds, identify appetizing bargains, bargains that are
potentially worth exploring.
And it's going to do that promising deals.
There's going to be an ensemble agent a new word.
That's a very exciting word.
This is something which is able to figure out how much is something actually worth in the market.
And it's called an ensemble because it brings together multiple different models.
You may remember we met that word when we were talking about random forest models, which are themselves
ensembles.
Well, that is going to be our ensemble and it's going to be great.
And we're also going to have a messaging agent that is going to send push notifications.
And in order for it to feel like a real agent, it has to have some sort of an LLM call in there.
So it's going to use an LLM to sort of hype up the message and make sure it's something that is suitably
enthusiastic for us.
So those on the right are some of the agents that will be building.
And then of course, we're going to have a planner, a planning agent.
This orchestrates activities around these these other agents.
That's its job.
There's then going to be an agent framework we're going to use, which is something that can handle
memory so that the the the planning agent doesn't surface the same deal twice.
And logging so that we can have the beginnings of observability, something that I tackle a lot of in
my other courses on Agentic AI and on MLOps production.
So we're going to do just some basics around that.
So we've got got something together.
And then of course we're going to have a user interface on top of all of this.
Now there are a lot of frameworks out there that help you build these kinds of agentic setups very easily.
There's one there's a crew.
AI is very popular.
One, there's OpenAI agents SDK, my favorite one, uh, as some people know, there's there's Google
has ADK, uh, there's, uh, Landgraf there's many of these agent frameworks.
And largely they help you with things like defining tools and calling between llms and handling observability
and memory and the like.
And they do so with, with the, uh, handling the glue code for you.
They're sort of abstractions over LM calls.
And in their seminal blog post, anthropic called called Building Effective Agents, anthropic strongly
suggested that particularly when starting out and with simpler problems that you start with out using
agent frameworks, because in large part, you can achieve all of this just by calling Lrms, and in
doing so, you really get to understand how it actually works.
You're not abstracting away important details, and that is exactly what we're going to do this week.
We're not going to use one of these fancy agent frameworks that does a lot of the nitty gritty for you.
We're going to be doing the nitty gritty ourselves, and it's going to be really easy.
We're going to build all this from first principles, just making calls to lrms and using tools, and
you're going to see it all.
If you want to use agent frameworks, then of course my course uses many of them and you get very familiar
with them.
But it's so valuable to do it yourself.
And honestly, often doing it yourself is all it takes, just as anthropic suggests.
Okay, but for today, before we dig into our agent architecture, and you may have noticed that I said
there were seven agents, but there doesn't appear to be seven.
That's because there's a little detail that I will show you later.
But before we get to it, we are going to dive into looking at Modalerts.com.
The serverless platform for AI teams that says that modal is a is a really terrific platform for running
your models, uh, for for inference on the cloud.
They do other things too.
But but running the inference is one of their most, most commonly used features.
And it's how I use them in my day job.
And many people do.
There are a bunch of others like modal out there and there's there's for AWS, there's SageMaker, which
is their big platform.
Um, there's there's uh, run pod.
There's there's many things like this where modal really sets itself apart.
Is that, first of all, it's incredibly easy to set up and configure, unlike some of the others.
When you define your infrastructure, you just do it through a little bit of code, and that's where
you set up what kind of machine you want and all sorts of features about the platform.
So it's really convenient.
Also, with modal, you only pay for the compute that you use.
You only pay for the clocks that you use up.
So any time that your platform is dormant, you're not spending a penny.
And that's really great.
And finally, modal, at least as of now, has this deal that you get $30 worth of free credits a month,
and we don't even get close to that kind of level.
And that means that basically, for the tasks that we do on this course, it's completely free, at
least as of right now.
And hopefully it still is for you.
You'll find out in just a second.
That's what we're going to use.
We're going to use modal.
And I think you're going to love it.
Let's go do that right now okay.
So please bring up your favorite browser of choice and go to mode not not model.
And this is what comes up AI infrastructure that developers love.
Uh or they might have a different splash screen when you see it.
But but it's it's, uh, this this is the homepage.
And you can scroll down.
You can see they've got some really big names behind them.
You can read more about what they do and why they are awesome, and inference is what we'll be using
them for.
But for sure they have lots of other stuff that they do as well.
They also offer notebooks.
Um, a bit like Google Colab.
You can you can run batches, you can do training in modal as well.
But we're going to be using it for the most common use case, which is inference.
You'll be pressing the sign up button because I imagine you haven't got an account.
I actually for this one I use my GitHub as my my auth, but you can of course use any of the others.
And I'm now going to log in because I'm already logged in.
I'm sure you'll need to answer a bunch of questions in order to, uh, to, to sign up.
And so you'll do that and in you come here and you can see that, that I've been using it quite a lot
in the last couple of days, and I've still got $27.50 left in this month's credits.
Uh, and there's no way I'll get through them, and and hopefully you'll be the same.
Um, and you get to the front.
There are some there are some apps showing, and, uh, this is, this is showing you shouldn't see
any apps yet.
There's apps for me because I've done some deployments.
And this this is will be your, your home for a little bit.
So keep this bookmarks and then let's get to cursor.
190 - Well, here we are in cursor starting a new week for the very last time.
Week eight.
Here we come.
You can see it's a busy old folder.
We've got.
We've got a fair amount to do this week, starting then with week eight.
Day one.
Come into the lab.
Remember to set your kernel if you haven't already.
I've got this little warning here to tell you.
Do be sure to to pull the latest code, because I update things all the time and this week is a big
week.
And do check the the guide, the git guide.
If you're not sure about how to deal with git pull and merging and all the rest.
Okay, so as a reminder, this week we are going to be having a modal today.
And then we're going to be doing Rag tomorrow, a couple more agents on Wednesday or whatever.
The third day is with me.
Today is Monday for you, but it's probably isn't.
Uh, and then we'll be doing the, the planner and then finally the finale for The Price Is Right,
the name of our project.
All right.
And I am going to start with just a few imports.
Now we are about to to to do a whole lot of stuff.
And modal is one of these platforms that likes printing outputs which include emojis in it, which is
very fancy of it.
But some PCs don't like that and get upset and fail with lots of errors.
If you run this next cell, uh, print locale or get preferred encoding, it should say UTF eight.
It does on Macs by default, but not always on PCs.
And if it doesn't, then try running that next cell which which should set it to UTF eight, and then
maybe try restarting your kernel and do that again and just see what happens if if that doesn't work
and you still get problems when you run modal commands, then there's a simple fix which is don't run
the modal commands from within the notebook, just run them in the terminal instead.
Uh, and I will explain that again when we get there okay.
So next up next up we need to set our tokens for modal.
And this is a bit of a procedure which which should be super easy.
and modal, has tried to make it really easy, but sometimes it doesn't work for people, so I want
to be very careful about it indeed.
So first of all, we're going to go into modal and look for our API tokens.
Okay.
So you click on this link up modal and then go to your dashboard if you're already logged in.
And then go to your settings avatar right here to settings.
And you can see that there is a link here for API tokens.
Now I'm not going to click that because it reveals your tokens right away.
But you click there and you press the Create New token button.
And when you do that it's going to show you, uh, you're going to click API tokens and click New Token.
And it will give you something like this to run modal token set minus minus token ID.
And then there's going to be a k and then a a like stuff minus minus token secret and then a s and a
bunch of stuff.
So that is the the token ID and the token secret a k and a s.
Uh, now it wants us to run this at the command line, and that's what we will do.
So open up a terminal window, which is, uh, like that which which is, um, control and and the backtick.
And you would want to type out this exact command that it told you, with one exception, because we're
working with UV, you don't run something like modal token set.
You run this, you say, um, run and then you do modal token set and you can just paste in exactly
what they have in modal.
And so you should now be pasting in something that says UV run modal token set minus minus token id
id.
And then it should have something that begins AK and then minus minus token secret.
And that should have something that begins as.
And when you do that, it should run and it should tell you that it's run and everything should be great.
Your modal tokens are set.
Uh, you may have problems occasionally.
People do.
For most people, this just works great if you do.
First up, try running.
You've run modal token new before you run the you've run token set.
Uh, if that still doesn't work, there's a suggestion that David s student had that he was able to
to fix it on his PC, and he gives some instructions here.
And then the third suggestion that someone had is perhaps the simplest of all is simply take this modal
token ID and modal token secret.
The two things, one beginning AK and one beginning a.s. put it in your EMV file and then run load EMV
and make sure that that is set as an environment variable.
That should work too.
And if none of that works, then message me or send me an email and I will get involved and we will
get it sorted.
I'm sure it will work, but 99% of you it's just going to work great.
Modal have tried to make this really easy, so the genius of modal is that they try to make it incredibly
simple to write Python code that you can run locally on your computer.
Well, we all know how to do that, but also that same Python code, you can say, okay, I now don't
want it to run locally on my computer.
I want to run it on the cloud, on your computer, but I want it just to be the same Python code I've
written right here.
And they make that really, really easy.
And for anyone that's worked with something like AWS Lambda or other serverless platforms, it is by
no means really easy to achieve what I've just said it might sound like.
Sure.
Don't they all do that?
No they don't, uh, take my, uh, MLOps, uh, AI and production course if you want a firsthand experience
with that.
Uh, but we're going to go to look at this file.
Hello.
Okay, so Hello.py get rid of that terminal.
Here's Hello.py.
It has like a modal import from modal import image we create we do this thing called modal app.
Hello.
Don't don't worry about this.
Just just get a sense for it.
And then we do this thing called image.
That's the type of Linux flavor.
And we install the requests package.
So this is just something that's that's telling modal.
What kind of infrastructure would we want this to run on if we decide to run it remotely.
And then I have this function called hello.
And I've just got this little decorator that tells modal hey, by the way, if I want to run this function
on your your world, I want to use this image to do it in.
So that's just how you tell it.
Just a simple, uh, simple computer running Linux with requests installed pip installed in it.
Okay.
So what does this hello function do.
It imports requests and then it just looks up what runs this little thing that looks up.
What's the IP address of what's currently running.
And then it gets the city the region the country.
And it says hello from wherever this code is actually running.
Uh, so that's that's all it does.
Uh, it just it's going to say say hello from and then, then the current location of the software that's
running.
Are you with me so far.
All right.
Let's go back to to to day one.
So I'm going to import that.
I'm going to import uh hello.
And I'm going to first of all you do this with app dot run is a little decorator you put around it.
Sorry.
Context manager.
I'm going to say hello Dot, and saying that just means that function we just wrote.
Hello.
I just want to run it on my computer.
I just want to run that right here.
And when I do that, I'm running this this hello function locally.
It takes a little bit of time the first time because it's got some some loading in to do and it says
hello from New York City, New York, US because it just ran for me and that is where I am.
So that works just fine.
Wouldn't it be nice if you could take just exactly that code and run it remotely on on one of modals
computers without hardly changing anything?
Wouldn't that be nice?
Yes, that's what the next cell does.
Let's let's do it.
Okay, so here is the next cell.
It's doing the same thing as before with run.
But now instead of calling hello local we call hello remote.
And that's all it takes to say take this code, use that configuration that I gave you there and go
run it modal on your cloud.
And that is what it did.
And uh yeah you can see that It says hello from Phoenix, Arizona.
So it ran somewhere remotely.
And if we come back here, you can see that the beauty of what modal is doing for us.
First of all, it's allowing us just to write some code and decorate it.
And then depending on whether we do local or remote, this code either runs on my computer or it gets
shipped off to the cloud.
And the second thing that modal makes it easy for us is it allows us to use code to describe what kind
of hardware we want to use.
I say we just simply want a basic Linux box.
We want to have the requests package pip installed on it.
That's all we want.
And now if I call remote, I want you to bring up that box and run this over there.
And it just worked.
And you should experiment with with different different implementations, different things you might
want to do and see how it works.
This is kind of cool because it actually reports back on where abouts it's running, and in fact we
can run it again and see if it runs in the same place.
Is it still in Phoenix, Arizona, or is it somewhere else?
And this time it's in Washington, Virginia.
So they have many data centers, I imagine for you it somewhere completely different and you can explore
with that.
And in fact you can be you can be specific about where you want it to be.
So we've I've got one here that a student had had pointed out to me, which is really cool, which is
if you go to hello, you can see here that I've got a different decorator.
I'm saying I want this image, but I want the region to be EU.
And then I've got a hello Europe and the same thing.
Exactly.
So if we come back here and run this, we're just running the same code.
But this time we're sending it over to Europe where it's running and coming back.
And particularly if you think of something like GDPR, it might be important for you that this is running
in Europe.
And there we go running in Germany.
Uh, and I've also got a link to the different region settings where you can pick what region that you
want it to run in.
It uses up slightly more credits, but only slightly more if you're if you're particular about where
you want it to run and it gives you all the details on their website.
So do experiment with this.
Get your own first hand sense of what it takes to write code, and have it running in different places
around the world.
191 - Okay.
Before.
Before we do the next part, there's one more little bit of configuration you have to do.
And again, this is something that is pretty easy that 99% of people get done fine.
But then just for some people there is a glitch.
And and so it can be problematic.
So let me be be very specific about it.
So this is about telling modal what you're hugging face secret is so that we can log in to your hugging
face account on your modal boxes.
And I've got like I call it like a, like a bulletproof recipe here.
Uh, so the first thing to do is to go back to modal.
So let me click that link to go to modal again.
Here it is.
Here is modal.
And go into your dashboard.
Now from your dashboard there is a section here called secrets.
Press that and here you go.
We're in the secrets section and press Create New Secret.
This is where we set up a new secret in in modal.
And there's a category called hugging Face.
And you can pick that category.
And here we are in in this category.
Now secrets in modal have a name.
That name is a name that's going to be used later in the code to say, I want to load this secret and
you have a secret with a name, and the name you want to give.
It is the same as the default one that will be here, which is hugging face hyphen secret.
You don't need to call it that, but it needs to match what's in the code.
And that's what we're going to have in the code by default in the repo.
So if you don't have that as the name, it's not going to match the part in the code.
When we try and collect this secret and say, this is a secret that I care about so better, best to
stick with the defaults, keep it as hugging face secret, and remember that because we'll see it in
the code, it'll be like gotcha.
But that is different to this here.
The key.
Your secret has a key and a value.
The key needs to be exactly what it is by default HF token, because that's set as an environment variable.
When you tell modal that you want to use this secret, it's going to set that as an environment key.
and the value here.
Of course, this needs to be your actual hugging face secret HF underscore blah blah blah blah blah
blah that you can copy in from hugging face.
Uh, and so once you've you've set this up, you need to have this saying hugging face secret, this
saying HF token and this with the HF underscore the actual value of hugging face token.
Uh, and I imagine this is like blindingly obvious to most of you.
Uh, but but if you get any of that wrong, of course, then strange things happen later.
And it's unclear why.
And people have certainly gotten very stuck with that.
And don't forget to press done, of course.
And then once you have done all of that, of course, when you go into secrets, you will see this hugging
face secret.
And, and uh, when it was last used very recently.
That's what you should see.
You do not want to see the second line.
That was because in the past, modal used to have that as the default and they changed it, which is
confusing.
Uh, so this this is the one that you want to have.
I hope that makes sense.
If you've got any questions, of course you can always, always ping me on, on on the platform, but
make sure you've got that set up right and then we'll go back to cursor.
Okay.
So here we are.
And again hopefully this is the bulletproof recipe IMDb.com.
Click on secrets.
Add the hugging face secret and fill it in.
Click done.
That's what you did.
Okay.
Now I want to show you another file here called llama pie.
So llama pie is so short.
Check this out.
Check out how simple this is.
It imports modal and imports image again.
And then we're going to make an app called llama.
And here's where we define the image we want it to be again a simple Linux box.
We want to pip install torch transformers and accelerate the three, uh, common libraries from hugging.
Face that sorry this this from PyTorch.
Obviously these two are from hugging face and then secrets is is where we are defining the secret that
we wish to use.
And that is, uh, the one that's called hugging Face secret.
And this is where if you called it something different, if the name was something different, you'd
have to change it here too.
And in all the other files that I have for this week.
Um, so.
So this is where we tell modal, hey, we want to use the secret that has that name.
In other words, we want you to find that secret and make that key be an environment variable with that
value.
So it's going to create an environment variable called HDF underscore token which is the one we want.
This is where we specify the GPU.
We want a T4 GPU.
And that is the model we'll be working with.
And so here we have a decorator as before apt function.
We specify the image we want the secrets.
We're going to be using the GPU that we want on this box.
And we put a timeout so it doesn't go on forever.
And this code is just absolute standard hugging face transformers code that is going to load in a tokenizer
load in our model, our Lama model, and just do inference to predict the next tokens after an input.
That's all we're doing with this very simple function.
Okay.
So we go back here to day one.
Uh, so we're going to import that.
And now we're going to say uh with modal enable output.
It's going to have it print lots of stuff.
And this is where you may have troubles with Unicode.
Maybe we'll see what happens.
Uh you could always take that out.
And then with apt run results is generate this function that we just wrote remote.
And the text that I want to ask llama to complete is text never gonna give you up.
Never gonna, uh, which most, most humans on this planet will now not be able to stop Rick Astley
from being, uh, being playing in their minds.
I want to rickroll llama 3.2 if you're familiar with that meme.
So when I run this because I've got this enable output, we're seeing lots of stuff going on as we see
what's happening remotely.
And yeah, you'll see it's a very noisy process, uh, view as a scrollable element so you can see it
all.
Um, and this can take quite a long time, depending on whether you've done it before and various other
things.
So this is something which which I will I will leave you for a minute and be back.
Uh, and it will take a bit, but then it will run and we will see what does llama 3.2 think is the
continuation of that.
And the important point is that this is running remotely on the cloud.
And it's having to.
So it's it's spawning up a box with a GPU.
It's then doing that whole business of downloading the hugging face files.
So it's having to bring in llama 3.2 into the environment.
And then it's making that LLM call.
So I will see you in a second when we have the output.
All right.
And it's finished.
And yes we get never going to give you up.
Never going to let you down.
Never.
And all of that.
Yes we knew what to expect.
Uh, if that's too painful for you to, to have Rick Astley, then I've given some other example things
that llama 3.2 won't be able to help but complete the stuff in red you see here.
By the way, this is the actual log running on that remote box.
You can see it did exactly what you're probably familiar with loading in the checkpoints from from hugging
face.
And then, uh, you always get this little warning about attention masks that you can ignore.
Everything is is good.
Okay, so that worked very nicely.
I now want to show you another thing which is called preiser ephemeral, and I call it ephemeral to
distinguish it between what we're going to do later, which is not going to be a femoral.
Femoral means like sort of fleeting, like it's it exists and then it doesn't.
Uh, so this is basically exactly the same thing.
Um, but we are going to actually look for the, the real model, the model that we fine tuned, the
one that we did in week seven, we're actually going to use that model.
Uh, so let me let me show you this.
So we again we import modal.
We this time we're calling the app Preiser.
And we install again the package Pytorch's torch we install from hugging faces libraries transformers
bits and bytes accelerate and the parameter efficient fine tuning their name for the package that has
the Laura stuff in it.
Pfft.
Uh, and again, we get this secret.
So if you have changed the name, then you need to use your name there.
Um, and then the constants, we're going to use a T4 box.
This is the base model.
It's going to be, uh, this is this is the run name and the revision number that had that terrific
result.
Uh, our best results yet.
So this is our strongest model on the planet that we're using here.
And, uh, that that is our model name.
This is basically taken from the week seven day five colab exactly as is.
And then I've just got a single function price.
And of course, it's decorated to take the image secrets GPU and timeout that we've got there.
And price again this this code you can check compare it uh like like they say on things in uh in a pharmacy
compare with the ingredients.
Compare this with what we had in Colab in week seven, day five.
And you'll see that we're just doing the same thing.
We are doing inference on our fine tuned model right here.
And then we are going to spit back the price.
I've just got some janky stuff here, because if it if it generates text with the number in it, I want
to strip out the number and return the number.
And that's what this function does.
So that is the only difference I think with the with the the colab.
Okay.
So let's go back to day one.
Here we have it.
We're going to import that.
And now I'm going to to set this going off it goes.
What this is now doing is it's contacting modal.
It's spawning a new box.
It's now going to install all of those packages.
And it's going to then download the model weights which because this is the big version, this is like
model weights of more than a gigabyte of model weights.
So it is going to take a while.
Again the last one only took a couple of minutes for me.
Sometimes this can take take take a long time.
Um, so you might have to wait a fair bit if it.
Yeah, it shouldn't take more than half an hour, but it has been known to take almost, almost that
long depending on a bunch of different factors.
So I will I will go again and be back in a minute when it's finished, and I'll report back on how long
it took.
192 - Okay, well that just finished and it actually only took one minute and 20s.
So my whole half an hour drama was was was completely wrong.
And maybe it took longer for you I don't know.
So as a reminder, I this is what I sent in Quadcast HyperX condenser mic that happens to be the microphone
that I used to record the original set of these videos.
It cost me about $130 when I bought it, so this estimate is quite a bit lower, unless I unless I was
ripped off with how much I paid for it.
But our model thinks it's a bit cheaper.
Uh, so that's interesting to note.
Um, but this did just call our fine tuned model running on the cloud, and it wasn't ideal because
it took a minute and a half because it had one minute and 20s had to load everything in, but still
it worked.
It did its thing running on a T4 box in the cloud.
Okay, next up, I need to to explain a little technical issue we have.
Okay, so here's a subtle problem that maybe you've already twigged.
When we trained all of our data in our proprietary model, we always pre-processed all of our data,
both in the training data and the test data, to have a particular format.
Our pre-processed format, which has like a title, a category, and so on.
So that is the format that the model has been trained to expect.
So just passing it in in a different format is probably a bit suboptimal.
It seems to have worked fine, but it's not ideal.
And if we want this to be reliable, we need to pre-process anything before we send it into the model
so that it has that same consistent format.
And pre-processing in this way is very common thing to do.
Um, so I'm going to use the same code that actually we used before.
It's a file called Pre-processor, which is in this in this directory here.
And what we can do is we can say pre-processor dot pre-process and put in some text.
And if I print that, what we get out is that put through a pre-processor, which by default I'm using
llama 3.2 running via llama on my local computer.
If you want you can also specify a different model.
So this is if I want to use grok on the cloud and have something which is like it gives it a different
category.
But this, this allows us to have something which is, which is the, the OSS model, um, and is using
grok by default.
It will use this.
I've also I've got this ability that you can add this to your EMV file.
If you want to specify that you want to use a particular preprocessor.
When we deploy our agent platform, your EMV file will control that.
Um, but this hopefully that makes sense to you.
If we want to get best performance, then before we call our model, we should convert the text of the
thing we want it to price into the same format that was used during training.
And so with that in mind, I can now kick off again the same thing as before app Dot run and price that
that microphone.
But instead of passing in just the text version of the original, just the just a little sentence about
what it is, I first pre-processed it and turned it into something which is more like this, which is
this we're using, which is the format that the model was trained on, so that it can have a consistent
format.
And to be honest, it's perfectly possible that we'll do fine either way.
But it's it's certainly more consistent.
It's a better practice to to treat your data at inference time, the same way that you treated your
data at at training time.
And so that's why we do it this way.
So this again, presumably this is going to take about the same amount of time about one minute and
20s.
And you you should be able to see see it running too.
And I will see you in 20s time when it is completed.
And there we go.
It's finished.
And it took one minute and eight seconds.
And interestingly, it gave exactly the same number.
Sometimes I'd have gotten a better number in the past.
I've done it, but for whatever reason, this time the pre-process text is identical, so it didn't
appear to have any difference at all pre-processing and writing it.
Let's just make absolutely sure that we did what we passed in.
Was this, uh, yeah.
You can see there it is.
We passed in the, um, the a better version of it that's more consistent with the way it's been trained.
And we got exactly the same answer.
So I guess that means that we've trained a model well to be somewhat immune to this, but it's still
it's definitely a better practice to to do the pre-processing in this way.
Okay.
So that has shown you the way that we can make a call to modal in the cloud in order to price something.
Spinning up a T4 box, populating it with our model and running it.
The remainder of what I want to show you now is how we make this more efficient.
We don't want to have to download and build this every time.
We want to be able to do a deployment.
So we've got something out there in modal that we can call, rather than this ephemeral idea that you
just have some code that gets sent each time.
So that's what we'll do next.
So the idea is that rather than just calling this function remotely, each time we're going to deploy
our code to modal and have like a handle to it on the cloud and then be able to call it that way.
So I've made a new Python module called Pricer Service, and it's basically exactly the same as the
set of ephemeral Pi.
Just we'll be using this to deploy it, but it's the same thing.
I've given it a different name, Preiser hyphen service, but it sets up the same box and it's got the
same price function.
This is the one we want to deploy and then use.
So let's go to to the lab.
And this is how you deploy a Python module.
It's modal deploy and then the module name.
But because we're in a UV environment you do UV run modal deploy.
And then the module name and you can run it from a notebook by putting that exclamation mark.
If this gives you any issues with funny emoji stuff, then you might need to to just run UV, run modal
deploy from from the command line from a terminal instead.
But when I run this, it will actually run really fast because it knows that I've already done it.
It will probably take a few minutes for you because it deploys it and and installs it.
Um, so that has happened.
And then next up, rather than the way that you call it, is you first of all say to Modell, hey,
look, I know that I've got a function that I've got in in something, a service that I've named Priceless
Service.
And the function is called price.
I would like you to give me a handle to that function called price.
And this is now like like you can think of that as, like a function like any other that you could call,
but it represents a modal function.
So I run that and we've now got this.
And then I can just call Pricer dot remote and pass in something that I want to run.
And it's going to then run that remotely on our deployment.
So let me kick that off.
Off it goes.
I'm going to go to modal so we can see this in action.
We go to the dashboard.
You can see that we've got prices service.
That's what we just deployed.
And here is price.
And it's running right now.
I come into here and you'll see that there it is.
I just kicked it off.
It started up.
It's running right now.
Let's go in.
You can see what's going on here in this timeline view this execution timeline.
See the start up period.
Execution has started.
Here are the logs where we can see what it's doing.
It's fetching two files.
Stuff is happening and you can sit here and watch.
Uh, your sort of a voyeur onto your code running remotely on their box, and it's just fetch some some
files.
This is the usual, like hugging face transformers code to download the the the model.
Uh, it's loading in the checkpoints.
And then we're going to see a bunch of messages as it does its thing.
And I will see you back in a second when it's complete.
And there we go.
It completed.
It took like one minute and five seconds.
We can, uh, see, see all of this.
I think that's that's done.
Uh, okay.
And now we should be able to go back to cursor and in cursor.
We should be able to scroll down and see here that it completed.
And it responded again with 90.
So we sent in the text and it ran remotely on our deployed app in modal in the cloud.
And we got back the number 90.
Okay.
Just one more thing left to do with this, and that is to show you prices, service to an improved version
of this, which I've got right here.
And because I in the price of service two, if you take a look at it, I've given this the same name,
the same modal name, price of service.
So this is actually going to overwrite the deployment that we just made with a new deployment.
That's a little bit better.
So how is it better.
It's mostly the same if you look through it it's mostly the same.
But there are some differences.
First up, rather than using a function, it uses a class.
It's got a class, an object oriented side to it, uh, which has like something which which handles
set up and then the price method again.
And why have we done it this way?
Because this gives us an opportunity to, to load in some data that will be persistent at free of charge.
This will get cached on the box.
And it's going to mean that it's able to start up much faster in the future.
It will take about 30s in the future to start up, rather than the minute, and a bit that it does at
the moment.
And the way that you do that with modal is that you can specify, um, a volume, uh, and the volumes
that we're specifying that you can see here, we're asking to have a cache directory, and for that
to be something which, which will give us an ability to look at this here, to have a volume that is
called HRF Hub Cache.
And so that is giving us like, like a volume, a persistent piece of storage associated with this deployment
that will always be attached to it.
And that means that we won't have to redownload the model weights every time the model weights will
be stored with this deployment.
So take a look through how this how this works.
But it's also very, very short and very simple.
And you can see that you use this decorator to say this is what should run the first time.
This, this is, uh, this is built, this container is built.
And then in subsequent times it will just call our price.
Okay.
With that in mind, let's go back to to to the lab.
And it's time for us to deploy process service to.
And then we will try calling that.
So I'm going to kick off the deployment.
And again it's quick for me, but it might not be as quick for you because it will need to actually
deploy it.
And it takes a few minutes the first time and then let's run it.
Okay, here we go.
I'm kicking this off.
We're calling this time from name.
You remember, this is analogous to before we said dot dot from name.
Now it's a class.
We get back the class we make a new instance of it.
We call price price remote.
And now we come in here go to the dashboard.
We should see it's running right here.
Let's come into it.
Here we go.
It's pending.
It's at the moment uh, in the middle of, of getting itself started up.
Um, it needs to, to, to build it.
And here we go.
It's got the usual warnings and I think it's probably finished.
There we go.
It's finished already now because I'd already run it once.
It had already built the container.
So it is really fast.
It took just 30s, not the one minute and a bit that it took before, so it's already half the time
that it took before, which is great to see.
Uh, and so, uh, that that really gives you a sense of how this works.
If we go back to the lab, you can see again, you just do pricer dot price remote.
Uh, so let me just add some more code, another code block here, uh, like that.
And let's just run it again.
Uh, and the second time you run it, look how fast it is, because it's already up there and ready
and it's warm and ready for us.
It's almost immediate.
And that that is taking that text, sending it to the cloud, running it on modal, getting back the
results.
And that no longer are we sitting there waiting like we were with the ephemeral pricer.
This, this is real serverless AI.
We only pay for the actual requests that we make.
It was so easy to define our code, describe the infrastructure we wanted, the T4 box, the things
about it, describe the volume we wanted cached, and then we're able to get this class pricer.
Uh, this this instance.
Sorry.
This class professor here creates an instance of it.
And just by going pricer dot price, we can repeatedly call it, uh, in the cloud.
Now, there's lots to love about modal.
And their documentation is great.
And you can read about all the sort of tricks and techniques with modal.
And I'd encourage you to do that.
I'm not going to go too deep into modal, because it may or may not be something that you're using.
I want to give you a flavor for it.
Hopefully this is enough.
So you see how you can write functions or classes yourself.
Call them locally or call them in the cloud.
Specify what kind of hardware you have with code.
It's it's really great.
It's so easy to use.
A little pro tip for you here.
One of the things about modal that's that's both a blessing and a curse is that after a short amount
of time, modal puts your computer, your remote computer to sleep.
And it will then take another 30s to spin it back up and load the model into memory.
Although the model is cached on disk, it's not cached in memory, so it'll still need to load that
in for 30s every time that it's gone cold, and it takes two minutes before it makes it go cold.
And that might be to not enough time for you.
You might find you're often waiting those 30s which can get annoying.
I imagine at this point we've already probably.
If I run this now, it's probably going to take the 30s.
There you go.
Uh, so you can you can tell modal that you'd like to override that behavior.
You can actually tell it that you want to have more containers, uh, rather than don't don't fall back
to zero containers.
Keep at least one always alive.
Of course you'll pay more for that, but that's something you can do if you're working with a production
system that always needs to be able to have a response, something that's perhaps not not not as much
of a strong step as that is to just tell modal, hey, instead of cooling down my box after two minutes,
please leave it more time.
Please leave it up to 20 minutes.
You can specify you'd like modal to keep your box alive, and this is a snippet of code you can run
to to keep the box alive for up to 20 minutes at a time, and this one puts it back to two minutes again
after you've done that.
But we'll leave it on two minutes for now.
And you see, it's still pretty quick even when it has to warm it up.
But if I run it a second time now, it'll be really quick.
There you go.
193 - And now.
And now I want to unveil our first agent.
And it's called the specialist agent.
And it's something which is going to allow us to make a call to price something using our proprietary
model by making a call to the cloud.
And all of my agents are in this Python package agents.
And this one specialist agent is right here in specialist agent.
And you will notice that it's very short.
It's a very simple agent.
Uh, it, uh, it has like an init method.
And in the init method of this, of this agent class, it says, uh, the Pricer, uh, the class Pricer
is model name, it's called price service.
And the name of the class is Pricer.
And that is our Pricer class.
And it makes a new instance of that class and it sets it to the instance variable pricer.
So we are building an instance of our modal remote class.
And we know because we just deployed it Exactly what that is.
It's a T4 box with a volume that contains our weights, and it contains a single function, a single
method price, which is able to remotely price a description.
And so here is our agent as a function price.
It takes a description and it simply calls self dot price remote.
Calling the remote method on our remote.
On our modal class price.
Passing in the description.
Back comes the result.
So it's it's a very short class.
And most of this is sort of comments and logging.
There's actually really only two lines of code here.
That line and this line.
That's it.
That is our first agent.
And that is all it takes to make an agent.
There's lots of people.
People think there's lots of magic to agents somehow, but there really isn't.
It's something that's wraps around a call to an LLM, which is exactly what we're doing.
And it's kind of cool that the LLM itself isn't running on my computer.
It's running on the cloud modals, serverless AI.
Oh, but I hear you.
Hang on.
Ed, you're saying you fibbed.
You've you've you've not told us all the truth.
I see that this specialist agent here is a subclass of a class called agent that you've imported.
You told us you weren't going to be using, like, an agent framework that deals with all of the interactions
between agents.
But you've got some something here and some parent class which is going to do some stuff.
So I better reveal this parent class to you.
Here is the parent class.
It's called agent and the parent class, which is the sum total of the agent framework that I've built
for you here.
It's just something which has a single log function that just does logging info, and it just picks
a different color based on the subclass.
And I've done this for a very important reason, which is that it's going to look really cool.
So I wanted it so that if each of our different subclasses writes a log message, it will show up in
a different color.
So you're going to see all the different agents logging with different colors.
Purely superficial.
I mean, I'm sure obviously this is all in the spirit of observability.
To be able to watch our agents and the way that we can do it in a way that will instantly see which
one is which, is if they appear in different colors, um, along with saying which, which, which
agent it is.
Uh, so that is the extent of the agent framework we're working with here.
Nothing more than that.
It really is just a couple of lines of code for our first our first specialist agent.
All right, let's see it in action.
Okay.
Well, first up, I set up logging so that we can see these log messages that I promised you.
And we're going to import the specialist agent and then create a new instance of this specialist agent.
And when we do so, we immediately get a log message in red.
Red is the color of the specialist agent.
And it tells you that it's a specialist agent.
Very good.
And we are now going to ask it to price an iPhone 14 Pro Max.
Let's see what happens when we kick this off.
It says specialist agent is calling the remote fine tuned model.
It's been a couple of minutes since I did it, so it's gone cold, so we'll need to bring up modal to
to see that.
Let's bring it up.
Here it is.
Go to the dashboard.
Here's the processor.
It's running right now.
Here it is.
It's pending.
It takes about 30s when it's coming from cold.
So you can see it's sitting here and waiting for a container.
And any second now the 30s will happen and it will run, hopefully nice and fast.
And then we will, of course, try running it a second time.
There we go.
It's just hit and it's going to be very quick.
Now let's go back to cursor.
Here it is.
Scroll down and we should find there we have it some more log messages.
It's calling the fine tune model and it predicted $700.
There we have it.
Let's go instead for an iPhone ten run that now it's super fast and it predicts $350 for that.
And of course, when it runs the second time round, it's very quick and we get our read messages.
Everything is working.
Modal is working.
This is running.
It's our first agent.
It's just code that runs locally here.
It's just a simple Python class.
But in calling it, it then makes a call out to where we are running serverless AI.
We're calling a remote method on a class, and it's then running our weights, our specialist model
in the cloud and making the price prediction.
There you have it.
Our first agent is live.
Well, I promised you a big week and hopefully it's living up to the promise.
We got a lot done today.
We deployed to modal and we built an agent and it's great.
Well tomorrow is actually the biggest day the whole week.
Tomorrow is huge.
We're going to build a ragged pipeline, a new type of pricer, and then also an ensemble model and
then deliver production ready code to call a number of different models.
So, so much to get done tomorrow.
So be sure to get to get a good night's sleep recharge I will see you for rag the return of rag tomorrow.
194 - Welcome to week eight, day two a fiendishly big day.
This is really everything coming together now as we head to the finish line.
You can already, in addition to all the things you know that you can do, you can also now deploy Llms
to production on models.com using the like an ephemeral approach and then a function based approach,
and then that class approach with a persistent volume.
Today, you're going to be able to build an advanced Rag solution with a lot of data without Lang chain
and build it ensemble model and deliver production ready code that calls a number of models, all of
that coming right up.
And you hardly need me to remind you about the prices, right?
And autonomous AI framework that is going to watch out for deals, find them, estimate how much they're
actually worth, send a push notification for good opportunities.
There's going to be seven different agents that are going to be collaborating, including the frontier
beating, fine tuned model and also back to a frontier model using Rag.
So we're comparing comparing training time techniques with inference time techniques with Rag.
Okay a reminder of our genetic architecture with again that little footnote that it's important to come
up with agent architectures in order to solve a business problem, not just because it sounds like you
want you want steps like this.
But with that caveat, this is the architecture we're using, which you can imagine we've come with
because this best solves our problem at hand.
I had mentioned yesterday that we're going to create a scanner agent that's going to be able to look
for promising deals by looking at RSS feeds.
Then we're going to have an ensemble agent that estimates the true value of things, and a agent that
sends push notifications.
So of course, what I didn't tell you yesterday, which I'm sure you guessed, is that that ensemble
agent works by itself, coordinating with other agents with Subagents.
And there are three of them.
And let's show them.
One of them, of course, is the specialist agent that we created yesterday.
If you're wondering why we created that and it didn't even map to the diagram, that's why it belongs
here.
That's one of the ways that we figure out how much something costs.
Another way is we're going to build a new kind of pricer a frontier agent.
We're going to make a call to a frontier LM to figure out how much something costs.
We already did that in week six, and we already know that it didn't it didn't fine tune well, and
the original version of it was was not as good as our specialist agent.
So why would we bring it back?
Well, we'd do that because rather than fine tuning it, we're going to use inference time techniques
in the form of rag in order to make it better.
What we're going to do is we're going to say to GPT five one, hey, how much does this cost this thing?
But by the way, I'm going to add in some context here.
Here are five other things that might be similar.
And here are their real prices.
And this might help you to give a good estimate for what I'm asking.
And that's essentially giving it context that is rag.
The way we're going to find these similar products is we're going to do a vector lookup in a vector
store to find similar products based on the description, so it is traditional Rag lookup relative relevant
context.
Shove it in the prompt, and that's going to help the frontier model to give a good accurate estimate.
That is what we're going to build.
We're also going to build a neural network agent.
And this is going to use that that cool neural network that I unveiled at the end of week six.
That's really very good.
And it uses such a different technique that it's powerful to have then these three different models
that have very different ways of estimating the price, because the ensemble agent will be able to to
combine all three in some way to get you an even better number.
And that that is how we're going to figure out how much something actually costs.
And we will build all of that in the next two days, today and tomorrow.
And then day four is when we build our planning agent to coordinate all of this.
And day five is when we bring it together with an agent framework and a UI, and we tie a bow on it
and we just settle back and get our deals and buy great TVs and everything like that.
That is our project.
That is the price is Right.
Let's go to cursor.
Let's build a rag.
Pricer.
Okay.
So let's go into week eight.
Day two.
Here we have our rag day.
Uh, the order of play we're going to to we've already done modalerts.com.
And the specialist agent today is rag and the frontier agent and ensemble agent.
And then tomorrow is the scanner and messenger.
Okay.
So we are going to build a rag based platform to estimate how much something costs.
And we need a data set of, of similar items to look at.
And well we have such a data set.
We have all of our training data that we used before.
The 800,000 scraped items from Amazon makes an ideal training data set.
Uh, we've got that.
We used it for training and we can now use it for inference time techniques in this case.
So, uh, let's, let's let's give that a try.
We're going to build a rag pipeline.
So there's a bunch of imports we've got to do here and load in the environment variables.
Got a context constant here for products vector store which is is right here which is where we are going
to store all of our vectorized products.
And now I'm going to sign into Hugging Face.
Don't worry about that warning.
And now you can choose.
Remember choosing light mode.
You can choose whether you want to have the full 800,000 data set, or just 20,000.
If you'd rather keep it a little bit more tight, it's still going to do great even with 20, so you
should feel free to use.
Light mode is true should you wish.
And as a reminder, today I'm going to go really fast.
Today there's a ton to do.
If this is too much for you, please, please don't worry.
Use it to get intuition.
Come back.
Run it in your own time.
Okay, so this is familiar code.
I hope this is just the thing that loads in the data set.
Uh, from using item, from hub, from the hugging face hub.
So we're loading in the full data set.
Now you might be loading in the full one, or just the partial one.
So when we've done that, we're then going to create our chroma data store.
Chroma of course the open source vector database.
Such a such a great, such a wonderful way to, uh, to be able to work with vector data stores.
Absolutely.
For free.
Um, on the Udemy Q&A, there's lots of good, good questions about different types of vector data store.
Do remember, the thing that makes all the difference is the encoder model.
It's the encoder model that makes the vector.
The data store is just where it gets stored.
And I remember showing you talking about the different types of vector database you can choose.
Picking different vector databases is about stuff like scalability, cost, uh, the speed of retrieval,
but the vector itself is made by the encoder.
So this is no longer long chain.
This is just native, uh, which we did at the end of week five already.
Chroma persistent client.
This loads in, uh, vector database or it creates one if it doesn't already exist.
For the encoder, we're going to use the sentence Transformers all mini Ml6 v2 that we did touch on
briefly before.
This is free open source model, so you can call encoder encode and have something like this bit of
text here.
A proficient AI engineer who's almost reached the finale of the AI Engineering core track, and we can
print out that this is this is the vector.
It has the all, all 384 dimensions in this vector, which is what all mini LLM, l6, v2 comes up with.
That's what to it represents the meaning of this bit of text right here.
Okay.
With that background we are now going to take 800,000 products, turn them into vectors and put them
in chroma, a big chroma database.
And I'm going to run that and it's going to get going right now.
Uh, and it it was immediate.
It was instant.
And you might think, wow, that's because creating vector data stores is really, really quick.
But sadly that's not the case.
It's because I've cheated here and I've got a little bit of code here to say if it already exists,
don't do anything.
Uh, this in fact takes like an hour or something.
Uh, and that's only.
I've got a GPU.
It might take longer for you.
It might.
This might be an overnight business if you really want to do it for all of them.
Yeah, it took 30 minutes when I, when I did it on my GPU.
So.
So you should see how it's going.
You can also for sure you can just truncate train.
You can say like like train equals train on 50,000 if you want 50 underscore uh oh, uh, you can you
can make it a bit shorter.
You can do whatever you feel like.
But this, this is what, what goes into chroma, uh, and this is the thing that says if it's already
there.
So remove that line if you want this to run, run the old fashioned way.
But when that's done, you will have a populated vector data store with perhaps all 800,000 items in
there.
195 - Okay, well, you spent the last seven weeks with me, and you know that I'm not someone that's happy
with just saying.
Oh, the data is all in there in Cromer.
We've got to look at this.
So next we're going to visualize, of course, the vectors in Cromer.
And uh, if you try and visualize all of them, all 800,000, then that's a sure way to crash your computer.
So I don't recommend doing that.
I tried doing that last year with, with like 400,000.
I just barely scraped by.
So we're not going to do that.
We're going to subselect 10,000 points, and then we're going to load in those 10,000 points, and we're
going to use t-SNE again.
T-distributed stochastic neighbor embedding to project down the 384 dimensions that the encoder came
up with down to two dimensions, and display that in, in some sort of a diagram.
Uh, and so let's do that now.
Let's create the 2D plot and bam, here it is.
And wow, isn't this cool?
It reminds me of what we did in week five.
Only just better.
So this is 10,000 points shown visually in space.
So we can understand what does it mean to take descriptions of products and put them in vectors.
And again remember the same point as week five.
The text that was given to the encoder did not include whereabouts in Amazon it was scraped from.
We just gave it the text and it turned that into a vector point.
And after the fact I've colored in these dots to represent what section in Amazon did this come from.
But that information was not given to the encoder.
So it's kind of cool that the different types of item are shown in different sections.
Here it shows that the encoder model had some kind of an innate understanding of the different types
of things.
Now, you might notice a subtlety here that there is a category included in the text, because we actually
when we did our pre-processing, we asked an LLM.
In my case, I asked OSS 20 to come up with a way to turn just the vanilla text into something that
had a category in it.
Just keep in mind that didn't come from Amazon.
That wasn't that wasn't information that got from which section of Amazon we went to.
That was something that was put in there after the fact.
So that's still something that's cool to see how that's allowed it to separate out different kinds of
things.
So for example, the stuff in blue here, this represents car parts, automotive stuff.
And the stuff in red is toys and games.
And maybe you're thinking, hang on a second, hang on, hang on.
Hold your horses.
I see that there are red items in the middle of the blue stuff.
That doesn't sound good.
Well, if you take a look at that, you will find that they are in fact car parts.
That of toys, toy car parts.
And the encoder model decided that this even though it turns out on Amazon, they were in a different
section.
The encoder things when it comes to the sort of meaning of things, it wants to put them around this
territory, and that is up to the encoder.
That's that's what it does, and that's how it's done it.
And I have I take such great delight in exploring the data, in looking at what's ended up where and
understanding it in terms of the content of the text.
And so I do encourage you to do the same thing.
Spend a while digging into this.
Look at what's ended up where, get a sense for how the encoder is deciding, uh, what where to put
things.
All of this is, of course, stored in chroma, the the free open source vector data store.
But the vectors were determined by our encoder model, the all mini lm6 L2 from hugging face.
And you know me too well.
You know I'm going to go and do a 3D plot next, obviously.
Let's see how it looks in 3D.
And just like in week five, you remember all the way back then.
At first blush it looks like a bit of a of a mess here.
We've got like tons of stuff, but again, we can zoom in, which is always a great experience.
Here it is.
And we can rotate it around and we can get this amazing sense of of how the reds and the blues for the
toy car parts are intermingled here, and you just get this much more visual sense of everything.
Uh, so I again, I do encourage you spend some time with it.
Uh, this is this is a really interesting way to dig into the data.
It gets me very overexcited, uh, because because it's, it's super interesting.
And it's also really cool.
A great way to get that first hand appreciation for.
What does it mean to take some text and turn it into a vector?
Okay, enough with our diagrams.
I never have enough diagrams.
Uh, let's just, uh, let's let's do some, uh, turning this now into into finding similar products
into into a rag flow.
Let's remind ourselves what is our first test item in our test data set.
Do you remember the first test item in the first test dataset.
Of course you do.
It's the old blood noise distortion pedal, that guitar pedal that we all need.
Uh, so we I'm going to start by giving you a function called vector, which takes an item and it turns
it into a vector.
And it does that by calling the encoder dot encode.
Okay.
That's easy enough.
You get that.
All right.
Well just very easy as well is something called find similars.
Given an item this is going to return some similar items and their prices.
And it's it's super simple.
We just make a vector out of items.
So we call this function here vector.
And then we say collection.
This is our chroma collection dot query.
And we pass in the vector.
We've got something there fancy to turn like the uh the numpy array into a list.
And we asked for five results back.
We get the documents, we get the prices and we return it.
Okay, so what do I get if I do find similars for the distortion pedal.
What do I get?
Okay, I get these.
These five responses.
We get something also from old blood noise.
But it's not a distortion pedal.
It's an endeavours procession reverb.
So a similar kind of audio effect box coming from the same manufacturer but not the same one.
We get a boss Md2 Mega Distortion.
So this is like another kind of of, uh, of distortion pedal from a different manufacturer.
We get another old blood noise, one that is a delay pedal, a different kind of effect, but from the
same brand.
And then a couple of other things.
And here are the prices of those five things.
So you can see immediately that we've got here similar products with their prices.
This is working.
It's all trivial.
Basically we're just doing a vector lookup in a data store.
And this is Rag at its core.
This is saying I've got something.
I want to look up similar information to it because I'm going to shove that in my prompt.
And in fact, that is exactly what we do in this next function, make context given something similar
and some prices.
So I'm going to have a message for context.
Here are some other items that might be similar to the item you need to estimate.
And then I'm just going to say potentially related product and list it out okay.
So just just to make that for you real for you, let's stick with our old blood noise distortion, whatever
it is.
Uh, let's first find the things that are similar to it and then call this make context and see what
that prints.
So here we go.
It says for context.
Here are some other items that might be similar potentially related old blood noise endeavours precession
reverb potentially related product boss Mega distortion pedal.
And I've got the prices coming at the end here.
So this is clearly a useful context which a frontier model will be able to use to make a better price.
So that that feels like we're onto something here.
And this is of course, again at the heart of rag.
Okay.
And we can turn that into an open AI style messages, um, with role user content message.
And the message will be estimate the price of this product, respond with the price.
No explanation, the same as before.
And then there is the item summary.
And then we're going to add in relevant examples.
Okay let's see this working.
Estimate the price of the product.
Uh let's let's again take, take the uh first test item and let's print the messages okay.
We get role user content, estimate the price of this product, respond with the price, blah blah,
blah, blah, blah.
It's exactly what we were expecting.
Let's, uh, instead of of this, let's let's take, um, take this and take the zeroth element of it
and the, uh, content and print this so that we really see what what we're getting.
I need to close my brackets here, I think, and delete that.
Let's run this and this is what we get.
Estimate the price of this product.
Respond with the price.
No explanation.
And there is the product.
For context, here are some other items that might be similar to the item we need to estimate.
And we have it.
This seems super clear and this is it.
This is already our Rag pipeline.
We can now have a function, GPT five one rag, where we simply take an item.
Step one we find things that are similar to that item.
Step two we call GPT five one.
We pass in the messages that we build that looks just like this.
And we don't need to do any reasoning.
We're giving it all the information it needs.
And that's it.
That's that's all we need to do to be calling GPT five one in in rag mode.
Uh, you might have thought this is going to be super complex, and it's really not.
We've just built a full rag pipeline.
The only thing that we remain to do is to try it out.
Let's give it a shot.
196 - So this is a moment of truth.
There's going to be a lot of moment of truth moments this week, but I do hope that you still have to
hand somewhere.
The prop from last week, with all of your notes written down of where we got to in our price, we were
able to get a three handle with 39.85, was our best price from our specialist model, and that that
is what we are up against here.
How does the strongest model on the planet equipped with a Rag knowledge base lookup, compare with
a model that is more than a thousand times smaller and quantized down to four bit, but fine tuned.
So this is definitely the battle of the Titans.
This is the function.
It's as simple as this.
Let's first do a quick experiment.
You remember that the price of that distortion pedal is $219.
Let's do Ragnar.
So when I run this one thing, it's going to it's going to first look up in chroma, find those similar
items, and then it's going to make that call to GPT five one in the cloud to come up with an estimate,
and it comes up with $229.
So that one is $10 off.
That would that's certainly very close.
That is that is surprising.
But what we don't know is, is whether this is going to whether this is going to be true across the
board, whether they're going to be outliers.
Let's find out.
Let's run this off it goes.
It's it's going off.
There's already there's some greens and there's some reds.
You can see it's moving nice and quickly.
And I'm too this is too exciting that I'm not going to do the thing of putting you on pause and coming
back because because we need to to live this moment together and be part of of all of this as it ticks
up.
Um, and, uh, yeah, I should say that even though we've set the seed here, I noticed that there
is some a bit of randomness in here, so I don't know exactly what answer we're going to get.
It's a bit different every time I run it.
We are two thirds the way through.
We're in the home stretch coming up 30 left to go, 20 left to do ten.
The answer is about to appear, which is going to be better training versus inference.
Here's the result visually.
And there's the number 30.19 rag for the win.
Wow.
So, uh, shockingly and amazingly, uh, the frontier model plus rag has crushed even our fine tuned
model.
And this is a different result to this time last year, where last year the specialist fine tuned model
was still stronger even than Rag.
But not anymore.
Now, the combination of having the frontier model with GPT five, one's power, with all of its worldly
knowledge and all of its abilities, combined with the with the expert knowledge of being able to look
up relevant content in a chroma database has allowed it to be really, really sharp.
Be within $30.
Uh, not within within $31 $30.19 is the error.
This is really tremendous.
The visual says it all.
We have just built we have just surpassed all of our previous numbers.
This is now the strongest model on the planet.
Yes, I hear you talking me down the strongest model on the planet for this very specific task.
And it's not really that.
It's the model that's the strongest.
It's that this workflow, the model plus the rag lookup together, has allowed us to be the strongest
on the planet.
So maybe I'm getting ahead of myself, but still, it's really awesome.
It's a terrific result, but it turns out that we can do slightly better.
You're like, what?
Ha!
How could we possibly do better than this?
Only slightly better.
But we can do slightly better.
And it's because of this mysterious thing called an ensemble.
If you have different models that come up with different answers, then you can often build another
model, which is a combination of those models and have it beat all of their performance.
Now, something about that might sound counterintuitive to you.
You might say, hang on, how could that possibly work if all of these models are out by more than than,
I don't know, let's say 100, then how could some combination of them get an error that's less than
100?
How could that possibly work?
And that that is the magic of something called an ensemble.
And and I mean, the data scientists amongst you for this is all old hat.
But famously, ensembles really, really came into being with something called the Netflix prize, which
is when Netflix famously won or offered $1 million to anyone that could could be the best, uh, beating
the existing model they had to recommend what movie you might want to watch next.
And the winners of the of the Netflix prize did it by building a big ensemble model.
Um, but ensembles are things that data scientists love and build all the time.
And in fact, the random forest model that we that we saw before is in itself an ensemble model.
So how is it that bringing together multiple models is able to do better than any of the constituents?
Well, one easy way to explain it is this supposing that we do have a model that is estimating prices,
and suppose that actually the price of all of our goods are exactly $100.
All of them $100 for every single product.
And this model is always off by exactly $10.
It's either $10 too much or $10 too little.
So it always either guesses 110 or 90.
Every single time, it's always off by ten.
Then when we run this model, the total average error is ten because it's off by ten every single time.
So the average is ten.
And let's say we have another model and it has much the same properties.
It's also always off by ten.
And it's also always either gets it wrong by too much or too little.
So both of these two models, model A and model B, both have an error of ten because they're both always
guessing off by ten.
Now let's suppose we combine these two models simply by taking the average.
We just take this model plus this model divided by two, the average of those two models.
What's going to be the error of the combined model?
Well, if it's if we're most unlucky and every time model A guesses too much by $10, model B also guesses
too much by $10.
And every time A is down, B is down.
Worst case.
In that eventuality, we would always again be off by ten in the average, and so the combined error
would be ten.
But if there's ever a case that that they go in opposite directions, then immediately the average error
would be less than ten.
And that that hopefully I give you this example to give you some intuition.
It sounds it sounds a bit counterintuitive, but but actually it makes sense.
It's quite possible there'll be ways to combine different models that would iron out the noise between
them, particularly if they use different methodologies, and it would allow the hole to be better than
the sum of the parts in some way.
And that's the sort of theory behind ensembles.
And that that is what we're going to do right now.
So let's start by going back to our our modal pricer our specialist.
I got a little function here specialist that is going to to to call modal in the cloud and return a
summary from modal.
I've also got this little thing here.
Get price that strips out a number when some of our models return text.
Okay.
Now there's another model that that that we're going to use as well, which is the neural network that
I unveiled at the end of week six that you may have also trained yourself if you wish to.
I've uploaded the weights to a file, deep neural networks, PyTorch, and it's up on the Google Drive
right here that you can download those weights.
And you should put it right here in this directory deep neural network.
It's just over a gigabyte.
So it might take a little bit of time to download.
And I'm not going to put it in git because it's too big for GitHub, so you can download it and put
it there.
And then I've made a class deep neural network inference, which you can just load in.
We don't actually need I don't think we need that.
Uh, we can just load this in and then we can load in our weights.
And that will give us another way to, uh, to to run this.
This will give us a way to, to to run deep neural network.
So now I've got a, a specialist model and a deep neural network model.
And we can now have an ensemble model.
And it's going to take the frontier rag as price one, the specialist model as price two and the deep
neural network as price three.
Now, what you're supposed to do in these things is now do a linear regression.
Now run this over a ton of data points and run linear regression to say, okay, what weighted combination
of these different models would give you the best outcome on some validation data.
And in fact, that is what I did in this course last year.
But it's a bit of a of a distraction.
It takes some time to do.
If you're interested in doing it, then I would I would very much encourage you to give that a try.
It doesn't take long, but it's about half an hour of faffing around with a linear regression model.
And I don't think it's important to illustrate the point because I could just quickly rough, rough
strokes say, look, let's pick 80% of the first price, 10% of the second price, 10% of the third
price.
Combining these three prices, the 80% goes to our frontier model with Rag, 10% goes to our specialist
model, 10% goes to the deep neural network.
Let's just try combining them and see what happens.
So what we can then do is simply run evaluate our usual test with the ensemble model with this test
test data set and see how it performs.
197 - Okay, so back to calling our favorite evaluate script with the ensemble function right here.
And with our test data set I will kick it off.
And this time it will take longer.
Particularly the first one is going to take the whole 30s while while modal kicks into gear.
But once it's got through the first the first one, it will then speed up.
So I'm going to let this do its thing, and hopefully you will do the same because you're going to want
to try this yourself.
But I will say if for some of you that you might get technical problems running the deep neural network
because it's quite, quite a hefty piece of machinery, if you want, you don't need to run this and
are very easy.
I mentioned before that there are some easy shortcuts.
If you have any problems running the ensemble model, you can just replace the ensemble model by something
that just makes simply the call to the specialist model only.
There's no need to do this if you don't want.
Anyway, it's off and running and I'm going to let it go through.
You can see once it's once modal has woken up, it's then pretty quick to call modal repeatedly.
So just in case it's not clear to you what we're doing, every time we come up with a price, we are
calling the specialist model in modal.
In the cloud, we're calling the we're calling our rag frontier model looking up in chroma, making
that prompt to GPT five one.
And then we are also calling a deep neural network and having it estimate as well.
And we're more than halfway through.
And I will see you in a second when it completes.
And I should have said it's of course, of those three prices, it's taking 80% times the frontier,
one plus 10% plus 10% that's being combined to this number.
Let's reveal.
Here you have it.
We got a two handle.
We only made a slight improvement on the frontier number.
But we're down to 29.9.
And here the R-squared is now at 87%.
This visual looks beautiful.
Absolutely beautiful.
Look how close everything is this now?
We really are.
We're done with pricing.
If you're fed up with these charts, this is the final, final one.
I was so determined to get a two handle and I got there in the end.
Write this down please.
Your final 129 .90.
That's that is success.
Now I also I'm keenly aware of what you probably already thought, which is that these do all have a
plus and minus.
So overly fixating on the fact that it's 29 is perhaps silly because there is, of course, an error
bar around it.
But it feels good.
You know, it feels nice to have got 29.9.
But the thing is, this is just based on a quick, broad setting of these weights.
If you have the time to build a proper ensemble model, you can do a lot better.
And by the way, you can throw in more models in here.
You could throw in other frontier models.
You could put in the whole gamut of the different models that we came up with.
Throw back in XGBoost, throw back in the random forest.
I think I did the random forest last year instead of the neural network.
So put in.
The more that you put in, the better.
The thing about using linear regression for your ensemble is that linear regression is smart, and if
something doesn't add any signal, it's not going to it's not going to include it.
It just won't get counted.
So you can put in as many models as you want.
And linear regression will figure out how can I take some combination of these different models to give
you the best final outcome?
So you should be able to beat me with this 29 and that of course, is the challenge for you.
Use all of the techniques.
Use everything we've done here to get even better.
Get it, get it down into the 20s.
Let's see what you could do.
Last year, the best score that I got was 46 or something like that.
It might have been 47.
Uh, so this I mean, honestly, my, my, I'm blown away by this result.
I'm so happy.
I wanted to get to a three handle.
That was that was my dream.
And I got to a two handle 29.9 uh, really, really cool.
Uh, so, uh, yeah, please take a moment to to to celebrate this success, wallow in the glory of
our $29.9 error.
And of course, it wouldn't be real if we weren't able to visualize that.
So I have to do this.
Here we go.
Put it put it into this chart.
And here is the final result, the prediction error from each model.
Uh, we've got, uh, the original, the original, uh, machine learning stuff, the, the disastrous
ad performance right here with 87.6.
Crazy.
Uh, this was the first, uh, neural network we did that was at 63.
These were all the frontier models.
The best was GPT five one at 44.74.
Then that was the disappointing fine tuning results.
This was our better deep neural network at 46, uh, and 46.49.
Then that was the baseline, the worst of everything, all the way down to the fine tuned 39.85, which
was our winner.
Up until today.
Now in comes GPT five one rag beating everything at 30.19, and then just coming in a hair lower is
our ensemble at 29.9.
Combining this plus this one plus this one.
And as I say, there's definitely more mileage here.
There's more juice and I, I can't wait to hear how you do it.
And you must send me screenshots, post screenshots of that chart showing what what performance you're
able to achieve.
But for now, I'm going to be very, very happy with the 29.9.
Okay.
Uh, but then just to make me really happy, we have to put this into an agent.
Uh, and, uh, so we're going to have a first of all, we're going to try a frontier agent, which
is one that that is basically going to call this whole rag flow.
Um, so let's just check it out again.
It's in the agents directory.
There is frontier Agent.
Where are you?
Um, there it is.
And the frontier agent is It's just exactly the same now as we as we look to to turn notebooks into,
uh, Python modules.
And I always do recommend you start with a notebook, because it's just a great way to be in the experimental
mindset and iterating on things.
But there comes a point when it's time to put things into Python modules.
And this is how I'm trying to show you.
Like production ready code.
It means that it has things like, you know, docstrings.
So we've got, uh, good comments here.
And I'm also using type hints.
So I'm doing all the better practices that the data scientists in me has perhaps not, not been as careful
with.
But now we're into more of the engineering side of being an AI engineer.
We're looking to be a bit more careful with this.
You can see that the frontier agent is just following exactly the same code, though.
Now we've experimented on it and perfected it, we can turn it into a nice module, a nice class frontier
agent.
It has the same thing making the contacts, getting the messages for finding similars.
And then this is when it actually calls the price.
And so with that background, we can now simply use this.
We can call the Quadcast HyperX condenser Mic and find out how much it costs.
And it predicts that it costs $140.
And I think I mentioned before that it actually costs me $130.
Uh, so this is a really very, very good pricing.
And our specialist model got 90, which wasn't as good.
Uh, so, uh, yeah.
There there you have it.
Now, uh, one, one thing that, uh, that.
Oh, yeah.
Let's try this as well.
Let's try it.
Pricing a Shure Mv7 plus.
Uh, now you might ask what that is.
That is the microphone that I'm speaking to you on right now.
Uh, that that is my current microphone, and that costs me 2.99.
Uh, so, uh, yeah, it's very close.
Again, it's, uh, obviously really knows this stuff.
Um, and we can also then, uh, have a neural network agent and this shows in purple.
And so let's have a look at the neural network agent.
Here it is.
It's very short and simple.
It just calls inference on our neural network.
Uh, and after after loading it in and setting it up.
So if we come back here, we can also do the same thing.
And it doesn't do as well.
It says 162.
Um, but it's still in the general ballpark.
And then finally we can start creating an ensemble agent to be using all three and combining them.
So let's go ahead and have a look at the specialists, the ensemble agent right now.
It's it's here in ensemble agent right there.
So it's nice and short again.
But there is one thing about this that maybe you were expecting.
If you, if you spotted this, this thing that I, that I almost didn't mention.
So what does this do?
It creates a specialist agent, a frontier agent, and a neural network agent in its init method.
It creates those three agents that it's delegating to, but it does also create the preprocessor.
Remember, we still have to.
If we're taking in some text from the internet, we still have to pre-process that to rewrite that in
the same format that is going to be most suitable for our agents.
So it's then going to take the, the, the, the, the text that comes in in this price function, take
the text and first use the preprocessor to rewrite it.
Then it will call the specialist.
The frontier and the neural network are three prices those three agents to the right.
And it combines them by combining by multiplying the frontier by 0.8, the specialist by 0.1, and the
neural network by 0.1.
And that is what it returns, and it logs that as well.
If you're going to come in and improve the ensemble, this is where to do it.
Of course, this is where you could use real weights that we come up with by looking at the data.
Look at the val, the validation data set perhaps to come up with the best way to weight it.
Also, if you have technical problems getting the neural network to work, or getting one of either
the specialist or the frontier to work.
This is a shortcut you can take.
You can come into this ensemble agent, and you can just comment out whichever ones give you trouble.
Just comment them out here, comment them out here and then down here.
Comment them out and just return the number that you actually want.
Let me uncomment it up so that that would allow you to simplify the ensemble agent to do whatever it
is that you want.
This is one place to go to, to really pare down what's happening.
If you want to, to run a minimal version of this.
Um, but but we'll, we'll have the maximum version of this.
We'll, we'll, we'll be using this combined weighting.
And you'll notice this is an example of really an agent workflow that we're just using Python code to
orchestrate the three calls to three different agents.
It's not like there's any autonomy at this point.
It's just a fixed calling for three sub agents in order to combine those numbers and come up with the
total estimated price of this item.
198 - Okay.
And so finally, it remains for me to now load in the ensemble agent.
You can see that when the ensemble agent gets initialized, it starts by initializing all of the underlying
agents, the frontier agent and the neural network agent.
And then it says it's ready.
And now I can ask our ensemble agent to price this Shure Mv7 plus podcaster microphone.
Off it goes.
And you can see you see how cool these log messages are.
We can watch while everything happens.
The ensemble agent is first pre-processing using grok because I've got that set in my env file as I
as I showed you before.
That's that's pre-processed.
Now the specialist agent is calling the fine tuned model.
And of course it's gone to sleep.
So this is going to take 30s, which is, uh, always tiresome when it does it.
I should have set that flag so that it stays awake.
But when that's done, when modal has finished with its, uh, with its, it's warming up the server,
it's then going to call modal.
It's then going to to do the rag pricing.
It's going to do the um the neural network pricing.
And we will then have our Combined results.
There we go.
Finished with that.
It predicted 2.99.
That's interesting that that is exactly correct.
So so it our this time our fine tuned model was spot on with the price of this.
That's that's really interesting.
Uh, so the frontier agent was off by $10.
The ensemble was way off.
The net result was close.
Uh, we'd have done better this time just to have picked the specialist agent.
And maybe when you build your ensemble, you'll have an ensemble that will.
That will be able to do better than my ensemble.
But there you have it.
We just built an ensemble model and you can see all the different calls to LMS have happened.
This is a call to an LM.
And and then we we also had to vectorize.
It's another call and then three more calls.
So the four five LM calls participated in coming up with this result.
And uh, that that then is the result of our ensemble agent live and ready for our product.
And I said five LM calls there.
But to be strictly accurate, I should say four LM calls and one neural network call.
We we first of all, we we, are called the frontier agent that involves an encoder LM and the frontier
LM.
The specialist agent.
That was our, uh, the fine tuned LM.
That's our third LM call.
Uh, the ensemble agent.
In order to call all of these, had to call the pre-processor, which was an LM call.
That's the fourth LM call.
This was a neural network, not an LM.
Uh, and so that that ends up being five models that were involved.
Four of them are LMS and one of them are neural network.
But still, what a lot of orchestration, a lot of stuff happening to come up with one price of a product.
All of that happened and that's our ensemble agent built our architecture.
It's coming along nicely.
What a big day it was.
I promise you a big day.
It was a big day.
We didn't take a huge amount of time over it.
We made good time.
But the the result was really, really terrific.
I'm so happy we got the two handle.
I didn't think we would.
So that's that's really amazing.
And maybe you've done even better.
Okay.
With that.
We are 92.5% through this journey.
This is home stretch territory.
Wow.
Of course you know, you can generate text and code with front end models, open source models, APIs,
tools.
The tools are going to make a comeback.
Assistance.
We built Rag now twice.
You can follow a five step strategy.
You can curate data, make a baseline model.
You can carry out fine tuning of a model.
And you can deploy models to production, including on modal.
We can build a Rag workflow and deploy a build an ensemble model that combines multiple different models.
Okay, so with that, next time we're going to work on our scanner agent mostly.
And that's going to involve using structured outputs that we have.
I've mentioned this many times and I kept saying we were going to come to it properly and we are going
to come to it properly.
We're going to come to it properly tomorrow.
And it's like one final piece of really important core learning.
Um, but but otherwise we're very much in the home stretch.
It's all going to come together now.
Uh, and I can't wait to show you the prices.
Right.
Uh, materializing.
See you tomorrow.
199 - Okay, a fine.
Welcome to week eight.
Day three.
Today is about leveling up yet again with a new skill.
Structured outputs.
Such a such an important skill in the way that that LMS work and the way that particularly with with
Agentic workflows already, of course you can use frontier and open source models, you can use tools
and rag, you can fine tune both frontier models and open source models.
Importantly, but also you can now deploy a fine tuned model with modal.
You can use Rag with frontier models with a big setup with 800,000, uh, similar items and and add
together an ensemble model that combines the best of multiple models.
Okay.
Today, today it's going to be about structured outputs.
And and importantly, one of the applications of this, there are many, many, many applications of
structured outputs.
One of them that we will do today is using it as a way to parse unstructured data and turn unstructured
data into a structured form, which is a business task, a commercial task that you come up against
all the time.
And llms are just great at it.
Let's get into it.
So structured outputs then.
So there's there's a way that that it feels like structured outputs work.
And then there's what they actually are.
It's a bit like tool calling.
When tool calling feels like the LLM is able to suddenly make calls to tools, but in practice it's
something a little bit more pedestrian.
So the way it feels with structured outputs is that you can define a Python class, and you have to
make it like a subclass of this, this thing called base model, which is a pedantic object which,
which we've touched on a couple of times.
So.
So you make a Python class, it's a subclass of something called base model.
And when you're doing that, it means that you define each of the attributes of this class fairly carefully.
So so you define a class that way.
And you can tell OpenAI OpenAI invented this and now most of the other providers support it as well,
but not all.
But you can tell a provider, hey, when you when you do, do what I'm about to ask you to do in my
prompting, when you respond, don't respond with natural language.
Respond with an object, a populated object, a Python object with a fields filled in.
That's weird right?
It's like it's a natural language model.
How is it suddenly able to not predict tokens, but instead craft an object, a Python object, and
that's what you get back?
Well, that's the magic of structured outputs.
And that's how it feels.
And that's that's really cool.
And it allows you to do so much.
It allows you to put structure around these, these somewhat very flexible calls to llms.
It allows you to constrain what you get back.
It allows you to then take actions based on it.
So it allows you to to put so much, uh, organization and structure around how you orchestrate between
multiple llms.
Uh, but, um, yeah, this this is how it feels.
But the reality, as is often the case, is a little bit more pedestrian.
So here's the reality.
The reason why you make a subclass of a pedantic base model is that what pedantic is all about is defining
a JSON schema.
If you if you have something that's a that's a subclass of base model, you can convert it to JSON and
you can convert the JSON back to the object again.
So the pedantic class that you set up is used to generate a JSON schema, something which says that
the JSON must conform to the following spec and it lays it out.
It needs to have these fields.
And you put like a natural language description by your fields, and that gets included in the JSON
schema.
And OpenAI just shoves something extra in the system prompt that says, hey, when you're generating
your response, you have to respond in JSON and it needs to conform to this schema, please.
And so the model just generates tokens.
All that generates tokens.
And the tokens it generates are JSON.
And models love generating JSON because they're trained on tons of it.
And it conforms to the schema because it's in the system prompt.
And then the OpenAI Python client library then goes and takes that JSON and converts it to an instance
of the class that you want populated with those JSON fields.
And lo and behold, you get back, apparently a Python object.
That's that's how it actually works.
It's not particularly magical, but it gives you this feeling that you can talk Python objects with
models instead of just talking natural language.
Except there is one thing about it that actually is quite magical.
There's one thing about it that is like an invention that is like, wow, that's clever.
One thing about structured outputs that you, even if you knew about everything so far, you may not
have known this, this little, little feature.
At least this is how it's implemented with OpenAI and with some other providers.
And it's really, really clever.
And to tell you about it, I need to remind you of the way that inference works.
Remember, when a model generates the next token, it doesn't literally generate a token.
That's not what comes out of the neural network.
What comes out after you apply the softmax function thing is a set of probabilities, all the probabilities
of all the possible next tokens.
And then there is some code which says okay, I'll pick the most likely or okay, I will sample from
these according to their probability distributions.
Well there is a trick.
And there's a trick that's called inference time constrained decoding.
That's the technical name for it.
And even from those words you probably already know what I'm going to say.
Basically when when the model generates this probability distribution, OpenAI have written some Python
code that says, hang on a second.
This model needs to conform.
This needs to generate something which conforms to a particular JSON spec.
Let me look through all the possible next tokens and see if there are any tokens here that would break
the spec a token.
That would mean that what comes out wouldn't conform to the spec, and I would simply zero out the probability
so that the model, whatever happens, it's not going to generate a token that will break the JSON spec.
It's only going to be able to generate.
I'm only going to keep probabilities for things which would stay in in line with the spec.
And then and then we'll generate the.
Then we'll select our next token and that trick.
And isn't that clever.
It's so simple.
Once you've heard it you're like, I would have thought of that, but you didn't think of it.
But once you heard it, it's like, of course, of course.
And that means that actually the model is constrained, that it has to generate text that conforms to
the spec.
The worst case is that it doesn't generate it never generates a conclusion.
It sort of keeps going or something.
So there's still some failure scenarios.
But but aside from that, when you're using OpenAI, it will always generate an output that is consistent
with the Pydantic JSON schema.
And so it is a way to guarantee that the response from the model will populate your Python object.
And that's really clever.
Okay.
And with that we're going to go straight to the lab.
We're going to get back to to coding.
And we're going to focus on the scanner agent I will see you in cursor.
200 - Okay.
So we go into week eight.
We go to day three.
Welcome to the next part of The Price is Right.
We've already built our specialist agent, our ensemble agent.
Now we're going to build our scanner I run some imports.
Now this is some code I wrote that scrapes RSS feeds and parses the results.
Let me kick this off and then just show it to you.
It's some basic stuff.
There's nothing lm about it.
It's in deals.
Dot py right here.
You start by specifying some some RSS feeds.
I've got one for electronics, computers and smart home deals from deal Dealnews.com.
And here's another couple for Automotive and Home Guard.
And you can throw in if you wanted.
And you could put in any RSS feeds you'd like.
I use a library called Feedparser, which is an open source library that parses RSS feeds, very simply
reads them in.
I just take the first ten items from each one.
You can put that number up if you if you'd rather have more, but it seems like seems like a decent
thing to do.
And uh, then I just read them in and I also go to the website where the deal is actually described,
and I suck as much data as I can from that as well.
So we end up with some some unstructured data that relates to this deal, and that's what we've got,
uh, over here.
Um, it's loaded in it's run those three RSS feeds.
If I look at this, we've got 30 deals because it's three sets of ten deals.
If I pick a random let's look at deal number ten.
Here it is.
It's a Dell Cyber Monday gaming deals, tons of stuff about it and a link to the deal itself.
Uh, that that is what we have scraped in.
Okay.
Here is, is the where the meat happens.
I have a system prompt.
You identify and summarize the five most detailed deals from a list by selecting deals, blah, blah,
blah, blah, blah.
I tell it to be careful with products that are described as some amount off or reduced.
This isn't the actual price you need to respond, blah blah blah and a very similar user prompt, I'm
telling it, you're getting a list of items you need to respond with the five most promising deals.
And don't be distracted by something that says it's $1,000 off.
What matters is the actual price itself.
And obviously I'm saying this because I've experimented, I've tried different prompts.
It's fallen short in different ways.
It's sometimes used to get confused with how much off a deal was.
That's how I've got here.
I sometimes present this as if as if this is the first thing I typed.
It wasn't.
It's so important with these kinds of projects that you're willing to roll up your sleeves and experiment
with the prompts until you get the performance that you want.
Okay, so that's the system prompt and the user prompt, uh, prefix.
And now I'm going to make a user prompt.
It's going to have this prefix here.
And it's going to be then the contents of all the 30 things that we've scraped.
So we're making a prompt which has this instruction.
And then it has this instruction.
And then it has 30 different things in there.
And then at the bottom it's is going to say include exactly five deals, no more.
So let's load that in.
And now let's have this function, uh, use a prompt.
So let me show you what that looks like.
We'll just show the first the first 2000 characters of it.
Uh, here's how it looks.
Respond with the most promising five deals from the list, etc., etc. deals.
And here are the deals.
Each one spelt out okay so far.
Makes total sense, right?
We're just we're telling it.
We want you to find the most promising five deals.
Nothing about structured outputs yet.
All right.
But now comes the structured outputs.
This is normally where I would have OpenAI create something that you know so well at this point OpenAI
create but I don't I have OpenAI.
Something different.
And that is how you describe structured outputs.
And it has in this parse function the usual parameters, the model name, the messages, the reasoning
effort which you remember from way back with saying minimal.
But there's something else.
There's response format and we're passing this thing in deal selection.
What is that?
Well, that's actually something that I've imported that is also over in this deals dot pi.
Let's find it deal selection.
It's called uh and here it is.
It's a subclass of base model.
And it is it's a class which only has one field deals.
And that field is a list of deal objects okay.
So deals is deal selection has deals, which is a list of deal objects.
And you'll see here in this this is pedantic I'm saying it's got one field called deal.
And you can describe it in English.
And so I describe your selection of the five deals that have the most detailed high quality description
and the most clear price.
You should be confident that the price reflects the deal.
That's a good deal with a clear description.
Okay.
So what are each of these deal objects?
Each of them has a product description, a price, and a URL.
The product description it says clearly expressed summary of the product.
The description is the actual price.
Be sure to give the actual price.
And then.
And then you know, if the deal is $100 off 500, then you should give 400.
And then the URL as provided.
So this is how we've defined a pedantic structure a deal selection object that contains deals which
are multiple of this object with a description, price, and URL.
And the key thing to note here is that we've not only described this JSON schema, but we've got some
language to explain how each field should be populated, and that that is what's allowing us now to
be making this structured output call.
And just to make this real for you, I just want to show you so deal selection this thing this is this
is a class.
It's I defined it in agent selection.
We were just looking at it.
It's because it's a pedantic class, a subclass of base model.
It's got some some functions that it inherits.
One of them is I can call model.
Model.
Um, uh, sorry.
Model.
Uh, schema this.
And now when I run this, we get to see the, uh, the JSON description of the JSON schema associated
with this object.
And it's this kind of schema that gets provided in the system prompt to OpenAI to say to GPT, to say
you must conform to this schema.
And that is how when we make this call to OpenAI parse and we say response format is deal selection,
it's going to return some JSON that will conform to that spec.
And you're used to us seeing results is response dot choices, zero dot message content.
And that's not what we've got here.
It's response zero 20...
And what that does is it takes the content and it takes the JSON, and it populates an object of type
deal selection with that.
So if I run this, it's turning that JSON thing into some schema.
It's calling OpenAI with this prompt.
Exactly.
This prompt OpenAI GPT is generating JSON that conforms to this schema.
And what comes back is a deal selection object populated with the JSON that came back.
And so if you look at this thing, you can see that it is something which is a deal selection object.
It has a field called deals, each one of which is a deal.
So hang on.
If I, if I add some code here and I say for deal in results dot deals, we'll do exactly what cursor
is suggesting.
And look at this.
You can see that we've got a fitness tracker uh, which is going for some crazy cheap price, a Dell
16 plus each of these things.
So this is a Dell laptop going for for $550.
Seems like a great bargain.
And you might be thinking this, this fitness tracker for $15.
That sounds too good to be true.
Well, we can double check.
Here's a link to dealnews.com.
This is the URL that came back in our structured outputs.
Let's click on it and see up it comes.
Here it is indeed.
This is the web page that was scraped by my janky code.
And this in an unstructured format would have been sent to to GPT.
And it's spotted that it hasn't given us the 159.
It's given us the $15 insanely cheap price there.
So it got that completely correct.
Let's see this one here.
$550 is indeed the price of the Dell computer.
Lots of janky pop ups come up.
So it has worked well.
It has parsed in the unstructured data, scraped from the internet, turned it into pedantic objects.
It responded in JSON that conformed to the schema.
The OpenAI library turned that into a pedantic object, and it's been populated correctly.
201 - Now there's another point I want to make here, which is a commercial point and an important one.
What we've just done taking unstructured data from the internet and parsing it, and doing so in a,
in a smart way in that something which is like $100 off $300 will have been interpreted as $200.
That was pretty much an unsolved problem only a few years ago.
There were there were plenty of parsers for different domains, but they tended to be very, very prickly,
very inflexible, and such that if the content isn't doesn't conform well to what was expected, then
they would break.
So however well you tried to to work how it would interpret text if the text had had sufficient meaning,
if it didn't say $100 off $300, if if instead it said something like it's usually $200 off, but this
week only it's $250 off.
That would be just completely not able to be handled by any passes on the planet, and there were lots
of passes that tried to to to do this in different ways, very janky and very brittle.
They would break when, when formats changed in different ways.
And somehow in the space of a few years, this kind of parsing has become a solved problem that Llms
are just able to do this, they are able to take unstructured data with human like complications, like
different kinds of deals and different exceptions, and they can interpret it with this kind of, of
intelligence.
And this is something which is which is almost magical.
If you've if you've tried to write parsers before yourself and the field.
I've done a lot of work with parsing resumes.
It's something which is pretty close to being a solved problem.
There are a lot of resume parsers out there, but resumes come in so many different kinds of formats
that resume parsers have grown over time to be very heavyweight.
Things that have tons and tons of of ifs built into them.
And they're pretty good, but they're they're a bit pricey.
and now llms have an easy time parsing resumes.
It is easy and nobody saw this coming.
This ability for Llms to parse unstructured data and turn them into a structured form.
It's something which is which is extraordinary.
And of course it comes with its own negatives.
There is a cost to it.
There's a latency and there's the unpredictability you get with, with, with llms.
But nonetheless, the, the intelligent parsing is something which is just a whole new set of solutions
that weren't available before.
And this is something which has many applications.
I bet you can think of somewhere in your current job where you could apply this kind of parser to be
able to to turn unstructured data into something structured.
And the key to being able to do it is to use structured outputs, because it guarantees the output format.
And now all that remains is for us to turn on logging, make something called the scanner agent.
Let's just quickly check it out.
It is really simple.
It's exactly the same thing, the same system prompt, the same user prompt.
There's a color, there's always a color.
And then fetch deals.
You can see I've added some comments and some type hints because it's a good thing to do.
So this is sort of trying to take a step towards productionizing this code.
Uh, after after being in a notebook, the make the user prompt the same thing and then the scan as
before.
This is where we pass in the response format.
And this is where we call response .0. parsed, which is of course where we say we're using structured
outputs.
And so with that we can call the scanner agent and we can call agent scan.
We see our log messages in cyan.
And with any luck after a couple of minutes we will get back some scanned deals that have been been,
uh, read in from the RSS feed and that then have been sent to to GPT five, which is doing two things.
It's selecting the most promising deals, and it's also parsing them and turning them into this structured
output, which which has things like the price and the URL identified explicitly.
Okay.
Well, I'll let that finish off while it's now.
It's now doing it's already received the 30 deals and it's now calling OpenAI using structured outputs.
The final step of this.
And then we will look at the result.
And then we're moving on to to the last part for today, which is one final little extra agent that
I think will will will amuse you.
Okay.
I will let this finish and I'll come back in just a second.
Okay.
And here we have it.
And we look at results.
And we do of course have a deal selection object because of the trick.
The inference trick we know that we were going to and it contains that, that fitness tracker at the
front of it.
All right.
Next up, the the last agent for today is a very simple, quick one, and I want to introduce you to
a new tool called pushover, which is a nifty little tool for sending push notifications to your phone.
You may be familiar with platforms like Twilio that are able to send text messages.
They're quite heavyweight, and they need you to fill in lots of paperwork to be allowed to send text
messages to avoid you spamming people.
A much simpler approach, if you're trying to message yourself, is to use an app that connects directly
to you, and pushover is free, at least for the first month or so, so you might as well be the one
to use it.
Now look, this isn't super critical.
This has got nothing to do with Llms being able to send a push notification, but it's fun to have that
sense of an agent having having agency to have it, sending a push notification to your phone.
So I do encourage you to go through this little setup, even though I do understand it's not exactly
super relevant, but but I use it on my other courses to use it for all sorts of things, and I find
pushover to be great.
There's lots of others, by the way, if you if you'd rather use a different one.
But but what we'll do is we're going to go to pushover dot net and get things set up.
Okay.
So you go to pushover net up it comes like this.
You go to log in or sign up.
And you will need to sign up for the first time.
And I can't go to this right now because for some reason they show you your API key, your token, like
on the dashboard screen, like in big letters.
So just by going there, I will reveal my token to you.
So when you do that you will get a you'll set it up and you will get a token.
Now here's the thing.
Uh, pushover has two tokens and you need both of them.
And it's a little bit confusing.
Once you've once you've signed up, you will see, um, a main token on the top right of that dashboard
screen.
It starts with the letter U.
It's called the user token.
And uh, so look out for that one beginning with a U.
That's easy.
But then you also on the home screen you need to click create an application slash API token.
And then it asks you to come up with a name, uh, and you can give it anything you want.
You could give it a name like agents or whatever you want, or MLM or whatever you want.
Maybe LM engineering would be a better one.
Or AI.
AI engineer.
That might be a nice a nice name for you.
Um, and then click Create Application.
This this doesn't matter just for your own queue.
So you'll remember it in the future.
And when you do that, you'll get another token, which is your application level token associated with
this thing.
Um, so you now have two tokens.
One starts with a U and one starts with an A, and you need to add to your EMV file, push over user
and then put the one that begins with the u push over token, and then put the one that begins with
an A and then save.
And then you will need.
Once you've saved your EMV file, make sure you save it.
I know you guys know this stuff by now.
Uh, then we'll need to come in here and do a EMV override is true and do this again.
And then, uh, you'll need to, uh, to, to, to print, uh, to, to load in your keys like this.
and let's just print them out and make sure the pushover user is found and starts with a U, and the
pushover token is found and starts with an A.
And if you've got to this point, then you're great.
Everything is working.
You will also need to install the pushover app on your phone.
Um, and uh, there are instructions for that on with a link to the app on the, on the landing page
there.
And I'm just going to have my phone here and turn it off silent and hope nobody calls me.
And what I've now just written this function push again.
This has got nothing to do with LMS at this point.
But push just has takes a payload.
That is the user token.
The token, the one that begins with an A and then a message, and then it just calls the pushover URL.
And that's, that's that's what it says.
And if I say massive deal and run this then there we go.
You heard that.
I hope you heard that.
That was my phone getting a push.
Let's do it again.
There it is.
Three times.
Very nice.
And I have put this into an agent.
Of course.
Here it is.
Messaging agent.
Uh, now, the thing is that I feel like it would be a stretch.
We couldn't call it an agent if it was literally just making a call to pushover, and that was it.
And I wanted to call it an agent.
And so I felt like there had to be an LLM involved.
So I have it using Claude Sonnet 45 to write a hype message.
So this is this is where it has the payload.
I've also put the change the sound to be a cash register sound.
And then I've got this thing alert which crafts a juicy message.
And then it makes the call to pushover with the juicy hype message about a deal.
So that's the only change I've made here.
If you don't want to do that, you can just you can just delete it from from here and just have it responding
with only the deal itself.
But, uh, yeah, especially if you don't have a cloud API.
This isn't strictly necessary, or you can make it, of course be OpenAI if you'd prefer, but I wanted
to do it so that we would we would be able to have some, some reason for having another agent in the
mix.
Um, okay.
So with that in mind, um, make sure my phone is unlocked.
I can say such a massive deal.
We should get a cash register.
There it is.
You have that ka ching, and we have our white printing.
And now this is the one where we'll actually call a model, uh, with this information here, a special
deal on Samsung.
So it's calling anthropic.
And there I got a cash register.
Ka ching.
And it says amazing deal alert.
Get a Samsung 60 inch TV.
Here we go.
Uh, a lovely hyped message from Claude.
So that just makes us really feel like we're using an agent.
Claude is is turning this into something that's going to wake us up and make us excited about going
to buy that that flat screen, 60 inch LED TV.
Uh, and it's sending it through to pushover.
So this is just something.
Something a little extra to mean that our agents are able to notify us and do so with style.
Wow.
You're at 95%.
We're almost done.
Uh, so, uh, you know, everything that you can do.
I'm having trouble cramming everything onto one slide I had to shove and use structured outputs at the
end of that last bullet.
A bit awkwardly, but.
But you honestly, at this point, you really have got all the different bits and pieces, all the building
blocks to be building AI solutions.
It's just about bringing it together now.
Perhaps the final piece of the puzzle is going to be about the orchestration part.
We're going to bring back use of tools that we did all the way back in week two.
We're going to come back with tools in anger, and we're going to use them to make an agent orchestration
and a planner, an autonomous planning agent with an agent loop.
We're going to do all of that tomorrow.
I will see you then.
202 - Well, would you believe this is the penultimate day?
Welcome to the penultimate day of the program.
It's now.
We're in week eight, day four, today and tomorrow.
Still to go.
Today we go into a gigantic AI.
We are going to be understanding how you use tools to orchestrate agents.
And we're going to build a planning agent with an agent loop crucial expertise that you are building.
For those of you that have actually done my agent course, you know all about Agentic AI.
Sometimes it's valuable to approach it this way from first principles, building an agentic framework
ourselves, doing the orchestration ourselves.
This is really helpful and this helps you deeply understand what it means to have agentic AI.
And as you know, it's pretty common to use off the shelf frameworks that do a lot of this for you,
which makes it very quick to get agents up and talking to each other.
But it's great to know how it actually works behind the scenes.
That's what we'll do today.
Now, at the beginning of the week, I defined a genetic AI and gave you some definitions that the modern
one, the most recent one, which is that it's when you have llms equipped with tools, calling tools
in a loop to achieve a goal, llms calling tools in a loop to achieve a goal.
Uh, but when you when you have a AI that that follows these definitions, there are some hallmarks
of what you produce which which you'll notice which which is what's in common between engineered solutions.
And that's what you look out for.
One of them is that typically an AI solution involves breaking a bigger problem into smaller steps,
where those smaller steps are carried out by individual LLM calls.
That's a very common, uh, feature of them.
And this also has that trap I mentioned before, the agentic trap, when people are too quick to divide
up their problem into steps, particularly when they give human like responsibilities to those steps
with, with agent names and, and they haven't done it in order to break a problem down.
They've done it because that's what.
What human roles would be like.
And and that might turn out that that's fine.
But I just do suggest that you start by understanding the problem.
You divide up into smaller LMS in order to solve the problem.
Well, not just because it sounds like that would make a good agent.
Okay, so that's one hallmark.
Another one, of course, is using tools.
Uh, tool calling is really where where I came from.
The idea that you can equip an LM with a tool to carry out some, some extra functionality, and indeed,
what that tool might do is involve calling another LM.
And that's how you have LMS.
Controlling the workflow and calling other LMS and structured outputs is another, another feature.
And you might think that tools and structured outputs are sound like very different things.
Tools equipping LM to to take out actions, structured outputs constraining the output that it comes
up with.
In fact, they're very closely related.
Uh, in for most providers structured outputs is actually implemented through tools.
It's a tool call that generates the structured output.
So that's interesting.
Another way to think of it is that one as an alternative to calling tools, you could just generate
a structured output.
And in that structured output describe what you want to happen next.
So in fact, even though tools and structured outputs sound like they're very different things, they're
quite closely related and they're almost analogous kind of concepts.
Um, but both of them together are hallmarks of an agentic AI solution.
And then an agent environment, something which is sort of a construct around your agents that allows
them to communicate with each other in some way, pass information, or have information in common between
them.
That is a hallmark of an agentic solution.
It's very common, uh, and it's something that we will we will create ourselves homegrown.
But if you use an agent framework, of course, it sort of comes with that, that kind of construct
and then a planning Agent.
Typically, it's another LM call that is able to decide what's going to happen when.
In in simple agent solutions, this can just be a workflow.
It could just be Python code that orchestrates what happens when, uh, and in more advanced agent solutions
like the one we'll do, it can be something where it is an LM call that has tools, and those tools
allow it to call other agents.
Or it could be an LM call that generates structured outputs.
And the structured outputs describe what should happen when either of those would work.
And then finally, and this one is perhaps the gooiest of them.
The one that is the most ill defined.
Is this the sort of idea of autonomy, a sense that this solution is a solution that isn't just a chat
with a user, it's not just an AI assistant.
It's something that has some kind of persistence beyond that, that construct of just a chat with a
user.
Uh, and uh, yeah, it's got some sort of memory that transcends one interaction that gives you a sense
you've got an authentic AI, uh, platform.
It seems to persist, and you can imagine the thing we're about to build that's going to be able to
to send push notifications every so often, whenever it feels like it, in a way that's going to have
that sense of autonomy and memory.
It's something which which which is able to carry out tasks in the background and then sort of proactively
reach out to us with an answer.
That kind of thing is like a hallmark, and it's probably the least well defined of them.
So this gives you a sense of what it means to be agentic.
We, of course, are going to tick all of these boxes in our Agentic platform, uh, and, uh, and,
but you'll, you'll generally see that platforms are described as agentic if they tick any of these
boxes.
The term is a very, uh, broad term that can apply.
It's an umbrella term that can apply to any of these kinds of solutions, but for sure, you'll find
people that will be more have a stricter definition and will say that it's only agentic if there is
a clearly an agent loop that could keep going forever.
Something that's more of a Claud code kind of experience.
And we get pretty close to that with what we're building as well.
All right.
And to remind you, what is the thing that we're building?
Well, you'll remember, there's a scanner agent that we built yesterday that is able to identify promising
deals.
And of course, our scanner agent uses structured outputs to turn, uh, the unstructured data scraped
from the internet and from RSS feeds into something that is a pedantic object that's populated with
deal information and a price.
There's the ensemble agent that estimates the true value of something based only on its description.
It does.
It does a pre-process to rewrite it in a format that is, that is more ready for models.
And then, of course, it's going to call a bunch of other models.
And we have a messaging agent that will write a hype message using Claude for sonnet.
And then we'll send a push notification using pushover.
And behind that ensemble agent, we have, of course, the specialist agent.
And where's that running?
It's running on.
And we've got a frontier agent that is using the Rag processor.
It's encoding the text of the the thing we're trying to price.
It looks up similar products in chroma.
And it's then making a call to GPT five one with all that information.
And it does really well at it.
And then we've got a neural network agent that is estimating prices using a deep neural network from
week six.
Today we're going to be building the planning agent that coordinates activities across these.
And it's going to do it because we're going to give it three tools, a tool that will allow it to call
each of those three steps, three agents to the right as far as it's concerned.
They're just tools.
It doesn't know that it's an LLM.
It just thinks of it as three different tools it can call.
Much like the tools we built in week two.
And then tomorrow we're going to finish off with the agent framework and the UI.
And it's going to be uh, it's going to be terrific.
That's going to be the epic finale.
Uh, but for now let's go to cursor.
Let's build ourselves a planning agent.
203 - Okay.
We go into week eight, we're going to day four.
It's almost over.
Are we going to day four?
And uh, here we have The Price is Right.
Day four the autonomous planner agent.
Uh, and, uh, here we have it.
We're going to do some imports.
We're going to be using GPT five one today.
If you want to use a cheaper model, then by all means dial that back.
But but it's going to be very short amounts of tokens okay.
I want to start by by just getting some test data.
The scanner agent I've got like a method test scan that just gets back test results.
So we can have.
Then let me show you what I mean.
It brings back a deal selection object.
This is the Pydantic object.
That and it's populated it with a fake, uh, set of deals.
It actually is something I scraped a while ago, so it was once real.
Uh, but it's just some data.
Uh, we're going to use test data to start with.
With this.
Okay.
Do you remember how tools work back from week two?
Do you remember how it works?
Basically, you come up with a blob of JSON, some janky JSON that describes to a model what functionality,
what capabilities it has.
And then when you prompt the model, you tell it, hey, you've got some tools.
And then you say, do you want to call any of these tools?
And if it says yes, then there's an if statement and we say, okay, if it wants to call one of these
tools, then we'll do so and we'll return the results.
Okay.
Hopefully you remember that.
If not, this is some revision a quick moment to to to strengthen your skills with tools.
Um, and uh, I am going to do that by creating three fake functions.
Three pretend functions.
And they are right here okay.
This function scan the internet for bargains.
So this tool scans internet for great deals and gets a curated list of promising deals.
It says it's going to print fake function to scan the internet.
This returns a hard coded set of deals and it just returns this test results right here turned into
into JSON.
That's it.
That is scan the internet for bargains.
It's fake.
It returns test bargains.
Here's another one.
Estimate true value.
This tool estimates the true value of a product based on a text description.
It's a fake function.
Fake function to estimate the true value of this always returns $300.
And then it returns the product description has an estimated true value of 300.
Let's put a dollar sign in that to make it $300.
That's it.
That's our second fake function.
Next fake function.
Notify user of deal.
This tool notifies users of a great deal given a description of it, and it prints fake function to
notify the user of this, which costs this.
And it estimated this and it returns just notifications sent.
Okay.
So these are fake functions.
All they do is print something.
Let's run this first one.
Scan the internet for bargains I run it.
It says fake function to scan the internet for bargains.
And it returns this set of JSON in a text.
Let's run this this second one estimate.
Estimate true value.
Estimate true value says a new iPhone cursor.
Thank you.
Uh, fake function to estimate the true value of a new iPhone that always returns 300.
And it just returns that that string with 300.
All right.
Uh, let's do notify user of deal a new iPhone.
The deal price is 100.
The estimated true value is 1000.
And that is the URL.
And here we go.
Fake function to notify the user notification sent okay.
All right.
Nothing clever here three fake functions I get it I know okay.
Now prepare yourself for some JSON, rub your eyes and get ready because this is going to be torturous
JSON, lots of it.
Uh, this is the JSON for the scan function.
Do you remember you have to come up with this blob of JSON that describes the name of the function,
the description of what it does, and then any parameters.
It's fairly simple for the scan function.
There it is.
This is the estimate function.
It's a bit more janky.
We've got estimate true value given the description of item, estimate how much it actually worth.
And there we go.
The the description is the one uh parameter which is a string, uh, which is uh the description of
the item to be estimated.
And then notify function is notify user of a deal.
It has three.
Uh, no, it has four parameters um description, deal price, estimated true value and URL.
And they are all required.
So this this is the JSON that describes the functions.
We did this in week two.
Same kind of thing.
We created this JSON.
And of course if you use an agent framework this is the kind of stuff that it does for you.
You don't need to write this JSON.
You have a function with with a docstring.
And there's like a utility that will just generate this JSON for you.
So this is the kind of thing that one does if you have to, if you're doing it from scratch like we
are.
If you're using an agent framework, it builds these sort of janky stuff for you.
Uh, but but we have to do it manually.
And now we're going to put all of that into a list of tools.
Uh, the scan function, estimate function, notify function, that is.
Now I need to execute that cell.
Execute that cell.
Execute this cell.
Let's see what it looks like.
Let's just give ourselves a moment to view this.
Here it is.
Here are our tools as a big ton of JSON that describes the different things that we're going to let
our LLM do.
And remember the secret to tool calling is that it's super boring.
What happens is this JSON here like that will be put in the system prompt to the LLM.
And the system prompt will say, hey, you can run any of these tools, or at least the user can if
you want, respond with with uh, stop.
Reason is tool calling.
If you want to call one of these tools, tell me which one I'll run it, and I'll then call you again
with the result.
That's that's what tool calling is all about.
Okay, let's let's now put this together.
We're going to call an LLM with these tools which are referring to fake functions that don't do anything.
They just print okay.
And now we've got a handle tool call function that again you might remember this from week two.
It's pretty generic.
It says uh for tool call in the in the tool calls because there might be many.
It will go through find the function name find the arguments.
And there's this bit of very I don't know whether this is very pythonic, very elegant or whether it's
a bit hacky.
Uh, I just used the fact that in Python globals gives you a list of all of the functions defined globally.
Uh, I collect the function, named this tool name, and then this is again either very elegant python
or a big hack, depending on your school of thought.
Um, but I then call the tool that is described in the response.
I'm relying on the fact that the name of the tool that comes back, like scan the internet for bargains,
is identical to the actual function itself.
So I'm turning that string into a function call.
What you should really do, if you want it to be safe is you should say something like if tool name
is scanned, look at that because it knows if tool name is scan the internet for bargains, then scan
the internet for bargains.
This this is what you should do.
This is safe and careful.
And what I'm doing is, is, is like, uh, I don't know if it's a hacker or if it's ingenious.
Uh, but this and then this is basically translating that string into a function and then calling it
dynamically.
Uh, so, um, yeah.
You like it or hate it, that's, that's what the trick I'm doing here.
And then I'm appending the results back to the message.
So this hopefully is somewhat familiar because we did it in week two.
So I don't need to go through it more okay.
And now we're coming close to uh to another another moment of truth for us.
204 - All right.
Are you ready?
This is really important.
This system message and user message is the most important system message and user message of the entire
course.
So we better we better we better focus here.
System message.
You find great deals on bargain products using your tools and notify the user of the best bargain.
Fair enough.
We'll go with that user message.
First, use your tool to scan the internet for bargain deals.
Then for each deal, use your tool to estimate the true value.
Then pick the single most compelling deal where the price is much lower than the estimated true value,
and use your tool to notify the user.
Then just reply okay to indicate success.
That's it.
That is our instruction.
Let's put that into some messages.
Let's just take a look at messages.
There it is.
That is the same as what I just read to you.
That is our system message and our user prompt.
All right.
Look at this.
The thing to note about this piece of code, the thing that there's one line that is the really important
line, and that line is this one right here.
We say done is false.
And then we say, while not done.
And why is that important?
You might be thinking you are.
Consider that for a second.
It's important because that is our agent loop.
This this is this means that we meet the definition because we have a loop.
It's a loop with a with an agent that is going to go around and it's got tools, it's an agent equipped
with tools.
And when it's responding, uh, to indicate success, it won't call a tool.
It will just it will just finish.
That means that done is true.
The objective is met.
And so this is an LLM in a loop with tools to meet a goal.
And the tools it's got are these sets of tools we're passing in right here.
And these tools are three fake functions that we wrote up there.
All they do is print something and then they return dummy data.
So with that I can run this and it's going to make that fake.
It's going to it's going to really it's going to really use this system message and user prompt arming
the LM with these fake functions, which it thinks as far as it knows, that they're real tools.
And we will see what it does.
Okay.
Here we go.
Deep breath and run.
So it immediately called the fake function to scan the internet.
That returns a hard coded set of deals.
Look at this.
It's just called the fake function to estimate the true value four times.
And it just made the fake function to notify the user of a deal, and then it returned.
Okay, it faster than I could commentate that.
That's what just happened.
They were all fake functions, but it called them all and it called them all autonomously.
It called them all because those were the tools that it thought was right to call at that point.
It is, of course, as you know, it's always tempting to to to try and think of this in a sort of human
like way.
What's going on is that these LM calls are generating tokens, the most likely next tokens, and those
most likely next tokens involve making the tool calls, stopping for reason of tool call for each of
these tool calls one in a row as described by this JSON blob.
Here it knows to first make this tool call and then this for each of those deals.
And then finally notifying the user.
And I think it got five deals and it decided to only call for prices.
That was that was its choice.
Uh, it's uh, it made that autonomous decision right there.
That is the power of autonomy.
Um, so even though we were fairly prescriptive and you could experiment with being less prescriptive,
you could try something really, really short here.
Uh, we were quite specific about what we wanted it to do.
It's still it made its own mind up about some of it.
And but it had all of the right conclusions.
But the thing is that that it's calling fake functions.
And that's not what we want.
We want it to actually call other agents.
So how will we do that?
Well, you probably already realized this, but it's going to be really very easy.
We hardly have to do anything that the LM the planner LM here.
It doesn't know that these functions are fake.
It's just calling these tools.
And it's making that function call which we've just got a print statement in.
But that function call could itself be just making a call to the other agent.
It could just say like Frontier Agent Price or anything like that.
How we implement that function is completely up to us.
And so that's exactly what I've done.
So if we look in autonomous planning agent here, this this is a class which, which basically when
it, when it's when it's created, when it's instantiated, it creates a scanner agent and ensemble
agent and a messaging agent.
It creates instances of each of those.
And then it's got the scan the internet for bargains function and that calls scanner scan.
That's the thing that kicks off a scan that we did a couple of days ago.
It's got estimate true value.
So we did that yesterday.
It's got estimate true value that just calls self dot ensemble dot price.
It calls the price function which will then call all of the other price functions.
And then we've got notify user of deal.
And that calls messenger notify which which again just just just calls the same function as we did yesterday.
And then I've got the same JSON blob.
And now in in the handle tool call I call one of those functions up above.
I have actually written it a little bit better this time.
I have a mapping dictionary that maps from text to the to the function itself, so that I'm not doing
that.
Nasty globals.
I don't know if you think it's elegant or a hack, but I'm not doing it.
I'm doing something a little bit more bulletproof.
In the spirit of this being productionized code that's ready for deployment with with nicely nicely
crafted.
So being a little bit more careful but otherwise the same system message and user prompt.
And here here we have our agent loop.
We have done as false while not done.
And then it loops for every time it calls a tool until it's decided I run out.
No more tools to call, and then it takes the response and it says that it completed with this reply.
And that is going to be our autonomous planning agent.
It's exactly the same thing, except instead of the empty functions, the fake functions, we've actually
made calls to the other agents.
Okay, the time has arrived.
Let's do this.
So, uh, we'll turn on logging again.
We're going to get hold of our of our database.
Have that have that to hand.
Okay.
Now I'm going to say from agents Dot there we go from agents autonomous planning agent import.
The thing we were just looking at right then and let's create it.
Agent is autonomous planning agent collection.
Okay.
Let's let's do this.
So we're going to create this agent.
And when we create the planning agent it's going to create those other agents that it depends on.
And so we'll see what happens here.
It's going to set up.
It's going to do a bunch of imports of course.
Look at that.
Some colors some colors a bunch of things are happening.
The autonomous planning agent initializing scanner agent scanner agent is ready.
Ensemble agent.
The specialist agent is connecting to modal.
Everything is happening.
The agent will have loaded its weights.
Okay, so now.
Now the time has come.
It's going to be time to run.
Agent.
Agent.
Plan.
You ready for this?
Let's kick it off.
All right, so it says the autonomous planning agent is kicking off a run.
It's calling the scanner.
And that's that's in green for the planning agent.
We're now in cyan for the scanner.
The scanner is about to fetch deals from an RSS feed.
So it's so it's doing that that scrape deal thing that's gathered 30.
Or maybe if you've turned it up it might have gathered more.
And now it's calling OpenAI with structured outputs.
It's using structured outputs so that we get back a format that is turned unstructured data into structured
data.
It received five selected deals from OpenAI as part of that structured output.
It's now back with the planning agent to figure out what does it want to do next.
Okay, well, it's going to want to do a few things.
It's first, it's going to to start by running the ensemble agent to estimate the true value of something.
And the ensemble agent starts by calling through light LM the I've got it set up to use OpenAI GPT OS
20 be to be pre-processing the text to turn it into the text with a title and a category and everything,
so that it's in the best possible state for our LMS to estimate the price.
And then it got to the specialist agent.
This is our frontier model.
So not all frontier model specialist model running on modal.
That took 30s to warm up, which it did.
Now the frontier model is running.
Now it's too fast for me.
Now you can see the purple is the frontier model.
The blue is the frontier model.
So purple is the neural network agent.
We've got five products have been priced now.
And now it's come back uh, to, uh, it's come back to the, um, uh, push notification.
And now it has just made a push and there.
Did you hear that?
That was my phone.
I've just got a message.
Amazing.
Deal.
Alert.
Get the Dell 16 plus ultra five.
I got the deal alert.
I got the catching.
It happened.
We just ran our agent framework.
And wasn't that amazing?
205 - So I hope that you are gobsmacked by this.
This was really, really cool.
Uh, I think I just just counted it up.
I think that in total running this framework involved, I've counted this upright, uh, 34 model calls
in total to do all of this.
29 Lrms, five, uh, neural network calls, um, including each of the parts of that agent loop as
a separate call.
Um, because it was like a different, different call to to to to um, uh, out of that, it's we were
calling three different frontier models GPT five, GPT five one, and anthropic, uh, Claude, uh,
45.
And we were calling three open source models, our fine tuned specialist model, uh, the all mini LM,
l6, v2, uh, encoder from Hugging Face and OSS, uh, that we used for GPT oss 20 that we use for
pre-processing.
So three frontier, three open source models.
29.
LMS plus five neural network calls to to our deep neural network for a total of 34 model calls, all
collaborating together in order to achieve this result of finding a Dell 16 Plus Ultra that got sent
to me as a push notification that that is quite a platform.
It's quite a product.
Uh, so I hope you enjoyed this.
I hope you've been able to get this to work yourself.
Remember, if you hit any technical snafus because there's a lot going on here, you can comment stuff
out.
You can reduce the complexity of the ensemble model.
Just just calling one of those models for sure.
Uh, you can simplify down in many different places if all of the moving parts aren't working for you,
but I hope they are.
And I hope you're seeing something like this.
And if you just want, if you're just in it to get the intuition, then it's just important to see that
it really wasn't that hard to build this sophisticated platform with six different 6 or 7 different
models collaborating on this across 34 different calls.
Uh, with this fantastic outcome.
All right.
I will see you for the wrap and take one more look at the architecture that we built and, uh, take
great pride in it.
And if you've managed to tweak it and do anything different, I would love to hear about it.
This is, uh, been so much fun building this.
And you're probably thinking, was that that was the finale, right?
That was that was really great.
No, there's still more.
There's still a little bit more.
We've got one day left of this thing.
One more day.
It's a short day, but it's a great day and it will be our final, final finale, the finale of finales.
We will finish the Agentic workflow by adding in things like memory and stuff like that, and by the
end of it, not only will you be able to do everything on this slide that I'm not going to say yet again,
you'll be able to do all of this, and you'll also be able to say, you know what?
At this point, I am an AI engineer.
206 - Well, the day has finally arrived.
How did we get here so fast?
It's somehow week eight.
Day five.
It is the last day of the program.
What you can already do for sure.
I'm going through it this time.
What you can already do, you can generate text and you can generate code.
And whether you're using frontier models or open source models and also images and audio as well, you
can use APIs and hugging face.
You can use tools, structured outputs we added in.
You can build assistants.
You can use Rag with and without Lang chain and including evaluations.
You can follow that five step strategy to solve problems including curating the data set evaluations,
making a baseline model, fine tuning at the frontier.
You can confidently carry out the end to end process for training a specialized open source model that
in some situations, will outperform the frontier, and you can deploy multiple models.
You can use the serverless AI platform.
You can build a Rag workflow with frontier models and with a neural network.
And after today, we will wrap things up with our agent workflow, and you will be able to to tick that
box and say that you got to the end and you consider yourself an AI engineer.
That is the plan.
You're probably absolutely exhausted.
You're probably thinking, I don't know if I'm an AI engineer, but I know I need some sleep.
Uh, but okay, let's just quickly recap the three definitions of agents that I said at the start of
the week.
Sam Altman OpenAI for a while was putting out there.
It's AI systems that can work independently.
The consensus early in 2025 was that it's about situations where an LLM controls the workflow, and
then the kind of emerging definition is that it's where you have an LLM in a loop with tools to achieve
a goal.
And hopefully you've got a good sense that we did all of these things.
We got an AI system that could work independently, although maybe, arguably we haven't yet completely
ticked that one because we had to kick it off.
We've got AI systems where LM controls the workflow, for sure.
And you saw that loop.
You saw that while not done, uh, you know that we've got a loop.
It runs tools to achieve a goal.
That is why it is a genetic.
And we also covered the hallmarks of an agentic AI solution, breaking a bigger problem into smaller
steps using tools or structured outputs.
An environment where agents collaborate, a planning agent that orchestrates and then autonomy and memory
existing beyond just the construct of an AI assistant, an AI chatbot.
Okay, and that's maybe the one part, that last part that we haven't completely ticked that box and
that that is the box that we will tick right now back in cursor for the last time.
207 - And here we are in cursor and going into week eight and going into day five, we get day five.
How did we get here so fast.
All right.
So it's now time.
The final step building the user interface.
And along with that, another uh, Python module that is going to help us out that I will introduce
for you in just a second.
So first of all, that great line import gradio as G.
And then this from deal agent framework import deal agent framework.
What is that?
I told you we weren't going to use any frameworks.
So what is this exactly.
And then we're bringing in some of the classes we looked at before from deals.
Okay.
So so with that before before we go further, I want to quickly show you what is in this deal agent
framework thing.
So here it is.
Here is the module deal agent framework.
And it's really just the kind of glue that goes around everything.
Uh, and it's just sort of to take us out of the notebook construct with just one little bit of extra
functionality.
So first of all, it has something that sets up logging and does that properly.
And this is the class deal agent framework.
Um, I've added something called memory.
And that sounds like it's something very fancy.
Whenever you hear of memory it sounds like this is very something very clever, ingenious.
But it's typically just talking about loading and saving something from disk.
In some situations, memory is a is a tool that you give an agent so that it can look things up in memory.
In other cases, it's just something that you'll shove in the prompt.
So make sure that it knows about the prior conversation or to to know about deals that it surfaced in
the past.
In that case, that's what we're doing here.
So I've got a function read memory and a function write memory.
And that quite literally reads and writes from a JSON file called memory and memory JSON.
I've clicked on here.
It just has a bunch of JSON to describe prior deals that have been surfaced.
In fact, because our deals are all pedantic objects, it simply writes those pedantic objects to JSON
and into this file.
And that's why the code is so light.
That's what read memory and write memory does.
And there's also a class method reset memory that will put it back to just the first two items.
So there's something a little in there.
There's a log function.
And then there's there's a run function that kicks things off and gets everything up and running.
So this is this is what we have.
Uh, and with that I am now going to, uh, to, to go back to the code so that we can, we can get
this thing running.
Okay.
So we're going to do these imports, we're importing Gradio and we're creating this deal agent framework
object.
Um, all right.
Now the next thing I'm going to do is create a little gradio app.
And, you know, this isn't a Gradio course.
So I'm not going to go super deep on it.
But I just want to explain we're using GR blocks, which is when you want to build a Gradio interface
piece by piece, which we did touch on briefly in week two.
We're giving it a title, The Price Is Right.
We're saying we want to fill the whole width of the interface to not have margins on either side.
And we're going to have, uh, two, two fields here.
Markdown.
The price is right deal hunting agent guy.
And then a sort of like a subheading.
Uh, let's just run this to see what happens if I do.
So, uh, when I run this, it pops up a screen.
The price is right here.
It is a nice gradient UI with, with the with all the usual stuff on an empty screen.
Ready for some action.
Okay.
All right.
So let's go back to the code again and let me show you the next step in this UI.
So we're going to create this deal agent framework.
We're going to have that running.
And meanwhile we're going to uh just just try and build out the user interface a little bit more.
I'm adding in a table which is called a data frame, a table with description, price estimate, discount
URL.
I'm also going to set up some some initial dummy objects, a deal which is going to have a description
example description.
And you know I'm using these things called Gradio callbacks.
This callback means when the user interface is loaded, I want you to call this function get table that's
written right here.
Give it as the inputs, the current deals that I know about and whatever comes out of it.
Connect that to this this gradio table.
All right.
So this may have been a bit abstract for you, but it will come real when I run it.
You see that the deal agent framework runs, which brings up lots of stuff.
Then the UI appears and there's a dummy table with an example item in there.
We're starting to see the beginnings of a user interface okay.
And now and now I have put this user interface into a Python module and it is called Price is right.py.
Let's take a look at it.
It's it's got a bit more I've got some, some funky stuff to deal with with how it's going to uh, collect
the logs, anything that's written to the log and display it in Gradio.
And this is a little bit janky, but but otherwise it's all fine.
It's it's it's pretty Boilerplate stuff that can be a bit wordy, but I'm making it so that it shows
all of the data on the UI.
And I've also got something built in here that means that it sets up a timer so that every five minutes
it will wake up and start things running again.
Um.
Meaning?
Meaning that this will always be running.
Always chugging.
Um.
Always doing some processing.
And again, if I go back to the day five lab, um, first up, I've, uh, remember I have that reset
memory function, a convenient function that is going to delete the memory down to just two recent things
that got surfaced so that we start fresh.
Um, and then the next thing that I can do is kick off the prices right dot pi by doing a UV run.
And that of course is is going to basically do a Python.
It's going to launch that app so that we can see this user interface together and that, that that is
what we're going to be doing in the next video.
208 - Okay, here we go.
I'm clicking here on UV run.py and I am launching this to bring up our new user interface, uh, in
Gradio for this application.
So we are about to see.
Here it is.
This is our Gradio UI.
On the top here is the memory.
The memory from our agent framework of deals.
It surfaced in the past.
On the bottom here, this is the log information from our agents.
I told you the colors would look cool.
These are each of our agents giving us the information.
The messaging agent.
Initialize everything.
Initialize the scanner agent is fetching deals from the RSS feed and currently calling OpenAI using
structured outputs.
Everything is running.
It's all going the.
It's now got to the specialist agent, which is calling the remote fine tune model.
This is model.
We're wasting our 30s for it to warm up.
While it's doing that, I'll mention what you're seeing here of course, is the memory from the 3D plot.
There's what, you might ask, what is the business value of showing this here?
Like what commercial purpose does it have?
It has no commercial purpose whatsoever.
I just think it looks great and it's my agent app so I can do what I want.
Here it is.
And now this is back.
You can see that that modal is running.
It's warm.
So we get the prices.
We're getting the frontier agent, each agent in turn.
And now.
Did you hear that?
Ka ching.
It's recommended for $550 a the Dell laptop.
And it has just appeared right here in the memory.
We have just got our first recommendation from our agent framework.
This is up and running and it will keep running.
This will be running.
And every five minutes it will wake up and do its thing.
And if it finds a compelling deal, it will send me autonomously a push notification to tell me all
about it.
And so this this is the finale I promised.
This, I hope you agree is an epic finale.
This really is the culmination of everything we've been working on for three weeks.
It's got a 34 different model calls, 29 of which are LMS.
And so much happening to bring this to fruition.
And yeah, I advise you, I urge you to have this up and running, sitting there and take great joy
every time you get that text message, that catching up on the push notification on your phone to tell
you that your agent has found another compelling deal.
And back here in cursor, you'll see that we've got the the trace, the logs being printed here as well.
And I mentioned a few things.
There are some more.
I've got another repo where I've built this out a little bit more to use an agent framework and to use
MCP should you wish to look at that.
And then one more time I've got links to LinkedIn.
If you haven't.
If you've somehow got this far and not connected with me.
I don't know how you did that, but this, this is then you're my, my, my final appeal that surely,
surely, at this point, uh, you want to connect with me on LinkedIn or maybe on on X?
Uh, but, uh, wow, congratulations on making it to the to the end of the final project on day five.
Let me see you back there.
You don't want to miss the final wrap up slides.
I will see you back for the wrap up.
Well, I'm sure you knew I was going to bring this one up.
How about it?
It's the end of week eight.
You started eight weeks ago over there on the left.
You were there in week one.
We did the foundational stuff.
We were talking about tokens and things which now seem like such old hat to you.
I'm sure the chat completions, API, OpenAI completions create.
And then in week two we looked at lots of APIs, UIs, multimodality, our first work with tools.
Week three we went to Colab for the first time and worked with hugging face pipelines and then the proper
Transformers models.
Week four was about picking the right LLM for the task at hand, looking at artificial analysis, AI
and and generating code.
Writing something that would port from Python to C++ in week five was rag week.
Good old rag week.
We did long chain one zero.
We did it without.
We did that evil thing.
That was cool.
Week six was curating a data set, building different models, testing out different frontier models,
and then ending with the fine tuning, the frontier model.
That didn't didn't do too well, but we made up for it in week seven and we fine tuned open source model,
a tiny llama 3.2 and crushed it.
Although of course, in week eight, the frontier came back with a vengeance when it was when it had
rag to help it out, it was able to triumph, but it was an ensemble model that did better than anything,
finally getting me my my two handle my 29 point something that I had been after and that also allowed
us to to end with the epic finale of an agentic framework built from scratch, using tools to orchestrate
amongst llms with an agent loop, and with that, with that.
This means that for sure you have.
Now you have earned it.
You can wear your your LLM engineer, your AI engineer badge with pride.
It's it's now about practice, practice, practice, build build stuff and and share it and tag me on
LinkedIn so that I can be part of of what you're building and what you're sharing.
Um, but, uh, you have reached the conclusion you are an AI engineer, and it remains for me to thank
you so much for hanging on in there till the bitter end.
Till the end of week eight.
Day five.
Not everyone makes it through to the end.
I'll say.
And so I'm very grateful that you did.
Thank you.
And yeah, it's it's something where I would really love it if you stayed in touch.
If you ping me and tell me you made it to the end.
Uh, anything that you build, I would love to hear about it.
Please.
Please do.
Obviously, the most important thing to build is thinking of ways that you can apply your new expertise
for for commercial benefit.
Think of ways you can deliver impact with what you've what you've learned, whether it's through using
tools, whether it's through building a rag based system, whether it's fine tuning or something, that's
a gigantic.
Look for opportunities to apply this to make business impact day to day.
That's what it's all about.
I've got an extra sweetener.
I've got got a fun project where I tune, fine tune an LLM on my text message history.
240,000 text messages are in here, and it makes for some entertaining results.
That's something you might want to check out.
and my editor would kill me if I didn't mention one.
One request that we have.
If you're able to rate this course on Udemy, it makes a huge difference.
This is one of the main ways Udemy decides whether or not to recommend the course to others, whether
to suggest it.
And so if you found it valuable and you think that other people would too, then please do rate it and
massively appreciate that it makes all the difference.
And then on another note, uh, if you haven't completely had enough of me, if you're not totally fed
up of Ed, uh, I do have other courses, as I mentioned once or twice.
Uh, there's the course that goes much deeper on Agentic AI.
There's an MLOps course that goes into Productionizing Llms with with things like explainability, observability,
scalability, resiliency.
Lots of good stuff.
And security, of course.
Uh, so so there's, there's that course which will also deploy your, your LLM solutions to Vercel,
AWS, GCP and Azure, uh, for, for uh, for whether you're a startup and you want to be able to have
a subscription SaaS app, or you work at an enterprise and want to deploy to a major cloud provider,
it's all in there.
And then finally, I've got my leadership course.
That's more about the commercial side.
And it's it's mostly designed for non-technical people, but it's good for for tech people too, because
it helps give you that commercial perspective, which can be a superpower for engineers.
So check out some of that on my home page has links to all of it if you're interested in more of me.
And with that one more time, let me offer my heartiest congratulations on this accomplishment on making
it to the very end.
Please post about it on LinkedIn and I'll weigh in to amplify your achievement.
And I just want to say, you could not have picked a better time to be entering this field.
What an exciting time to be involved in the field of of of generative AI and a genetic AI.
What a time to be coming in as an AI engineer.
Congratulations.
Please stay in touch.
I can't wait to hear what you do next.
